Google 



This is a digital copy of a book that was preserved for generations on library shelves before it was carefully scanned by Google as part of a project 

to make the world's books discoverable online. 

It has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one that was never subject 

to copyright or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 

are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often difficult to discover. 

Marks, notations and other maiginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 

publisher to a library and finally to you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud to partner with libraries to digitize public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order to keep providing tliis resource, we liave taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial parties, including placing technical restrictions on automated querying. 
We also ask that you: 

+ Make non-commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request that you use these files for 
personal, non-commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain fivm automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort to Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attributionTht GoogXt "watermark" you see on each file is essential for in forming people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use, remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 
countries. Whether a book is still in copyright varies from country to country, and we can't offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liabili^ can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through the full text of this book on the web 

at |http: //books .google .com/I 



XonDon 
MACMILLAN AND CO. 




FUBLISRERS TO THE VNIVERSITT OF 



^ixttxHsm pm Sm 



BACON 



WRIGHT 



a 



Xonbon 
MACMILLAN AND CO. 




PUBLISHERS TO THE VNtVERStTr OF 



€lnxinlOian |pnss 3ttuB 



BACON,/?-^^.v,.....f Si 



THE 



DVANCEMENT OF LEARNING 



EDITED BT 



WILLIAM ALDIS WRIGHT, M.A. 



SECOND EDITION 



AT THE CLARENDON PRESS 
MDCCCLXXVI 

[All rights reserved "l 



-sSf 



/^ 



PREFACE. 



Francis Bacon was born on the 22nd of January, 1560-1, 
at York House in the Strand, the residence of his father 
Sir Nicholas Bacon, Lord Keeper of the Great Seal. Sixty 
years later, Ben Jonson sang of him as 

' England's high Chancellor ; the destined heir. 
In his soft cradle, to his father's chair.' 

His mother, Anne Cooke, whose eldest sister was married to 
Lord Burleigh, was his father's second wife, and had borne 
him .two children. Anthony, the friend and correspondent of 
Essex, was two years older than Francis. Of their childhood 
nothing is known. In April, 1573, when Francis was little 
more than twelve syears old, the two brothers were entered 
as fellow-commoners at Trinity College, Cambridge, and ma- 
triculated between the loth and 13th of June in the same year. 
They were placed under the care of Dr. Whitgift, Master of the 
Ck>llege, who found this distinguished position not inconsistent 
with holding the Deanery of Lincoln, a Canonry at Ely, and the 
y <rf Teversham ; having, however, previously resigned 
igius Professorship of Divinity. From an account-book 
be kept, and which was published by the late Dr. Mait- 
the Brit Magazine (vols, xxxii. xxxiii), we glean 
£ s of Francis Bacon's University career. We 
tor cCi that during the period of his residence in 

, april 5, 1573, to Christmas 1575, the Master's 

d him with so many pairs of shoes, a bow 
OT tl there was oil bought for his neck, 
to the 'potigarie ' when he was sick, 
he was recovering, that he had a 



Vi PREFACE. 

desk put up in his study, that his stockings were d} 
a cost of i2d,, that his laundress's bill from Midsumr 
Michaelmas was 3 shillings, that his hose were mend( 
windows glazed, two dozen silk points, a pair of pantofl 
pumps bought for him, and a dozen new buttons set 
doublet. Some books the brothers brought >vith then 
London. With others they were furnished by the Mas 
Livy, Cicero, Demosthenes* Olynthiacs, Homer's Iliad, < 
Aristotle, Plato, Xenophon, Sallust, and Hermogenes. 
is an interval in the accounts from the latter part of A 
1574, to the 2ist of March following; during which tir 
plague raged in Cambridge, and the members of th( 
versity were dispersed. The only record of Bacon's res 
at Trinity is a reminiscence of his own preserved in the 
Sylvarum (cent. ii. 151), which shows that at this early 
he had begun to observe natural phenomena. * I reme 
he says, * in Trinity College in Cambridge, there was an 
chamber, which being thought weak in the roof of i 
supported by a pillar of iron, of the bigness of one's a 
the midst of the chamber ; which if you had struck, it 
make a little flat noise in the room where it was struck, 
would make a great bomb in the chamber beneath.' W 
possibly have here a description of the rooms occupied 
two brothers, but if so they must have been in the bu 
of King's Hall, removed by Dr. Nevill in constructing tl 
sent Old Court. No tradition of their whereabouts re 
If we add to these fragments an anecdote related by Dr 
ley, his chaplain and earliest biographer, we are in pos: 
of all that is known of Francis Bacon up to the time t 
completed his fifteenth year. Rawley's story introduce 
a child of singular gravity and adroitness, the future 
cellor and courtier. The Queen 'delighted much t 
confer with him, and to prove him with questions; 
whom he delivered himself with that gravity and m; 
above his years, that Her Majesty would often ten 
" The young Lord Keeper." Being asked by the Quec 
eld he was, he answered with much discretion, bein; 



PREFACE. Vll 

but a boy, " That he was two years younger than Her Ma-^ 

jesty's happy reign ;" with which answer the Queen was much 

taken.* Another anecdote from the same source, of which 

more than enough has been made, belongs to this period. 

'Whilst he was commorant in the University, about sixteen 

years of age (as his lordship hath be^n pleased to impart unto 

myself), he first fell into the dislike of the philosophy of 

Aristotle ; not for the worthlessness of the author, to whom 

he would ever ascribe all high attributes, but for the unfniit- 

fiilness of the way; being a philosophy (as his lordship used to 

say) only strong for disputations and contentions, but barren 

of the production of works for the benefit of the life of man ; 

vhich mind he continued to his dying day.* 

The story which has been told above of the iron pillar in 

the chamber at Trinity shows that Bacon's attention had 

been very early directed to the observation of sounds, and 

lends a probability to the supposition that it may have been 

at this time that he tried the experiment recorded in the 

Sylva Sylvarum (cent. ii. 140). * There is in St. James's Fields 

a conduit of brick, unto which joineth a low vault ; and at the 

end of that a round house of stone ; and in the brick conduit 

there is a window; and in the round-house a slit or rift of 

some little breadth ; if you cry out in the rift, it will make a 

fearful roaring at the window.' In all this there is a certain 

ring of boyishness. To this time also belongs the story of the 

conjuror (Sylva, cent. x. 946), who must have exhibited his 

tricks at Sir Nicholas Bacon's house before Francis left 

England. 

But his father had in view for him a public career as states- 

1 or diplomatist, and after he had spent nearly three years 

over his books at Cambridge, sent him to France to read men. 

On the 25th of September, 1576, we learn from Burghley's 

y, * Sir Amyas Paulet landed at Calliss going to be Amb. 

at France in Place of Dr. Dale.' It was not till the February 

ing that he succeeded to the post. Bacon apparently 

d him after his arrival in Paris, for on Nov. 21, 1576, he 

nitted of the grand company at Gray's Inn, having 



Vlll PREFACE, 

entered the Society on the 2 7th of June previous. He was sub- 
sequently * entrusted with some message or advertisement tc 
the Queen ; which having performed with great approbation, 
he returned back into France again, with intention to continue 
for some years there.* (Rawl^.) Here we find him still keen 
in his observation of natural phenomena, sounds as before 
occupying a great share of his attention. Let him describe 
what he heard in his own words written nearly fifty years 
later. * For echoes upon echoes, there is a rare instance thereof 
in a place which I will now exactly describe. It is some three 
or four miles from Paris, near a town called Pont-Charenton ; 
and some bird-bolt shot or more from the river of Seine. 
The room is a chapel or small church. The walls all stand- 
ing, both at the sides and at the ends. Two rows of pillars, 
after the manner of aisles of churches, also standing ; the roof 
all open, not so much as any embowment near any of the walls 
left. There was against every pillar a stack of billets above a 
man*s height ; which the watermen that bring wood down the 
Seine in stacks, and not in boats, laid there (as it seemeth) for 
their ease. Speaking at the one end, I did hear it return the 
voice thirteen several times : and I have heard of others, thai 
it would return sixteen times : for I was there about three of 
the clock in the afternoon ; and it is best (as all other echoes 

are) in the evening I remember well, that when I went to 

the echo at Pont-Charenton, there was an old Parisian, who 
took it to be the work of spirits, and of good spirits. For 
(said he) call Satan, and the echo will not deliver back the 
devil's name ; but will say, va fen ; which is as much in French 
as apage or avoid. And thereby I did hap to find that ar 
echo would not return S, being but a hissing and an interioi 
sound.' (Sylva Sylvarum, cent. iii. 249, 251.) Another stor^ 
which he tells of himself belongs to this period of his life. * ] 
had, from my childhood, a wart upon one of my fingers : after- 
wards, when I was about sixteen years old, being then at Paris 
there grew upon both my hands a number of warts (at the 
least an hundred) in a month's space. The English ambassador's 
lady, who was a woman far from superstition, told me one day. 



PREFA CE, IX 

she would help me away with my warts : whereupon she got 
a piece of lard, with the skin on, and rubbed the warts all 
over with the fat side ; and amongst the rest, that wart which 
I had had from my childhood : then she nailed the piece of 
lard, with the fet towards the sun, upon a post of her chamber 
window, which was to the south. The success was, that 
within five weeks' space all the warts went quite away : and 
that wart which I had so long endured, for company.' (Sylva 
Sflvarum, cent. x. 997.) The questions of sounds and mys- 
terious sympathies did not,, however, occupy the whole of his 
active mind. It was while at Paris learning diplomacy that 
he invented the cypher which he describes at the end of the 
sixth book of the De Augmentis, and here too he probably 
saw that strange visionary, Guillaume Postell, in his retreat 
at the monastery of St. Martin des Champs. In the summer 
of 1577, the French Court was at Poitiers. Sir Amias Paulet, 
with Bacon probably in his suite, remained there from the end 
of July to the latter end of Octqjber. That Bacon was at 
Poitiers at some time during his residence in France we 
know from his own account of a conversation with a cynical 
young Frenchman, perhaps a student, who afterwards became 
a man of considerable distinction. (Hist. Vitae et Mortis, 
Works, ii. 211.) There is no evidence however that he him- 
self studied at the University there. 

But now an event occurred which changed the whole cur- 
rent of his life. On the 20th of February, 1578-9, Sir Nicholas 
Bacon died, after an illness of only a few days. His death, by 
a strange coincidence, was foreshadowed by a dream, which 
on upon after reflection appears to have regarded almost 
I sign of the coming disaster. * I myself remember,' he 
says, 'that being in Paris, and my father dying in London, 
or three days before my father's death I had a dream, 
wmch I told to divers English gentlemen, that my father's 
house in the country was plastered all over with black mortar.' 
Iva, cent. x. 986.) A month later, on the 20th of March, 
1578-9, Bacon left Paris, bearing with him a despatch and 
commendations from Sir Amias Paulet to the Queen. His 



X PREFACE, 

father, according to Rawley, had accumulated a considera) 
sum of money for the purpose of purchasing an estate for 
youngest son, but his sudden death prevented its accompli* 
ment, and Francis was left with only a fifth part of his fathe 
personal property. Diplomacy was now abandoned as a care 
his prospects of a studious leisure became more distant th 
ever, and for one who would willingly have lived only to stuc 
there was nothing left but to study how to live *, Soon aft 
his return to England he appears to have entered upon 
course of law at Gray's Inn, and on the 27th of June, 15 J 
we find him admitted as an utter barrister. The next ye 
he is seen abroad in the city in his barrister's dress, and pr 
mises to do well. Meanwhile he has made a beginning 
the great work on which his fame was to rest, the first sket 
of which he called, as he told Father Fulgentio forty yes 
later, by the ambitious title of ^emporis Partus Maximus, 

In 1584 Bacon appeared upon a new stage, which he nev 
left for thirty years and upwards, and on which some of 1 
greatest triumphs were achieved. On the 23rd of Novemb 
he took his seat in the House of Commons as member f 
Melcombe Regis, in Dorsetshire. In D'Ewes's Journal (p. 3 3 < 
his name appears on the Committee appointed on the 9th 
December to consider the 'Bill for redress of Disorders 
Common Informers.* In the next Parliament, which ra 
Oct. 29, 1586, he sat for Taunton, and on the 4th of N 
vember made a speech on * the great cause ' of Mary, Que* 
of Scots, but no report of it has been preserved. With oth 
members of both Houses he attended (Nov. 12) upon tl 

• Of his personal appearance at this time we can form an idea fro 
the interesting picture pamted by Hilliard in 1 5 78, with the significa 
motto, showing that his intellectual pre-eminence was already becomii 
conspicuous, Si tabula daretur digna, animum mallem. The artist is ; 
of whom Donne says : — 

* A hand or eye 
By Hilliard drawn, is worth i. history 
By a worse painter made.' 



PREFACE. XI 

Queen, to present a petition for the speedy execution of Mary. 

In the previous February he had been admitted to the high 

table at Gray's Inn, and in due course became a bencher. 

Beyond the fact that he was on the * Committees appointed 

for conference touching a loan or benevolence to be offered 

to Her Majesty,' and of the Bill for Attainder, and that he was 

one of those sent up to confer with the Lords about the Bill 

for continuance of Statutes, we hear no more of Bacon during 

the present Parliament. The next finds him member for 

Liverpool, busy on frequent committees, and reporting their 

proceedings to the House. The Marprelate controversy was 

now at its height, and Bacon delivered his judgement, full of 

wisdom and moderation, on the points in dispute, in a paper 

which remained unprinted during his lifetime, called *An 

Advertisement touching the Controversies of the Church of 

England.' It contains the germs of his essay * Of Unity in 

Religion.' 

In 1589 he received his first piece of preferment in the 
form of the reversion of an office, which however did not fall 
in for nearly twenty years. Under the date of Oct. in this year 
we find the entry in Burghley*s printed diary, * A Graunt of 
the Office of Clerk of the Counsell in the Starr Chamber to 
Francis Bacon.' The office was worth 1600/. or 2000/. a year, 
and was executed by deputy, but Bacon had to exercise the 
patience of hope till July 16, 1608 ; and meanwhile, as he said 
hi ;lf, * it was like another man's ground buttalling upon his 
1 ', which might mend his prospect, but it did not fill his 
.' (Rawley.) He was a poor man in purse for many years 
10 come, toiling in a profession in which his heart was not ; 
, as he writes to Burghley, with as vast contemplative ends 
as he had moderate civil ends, for he had taken all knowledge 
to be his province. His highest ambition at this time was to 
k put in an office which should place him above the reach of 
f and leave him leisure to prosecute his intellectual con- 
. This was the career he longed for at thirty-one, and 
tt IS important to bear it in mind as helping in some degree to 
vindicate his motives in later life. 



Xll PREFACE. 

In February, 159 1-2, his brother Anthony came to live in 
Gray's Inn, and from the motherly solicitude of Lady Bacon 
for her eldest son's religious welfare, we learn that Francis 
was negligent in the use of family prayers, and was not to be 
held up as a pattern to his brother, or resorted to for counsel 
in such matters. 

To the autumn of 1592 Mr. Spedding with great probability 
assigns the speeches in praise of Knowledge and of the Queen, 
which were apparently written for some Court device, perhaps 
that contrived by the Earl of Essex for the Queen's day. In 
close connexion with the latter of these is the treatise entitled 
* Certain observations upon a libel published this present year, 
1592,' which Bacon wrote in reply to the Responsio ad edictum 
RegincB AngHcB of Father Parsons. 

In the Parliament which met on February 19, 1592-3, Bacon 
who had hitherto been returned only by boroughs, now sat as 
member for Middlesex. It was in the course of this sessior 
that, according to Macaulay, * he indulged in a burst of patriot- 
ism, which cost him a long and bitter remorse, and which he 
never ventured to repeat.' In this sounding sentence there ij 
hardly a word of truth. What really happened may be brieflj 
told. On the 26th of February Bacon, with Sir Robert Ceci 
and other leading members of the House, moved that a com- 
mittee of supply be appointed to provide against the danger? 
with which the country was threatened both by Rome anc 
Spain, and other confederates of the Holy League. A fe\« 
fragments of his speech in support of the motion have beer 
preserved, and he himself was one of the committee appointed 
Another committee was formed by the Lords, the two com- 
mittees consulted together, and the result of their conference 
was communicated to the House of Commons by Sir Robert 
Cecil. The Lords demanded at least a treble subsidy, payable 
in three years by two instalments each year. Bacon spoke 
next, * and yielded to the subsidy, but misliked that this House 
should join with the Upper House in the granting of it. 
(D'Ewes, JoiuTial of the House of Commons, p. 483.) Hii 
opposition was solely in defence of the privilege of the Hoi 



PREFACE. xiil 

of Commons, and to preserve this he moved, * that now they 
might proceed herein by themselves apart from their Lord- 
ships.' After considerable discussion the question was ultim- 
ately put to the House, that no such conference should be 
had with the Lords, and was carried by a majority of 217 to 
128. The point of privilege was yielded, and a motion of Sir 
Walter Ralegh's for a general conference with the Lords 
carried unanimously. As the result of this, the original pro- 
position was so far modified that four years instead of three 
were to be allowed for the payment of the subsidies. Bacon 
'assented to three subsidies, but not to the payment under six 
years,' but he was outvoted and made no further difficulty. 
Such was the solitary act of patriotism of which Macaulay 
says Bacon was guilty. And even for this, he adds, he made 
the most abject apologies. Two letters of Bacon's on this 
subject have been preserved, one to Lord Burghley, the other 
probably, as Mr. Spedding conjectures, to Essex. The tone 
of both is that of manly justification of his conduct ; in neither 
is there one syllable of apology or regret for what he had 
done. He is evidently surprised at being misunderstood. The 
Queen was angry at his speeches, and Bacon expresses his 
grief that she * should retain an hard conceit ' of them. What 
follows is very instructive. *It mought please her sacred 
Majesty to think what my end should be in those speeches, 
if it were not duty, and duty alone. I am not so simple but I 
I how the cdmmon beaten <vuay to please. And whereas popul- 
arity hath been objected, I muse what care I should take to 
please many, that taketh a course of life to deal with few.* 

At this juncture the Attorney-Generalship was vacant, and 

whatever chance Bacon might have had, through the influence 

of Essex, of being appointed to the post, was entirely nullified 

by the Queen's displeasure. For himself he was not anxious 

for the honour, but he assured Elizabeth, in a letter which was 

>nded to appease her, that he was ready to do that for her 

ice which he would not do for his own gain. * My mind,* 

s, * tumeth upon other wheels than those of profit.' Had 

A not been for this chance, however, he would probably have 



xiv PREFACE, 

relieved himself from the embarrassment of his debts by sdlia^r 
the reversion of his property and purchasing an annuity, and 
would then have abandoned a profession for which he had no 
love, and lived the life of a student. But he was kept in sus- 
pense during the summer of 1593, and the delay decided his 
future career. 

In March, 1593-4, he drew up a report, not printed in his 
lifetime, * of the detestable treason, intended by Dr. Roderigo 
Lopez, a physician attending upon the person of the Queen's 
Majesty,* which had been traced out with great skill by Essex. 
The latter meanwhile was urging Bacon's claims upon the 
Queen with a pertinacity and petulance which rather injured 
than furthered his cause. Heartsick with hope deferred, 

Bacon writes to his friend, * I will, by God's assistance 

retire myself with a couple of men to Cambridge, and there 
spend my life in my studies and contemplations, without look- 
ing back.' On the loth of April Coke's patent as Attorney- 
General was made out and delivered. By this appointment 
the Solicitorship became vacant, and Essex renewed his im- 
portunities with the Queen, who disparaged Bacon in his legal 
capacity as one who was not deep, but rather showed to the 
utmost of his knowledge, while she admitted he had * a great 
wit and an excellent gift of speech, and much other good 
learning.' On the 27th of July, 1594, being detained by illness 
at Huntingdon on his way north, he paid a visit to Cambridge, 
and received the honorary degree of Master of Arts. The 
Queen was still relentless, but had given way so far as to 
employ him on the 13th of June in the examination of two 
persons in the Tower, who were implicated in a coi y. 

In August and September he is again at work upon t 
of the same kind. Still the long hoped-for promotion did not 
come. In the Christmas vacation of this year he amused him- 
self with beginning his * Promus of Formularies and Elega 
cies,* and in writing speeches for an entertainment at Gray's 
Inn. The suspense of more than a year and half was brought 
to an end by the appointment of Serjeant Fleming to the 
Solicitorship on the 5th of November, 1595. Essex was mor^ 



PREFACE. XV 

tified at the ill success of his suit, the failure of which had 
perhaps in some measure been due to his own want of judge- 
ment in pressing it. Lady Bacon said truly, * though the Earl 
showed great affection, he marred all with violent courses.* 
But he generously resolved that his friend should not be alto- 
• a loser by his friendship. The relation between them 
at juncture is excellently expressed by Mr. Spedding. 
*In account between him and Bacon the obligation was 
not all on one side. Bacon owed him much for his friendship, 
trust, and eager endeavours to serve him. He owed Bacon 
I, not only for affection and zeal, but for time and pains 
:uitously spent in his affairs. These he had done his best 
to requite in the best way — namely by advancing him in his 
jssion ; but having failed, he (not unnaturally) desired to 
e him some reparation.* * You shall not deny,* said Essex, 
*to accept a piece of land which I will bestow upon you.* 
B declined, but the Earl insisted, and what followed 
I t)e told in Bacon's own words, because it shows in what 
le viewed the respective duties of citizenship and friend- 
aup, and how fixed a principle it was with him that, like 
Pericles, he could only be a friend tuque ad arasy so far, that 
is, as was consistent with higher obligations. After in vain 
Mivouring to persuade Essex not to imitate the Duke of 
Liuise and turn his estate into obligations, he said, * My Lord, 
1 see I must be your homager and hold land of your gift : but 
io you know the manner of doing homage in law ? Always it 
s with a saving of his faith to the King and his other lords : 
nd therefore, my Lord* (said I), *I can be no more yours 
'. was, and it must be with the ancient savings.* It looks 
t Bacon already foresaw that the impetuous rashness of 
issex might at some time place him in such a position that 
lower duty would have to give way before the higher, 
low strongly he felt this is shown by the closing sentence of 
letter to the Earl, which is very properly assigned to this 
1 of his life, and carries with it a warning sound. * I 
n myself as a common (not popular, but common) ; and as 
as is lawful to be enclosed of a common, so much your 



XVI PREFACE, 

Lordship shall be sure to have.' Five years later he reitei 
in the same tone, * I humbly pray you to believe that I a 
to the conscience and commendation first of bonus civisy -w 
with us is a good and true servant to the Queen, and nes 
bonus vir, that is, an honest man.' But of this anon, 
result of the present negotiation was that Essex prese 
Bacon with a piece of land, which he afterwards sold to 1 
nold Nicholas for 1800/. 

At what precise time Bacon was appointed by the Q; 
one of her counsel learned in the law, is not quite certain 
has been supposed that the appointment was made as ear 
the beginning of 1592, and he is certainly described by 
title in a lease of sixty acres of land in Zelwood Forest, Soi 
setshire, which was granted him by the Crown, July 14, i 
From the fact that he is not so described in the grant of 
reversion of the lease of Twickenham Park, dated Nov 
1595, it would seem that he had been made Queen's coi 
in the interval. Meanwhile he consoled himself for his 
fessional disappointments by increased devotion to his favoi 
studies, and early in 1597 published, in a small volume, the 
instalment of his Essays, which had been written some 
before, and were already circulated in manuscript. Fror 
expression in the dedication to his brother Anthony, he t 
ently regarded the publication as premature. * I doe nc 
he says, Mike some that have an brcharde ill neighbc 
that gather their fruit before it is ripe, to prevent steal 
The same volume contained the Colours of Good and Evil, 
the Meditat tones Sacra, Traces of his hand are also t( 
found in the * Advice to the Earl of Rutland on his Tra^ 
and to * Sir Fulke Greville on his Studies,' which appear in 
name of Essex, and belong to the beginning of 1596. 

On the 30th of April, 1596, the Mastership of the I 
became vacant by the death of Lord Keeper Puckering, 
the promotion of Egerton to his place. For this post Bj 
was again a candidate, Essex as before supported his claim, 
with the same result, suspense and ultimate disappointn: 
Burghley's influence was exerted with no better success. 






PREFACE, XVll 

had endeavoured to procure the Solicitorship for his nephew, 
and, failing that, *the place of the Wards;' probably, as 
Mr. Spedding conjectures, the office of Attorney of the 
Wards. But all came to nothing, as did another suit of a 
more private nature, which Bacon contemplated if he did not 
prosecute, and in which Essex again stood his friend. It is 
not certain that he ever actually proposed for the hand of 
Lady Hatton, the young and wealthy widow of Sir William 
Hatton, and granddaughter of Burghley. From an expression 
is one of his letters to Essex it is probable that he saw no 
opportunity of urging his suit with success, and on the 7th of 
November, 1598, the lady became the wife of his determined 
enemy. Sir Edward Coke. 

It was during the autumn of 1597 that an estrangement 
took place between Bacon and Essex. Warnings on the one 
side, which were unheeded on the other, * bred in process of 
2i time,' says Bacon in his Apology, * a discontinuance of private- 
ess. •• . between his Lordship and myself; so as I was 
t d nor advised with, for some year and half before his 
01 's going into Ireland, as in former time.' After the 
success of the Cadiz expedition. Bacon wrote a letter 
aavice to the Earl touching his conduct; a letter full of the 
lest wisdom, showing the clear apprehension which the 
Titer had of the weak points of Essex's character. The 
nee between the policy he recommended and the 
t ivhich Essex adopted cannot be more strikingly put 
I m Bacon's own words in his Apology : * I ever set this 
D, 1 the only course to be held with the Queen, was by 
qmc and observance . . . My Lord on the other 

a settled opinion that the Queen could be brought 
louimg but by a kind of necessity and authority.' How 
his was no man knew better by experience than Bacon 
', who ever in season and out of season gave him * the 
il of a wise and then a prophetical friend.' (Sir H. 
n.) But it was all in vain. Essex's nature was too 
jnt to follow a course which involved so much self- 
, He went his own way, and in a few brief years 

b 



XVIU PREFACE. 

followed the partial faflure of the Island Toyage, the tot 
failure of the Irish expedition, his hasty return, the Queen' 
displeasure, and then the final catastrophe. 

But we must go back for a while to see in what qiattef! 
Bacon was occupied. In 1595 the question of Star-Chambei 
Fees was undergoing investigation, and in consequence, cer 
tain fees hitherto claimed by the Clerk had been restrained 
by the Lord Keeper. Bacon, who was inmiediately interested 
addressed a paper to Egerton on the subject in July 1597 
His estate at this time, as he confesses in another letter, % 

* weak and indebted,' a condition which he attributed in p 
to the slender provision made for him by his fether, a 
greatly also to the plan of his own life, in which he *rat! 
referred and aspired to virtue than to gain.' Want was steal 
ing upon him. But he was not disheartened. There we 
three means of preventing it : his practice, in which he ^ 
conscious of not playing his best; the prospect of a ] 
under government ; and the reversion of the clerkship ot 
Star-Ghamber. The last of these he proposed to give up 
the Lord Keeper's son, if Egerton would obtain the Master 
ship of the Rolls for him ; but once more he fuled, and 
oflfice was not filled up till the next reign. 

The ninth Parliament of Elizabeth met on the a4th 
October, 1597, and Bacon sat as member for Ipswich. > 
first speech was on a motion which he brought fon 

* against depopulation of towns and houses of husbandry, 1 
for the maintenance of husbandry and tillage,' a qi 
which in after years possessed his mind, and was discussec 
his Essay * Of the true Greatness of Kingdoms and Esta 
first published in 16 12, and again in his History of Henry "^ 
in 1622. An examination of D'Ewes's Journal of the H< 
of Commons shows that his name is to be found on c 
mittees for the consideration of every question of imj 
ance during this session, and that though the Qneen had 
yet forgiven his conduct on a former occasion, hb p< 

the House was as high as ever. 
Snt if his ivpuUUioii was luancafliiig his dcfala 



PREFACE, Xi:^ 

creasing too, and in September 1598 he was arrested on his 
way from the Tower, where he had been engaged in the in- 
vestigation of a plot for the murder of the Queen. He com- 
plained of the indignity thus offered him to Sir Robert Cecil 
and the Lord Keeper Egerton, but how he was relieved from 
it we have no information. A history of the conspiracy from 

>en appeared in the following year. 
In the spring of 1599 Essex set out on his disastrous exped- 
ition to Ireland. Bacon had already so far renewed his 
•course with the Earl as to write him two letters of 
£ !. A third Cassandra-like note of warning was sounded 
before his departure, containing two maxims which Essex 
ias only too apt to forget, *that merit is worthier than 
une,* and 'that obedience is better than sacrifice.* He 
ifflded in Dublin on the 15th of April, and on the 28th of 
J smber he startled the Queen at Nonsuch, by rushing 
tavel-stained into her chamber while she was dressing, * her 
about her face,' as a letter-writer of the time tells us. 
nd what had he done meanwhile ? Practically, as Mr. Sped- 
puts it, * whatever might be said in justification of this 
r that item of the account, the totals must stand thus ; — 
ipended, 300,000/. and ten or twelve thousand men: re- 
ived, a suspension of hostilities for six weeks, with promise 
I fortnight's notice before recommencing them, and a 
il communication from Tyrone of the conditions upon 
I he was willing to make peace.' Between ten and 
o'clock the same night he was ordered to keep his 
His first plan of bringing over with him a part of 
nny to enable him to make conditions with the govern- 
had been abandoned by the advice of his stepfather 
k, his friend Southampton. But he took with him 
Dody-guard of trusty men, * who might have secured 
any commitment.' On the ist of October he 
Ma in the custody of the Lord Keeper at York 
Bacon, who at this time had constant access to the 
\ C :ed by popular rumour with irritating her 
'Aocordmg to the ordinary charities of 
b2 



XX PREFACE. 

Court/ he says with quiet irony, *it was given out 
was one of them that incensed the Queen against m 
of Essex.' To Elizabeth's plan of having 'somewhs 
lished in the Star-Chamber, for the satisfaction of th( 
touching my Lord of Essex his restraint,' Bacon was 
opposed, and his opposition gave her great offence 
charged him with being absent from the Star-Ghambe 
the declaration was made on the 29th of November, 
he was absent we have his own evidence to prove, 
pleaded indisposition as the cause. An unjust suspici 
upon him of having given the Queen an opinion in th< 
of Essex in opposition to that of the Lord Chief Justi 
the Attorney-General. His life was even threatened ; 
had ' the privy coat of a good conscience,* and felt tha 
falsehoods would recoil upon their authors. Essex s 
mained in the custody of the Lord Keeper, and foi 
months not a word passed between the Queen and 
about him. But neither of them at this time knew th< 
of Essex's guilt. They knew nothing of his first de 
landing in England with two or three thousand men, t( 
■good his position till he could gain support. The) 
nothing of the treasonable intention with which "M 
succeeded to Essex's command in Ireland; an in 
which had no less a scope than with half his army to j« 
King of Scots in an armed demonstration to supp 
right to the succession, the party headed by Essex in E 
working to the same end. James was too timid or to 
to listen to such a proposal, and the plot was for th 
abandoned. Before it was revived Montjoy had come 
senses, and then * utterly rejected it as a thing which h< 
no way think honest.' 

In the meantime Essex was released from custoc 
allowed to retire to his own house, still however ren 
under surveillance. Towards the end of the Easter te 
Queen admitted to Bacon that the former * proceeding 
Star-Chamber had done no good, but rather kindled f 
bruits (as she termed them) than quenched them.' 81 



PREFACE. XXI 

jed to proceed by public information against Essex. 
)r this, Bacon urged, it was far too late ; at which the 
I was offended. At the beginning of the next term the 
t was again discussed between them. Bacon as before 
ling any public process. The Queen finally resolved 

matter should be heard before a commission at York 
. Her counsel had their parts assigned to them. At 
: was doubtful whether Bacon, in consideration of his 
ns with Essex, and the way in which he had consist- 
pleaded his cause, would be allowed any share in the 
jdings. He begged to be excused, but held himself 
to obey the Queen's commands, thinking that by so 
Iding to her he might be in a better position to serve 

Up to this time it must be remembered he knew 
g of the Earl's treasonous designs, and regarded his 
j1 with the Queen as a storm which would soon blow 
In the distribution to the counsel of their several 
Bacon was allotted one which seemed insignificant, and 
ven him as least calculated to do harm to Essex. The 
Council with their assessors met at York House on the 
* June. Essex was acquitted of disloyalty, but censured 
•ntempt and disobedience in neglecting his instructions 
eserting his conunand. Bacon, by the Queen's order, 
up a narrative of what had passed, in which he touched 
Essex's faults with so tender a hand, that Elizabeth was 
i and said, *she perceived old love would not easily be 
ten.' Bacon with great adroitness took advantage of 
xpression. 'Whereunto I answered suddenly, that I 
meant that by herself.' In a short time Essex was 

trom the slight restraint which had been placed upon 
>ut forbidden to come to the Court. His fate was again* 
own hands. 

far it was proved that Bacon's policy was the true one, 
liat by keeping on good terms with the Queen he could 

serve Essex than by placing himself in opposition to 
His principles however remained the same as before, 
my Lord of Essex,' he writes to Lord Henry Howard, 



XxH PREFACE. 

* I am not servile to him, having regard to my superior dul 
I have been much bound unto him. And on the other side 
have spent more time and more thoughts about his we 
doing than ever I did about mine own.' Still he had 
suspicion of the dangerous secrets of which Essex was co 
scious. His counsel was as ever patience, and for a time t 
Earl, to the outer world at least, seemed heedful of his advic 
To his intimates he presented another aspect. * In my 1 
discourse,* says Sir John Harington, *he uttered stran 
wordes, borderynge on suche strange desygns that made i 
hastene forthe, and leave his presence; thank heaven I a 
safe at home, and if I go in suche troubles againe, I deser 
the gallowes for a meddlynge foole : His speeches of the Q 
becomethe no man who hathe mens sana in corpore son 
(Nugae Antiquae, ii. 225, ed. 1779.) His patent for t 
monopoly of sweet wines was to expire at Michaelmas, a 
he petitioned for a renewal of the lease. His petition \n 
refused and his patience at an end. From this time t 
Queen, who evidently was better informed than Bacon as 
what Essex had really done, and supposed that Bacon ki 
as much as herself, was so angry at his importunity for I 
friend that she would no longer see him. For three moni 
this estrangement lasted. It was not till after New Yea 
Day, 1 600-1, that Bacon was admitted to her presence, a 
then boldly and *with some passion 'spoke his mind. 'Mac 
I see you withdraw your favour from me, and now that I ha 
lost many friends for your sake, I shall leese you too. . . 
A great many love me not, because they think I have be 
against my Lord of Essex ; and you love me not, because y 
know I have been for him : yet will I never repent me, tl 
I have dealt in simplicity of heart towards you both, witl 
respect of cautions to myself, and therefore 'vivus viden 
pereo^ The Queen was moved by the earnestness of 
protestations, and spoke kindly to him as of old ; but of I 
never a word. Henceforth Bacon determined to meddle 
more in the matter, and never saw the Queen again till t 
Earl had put himself beyond the reach of intercession. 



PREFACE. XXlll 

devoted his energies to his own affairs, which were still 
rrassed, and to the business of his profession, in which 
IS gradually but surely rising. On the 24th of October, 
he had been made Double Reader at Gray's Inn, and 
is lectures for the Lent term to prepare on the Statute 
ss* 

to the 8th of February, 1600--1, it is abundantly evident 
Bacon had done his utmost to restore Essex to the 
a's favour. His efforts were vain, but they were made, 
'ere made, moreover, not only at the risk but with the 
of bringing the Queen's displeasure upon himself. And 
came the crisis in which his worst forebodings were 
than realised. Essex, left to his own devices and the 
my and counsel of men who used him as an instrument 
eir own ends, plunged deeper and deeper in guilt. As 
ago as the previous August he had again sounded 
joy on the subject of an armed demonstration in con- 
ion with the King of Scotland. But Montjoy turned 
f ear. Still there were hopes from James. Meanwhile 
2cret which had hitherto been confined to a few was 
iger of being divulged. The discontented spirits of all 
s were encouraged to rally round Essex, though without 
ing the full extent of the conspiracy they were intended 
)port. Before Christmas, Essex had determined to se- 
his access to the Queen in such sort as might not be 
2d. By the end of January the plot had assumed a defin- 
rm. He was 'resolved not to hazard any more com- 
ments and restraints.' On the 3rd of February the 
or attacking the Court was made and the parts assigned 
; CQjispirators. Sir Christopher Blount was to seize the 
gate, Sir Charles Davers the presence, and Sir John 
s the hall and water-gate. The guard being over- 
red and the Queen's person secured, the Earl and his 
any were to enter from the Mews, and make their own 
* Cecil, Ralegh, and Cobham were to be removed, 
had no intention of injuring the Queen ; but, as Blount 
ssed on the scaffold, they were prepared, rather than 



XXiv PREFACE. 

faU in their ends, to have even 'drawn blood from h 
The gatherings at Essex House had attracted the att 
of the Court, and on Saturday the 7th of February Ess< 
summoned before the Privy Council. He refused to g( 
in the evening, fearing that the Lords knew more tha: 
did, proposed to make the attack. But the guai 
doubled at Whitehall, and next morning Charing Cro 
Westminster were barricaded. There was nothing n( 
but to raise the City. At ten o'clock on Sunday mc 
the Lord Keeper, the Earl of Worcester, Sir William K 
and the Lord Chief Justice repaired to Essex House. 1 
men had been running hither and thither all night to su 
his friends, and by this time wellnigh three hundred 
assembled. The arrival of the Lord Keeper preci] 
their action. Essex cried out that he should be mui 
in his bed, that his enemies had forged his name, an 
he was armed in self-defence. The Lord Keeper pre 
that he should have justice done, but it was now to< 
Essex left him and his companions prisoners, and rushi 
with some two hundred followers on foot, crying hyste 
that plots were laid against his life, and that the count 
sold to the Spaniard. Not a man stirred in his defence, 
conspirators marched through the City as far as Fen( 
Street to the house of Sheriff Smith, and there Essex s 
signs that his nerve had forsaken him. Making the 
back to Ludgate Hill, they found the street closed j 
them. A fight ensued, in which one or two were si 
either side, Essex was shot through the hat, Blount wc 
and taken prisoner. The Earl, with some fifty foUowe 
caped by water to Essex House, and by ten o'clock 
evening surrendered. And so ended this miserable and 
impatience.' But there was evidently a mystery whii 
Court had not penetrated, and to unravel it Bacon with 
of her Majesty's counsel was employed. They soo 
covered the true nature of the pl&t. Judgement fo 
swiftly upon the offenders. On the 19th of February 
and Southampton were arraigned. The evidence i 



PREFA CE. XXV 

them was overwhelming. Bacon took his place among the 
counseL The office he had to perform was none of his 
seeking: it was laid upon him with the rest of his fellows. 
The time had come when he was obliged to choose between 
his Queen and one to whom he had tried his utmost to be 
a friend. Essex's defence was, as before, that his life was in 
danger, that he took up arms for his own protection, and 
that the kingdom was betrayed to Spain. Bacon spoke twice, 
on both occasions recalling the attention of the Court to the 
trae nature of the case, and showing that the private quarrel 
which had been alleged was a mere pretext. The defence" 
broke down on all points, and the two Earls were condemned. 
Eyen those who blame Bacon for taking any part in the trial 
have nothing to urge against the manner in which he acquit- 
ted himself. Birch (Memoirs of the Reign of Queen Elizabeth, 
i 499) says, ' Mr. Francis Bacon's behaviour towards the Earl 
at his trial was perhaps less exceptionable than his submitting 
to any share in it.' Essex himself uttered no word of re- 
proach. He was too conscious that Bacon had stood by him 
in evil report and in good report, and how wise all his counsels 
had been. After a careful review of this strange eventful 
history, the whole course of which must have been inexpress- 
ibly painful to Bacon, it is difficult to see how, as a good 
citizen, whose first duty was to his country, he could have 
acted otherwise. His contemporaries passed no censure upon 
hhn. Essex, who laid the blame of his own treason upon 
his personal enemies, did not reckon Bacon among them. 
And these things being so, we may confidently expect at the 
hands of posterity a verdict not only of * not proven,' but of 
*not guilty.' 

So much misapprehension has existed as to the real nature 

of the oflfence of Essex, and of Bacon's share in his trial and 

lemnation, that it has been necessary to discuss it some- 

t in detail. With the Earl's execution, however, Bacon's 

in the transaction did not terminate. Though the evid- 

was crushing and irresistible, the conduct of the trial had 

'enly, and the impression left by it confused. It was 



XXVI PRE FA CE. 

desirable that an authoritative statement should be drawn u 
setting forth with all clearness the real nature of the offenc 
and the evidence on which judgement had been pronounce 
and the task of drawing up such a statement was entrust! 
to the skilful pen of Bacon. The result was j1 Declaration 
the Practhes and Treasons attempted and committed by Robe 
late Earle of Essex and his Complices, against her Maiestie ai 
her Kingdoms, Sfc, which was published in 1601. His ii 
structions as to the writing were very precise, and aft( 
a first draft had been made, it was submitted to *certa 
principal counsellors/ who 'made almost a new writing,' j 
that Bacon himself ' gave only words and form of style,' ar 
in this he nothing extenuated or set aught down in malic 
The principal offenders being punished, he exerted hims€ 
to save the inferior actors, and with such good success 
six out of nine were stayed from being attainted. 

In the course of the spring of 1601 he lost his brothe 
Anthony, to whom he had always been greatly attache< 
His circumstances were by this somewhat improved, and wit 
the 1200/. which he received from the fine of Gatesby, on 
of the accomplices of Essex, he was enabled to get rid ( 
some obligations which had pressed heavily upon him. 

In the last Parliament of Elizabeth, which met on the 27! 
of October, 1601, Bacon was returned both by Ipswich an 
St. Alban's, a conspicuous proof that his conduct in the Esse 
conspiracy had not brought upon him the censure of th 
country. His voice, as of old, was heard, and his pen was sti 
busy, on all important questions. 

With the death of Elizabeth on the 24th of March, 1602- 
and the accession of James, no great change took place 
Bacon's prospects. He was still allowed to continue one i 
the learned counsel. On the 3rd of July he writes to Cec 
that he is forced to sell the skirts of his living in Hertforc 
shire to preserve the body, thereby leaving himself free fr( 
debt and with a little money in hand, * 300/. land per annun 
with a fair house, and the ground well timbered.' He wis! 
to be made a knight because of some disgrace which ha 



■ )(>*> 

PkEFACS. ""^ xxvii 

been passed upon him, and because there were three new 
knights in his mess at Gray's Inn. The most important 
reason for seeking this honour he keeps to the last — * because 
1 have found out an alderman's daughter, an handsome 
maiden, to my liking.' But he desired especially that the 
honour should be conferred as a real distinction, and that he 
'might not be merely gregarious in a troop.' On the 23rd 
of July he gained his wish, but in the company of three 
hundred others. His ambition for professional advancement 
was quenched under the new sovereign. In the letter to Cecil 
which has already been referred to, he says, *My ambition 
now I shall only put upon my pen, whereby I shall be able 
to maintain memory and merit of the times succeeding.* 
«, if not wise, was undoubtedly learned, and in his 
a t to tne tnrone .bacb ii ^aw hoptib uf at l«isL realizing " 
1 n iHu? dreams ot t ne regeneration ot learning an d" 
be ext n ot the kingdom ot man. And it may be that 
jgring this year (1603} he wrote tne rirst book of The 
Proficience and Ad*vancement of Learning, His other literary 
productions of this period are A Brief Discourse touching the 
Happy Union of the Kingdoms of England and Scotland^ and 
Certain Considerations touching the better Pacification and Edific- 
ation of the Church of England. The latter of these may be 
rded as the sequel to a tract on the same subject which 
lie had written in 1589^ It was partly printed in 1604, but 
not published, and was evidently composed with direct refer- 
ence to the subjects discussed at the Hampton Court con- 
ference. His Apology for his conduct in the Essex trial, 
h was addressed to Montjoy, now Earl of Devonshire, 
to the same year. 
Ihe first Parliament of the new reign met on the 19th of 
rch, 1603-4, and Bacon was again returned both by 
vich and St. Alban's, still taking the same prominent part 
in the proceedings of the House. His office as one of the 
ed counsel was confirmed to him by patent on the 18th. 
«t August, coupled with the grant of a pension of 60/. a year 
tr life. His vacation was employed in drawing up Certain 



XXvm PR EFA CE. 

Articles or Considerations touching the Union of the Kingdoms of 
England and Scotland, in view of the Commission appointed 
to meet in October for the discussion of the question. A 
draft of a proposed proclamation touching his Majesty's style 
was also prepared at the same time, but not used. Just as 
the Commission had commenced its sittings, the Solicitorship 
became vacant ; but Bacon was again pa3sed over, and Dode- 
ridge appointed. 

Still his professional occupations allowed him less leisure 
than ever, and when on the 24th of December the next 
meeting of Parliament was postponed till October, 1605, 
Bacon foresaw that, if he intended to finish his work on the 
Advancement of Learning, he must make good use of the 
interval. Mr. Spedding has pointed out that the first book 
was printed in all probability before the second was ready 
for the press, and that the second book shows marks of haste 
both in printing and composition. The entries in the books 
of the Stationers* Company^ indicate that his first intention 
was to have issued the work both in Latin and English. 
Under the date of Aug. 19, 1605, we find, *Mr. Richard 
Ockould. Entred for his Copies vnder the handes of the B : 
of London & Mr. Feild warden, The firste parte of the Twoo 
bookes of S' Frauncis Bacon, Of the proficience & advauncem* 
of Learninge divine and Humane to be printed bothe in 
Englishe & Lattin. xij^.' And again, Sept. 19 : *Mr. Ockold. 
Entred for his copie vnder the handes of my Lo. Bysshoop oi 
Londofi. and the wardens. A booke aswell in Latyn as in 
Englishe called The second book of frauncis Bacofi. of the 
proficience and Advauncement of learninge Divine and 
humane, xij^.' We might almost infer from these two en- 
tries that Bacon in the course of the summer had resolved 
to issue the first book separately, either from inability to 
finish the second, or for some other reason, and that he 
afterwards changed his mind and printed the second very 

^ For an opportunity of consulting these I am indebted to the kind 
ness of Mr. Greenhill. 



PREFACE, Xxix 

hastily. Dr. Playfer, Margaret Professor of Divinity at Gam- 
bridge, who had expressed the good liking he had conceived 
of the book, was applied to by Bacon to translate it into 
Latin, but the specimen of his version was too ornate for 
Bacon's taste, and it was never completed. The two parts, 
in English only, were published together in quarto some time . / 
about the end of October, and then not by Richard Ockould 
but by Henry Tomes, with the following title : * The Twoo 
fiookes of Francis Bacon. Of the proficience and aduaunce- 

it of Learning, diuine and humane. To the King, At 
London, Printed for Henrie Tomes, and are to be sould at his 

I at Graies Inne Gate in Holborne, 1605.' In a letter from 
Uiamberlain to Carleton on the 7th of November, the appear- 
ance of Sir Francis Bacon's new work on Learning is duly 
chronicled <^. Any attention it might otherwise have attracted 
was no doubt greatly diminished by the event which then 
filled men's minds, the discovery of the Gunpowder Plot. In 
the investigations which followed this discovery. Bacon was 
only slightly concerned. A prospect of a vacancy occurs in 
the Solicitorship in March, 1606-7, and Bacon urges Cecil to 
press his claims. But he had again to wait. 

In the hiury and business of this session, the gossip of 
Carieton gives us a glimpse of Bacon, the statesman and 

Dsopher, in a new aspect. On the nth of May, 1606, 

mtes to Chamberlain, *Sir Francis Bacon was married 

rday to his young wench in Maribone Chapel. He was 

trom top to toe in purple, and hath made himself and his 

nich store of fine raiments of cloth of silver and gold 

; it draws deep into her portion. The dinner was kept at 
ier- in-law Sir John Packington's lodging over against 

*In the present edition the text has been taken from that of 1605, 

ted where necessary by the Errata and by the subsequent editions 

N 1029 and 1633. The spelling has been modernized throughout. In 

ig the quotations I have been materially assisted by Wats' trans- 

of the De Augmentis, and the recent editions of the Advancement 

yUAij and Mr. Kitchin. 



XXX PREFACE. 

the Savoy, where his chief guests were the three knight 
Cope, Hicks, and Beeston ; and upon this conceit (as he sa 
himself) that since he could not have my L. of Salisbury 
person, which he wished, he would have him at least in h 
representative body.' Alice Bamham, who thus became tl 
wife of Francis Bacon, was no doubt the same *handson 
maiden ' whom he mentioned three years before to his cous 
Cecil. She was the daughter of Benedict Barnham, a Londc 
merchant, whose widow took for her second husband Sir J< 
Packington, a knight of Worcestershire. Lady Bacon bro 
with her a fortune of 220/. a year, which was settled upc 
herself, with an additional 500/. a year from her husban 
a fact which at once disproves Lord Campbell's charge th 
the match was a mercenary one. But how much of roman< 
or even sentiment there was in it we have no means of kno\ 
ing. Bacon was now in his forty^-sixth year, and his languai 
three months later breathes not so much the tone of ecsta 
as of tranquil satisfaction. ' I thank God I have not taken 
thorn out of my foot to put it into my side.' No letter 
their correspondence has been preserved, and from this tin 
we hear nothing more of the lady which could tell us wheth 
her influence over her husband was great or small. Tl 
gossip of fifteen years later credited her with a forwa 
tongue, and from a sentence in Bacon's will we lea 
that she had given him grievous cause of offence. SI 
survived him many years, and married her gentlei 
usher. 

The subject of the Union with Scotland and the Natun 
isation of the Scotch was still the prominent one before tl 
House. On the former question we have a fragment of Bacoi 
speech delivered on 25th Nov., 1606. On the latter he replii 
to Nicholas Fuller, 17th Feb., 1606-7. He spoke against t 
motion for the Union of Laws on the 28th of March, and < 
the 17th of June he reported to the House the speeches 
Salisbury and Northampton at the conference concerning tl 
petition of the merchants upon the Spanish grievances. Tl 
reward which he had so well earned came at last. Doderidj 



PREFACE. XXXI 

was made King's Serjeant, and Bacon became Solicitor General 
in his stead on the 25th of June, 1607, 

He had now no longer to fear that want would either steal 
upon him as a wayfaring man or assault him as an armed man, 
and in the greater tranquillity of mind which resulted he gave 
himself up to the developement of his plan for enlarging the 
horders of human knowledge. The Great Instauration seems 
now to have taken a definite form, and as a means of clearing 
the way for its reception he wrote the treatise called Cogitata 
rt Visa, which must have been the product of the latter half 
of the year 1607. His professional work of the same period 
is represented by 'A view of the differences in question 
betwixt the King's Bench and the Council in the Marches,' 
by two proclamations, the one touching the Marches, the 
other concerning Jurors. 

The next year (1608) is marked by the falling in of the 
derkship of the Star-Chamber, by the death of William Mill 
on the 1 6th of July. Bacon had waited patiently for it nearly 
twenty years. In the summer vacation, and possibly during 
the unwilling leisure caused by an outbreak of the plague, he 
wrote his treatise Infelicem memoriam EH%abethae, and towards 
the end of the year his discourse on the Plantation in Ireland, 
which will even now be read with interest. Letters to his 
friend Toby Matthew show that during the following year 
(1609) the Instauration was not laid aside. * My Instauration 
I reserve for our conference ; it sleeps not.' He sent him * a 
leaf or two of the Preface, carrying some figure of the whole 
work.' Shortly after he forwarded another portion, which 
may have been the Redarguiio Philosophiarum, In the course 
of this year, also, he wrote and submitted to the judgement of 
the same friend, a little work of his recreation, as he calls it, 
the treatise De Sapientia Feterum, on the interpretation of the 
ancient fables of Greece and Rome. The Cogitata et Visa had 
ergone revision and elaboration at the same time, and a 
copy was sent in MS. to Bishop Andrewes, who had been 
translated from Chichester to Ely. 

The session of 1609-10 was occupied with disputes between 



XXXU PREFACE, 

the King and the Commons, on the subject of the King's 
debts. Bacon spoke in favour of supply, and in defence of the 
King's right of imposition. Towards the end of August this 
year his mother died, and to the summer vacation Mr. Sped- 
ding refers * The beginning of the History of Great Britain.' 
What were his occupations in 1611 we have no certain inform- 
ation. Perhaps he amused himself with elaborating his 
Essays, of which he published a much enlarged edition in the 
following year. His letter to the King touching Sutton's 
Estate, a report on the scarcity of silver at the Mint, and a 
charge on opening the Court of the Verge, show that his pro- 
fessional duties were not neglected. Salisbury's death in 161 a 
left an opening for the appointment of a Secretary of State, 
and Bacon oflfered his services to the King. The office was 
not filled up immediately, and soon after the Mastership of 
the Wards, vacant from the same cause, was given to Sir 
George Carey, though popular rumour assigned it to Bacon, who 
had drawn up a frame of declaration and instructions for the 
new Master. In the trial of Lord Sanquhar for murder (June 
37, 161 2), Bacon appe'ared in his capacity of Solicitor General 
as counsel for the prosecution. Three days later he made 
a speech before the Council and Judges, on the reftisal of the 
Countess of Shrewsbury to be examined for aiding the Lady 
Arabella Stewart in her attempt to escape. 

The proposed marriage of the Princess Elizabeth to the 
Elector Palatine in 161 2, gave Bacon additional employment 
in drawing up Instructions to the Commissioners for collect- 
ing the Aid which was levied on the occasion. Probably 
towards the end of November he published the second edition 
of his Essays. It was his intention to have dedicated them to 
Prince Henry ; but the Prince's unexpected death on the 6th 
of November prevented him from carrying this intention into 
effect, and the Essays were addressed to Sir John Constable, 
who had married Lady Bacon's sister. They must have ap- 
peared in the interval between the death of the Prince and 
the 17 th of December, when they are referred to in one of 
Chamberlain's letters. 



PREFACM, XXxill 

The marriage of the Princess, which had "been postponed 
in consequence of her brother's death, took place on the 1 4th 
of February, 16 12-13, and a masque was 'given as an enter- 
tainment in honour of the event by the gentlemen»of Gray's 
Inn and the Inner Temple. Bacon was the contriver of the 
device, which represented the marriage of the Thames and 
the Rhine, It was a work to which he was not new, and his 
Essay * Of Masques and Triumphs' shows that he took interest 
in it. 

The Mastership of the Wards had again been vacant by the 
death of Sir George Carey, 13th November, 1612, and *Sir 
Francis Bacon certainly expecting the place, had put most of 
his men into new cloaks. Afterward when Sir Walter Cope 
carried the place, one said merrily that Sir Walter was Master 
of the Wards and Sir Francis Bacon of the Liveries.' (Rawley.) 
As before, he might say sic nos non nobis. But the promotion 
for which he had almost served an apprenticeship was not 
long in coming. The death of Sir Thomas Fleming, Chief 
Justice of the King's Bench, on the 7th of August, 161 3, 
brought about a change.^ Sir Edward Coke, who had hitherto 
been Chief Justice of the Common Pleas, became Chief 
Justice of England and a Privy Councillor ; Hobart was put in 
his place, and Bacon succeeded Hobart as Attorney General 
on the 26th of October. For eflfecting this change, though 
Bacon himself attributed it to the King, the Court favourite, 
Somerset, wished to appropriate some credit, and it was ap- 
parently with the view of releasing himself from the implied 
obligation, that Bacon took the whole charge of preparing a 
masque, which was given by Gray's Inn in honour of the 
marriage of Somerset to the divorced Countess of Essex. 

The first professional work in which he was engaged after 
his appointment, was the delivery of a charge in the Star- 
Chamber concerning duels, on the 26th January, 16 13-4. But 
there were two cases with which his name has been associated^ 
and upon the telling of which much of the impression in 
modem times with regard to his character depends. These 
were the cases of St. John and Peacham. The charge against 

c 



( 



XXXii PREFACE. 

the King and the Commons, on the subject of the King's 
debts. Bacon spoke in favour of supply, and in defence of the 
King's right of imposition. Towards the end of August this 
year his mother died, and to the summer vacation Mr. Sped- 
ding refers ' The beginning of the History of Great Britain.' 
What were his occupations in 1611 we have no certain inform- 
ation. Perhaps he amused himself with elaborating his 
Essays, of which he published a much enlarged edition in the 
following year. His letter to the King touching Sutton's 
Estate, a report on the scarcity of silver at the Mint, and a 
charge on opening the Court of the Verge, show that his pro- 
fessional duties were not neglected. Salisbury's death in 1613 
left an opening for the appointment of a Secretary of State, 
and Bacon offered his services to the King. The oSice was 
not filled up immediately, and soon after the Mastership of 
the Wards, vacant from the same cause, was given to Sir 
George Carey, though popular rumour assigned it to Bacon, who 
had drawn up a frame of declaration and instructions for the 
new Master. In the trial of Lord Sanquhar for murder (June 
ay, 1611), Bacon appeared in his capacity of Solicitor General 
as counsel for the prosecution. Three days later he made 
a. speech before the Council and Judges, on the refusal of the 
Countess of Shrewsbury to be examined for aiding the Lady 
Arabella Stewart in her attempt to escape. 

The proposed mamage of the Princess Elizabeth to the 
Elector Palatine in 1611, gave Bacon additional employmeDt 
in dnwiog up Instructions to the Commissioners for collect- 
ing the Aid which was levied on the occasion. Probably 
Ip w m A the end of Norember he published the second edition 
tf VB Easayn. It ^nn Ms intention to have dedicated them to 
Prince Henry; but the Prince's nneipected death on the 6th 
of November prevented him from carrying this intention into 
effect, and the Essays were addressed to Sir John Constable, 
who had married Lady Bacon's sister. They must have ap- 
pe«red in the interval bctwcoi the death of the Prince and 
the 17th oF December, when they an icfened to ia one of 
Chjmbci-i.ii.,'- WiiO^ 



PREFACE, XXXlil 

The marriage of the Princess, which had "been postponed 
in consequence of her brother's death, took place on the 14th 
of February, 161 2-1 3, and a masque was 'given as an enter- 
tainment in honour of the event by the gentlemen»of Gray's 
Inn and the Inner Temple. Bacon was the contriver of the 
device, which represented the marriage of the Thames and 
the Rhine. It was a work to which he was not new, and his 
Essay * Of Masques and Triumphs' shows that he took interest 
in It 

The Mastership of the Wards had again been vacant by the 

death of Sir George Carey, 13th November, 1612, and *Sir 

Francis Bacon certainly expecting the place, had put most of 

his men into new cloaks. Afterward when Sir Walter Cope 

carried the place, one said merrily that Sir Walter was Master 

of the Wards and Sir Francis Bacon of the Liveries.' (Rawley.) 

As before, he might say jtc nos non nobis. But the promotion 

for which he had almost served an apprenticeship was not 

kmg in coming. The death of Sir Thomas Fleming, Chief 

Justice of the King's Bench, on the 7th of August, 161 3, 

brought about a change. Sir Edward Coke, who had hitherto 

been Chief Justice of the Common Pleas, became Chief 

Justice of England and a Privy Councillor ; Hobart was put in 

las place, and Bacon succeeded Hobart as Attorney General 

he a6th of October. For effecting this change, though 

J n himself attributed it to the King, the Court favourite, 

5 set, wished to appropriate some credit, and it was ap- 

Js r "with the view of releasing himself from the implied 

m, that Bacon took the whole charge of preparing a 

De, which was given by Gray's Inn in honour of the 

age of Somerset to the divorced Countess of Essex. 

llie first professional work in which he was engaged after 

fa oiiitmexit, was the delivery of a charge in the Star- 

er concerning duels, on the 26th January, 161 3-4. But 

1 two cases with which his name has been associated, 

the telling of which much of the impression in 

n times with regard to his character depends. These 

1 cases of St. John and Peacham. The charge against 

c 



XXXIV PREFACE. 



him with regard to the former, is that he employed the lai 
which he was engaged in reducing and re-compiling, to 1 
vilest purposes of tyranny, by appearing as counsel for t 
prosecution of Oliver St. John, who maintained that the Ki 
had no right to levy benevolences. As Bacon acted in t 
matter in a purely official capacity, it is scarcely necessary 
inquire whether the charge against St. John was justif 
or not, and whether his conduct was so ' manly and constil 
tional' as Macaulay represents it. The circumstances ^ 
these. In June, 1614, the Parliament, to which Bacon h 
been returned by three constituencies, Cambridge Universi 
Ipswich, and St. Alban's, was dissolved without voting a 
supplies. As a means of meeting the King's wants, it v 
proposed that a voluntary contribution should be raised, 
which all who would should give as they were disposed. ] 
compulsion was to be employed and no tax levied, but it v 
to be a benevolence in the strict sense of the word. On t 
I ith of October, Oliver St. John, a gentleman of Marlborou 
(not the St. John of the Long Parliament), addressed a let 
to the Mayor of that town, denouncing this kind of benev 
ence as contrary to law, reason, and religion, and char 
the King with a violation of his coronation oath. For this 
was tried on the 15th of April, 161 5, in the Star-Chamb 
The judges were unanimous, Coke leading the way, in si 
porting the legality of the benevolence, and St. John \ 
condemned to a fine of 5000/., and to be imprisoned dur: 
the King's pleasure. In this Bacon acted simply by the din 
lion of the Council, and even if he recommended the pro 
cution, of which there is no evidence, he would have be 
fortified by the unanimous opinion of the judges. 

Peacham's case was of a different nature, and the chai 
against Bacon founded upon it is even more serious. Tl 
were difficulties both of fact and law to be met, and Bac< 
according to Macaulay, * was employed to settle the quest! 
of law by tampering with the judges, and the question of fi 
by torturing the prisoner.' Edmund Peacham, a Some 
shire clergyman, having brought libellous accusations aj 



PR EFA CE. XXXV 

his diocesan, the Bishop of Bath and Wells, was sent up to 
Lambeth to be tried before the High Commission, and sen- 
tenced to be deprived of his orders on the 19th of December, 
1614. Before the sentence his house was searched, and a 
finished sermon was discovered, the contents of which were 
decided by the Council to be of a treasonable nature. It was 
thought, moreover, to indicate a state of disaffection in the 
part of the country to which Peacham belonged, and as he 
refiised to criminate any accomplices, the Council resolved 
that he should be put to the torture. In this there is no 
evidence that Bacon had any hand whatever, further than that 
he, as Attorney General, was one of the Commission appointed 
by the Council to attend the examination of the prisoner. 
It is clear that by the common law the use of torture for 
extracting evidence was regarded as illegal, but it is equally 
dear that it was employed by the Council for discovery, and 
not for evidence ; that is, not to make a prisoner criminate 
«lf, but to get from him other information which it was 
ible to obtain. Bad as we may think this to be, it is not 
)n who was to blame for it. There is proof in his own 
I -s that he engaged in the proceeding with reluctance, 
that the step was taken against his advice. How far he 
can be justified against the other charge, of tampering with 
the judges, depends upon a clear knowledge of what his inter- 
ference really amounted to, and this is not easy to arrive at. 
As the torture had utterly failed to extort from Peacham any 
proof of the existence of a conspiracy, it became a question 
whether he himself could be proceeded against for treason. 
On this point of law the King was anxious to obtain the 
)n ot the judges of the King's Bench. It is not denied 
tliatthe Crown had a right to consult the judges on points of 
this kind, but it does not appear to have been the custom to 
t : them separately, as was done in this case. There was 
DO ;tion with regard to Peacham's authorship of the 
I, which was in his handwriting. The points for the 
pwges' consideration were, first, whether the sermon, had it 
published, would have supported an indictment for 

c a 



XXXVi PR EFA CE, 

treason ; and secondly, whether it was possible to establish 
treasonable charge on the mere fact of composition. Tl 
idea of consulting the judges separately originated with tl 
King. Whether he thought by this means to get a mo 
genuine opinion from the others when they were not influenc« 
by the presence and authority of Coke, or what was 1 
motive, we have no means of knowing. That Bacon h; 
anything to do with suggesting such a course, there is i 
evidence to show. What he did was to carry out the Kin^ 
instructions, and to lay the case before the Lord Chief J 
for his opinion. Coke's opposition was not exerted aga 
the consultation of the judges, but against their being coi 
suited separately. None of the judges of the King's Bern 
had to try the case, and therefore it is hard to see with wh 
truth Bacon's conduct can be described as tampering wi 
the judges in order to procure a capital conviction. Peacha 
was ultimately tried at the assizes at Taunton, on the 7th 
August, 16 1 5, and convicted of high treason, but the capii 
sentence was never carried into effect, because, as the repc 
of his trial says of his offence, * many of the judges were 
opinion that it was not treason.' That his case excited a 
indignation in the country, is a simple invention of Lo 
Campbell's. 

On the 24th and 25th of May, 16 16, Bacon took part 
Attorney General in the trial of the Earl and Countess 
Somerset for the murder of Sir Thomas Overbury. W: 
the prosecution of the inferior agents in this mysterious crii 
he had nothing to do. During the early part of this year t 
health of the Lord Chancellor (Ellesmere) had been givi 
way, and Bacon was a suitor to the King for the office whi 
seemed likely to be vacant. On the 9th of June he becam< 
Privy Councillor, an appointment upon which he was forr 
congratulated by the University of Cambridge, which 
represented in Parliament <i. He had held the office 

d He now gave up his practice, though he retained his office of 
toraey General, and employed his first leisure in addressing to the Kic 
proposition for the compiling and amendment of the laws of England 



PREFA CE. XXXVll 

University Counsel since the loth of November, 1613, and had 
been retained in the same capacity by Trinity College during 
the years 161 4-1 6. It was not known till the 3rd of March, 
1616-7, that the Lord Chancellor resigned the Great Seal, 
which on the 7th of the same month was delivered by the 
Xing into the hands of Bacon. * Our new Lord-Keeper,* says 
Chamberlain, * goes with great state, having a world of follow- 
ers put upon him, though he had more than enough before.* 
On the first day of Term (May 7) he rode in pomp to West- 
minster, with a train of two hundred gallants, and delivered 
his inaugural speech in Chancery, in which he published the 
charge which the King gave him when he received the Seal, 
and the rules he had laid down for his own conduct. Such 
was his marvellous energy in his new office, that in the 
course of a month he had cleared off all arrears, and on the 
8th of June he reports to Buckingham that there is not one 
cause unheard. A week after his appointment the King took 
his departure for Scotland, leaving Bacon at the head of the 
Council to manage affairs in his absence. In the same year 
we find him using his influence with the King to dissuade him 
from the Spanish match, and with Buckingham to prevent the 
marriage of his brother. Sir John Villiers, with the daughter 
of Sir Edward Coke. The issue of both showed that his 
counsel was wise, but the King and Buckingham alike re- 
sented his interference. Coke*s animosity was of course not 
lessened by it. But for the present the career of Bacon*s 
prosperity was unchecked. On the 4th of January, 16 17-8, he 
became Lord Chancellor, and on the nth of July in the same 
year he was created Baron Verulam. In his inaugural speech 
as Lord-Keeper, he had announced his intention of reserving 
*the depth of the three long vacations* for the studies, arts, 
and sciences, to which in his own nature he was most in- 
dbed. How well he had employed these moments of retire- 
ment from the business of his office became evident when, in 
October, 1620, he presented the King with the great work of 
his life, the Novum Organum, the object of which, he says, 
B to * enlarge the bounds of reason, and to endow man's estate 



xxxviii PREFACE. 

with new value.' He confesses that it is a fragment, and 
not written in haste, for he has been about it near th 
years. But he feels that his own life is hastening to its cl< 
and he wishes that a portion of his work at least should 
saved. The end was now very near. On the 27th 
January, 1 620-1, he became Viscount St. Alban, His i 
tune, which for nearly four years had borne him smoot 
on, now raised him to his greatest height, as if to m; 
the final catastrophe more dramatic and appalling. Par 
ment met on the 30th. The Chancellor, in add 
the new Speaker, gave expression to a sentiment whi 
read in the light of subsequent events, seems prophe 
— *It is certain that the best governments, yea, and 1 
best of men, are like the best precious stones, wherein evi 
flaw or icicle or grain are seen and noted more than 
those that are generally foul and corrupted.' Coke, who 1 
not been in the House for many years, was returned 
member for Liskeard. On the 5th of February he moved fc 
Committee to inquire into public grievances. A Commit 
was appointed to report concerning the Courts of Justi 
Bacon, unsuspecting any malice, acted like a man who ^ 
certainly not conscious of any great delinquency. On 
17 th of February Sir E. Sackville reported to the House t 
the Chancellor willingly consented that any man might sp< 
anything freely concerning his Court. On the 15th of Ma 
Sir Robert Phillips laid before the Lower House the rep 
of the Committee on Courts of Justice. It came lik< 
thunderclap. The Lord Chancellor was accused of corr 
tion in the exercise of his functions, and two instances w 
given as proofs. On the 19th the Lords received a me 
from the Commons requesting a conference concerning abi 
in certain eminent persons. Bacon was absent through 
ness. He sat in the House of Lords for the last time 
Saturday, the 17th of March. Next day. Sir James L 
Lord Chief Justice, was empowered by the King's comn 
sion to act as his substitute. On the Monday the c 
ference for which the Lower House applied was grant 



PR EFA CE. XXXIX 

ad on the 20th the Lord Treasurer reported to the 
ords that the Lord Chancellor was accused of bribery 
id corruption, and that the charge was supported by two 
ses alleged. Bacon, sick to death as he thought himself, 
d tortured by his hereditary malady, felt that his enemies 
J closed upon him. He knew of * the courses that had 
;n taken for hunting out complaints' against him, and 

id only a fair hearing, that he might give them an 

ous answer. He wrote to Buckinghanj: *I know I 

re clean hands and a clean heart, and I hope a clean house 

friends or servants. But Job himself, or whosoever was 

jjustest judge, by such hunting for matters against him, as 

been used against me, may for a time seem foul, espe- 

j in a time when greatness is the mark, and accusation 
J e.* And again, to the same: *I praise God for it, 
never took penny for any benefice or ecclesiastical living ; 
never took penny for releasing anything I stopped at the 
al; I never took penny for any commission, or things of 

lature ; I never shared with any servant for any second 

inferior profit.' To the King he said: *For the bri- 

and gifts wherewith I am charged, when the books 

t 5 shall be opened, I hope I shall not be found to have 

roubled fountain of a corrupt heart, in a depraved habit 
ta rewards to prevent justice ; howsoever I may be frail, 
d ake of the abuses of the times.' We must take into 
count these protestations w^en we come to consider his 

luent confession. The Houses adjourned on the 27th 
rch till the 17th of April. The day before they met, 

n had an interview with the King. On the following 
y Lord Treasurer reported to the Lords that the 
lancellor desired two things of his Majesty: — i. That where 
> answers should be fair and clear to those things objected 
him, his Lordship might stand upon his innocency. 
Where his answers should not be so fair and clear, there 
i Lordship might be admitted to the extenuation of the 
arge ; and where the proofs were full and undeniable, his 
oniship would ingenuously confess them, and put himself 



Xl PREFA CS, 

upon the mercy of the Lords. A few days later (April 22) 
Bacon, who had ascertained privately the particulars of the 
charge, wrote to the Lords: *I find matter sufficient and 
fiill, both to move me to desert my defence, and to move 
your Lordships to condemn and censure me.' "Why he t 
avoided the trial is a mystery which has never yet been 
solved. He wished to resign the Seal, urging as a mol 
for clemency, * Neither will your Lordships forget, that t e 
are vitia temporis as well as *vitia hominis ; and the begini 
of reformation hath the contrary power to the pool <tf 
Bethesda ; for that had strength to cure him only that was 
first cast in, and this hath strength to hurt him only that n 
first cast in ; and, for my part, I wish it may stay there and 
go no farther.' His confession was regarded as insufficient, 
and it was ordered that the articles of the charge, now in- 
creased in number to twenty-three, should be laid bef 
him. On the 30th of April his full confession, with 
answers to the articles in detail, was read before the Lo 
* I do plainly and ingenuously confess,' he says, * that I am 
guilty of corruption, and do renounce all defence.* As afte! 
the severe self-examination which he underwent, he did no< 
find himself blameless, it would be doing an ill service to hi! 
memory to excuse him. But, in confessing himself guilty rt 
corruption, we must have regard to his own language. Thai 
Bacon took bribes for the perversion of justice no one 1 
ventured to assert. Not one of the thousands of decree 
which he made as Chancellor was ever set aside. None 
his judgements were reversed. Even those who first charge 
him with accepting money admitted that he decided agai; 
them. What his .own opinions were concerning judicis 
bribery we know from many passages in his writings, an 
it would argue him a hypocrite of the deepest dye to suppos 
that he openly practised what he as openly denounces 
In his speech in the Common Pleas (May 3, 16 17) to Justic 
Hutton, he admonishes him: *That your hands, and th 
hands of your hands (I mean those about you) be c 
and uncorrupt from gifts, from meddling in titles, and tn 



PREFACE. Xll 

serving of turns, be they of great ones or small ones.' In 
his Essay *Of Great Place,* first published in 1612, and re- 
issued in 1625, he says: *For corruption: Do not only bind 
tliine own hands, or thy servants' hands, from taking, but 
bind the hands of suitors also from offering.' In confessing 
liimself guilty of corruption, therefore, does he admit that 
tiie whole practice of his life had been a falsification of his 
' nples ? Let us see. Of the twenty-two cases of bribery 
wth which he was charged, and which we may safely assume 
were all that the malice of his enemies could discover against 

there are but four in which he allows that he had in 
Miy way received presents before the causes were ended; 
ind even in these, though technically the presents were made 
^eulmie lite, there is no hint that they affected his decision. 
During the four years of his Chancellorship he had made 
"irders and decrees to ^:he number of two thousand a year, 
s he himself wrote to the Lords, and of the charges 
)rought against him there was scarcely one that was not two 
^ears old. The witnesses to some of the most important 
wre Churchill, a registrar of the Court of Chancery, who 
od been discharged for fraud; and Hastings, who contra- 
licted himself so much that his testimony is worthless. But 
re are more concerned with Bacon's confession of guilt than 
1 1 evidence by which the charge was supported. In a 
A of memoranda which he drew up at the time, and 
rhicn has been printed by Mr. Montagu (Bacon's Works, xvi. 
J* I. p. cccxlv), he writes : * There be three degrees or cases, 

conceive, of gifts or rewards given to a judge. The first 
J of bargain, contract, or promise of reward, pendente lite, 
ind of this my heart tells me I am innocent ; that I had no 
or reward in my eye or thought when I pronounced 
By tence or order. The second is a neglect in the 
odge to inform himself whether the cause be fully at an 
, or no, what time he receives the gift ; but takes it upon 

n^dit of the party that all is done, or otherwise omits 
inquire. And the third is, when it is received sine fraude, 

' the cause ended; which it seems, by the opinions of 



xlil PREFACE, 

the civiliansi is no offence/ In another draft he adds tb 
comment : * For the first, I take myself to "be as innocen 
as any bom on St. Innocents* day in my heart. For tl 
second, I doubt in some particulars I may be faulty. 1 
for the last, I conceived it to be no fault.* 

Such is Bacon's own interpretation of his confession, and 
we are bound to accept it, for it is borne out by twenty-two 
of the articles of the charge. To the twenty-third article, 
that he had given way to great exactions by his servants, *he 
confessed it to be a great fault that he had looked no be 
to his servants.' With this confession, we may leave 1 
name and memory, as he left it in his will, * to men's charit- 
able speeches, and to foreign nations, and the next ; 
The verdict can hardly be other than that he pron( c 
himself: *I was the justest judge that was in England tin 
fifty years ; but it was the justest censure in Parliament tl 
was these two hundred years.' This censure, pronounced 
the 3rd of May by the Lords, was that he should pay a 
40,000/. and be imprisoned in the ^Tower during the Kinj 
pleasure ; that he should thenceforth be incapable of hoi 
any office in the State, or of sitting in Parliament ; and that 
should not come within the verge of the Court. He h 
resigned the Seal to the King on the ist of May. It 
been decided by a majority of two that his titles were not 
be taken from him. But the sentence of imprisonment 
partially carried out, evidently to his great astonishment. C 
the 31st of May he was taken to the Tower, and inst; 
wrote a passionate letter to Buckingham, *Good my Lo 
procure the warrant for my discharge this day.' The on 
must have been given at once. On the 4th of June he wrote 
thank the King and Buckingham for his release. On the yth* 
dated a letter to the Prince of Wales from Sir John Vaugh 
house at Parson's Green, whither he had been allowed 
retire. On the 9th, Chamberlain writes to Carleton that 

* The date usually given to this letter,* June i/is obrioosly inc* 
Mr. Speddiog informs me that it should be * June 7.' 



PREFACE, xHii 

ancellor had obtained leave to go to his own home, 
Iked of as President of the Council. On the 23rd, he 
hat the Chancellor has removed from Fulham to his 
Gorhambury. Here he remained till the end of the 
rem his retirement he writes to Buckingham (Sep- 
), * I am much fallen in love with a private life ; but 
II so spend my time as shall not decay my abilities 
The occupation of his enforced leisure was the 
)f Henry VH, which was completed in manuscript 
er. The fine inflicted by the sentence in Parliament 
sed by the King's warrant on the 21st of September, 
ssigned to trustees, that Bacon might be protected 
importunity of his creditors. He had nothing now 
ension of 1200/. a year which the King had recently 
1, and his own private fortune. On being made Lord 
le had resigned not only the lucrative post of At- 
sneral, but the clerkship of the Star-Chamber. By 
: had lost 6000/. a year. A pardon was issued under 

Seal on the 17th of October, but it appears to have 
ed by the new Lord-Keeper. The prohibition which 
I him from coming within twelve miles of the Court 
:ed in the following March, and he was allowed to 
as near as Highgate. Buckingham was annoyed at 
1 to give up York House, and opposed his return to 

In the course of the year, however, the restriction 
tved, and he took up his residence at Bedford House, 
Tiansion meanwhile having been surrendered. The 
)n of the History of Henry the Seventh in the 
Qd the translation into Latin of the Advancement 
ng, kept him fully employed. In the latter work he 
have been assisted by George Herbert. Writing to 
ndrewes the dedication to his Dialogue touching a 
ir, which was also the work of this year, he says : 
lin, for that my book of Advancement of Learning 
»me preparation, or key, for the better opening of 
uration ; because it exhibits a mixture of new con- 
l old ; whereas the Instauration gives the new un- 



xllV PREFACE. 

mixed, otherwise than with some little aspersion of the < 
for taste's sake ; I have thought good to procure a transl: 
of that book into the general language, not without gr 
ample additions and enrichment thereof, especially in t 
second book, which handleth the Partition of Scienc 
such sort, as I hold it may serve in lieu of the first part ot 
Instauration, and acquit my promise in that part.* 

The provostship of Eton fell vacant in April 1623, ai 
Bacon sought the appointment as *a retreat to a place 
study so near London,' but without success. The Advanc 
ment of Learning in its Latin form was issued this year ur 
the title of De Augmentis Scientiarum, in nine books, the 
closely corresponding with the English. The last two 
three years of his life were occupied with dictating his Syl 
Sylvarum, putting the last touches to his Essays, which we 
published in their final form in March 1625, and superintem 
ing their translation into Latin With other works to be enti 
Opera Moralia, The Apophthegms were the occupation ot 
morning. It does not appear that the sentence of Parliame 
was ever entirely revoked. The name of Lord St. Alban's, 
is true, is among those of the Peers summoned to the fir 
Parliament of Charles, but for some reason he did not tal 
his seat in the House. On New Year's Day, 1625-6, I 
wrote to Sir Humphry May: *The present occasion doi 
invite me to desire that his grace (i. e. Buckingham) wou 
procure me a pardon of the King of the whole sentence. U 
writ for Parliament I have now had twice before the tim 
and that without any express restraint not to use it.* H 
health, long feeble, would not have allowed him to attend, b 
he could have appointed a proxy. At length came death, ti 
friend, whom for five years he had looked steadily in the fac 
and released him from all his troubles. A cold, caught in ti 
process of an experiment to test the preserving qualities 
snow, terminated in a gentle fever, and after lingering a w« 
he passed quietly away in the early morning of Easter-da 
April 9, 1626. He died at the Earl of Arundel's house 
Highgate, and was buried in the church of St. Michaeli 



PREFA CE. xlv 

Alban's. His chaplain, Dr. Rawley, ends tjie life which 

e wrote of his old master with words which form a fitting 

oclusion to every life of him : * But howsoever his body 

as mortal, yet no doubt his memory and works will live, and 

in all probability last as long as the world lasteth.' And 

Tith this anticipation we leave Francis Bacon to the judge- 

of all time. 

W. A. W. 



I 



This Second Edition has been revised and corrected 
•ughout, and some additions have been made to the 
otes and Glossary. 

W. A. W. 
Jprii, 1873. 



CALENDAR 



OF THE LIFE AND WORKS 



OF 



FRANCIS BACONf 



ff 



«> 



Admitted of 
company of 



the 
that 



1560-1. Jan. 22. Bora at York 

House. 
1573. April 5. Went up to Trinity 

College, Cambridge. 
„ June 10. Matriculated. 
J 576. June 27. Entered at Gray's 

Inn. 
Nov. 21. 

grand 

society. 
Went to Paris with Sir Amias 

Paulet. 
1578-9. Feb. 22. Death of his fa- 
ther. Sir Nicholas Bacon. 
1582. June 27. Admitted as utter 

barrister. 
„ About this time wrote Temporis 

Partus Maximus. 
1584. Nov. 23. Sat in parliament as 

member for Melcombe Regis. 
1586. Oct. 29. Member for Taunton. 

1588. Lent term. Elected Reader at 

Gray's Inn. 
„ Nov. Member for Liverpool. 

1589. Oct. 29. Reversion of the 

Clerkship of the Star-Cham- 
ber granted to him. 



1589. 

ti592- 

» 
1592- 

1593- 

1594- 

» 

1595- 

1595- 

ti596. 

1597- 



An Adveriisement tot 
Controversies of t) 
of England (1640' 

Nov. 17. Discourses 
of Knowledge an 
Q«^m(i734). 

Observations on a Lib 

•3. Feb. 19. Sat as m 
Middlesex. 

4. Jan. 25. First a 
as a pleader in cou 

A true Report of Dr. 
Treason (1657). 

July 27. Made M.A 
bridge. 

Nov. 17. Contributi 
Device presented 
to the Queen: p 
Mr. Spedding (i8e 

6. Formularies and J 

(1859). 
Made Queen's Coun; 

ordinary. 

First edition of the E: 

Colours of Good a 

Meditationes Sacrc 

Maxims of the La\ 



' In the list of his Works I have not included his speeches in Pari 
his arguments in law. The date of composition when it could be a 
is given; the date of publication, when different from that of comp 
included within parentheses. Probable dates are indicated by a c 
Those pieces of which the date is altogether uncertain are placed at th< 



CALENDAR OF LIFE AND WORKS. 



xlvii 



Oct. 24. Sat as member for 

Ipswich. 
Oct. 24. Double Reader at 

Gray's Inn. 
I. Feb. 19. Trial of Essex and 

Southampton. 
A Declaration of the Practises 
and Treasons attempted and 
committed by Robert late 
Earl of Essex, &c., drawn 
up by Bacon. 
Oct. 27. Returned to parlia- 
ment as member for Ipswich 
and St. Alban's. 
Letter to Cecil with Consider- 
ations touching the Queen*s 
service in Ireland (1648). 
-3. Mar. 24. Death of Elizabeth. 
. July 23. Bacon knighted by 
James I. 
A Brief Discourse touching the 
Happy Union of the King- 
doms of England and Scot- 
land. 
. Valerius Terminus cf the Inter- 
pretation of Nature (1734). 
De Interpretatione Natures Pro- 

cemium (165 3). 
^ Mar. 19. Returned again by 
Ipswich and St. Alban's. 
^ Certain Considerations touching 
the better Pacification and 
Edification of the Church of 
England (1640). 
Apology in certain imputations 
concerning the late Earl of 
Essex. 
Aug. 18. Appointed King's 

Counsel. 
Certain Articles or Consider- 
ations touching the Union of 
the Kingdoms of England 
and Scotland (1657). 
Advancement of Learning, 
Cogitationes de Natura Rerum 

(1653). 

f 10. Francis Bacon mar- 

ned Alice Baraham. 



'i'l6o6. Partis Instaurationis Secundcs 
Delineatio et Argumentum 
(^653). 

1607. June 25. Made Solicitor Gen- 

eral. 
„ Cogitata et Visa (1653). 
+1607. Filum Labyrinthi {i'j^4). 

1608. Inquisitio Legitima de Motu 

(1653). 

„ Color et Frigus (1734). 

„ Historia Soni et A uditus (1658). 

„ In felicem memoriam Eliza- 
bethce (1658). 

„ A fragment Of the true great- 
ness of Britain (1734). 

„ July 16. The Clerkship of 
the Star-Chamber falls to 
him. 
+1608. Temporis Partus Masculus 

(1653). 
„ Aphorismi et Consilia (1653). 

1608-9. Jan. I. Discourse of the 

Plantation in Ireland 

(1657).. 

1609. De Sapientia VeterumT 

1610. Death of his mother, Lady 

Anne Bacon. 
„ 7%« beginning of the History of 
Great Britain (1657). 
1611-12. Advice to the King, touch" 
ing Sutton* s Estate (1648). 

161 2. Second edition of the Essays. 
+161 2. Descriptio Globi Intellectualis 

(1653). 
„ Thema Coeli (1653). 

1613. Oct. 26. Appointed Attorney 

General. 

1614. Returned to parliament by 

Ipswich, St. Alban's, and 
Cambridge University. 
1 61 6. June 9. Made a Privy Coun- 
cillor. 
„ Proposition to His Majesty 
touching the Compiling and 
Amendment of the Laws of 
England. 
+1616. De Fluxu et Refluxu Maris 
(1653). 



xlviii 



CALENDAR OF LIFE AND WORKS. 



i*i6l6. De Principiis atqtie Originihjis 

, (1653). 
1610-7. Mar. 7. Made Lord Keeper. 

1617-8. Jan. 4. Made Lord Chan- 
cellor. 

1 61 8. July 9. Created Baron Veni- 
1am. 

1640. Oct. Novum Organum pub- 
lished with Parasceve ad 
Historiam NcUuralem et Ex- 
perimentalem, 

1 620-1. Jan. 27. Created Viscount 
St. Alban. 

162 1. May 3. Sentenced by the 

House of Lords. 
1621-6. In this interval were com- 
posed Ahecedarium Naturce 
(lost except a fragment pub- 
lished by Tenison, 1679) ; 
Jnquisitio de Magnete ( 1 658); 
Topica inquisitionis de luce 
et lumine (1653); Sylva 
Sylvarum (1627); Offer of 
a Digest to he made of the 
• Laws of England (1629). 

1622. History of Henry VII; Historia 

Naturalis et Experimentalis ; 
Advertisement touching an 
Holy War (1629). 

1623. De Augmentis Scientiarum libri 

ix; Historia Vitce et Mortis; 
History of the reign of Henry 
VIII (1629). 



1624. Considerations touch 
with Spain (162^ 
New Atlantis (1627 
Magnolia Natur<B ( 
Dec. Apophthegms. 
„ Translationqf 
Third edition of the 
1626. Apr. 9. Bacon diet 
gate. 



» 



>* 



«> 



>» 



1625. 



Of the following works t 
composition is doubtful : — 

Phenomena Universi (161 
Intellectus and Prodror, 
Cogitationes de Scientu 
(1653) ; De Interpretatii 
SententicB xii (1653) ; i. 

for Civil Conversatioi 
Confession of Faith (164 
(1648, 1679) ; Imago C 
Casaris (1658) ; Ima 
Augusti Ccesaris (165! 
tiqns to Camden^ s Anna'i 
In Henricum Principe^ 
Elogium (1763); PI 
and Medical Remain 
Between 1596 and i( 
wrote the Letter and L 
Sir Henry Savill^ touc) 

for the Intellectual Powt 
and, after July 1608, j 
Philosophiarum ( 1 65 3), 



xX 



s 
1 



IS. 

.EARNING AND KNOWLEDGE 

ledge. 

ment of learning, with the defects of the same. 



le, manners, or thejiature of their studies (iiL x— lo). 

tical learning (iv. &— 12). 
itious learning (iv. 5—7). 
:e learning (iv. 3—4). 

f and novelty (v. i). 
eries (v. 2). 
opinions prevail {v. 3). 
f knowledge to arts and methods (v. 4 ). 
or philosophia prima (v. 5). 
>r the intellect (v. 6). 
with men's inclinations (v. 7). 
. 8). 

:nowledge (v. 9). 
md to tnemselves (▼. 11). 
tf knowledge (v. 11). 



Abel (7). 

<mon (xi)> Christ (12), the Apostles (13), the Fathers (14), the Jesuits (15). 

; (vii. i). 

:rse of man and man (vii. 2). 

iMm#»H nrinr#.Q / ^" P^acc { e.g. the Roman Emperors (viL 4—9). Q- Elizabeth (viL xo). 
learned pnnces j jn ^ (yji xol; e.g. Alexander (vii ii-ai), Caesar (vii 22-29), 
; (viiL X, 2). Xenophon (vii 30). 

f man to beasts (viii. 3 ) 
advancement (viil 4). 

[viil 6). 

\T9 face Page x.\ 



THE 

FIRST BOOK OF FRANCIS BACON; 

OF THE PROFICIENCE AND 

ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING, 

DIVINE AND HUMAN. 

To the King. 

I, T^HERE were under the law, excellent King, both 
daily sacrifices and freewill oflferings; the one 
proceeding upon ordinary observance, the other upon a 
devout cheerfulness: in like manner there belongeth to 
kings from their servants both tribute of duty and presents 
of affection. In the former of these I hope I shall not live 
to be wanting, according to my most humble duty, and 
the good pleasure of your Majesty's employments : for the 
latter, I thought it more respective to make choice of 
some oblation, which might rather refer to the propriety 
and excellency of your individual person, than to the 
business of your crown and state. 

2. Wherefore, representing your Majesty many times 
unto my mind, and beholding you not with the inquisitive 
eye of presumption, to discover that which the Scripture 
telleth me is inscrutable, but with the observant eye of 
duty and admiration; leaving aside the other parts of 
your virtue and fortune, I have been touched, yea, and 
possessed with an extreme wonder at those your virtues 

B 
it 



2 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [a 

and faculties, which the Philosophers call intellectual 
the largeness of your capacity, the faithfulness of you 
memory, the swiftness of your apprehension, the pene 
tration of your judgement, and the facility and order c 
your elocution : and I have often thought, that of all tb 
persons living that I have known, your Majesty wen 
the best instance to make a man of Plato's opinion 
that all knowledge is but remembrance, and that tb 
mind of man by nature knoweth all things, and had 
but her own native and original notions (which by 
strangeness and darkness of this tabernacle of the bod; 
are sequestered) again revived and restored : such a 1 
of nature I have observed in your Majesty, and such ; 
readiness to take flame and blaze from the least occasioi 
presented, or the least spark of another's knowledge dc 
livered. And as the Scripture saith of the wisest king 
That his heart was as the sands of the sea ; which thougl 
it be one of the largest bodies, yet it consisteth of 
smallest and finest portions ; so hath God given y 
Majesty a composition of understanding admirable, beinj 
able to compass and comprehend the greatest matten 
and nevertheless to touch and apprehend the least 
whereas it should seem an impossibility in nature, fc 
the same instrument to make itself fit for great an 
small works. And for your gift of speech, I call to min 
what Cornelius Tacitus saith of Augustus Caesar: August 
profltunSy et quce principem deceret^ eloquentia fuit. For 
we note it well, speech that is uttered with labour an 
difl5culty, or speech that savoureth of the a£fectation < 
art and precepts, or speech that is framed after the imkf 
tion of some pattern of eloquence, though never so ei 
cellent; all this hath somewhat servile, and holdi] < 
the subject. But your Majesty's manner of speedi 



a.] THE FIRST BOOK. 3 

indeed prince-like, flowing as from a fountain, and yet 
streaming aiid branching itself into nature's order, full of 
facility and felicity, imitating none, and inimitable by any. 
And as in your civil estate there appeareth to be an emul- 
ation and contention of your Majesty's virtue with your 
fortune ; a virtuous disposition with a fortunate regiment; 
a virtuous expectation (when time was) of your greater 
fortune, with a prosperous possession thereof in the due 
; a virtuous observation of the laws of marriage, with 
most blessed and happy fruit of marriage ; a virtuous and 
most Christian desire of peace, with a fortunate inclination 
m your neighbour princes thereunto : so likewise in these 
intellectual matters, there seemeth to be no less con- 
tention between the excellency of your Majesty's gifts of 
nature and the universality and perfection of your learn- 
ing. For I am well assured that this which I shall say is 
no amplification at all, but a positive and measured truth ; 
which is, that Lthere hath not been since Christ's time any '| 
king or temporal monarch, which hath been so learned in 
all literature and erudition, divine and humaffT] For let a 
man seriously and diligently revolve and peruse the sue- . 
cession of the emperors of Rome, of which Caesar the 
Dictator, who lived some years before Christ, and Marcus 
Antoninus were the best learned ; and so descend to the 
emperors of Grecia, or of the West, and then to the 
lines of France, Spain, England, Scotland, and the rest, 
and he shall find this judgement is truly made. For it 
seemeth much in a king, if, by the compendious ex- 
tractions of other men's wits and labours, he can take 
hold of any superficial ornaments and shows of learning ; 
or if be countenance and prefer learning and learned 
m: but to drink indeed of the true fountains of learn- 
ing, nay, to have such a fountain of learning in himself, 

B 2 



4 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [l. 

in a king, and in a king born, is almost a miracle. And 
the more, because there is met in your Majesty a rare 
conjunction, as well of divine and sacred literature, as of 
profane and human ; so as your Majesty standeth in- 
vested of that triglicity, which in great veneration was 
ascribed to the ancient Hermes ;[thp power and fortune 
of a king, the knowledge and illummation of a priest , and 
the learning and universality of a philosopher^ Th» 
propriety inherent and individual attribute in yourMaje^ 
deserveth to be expressed not only in the fame and ad- 
miration of the present time, nor in the history or tradition 
of the ages succeeding, but also in some solid work, fixed 
memorial, and immortal monument, bearing a character 
or signature both of the power of a king and the differ- 
ence and perfection of such a king. 

3. Therefore ' I did conclude with myself, that I could 
not make unto your Majesty a better oblation than of 
some treatise tending to that end, whereof the sum will 
consist of these two parts; the former concerning the 
excellency of learning and knowledge, and the excel- 
lency of the merit and true glory in the augmentation and 
propagation thereof: the latter, what the particular acts 
and works are, which have been embraced and under- 
taken for the advancement of learning ; and again, what 
defects and undervalues I find in such particular acts : to 
the end that though I cannot positively or afi&rmativelj 
advise your Majesty, or propound unto you framed par- 
ticulars, yet I may excite your princely cogitations to 
visit the excellent treasure of your own mind, and thence 
to extract particulars for this purpose, agreeable to youi 
magnanimity and wisdom. 



1. 1.] 



THE FIRST BOOK. 



I. I. TN the entrance to the former of these, to clear 
the way, and as it were to make* silence, to have 
the trae testimonies concerning the dignity of learning to 
be better heard, without the interruption of tacit objec- 
tions ; I think good to deliver it from the discredits ^ nd 
disgraces which it hath received, all from ignor ance; bu t 
^orance severally disguised ; appearing sometimes _in 
the zeal and jealousy of divines ; som etimes in the severity _ 
and arroga ncy of politiques ; and Rnnr)fif;iTr^p<^ jr* tV»A ^rrr^rc 
and imperfect ions of learned men themselves. 

2. 1 hear the former sort say, that knowledge is of 
those things which are to be accepted of with great limita- 
tion and caution: [that the aspiring to overmuch know-^^ 
ledge was the original temptation and sin whereupon j^ 
ensued the fall of man : that kn owledg e hath in it some - K 

lof th e serpent, and therefore where it entereth in to 

akes hiTrL^^ w e]l^J Sczen/ta /«/f^/ ; ' that Salomon ^^^ 
gives a censure, Tkaf there is no end of making books, and 
tha t much re ading is w eariness of the flesh ; and again in 
anottier place, That in spacious knowledge there is much 
contristation, and that he that increaseth knowledge increaseth 
anxiety : that Saint Paul gives a caveat, That we be not 
spoiled through vain ihilosophy : that experience demon - 
strates how learned men have been arch-here^irs^ \]n\v 
Feamed times have been inclin ed to atheism, and ho^ £jJa» 
S^ltiiiplali uii uf becond causes doth derogatefrom o ur 

3. To discover then the ignorance and error of this 
opinion, and the misunderstanding in the grounds thereof, 
it may well appear these men do not observe or consider 
that it was not the pure knowledge of nature and uni- 
versaH^j a knowledge by the light whereof man did give 
names unto other creatures in Paradise, as they were 



A 



6 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING 

brought before him, according unto their proprietie 
gave the occasion to the fall : but it was the prouc 
ledge of good and evil, with an intent in man to 
unto himself, and to depend no more upon God 
mjindments, which was the form of the ten 

[Neither is it any quantity of knowledge, how greai 
that can make the mind of man to swell j for notl 
fill, much less extend the soul of man, but God 

, contemplation of Go3\ and therefore Salomon, s 
of the two principal senses of inquisition, the eye 
ear, affirmeth that fhe eye is never satisfied wiit 
nor the ear with hearing ; and if there be no fulne 
is the continent greater than the content : so of kn 
itself, and the mind of man, whereto jhe senses, 
reporters , he defineth likewise in these words, plac 
that Kalendar or Ephemerides which he maketl 
diversities of times and seasons for all actions a 
poses ; and concludeth thus : God hath made ai 
beautiful y or decent ^ in the true return of their season 
he hath placed the world in man's heart ^yet cannot i 
out the work which God worketh from the beginni? 
end : declaring not obscurely, that God hath fra: 
mind of man as a mirror or glass, capable of the i 
the universal world, and joyful to receive the im 
thereof, as the eye joyeth to receive light ; and : 
delighted in beholding the variety of things and vi( 
of times, but raised also to find out and discern th 
ances and decrees, which throughout all those 
are infallibly observed. And although he doth i 
that the supreme or summary law of nature, y 
calleth The work which God worketh from the begt 
the end, is not possible to be found out by man ; 
doth not derogate from the capacity of the 



.3.] THE FIRST BOOK. 7 

)e referred to the impediments, as of shortness of life, ill 
injunction of labours, ill tradition of knowledge over 
rom hand to hand, and many other inconveniences, 
thereunto the condition of man is subject. For that 
iJDthing parcel of the world is denied to man's inquiry 
and invention, he doth in another place rule over, when 
k saith. The spirit of man is as the lamp of God, where- Ni 
'with he searcheth the inwardness of all secrets. If then ' 
such be the capacity and receipt of the mind of man, it 
is manifest that there is no danger at all in the proportion 
or quantity of knowledge, how large soever, lest it should 
make it swell or out-compass itself; no, but it is merely 
the quality of knowledge, which, be it in quantity more or 
less, if it be taken without the true corrective thereof, hath 
in it some nature of venom or malignity, and some effects 
of that venom, which is ventosity or swelling. This cor- 
rective spice, the mixture whereof maketh knowledge so 
sovereign, is charity, which the Apostle immediately 
addeth to the former clause : for so he ^2}i^aj^JCj3jawl^dge 

itv bu ildeth up ; not unlike unto that 

w&ich he delivereth in another place : If I spake ^ saith he, 

i r the torques of men and angels^ and had not charity^ it 

e hut as a tinkling cymbal ; not but that it is an 

excellent thing to speak with the tongues of men and 

els, but because, if it be severed from charity, and not 

referred to the good of men and mankind, it hath rather 

% sounding and unworthy glory, than a meritinjg and 

substantial virtue. And as for that censure of Salomon, 

conceming the excess of writing and reading books, and 

the anxiety of spirit which redoundeth from knowledge ; 

and admonition of Saint Paul, That we be not seduced 

iy lasaphy; let those places be rightiy understood, 

\ do indeed excellently set forth the true bounds 




8 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [l. 3. 

and limitations, whereby human knowledge is confined 
and circumscribed ; and yet without any such contract] 
or coarctation, but that it^may comprehend all the i 
versal nature of things ; Uor these limitations are three : 
the first, Thai we do not so^'plhce our felicity in knowk 
as we forget our mortality: the second, That we ( 
application of our knowledge^ to give ourselves repose 
contentment, and not distaste or repining: the third, I 
we do not presume hv the contemplation of nature to attaint 
the mysteries of God^ For as touching the first of thesCj 
Salomon doth excellently expound himself in anothei 
place of the same book, where he saith : / saw well 
knowledge recedeth cls far from ignorance as light doth J 
darkness ; and that the wise maris eyes keep watch in hi 
heady whereas the fool roundeth about in darkness : 
withal I learned, that the same mortality involveth them both. 
And for the second, c;ertain it is, there is no vexation or 
anxiety of mind which resulteth from knowledge oth> 
wise than merely by accident; f or all knowledfi;e and 
wonder (which is the seed of knowledge ) is^ iin^pii 
of pleaSirfe"m'j|§eif r'totit when meiTfall to framing o 
elusions out of their knowledge, applying it to their ] 
ticular, and ministering to themselves thereby weak fe 
or vast desires, there groweth that carefulness and trou j 
of mind which is spoken of: for then knowledge is no 
more Lumen siccum^ whereof Heraclitus the profi d 
said. Lumen siccum optima anima ; but it becometh Li 
madidum, or maceratum, being steeped and infused in the 
humours of the affections. And as for the third point, it 
deserveth to be a little stood upon, and not to be lightly 
passed over : for if any man shall think by view i 
inquiry into these sensible and material things to 1 
that light, whereby he may reveal unto himself t 



|.J THE FIRST BOOK. 9 

wU of God, then indeed is he spoiled by vain philo- 
by; for the contemplation of God's creatures and 
b produceth (having regard to the works and crea- 
) themselves) knowledge, but having regard to God, 
erfect knowledge, but wonder, which is broken know- 
;. And therefore it was most aptly said by one of 
I's school. Thai the sense of man carrieth a resem- 
e with the sun, which {as we see) openeth and revealeth 
he terrestrial globe ; but then again it obscureth and 
ileth the stars and celestial globe : so doth the sense 
^er natural things, but it darkeneth and shutteth up 
?. And h ence it is true that it hath proceeded, th at 
s great learned men have been heretical, whilst they 
sought to fly up to the sec rets of the Deity by the _ 
[1 wi ngs oi the senses. And as for the conceit that 
Quch knowledge should incline a man to atheism, 
hat the ignorance of second causes should make a 

devout dependence upon God, which is the first 
; first, it is good to ask the question which Job 

of his friends : Will you lie /or God, as one man will 
• another, to gratify him ? For certain it is that God 
jth nothing in nature but by second causes: and 
y would have it otherwise believed, it is mere im- 
re, as it were in favour towards God ; and nothing 
but to offer to the author of truth the unclean 
ice of a lie. But further, it is an assured truth, and 



X 



iclusion of experience, thatjTa little or superficial 

ly incline^l: 



/ 



ledge of philosophy may inclinethe mind of man to 
im, but a further proce^ing therein doth bring the , 

back again to religionT] For in the entrance of 
3ophy, when the second causes, which are next unto 
inses, do offer themselves to the mind of man, if it 

and stay there it may induce some oblivion of the 



v 



lO OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [I.3 

highest cause ; but when a man passeth on further, aiw 
seeth the dependence of causes, and the works of Pro 
vidence, then, according to the allegory of the poets, h 
will easily believe that the highest link of nature's ch 
must needs be tiedto the foot of Jupiter's chair. T 
* conclude therefore\ let no man upon a weak conceit ( 
1 sobriety or an ill-applied moderation think or maint 

that a man can search too far, or be too well studied i 

/ the book of God's word, or in the book of God's work 

divinity or philosophy ; but rather let men endeavour a 

endless progress or proficience in both; only let me 

beware that they apply both to charity, and not t 

I swelling; to use, and not to ostentation; and agaii 

I that they do not unwisely mingle* or confound thei 

learnings togetherTl 

II. I. And as Tor the disgraces which learning n 
ceiveth from politiques, they be of this nature; th 
learning doth soften men's minds, and makes th 
more unapt for the honour and exercise of arms; that 
doth mar and pervert men's dispositions for matter • 
government and policy, in making them too curious ar 
irresolute by variety of reading, or too peremptory • 
positive by strictness of rules and axioms, or too ii 
moderate and overweening by reason of the greatne 
of examples, or too incompatible and differing from 
times by reason of the dissimilitude of examples; or 
least, that it doth divert men's travails from action ai 
business, and bringeth them to a love of leisure ai 
privateness; and that it doth bring into states a relax 
tion of discipline, whilst every man is more ready 
argue than to obey and execute. Out of this cone 
Cato, surnamed the Censor, one of the wist 
indeed that ever lived, when Carneades the p 



r.i.] THE FIRST BOOK. II 

;ame in embassage to Rome, and that the young men 
f Rome began to flock about him, being allured with 
he sweetness and majesty of his eloquence and learn- 
gave counsel in open senate that they should give 
dispatch with all speed, lest he should infect 
nd enchant the minds and affections of the youth, and 
t unawares bring in an alteration of the manners and 
Bstoms of the state. Out of the same conceit or 
Hmour did Virgil, turning his pen to the advantage of 
ountry, and the disadvantage of his own profession, 
lake a kind of separation between policy and govern- 
t, and between arts and sciences, in the verses so 
I renowned, attributing and challenging the one to 
he Romans, and leaving arid yielding the other to the 
jrecians: Tu regere imperio populosy Romane^ memento ^ 
1(B tibi erunt artes, dhc. So likewise we see that Any tus, 
be accuser of Socrates, laid it as an article of charge and 
iccusation against him, that he did, with the variety and 
wwer of his discourses and disputations, withdraw young 
nen from due reverence to the laws and customs of their 
wuntry, and that he did profess a dangerous and per- 
jicious science, which was, to . make the worse matter 
•eem the better, and to suppress truth by force of elo- 
luence and speech. 

2. But these and the like imputations have rather a 
countenance of gravity than any ground of justice : for 
experience doth warrant, that both in persons and in 
times there hath been a meeting and concurrence in 
learning and arms, flourishing and excelling in the same 
men and the same ages. For as for men, there cannot 
be a better nor the like instance, as of that pair, Alexander 
Great and Julius Caesar the Dictator ; whereof the one 
ie's scholar in philosophy, and the other was 



12 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [l 

Cicero's rival in eloquence : or if any man had rather 
for scholars that were great generals, than generals 
were great scholars, let him take Epaminondas 
Theban, or Xenophon the Athenian; whereof the 
was the first that abated the power of Sparta, and 
other was the first that made way to the overthrow of 
monarchy of Persia. And this concurrence is yet n 
visible in times than in persons, by how much an 
is [a] greater object than a mai^. For both in Eg 
Assyria, Persia, Grecia, and Rome, the same times 
are most renowned for arms, are likewise most adm 
for learning; so that the greatest authors and philosopl 
and the greatest captains and governors have lived in 
same ages. Neither can it otherwise be : for as in i 
the ripeness of strength of the body and mind con 
much about .an age, save that the strength of the b 
cometh somewhat the more early, so in states, arms 
learning, whereof the one correspondeth to the body, 
other to the soul of man, have a concurrence or 
sequence in times. 

3. And for matter of policy and government, 
learning should rather hurt, than enable thereunto, ; 
thing very improbable : we see it is accounted an e 
to commit a natural body to empiric physicians, wl 
commonly have a few pleasing receipts whereupon t 
are confident and adventurous, but know neither 
causes of diseases, nor the complexions of patients, 
peril of accidents, nor the true method of cures : we 
it is a like error to rely upon advocates or lawyers, wl 
are only men of practice and not grounded in their bo( 
who are many times easily surprised when matter fal 
out besides their experience, to the prejudice of 
causes they handle : so by like reason it cannot be h 



n.3.] THE FIRST BOOK. 1 3 

3f doubtful consequence if states be managed by 

im : statesmen, not well mingled with men grounded 

n learning. But contrariwise, it is almost without instance 

lontradictory that ever any government was disastrous that 

n the hands of learned governors. For howsoever 

t I been ordinary with politique men to extenuate and 

lisable learned men by the names of pedantes ; yet in the 

ecords of time it appeareth in many particulars that the 

jmments of princes in minority (notwithstanding the 

ite disadvantage of that kind of state) have never- 

hel excelled the government of princes of mature age, 

ven for that reason which they seek to traduce, which is, 

by that occasion the state hath been in the hands of 

ntes : for so was the state of Rome for the first five 

years, which are so much magnified, during the minority 

of Nero, in the hands of Seneca a pedanti: so it was again, 

for ten years' space or more, during the minority of Gor- 

dianus the younger, with great applause and contentation 

in the hands of Misitheus a pedanti : so was it before that, 

in the minority of Alexander Severus, in like happiness, in 

lands not much unlike, by reason of the rule of the 

vomen, who were aided by the teachers and preceptors. 

^ay, let a man look into the government of the bishops 

f Rome, as by name, into the government of Pius 

inintus and Sextus Quintus in our times, who were both 

i their entrance esteemed but as pedantical friars, and he 

I that such popes do greater things, and proceed 

1 truer principles of estate, than those which have 

'sc ed to the papacy from an education and breeding 

nal s of estate and courts of princes; for although 

■"■^ bred in learning are perhaps to seek in points of 

inience and accommodating for the present, which 

^ ^ s call ragioni di stah^ whereof the same Pius 



14 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [U. 

Quintus could not hear spoken with patience, te 
them inventions against religion and the moral virtue 
yet on the other side, to recompense that, they are perf< 
in those same plain grounds of religion, justice, honoi 
and moral virtue, which if they be well and watchfti 
pursued, there will be seldom use of those other, no 
i than of physic in a sound or well-dieted body 7"T^ ei 
I can the experience of one man's life furnish examples a 
[precedents for the events of one man's lifeT For as 
happeneth sometimes that the grandchild, or other < 
scendant, resembleth the ancestor more than the son ; 
many times occurrences of present times may sort bet 
with ancient examples than with those of the later 
immediate times : and lastly, the wit of one man can 
more countervail learning than one man's means can h 
way with a common purse. 

4. And as for those particular seducements or ind 
positions of the mind for policy and government, whi 
learning is pretended to insinuate ; if it be granted tl 
any such thing be, it must be remembered withal, tl 
learning ministereth in every of them greater stre 
of medicine or remedy than it offereth cause of ii 
position or infirmity. For if by a secret operation it 1 
men perplexed and irresolute, on the other side by pL 
precept it teacheth them when and upon what ground 
resolve ; yea, and how to carry things in suspense witb( 
prejudice, till they resolve. If it make men positive a 
regular, it teacheth them what things are in their nati 
demonstrative, and what are conjectural, and as well 1 
use of distinctions and exceptions, as the latitude 
principles and rules. If it mislead by disproportioii 
dissimilitude of examples, it teacheth men the force 
circumstances, the errors of comparisons, and aB i 



[1. 4.] THE FIRST BOOK, 1 5 

cautions of application ; so that in all these it doth rectify 

nore effectually than it can pervert. And these medicines 

'. conveyeth into men's minds much more forcibly by the 

ness and penetration of examples. For let a man 

look into the errors of Clement the seventh, so lively 

described by Guicciardine, who served under him, or into 

4e errors of Cicero, painted out by his own pencil in his 

^istles to Atticus, and he will fly apace from being 

irresolute. Let him look into the errors of Phocion, and 

he will beware how he be obstinate or inflexible. Let 

him but read the fable of Ixion, and it will hold him 

from being vaporous or imaginative. Let him look into 

the errors of Cato the second, and he will never be one 

of the Antipodes, to tread opposite to the present world. 

5. And for the conceit that learning should dispose 

inen to leisure and privateness, and make men slothful ; 

it were a strange thing if that which accustometh the mind 

to a perpetual motion and agitation should induce sloth- 

fcbess : whereas contrariwise^^ may be truly affirmed, 

that no kind of men love business for itself but those that 

»e learned; for other persons love it for profit) as an 

Qg, that loves the work for the wages ; or for honour, 

ecause it beareth them up in the eyes of men, and 

jth their reputation, which otherwise would wear ; 

'because it putteth them in mind of their fortune, and 

i them occasion to pleasure and displeasure; or 

ecause it exerciseth some faculty wherein they take 

i/l and so entertaineth them in good humour and 

\ g conceits toward themselves ; or because it 

< eth any other their ends. So that as it is said 

^ rae valours, that some men's valours are in the 

<}| * of them that look on ; so such men's industries 

'« eyes of others, or at least in regard of their 



l6 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [iF- 

own designments: only learned men love business < 
an action according to nature, as agreeable to health of 
mind as exercise is to health of body, taking pleasure in 
the action itself, and not in the purchase : so that of all 
men they are the most indefatigable, if it be towards any 
business which can hold or detain their mind. 

6. And if any man be laborious in reading and study 
and yet idle in business and action, it groweth from some 
weakness of body or softness of spirit ; such as Seneca 
speaketh of: Quidam iam sunt umbraliles, ut puteni in 
turhido esse quicquid in luce est ; and not of learning : well 
may it be that such a point of a man's nature may make 
him give himself to learning, but it is not learning that 
breedeth any such point in his nature. 

7. And that learning should take up too much time or 
leisure ; I answer, the most active or busy man that hath 
been or can be, hath (no question) many vacant times of 
leisure, while he expecteth the tides and returns of busi- 
ness (except he be either tedious and of no dispatch, 
or lightly and unworthily ambitious to meddle in things 
that may be better done by others), and then the question 
is but how those spaces and times of leisure shall be filled 
and spent; whether in pleasures or in studies; as was 
well answered by Demosthenes to his adversary iEschines, 
that was a man given to pleasure and told him JluU his 
orations did smell 0/ the lamp : Indeed (said Demosthenes) 
there is a great difference between the things that you and I 
do by lamp-light. So as no man need doubt that learning 
will expulse business, but rather it will keep and defend 
the possession of the mind against idleness and pleasure, 
which other^^'ise at unawares may enter to the prejudice 
of both. 

8. Again^ for that other conceit that learning diotild 



'■I 

xnment, it is /]f 
''j without all J I 



/", 



DJ ff.«.] THE FIRST BOOK. 

-ssJ andermine the reverence of laws and government, 
^^1 assunecllj a mere depravation and calumny, 
^ef shadow of truth. For to say that a blind custom of 
' obedience should be a surer obligation than duty taught 
and understood, it is to afi&rm, that a blind man may 
tread surer by a guide than a seeing man can by a light. 
And it is without all controversy, that learning doth make 
minds of men gentle, generous, maniable, and pliant 
to government; whereas ignorance makes them churlish, 
thwart, and mutinous: and the evidence of time doth 
clear this assertion, considering that the most barbarous, 
rude, and unlearned times have been most subject to 
tumults, seditions, and changes. 

9. And as to the judgement of Cato the Censor, he 
was well punished for his blasphemy against learning, in 
the same kind wherein he offended ; for when he was 
past threescore years old, he was taken with an extreme 
desire to go to school again, and to learn the Greek 
tongue, to the end to peruse the Greek authors ; which 
doth well demonstrate that his former censure of the 
Grecian learning was rather an affected gravity, than 
according to the inward sense of his own opinion. And 
as for Virgil's verses, though it pleased him to brave the 
world in taking to the Romans the art of empire, and 
leaving to others the arts of subjects ; yet so much is 
manifest that the Romans never ascended to that height 
of empire, till the time they had ascended to the height of 
other arts. For in the time of the two first Csesars, which 
had the art of government in greatest perfection, there 
lived the best poet, Virgilius Maro ; the best historio- 
grapher, Titus Livius ; the best antiquary, Marcus Varro ; 
and the best, or second orator, Marcus Cicero, that to 
the memoiy of man are known. As for the accusation 

c 



12 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [ll. ^^ 

Cicero's rival in eloquence : or if any man had rather cbU 
for scholars that were great generals, than generals that 
were great scholars, let him take Epaminondas the 
Theban, or Xenophon the Athenian; whereof the one 
was the first that abated the power of Sparta, and the 
other was the first that made way to the overthrow of the 
monarchy of Persia. And this concurrence is yet more 
visible in times than in persons, by how much an age 
is [a] greater object than a mai^. For both in Egypt, 
Assyria, Persia, Grecia, and Rome, the same times that 
are most renowned for arms, are likewise most admired 
for learning; so that the greatest authors and philosophers 
and the greatest captains and governors have lived in the 
same ages. Neither can it otherwise be : for as in man 
the ripeness of strength of the body and mind cometh 
much about .an age, save that the strength of the body 
cometh somewhat the more early, so in states, arms and 
learning, whereof the one correspondeth to the body, the 
other to the soul of man, have a concurrence or near 
sequence in times. 

3. And for matter of policy and government, that 
learning should rather hurt, than enable thereunto, is a 
thing very improbable : we see it is accounted an error 
to commit a natural body to empiric physicians, which 
commonly have a few pleasing receipts whereupon they 
are confident and adventurous, but know neither the 
causes of diseases, nor the complexions of patients, nor 
peril of accidents, nor the true method of cures : we see 
it is a like error to rely upon advocates or lawyers, which 
are only men of practice and not grounded in their books, 
who are many times easily surprised when matter falleth 
out besides their experience, to the prejudice of the 
causes they handle : so by like reason it cannot be but a 



^^•j W.3.J THE FIRST BOOK. 1 3 

fflafter of doubtful consequence if states be managed by 
empiric statesmen, not well mingled with men grounded 
in learning. But contrariwise, it is almost without instance 
contradictory that ever any government was disastrous that 
was in the hands of learned governors. For howsoever 
it hath been ordinary with politique men to extenuate and 
disable learned men by the names of pedanies ; yet in the 
records of time it appeareth in many particulars that the 
governments of princes in minority (notwithstanding the 
infinite disadvantage of that kind of state) have never- 
theless excelled the government of princes of mature age, 
even for that reason which they seek to traduce, which is, 
that by that occasion the state hath been in the hands of 
pedanies : for so was the state of Rome for the first five 
years, which are so much magnified, during the minority 
of Nero, in the hands of Seneca a pedanii: so it was again, 
for ten years' space or more, during the minority of Gor- 
dianus the younger, with great applause and contentation 
in the hands of Misitheus a pedanii : so was it before that, 
in the minority of Alexander Severus, in like happiness, in 
hands not much unlike, by reason of the rule of the 
women, who were aided by the teachers and preceptors. 
Nay, let a man look into the government of the bishops 
of Rome, as by name, into the government of Pius 
Quintus and Sextus Quintus in our times, who were both 
at their entrance esteemed but as pedantical friars, and he 
shall find that such popes do greater things, and proceed 
upon truer principles of estate, than those which have 
ascended to the papacy from an education and breeding 
in affairs of estate and courts of princes ; for although 
men bred in learning are perhaps to seek in points of 
convenience and accommodating for the present, which 
the Italians call ragioni di staio, whereof the same Pius 



12 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING, [if. ^ 

Cicero's rival in eloquence : or if any man had rather cbU 
for scholars that were great generals, than generals that 
were great scholars, let him take Epaminondas the 
Theban, or Xenophon the Athenian; whereof the one 
was the first that abated the power of Sparta, and the 
other was the first that made way to the overthrow of the 
monarchy of Persia. And this concurrence is yet more 
visible in times than in persons, by how much an age 
is [a] greater object than a mai^. For both in Egypt, 
Assyria, Persia, Grecia, and Rome, the same times that 
are most renowned for arms, are likewise most admired 
for learning; so that the greatest authors and philosophers 
and the greatest captains and governors have lived in the 
same ages. Neither can it otherwise be : for as in man 
the ripeness of strength of the body and mind cometh 
much about .an age, save that the strength of the body 
cometh somewhat the more early, so in states, arms and 
learning, whereof the one correspondeth to the body, the 
other to the soul of man, have a concurrence or near 
sequence in times. 

3. And for matter of policy and government, that 
learning should rather hurt, than enable thereunto, is a 
thing very improbable : we see it is accounted an error 
to commit a natural body to empiric physicians, which 
commonly have a few pleasing receipts whereupon they 
are confident and adventurous, but know neither the 
causes of diseases, nor the complexions of patients, nor 
peril of accidents, nor the true method of cures : we see 
it is a like error to rely upon advocates or lawyers, which 
are only men of practice and not grounded in their books, 
who are many times easily surprised when matter falleth 
out besides their experience, to the prejudice <rf the 
causes they handle : so by like reason it cannot be but a 



J^'i n»s.] THE FIRST BOOK. 1 3 



r 



matter of doubtful consequence if states be managed by 
empiric statesmen, not well mingled with men grounded 
in learning. But contrariwise, it is almost without instance 
contradictory that ever any government was disastrous that 
was in the hands of learned governors. For howsoever 
it hath been ordinary with politique men to extenuate and 
disable learned men by the names of pedantes ; yet in the 
records of time it appeareth in many particulars that the 
governments of princes in minority (notwithstanding the 
infinite disadvantage of that kind of state) have never- 
theless excelled the government of princes of mature age, 
even for that reason which they seek to traduce, which is, 
that by that occasion the state hath been in the hands of 
ftdanUs : for so was the state of Rome for the first five 
years, which are so much magnified, during the minority 
of Nero, in the hands of Seneca a pedanti: so it was again, 
for ten years' space or more, during the minority of Gor- 
dianus the younger, with great applause and contentation 
in the hands of Misitheus a pedanti : so was it before that, 
in the minority of Alexander Severus, in like happiness, in 
hands not much unlike, by reason of the rule of the 
women, who were aided by the teachers and preceptors. 
Nay, let a man look into the government of the bishops 
of Rome, as by name, into the government of Pius 
Quintus and Sextus Quintus in our times, who were both 
at their entrance esteemed but as pedantical friars, and he 
shall find that such popes do greater things, and proceed 
upon truer principles of estate, than those which have 
ascended to the papacy from an education and breeding 
in afiiairs of estate and courts of princes ; for although 
men bred in learning are perhaps to seek in points of 
convenience and accommodating for the present, which 
the Italians call ragioni di stato^ whereof the same Pius 



l6 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [U 

own designments : only learned men love business 
an action according to nature, as agreeable to heall 
mind as exercise is to health of body, taking pleasure 
the action itself, and not in the purchase : so that of 
men they are the most indefatigable, if it be towards i 
business which can hold or detain their mind. 

6. And if any man be laborious in reading and sti 
and yet idle in business and action, it groweth from so 
weakness of body or softness of spirit ; such as Sen* 
speaketh of: Quidam iam sunt umbraliles, ut puieni 
iurhido esse quicquid in luce est ; and not of learning: v 
may it be that such a point of a man's nature may xoi 
him give himself to learning, but it is not learning t] 
breedeth any such point in his nature. 

7. And that learning should take up too much ti 
leisure ; I answer, the most active or busy man that 
been or can be, hath (no question) many vacant times 
leisure, while he expecteth the tides and returns of 1 
ness (except he be either tedious and of no dispatc 
or lightly and unworthily ambitious to meddle in t 
that may be better done by others), and then the qu 

is but how those spaces and times of leisure shall be 
and spent; whether in pleasures or in studies; as v 
well answered by Demosthenes to his adversary iEscl 
that was a man given to pleasure and told him Thai 
orations did smell of the lamp : Indeed (said Demosthem 
there is a great difference between the things that you arte 
do by lamp-light. So as no man need doubt that leai 
will expulse business, but rather it will keep and de 
the possession of the mind against idleness and plei 
which otherwise at unawares may enter to the preji 
of both. 

8. Again, for tf iat o ther conc.^it that learn 



1.$] THE FIRST BOOK. 1 7 

undermine the reverence of laws and government, it is 
assureiy a mere depravation and calumny, without all 
shadow of truth. For to say that a blind custom of 
obedience should be a surer obligation than duty taught 
and understood, it is to afi&rm, that a blind man may 
tread surer by a guide than a seeing man can by a light. 
And it is without all controversy, that learning doth make 
the minds of men gentle, generous, maniable, and pliant 
to government ; whereas ignorance makes them churlish, 
thwart, and mutinous: and the evidence of time doth 
cfear this assertion, considering that the most barbarous, 
I and unlearned times have been most subject to 
Its, seditions, and changes. 
I 9. And as to the judgement of Cato the Censor, he 
veil punished for his blasphemy against learning, in 
he same kind wherein he offended ; for when he was 
threescore years old, he was taken with an extreme 
Jesire to go to school again, and to learn the Greek 
:ongue, to the end to peruse the Greek authors ; which 
loth well demonstrate that his former censure of the 
jrecian learning was rather an affected gravity, than 
iccording to the inward sense of his own opinion. And 
s for Virgil's verses, though it pleased him to brave the 
rorld in taking to the Romans the art of empire, and 
leaving to others the arts of subjects ; yet so much is 
manifest that the Romans never ascended to that height 
of empire, till the time they had ascended to the height of 
other arts. For in the time of the two first Caesars, which 
had the art of government in greatest perfection, there 
lived the best poet, Virgilius Maro ; the best historio- 
grapher, Titus Livius ; the best antiquary, Marcus Varro ; 
and the best, or second orator, Marcus Cicero, that to 
die memoiy of man are known. As for the accusation 

c 



l6 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [] 

own designments: only learned men love business 
an action according to nature, as agreeable to health 
mind as exercise is to health of body, taking pleasure 
the action itself, and not in the purchase : so that of 
men they are the most indefatigable, if it be towards i 
business which can hold or detain their mind. 

6. And if any man be laborious in reading and 
and yet idle in business and action, it groweth from s< 
weakness of body or softness of spirit ; such as Sane 
speaketh of: Quidam iam sunt umbraliles, ut puteni 
turbido esse quicquid in luce est ; and not of learning: w 
may it be that such a point of a man's nature may ma 
him give himself to learning, but it is not learning 
breedeth any such point in his nature. 

7. And that learning should take up too much time 
leisure ; I answer, the most active or busy man that 
been or can be, hath (no question) many vacant times 
leisure, while he expecteth the tides and returns of t 
ness (except he be either tedious and of no dispatc 
or lightly and unworthily ambitious to meddle in thin 
that may be better done by others), and then the questii 
is but how those spaces and times of leisure shall be fill 
and spent; whether in pleasures or in studies; as v 
well answered by Demosthenes to his adversary .^Ischiiv 
that was a man given to pleasure and told him That ) 
orations did smell of the lamp : Indeed (said Demosthene 
there is a great difference between the thiftgs that you ana 
do by lamp-light. So as no man need doubt that leamii 
will expulse business, but rather it will keep and defei 
the possession of the mind against idleness and p] 
which otherwise at unawares may enter to the pre 

of both. 

8. Again, for t hat o ther cpnc.^it that leara 



Dvernment, it is w 
iny, without all j| 



THE FIRST BOOK. 

: the reverence of laws and government, 

a mere depravation and calumny, 

• truth. For to say that a blind custom of 

should be a surer obligation than duty taught 

stood, it is to afi&rm, that a blind man may 
r by a guide than a seeing man can by a light, 
vrithout all controversy, that learning doth make 

of men gentle, generous, maniable, and pliant 
nent ; whereas ignorance makes them churlish, 
d mutinous: and the evidence of time doth 
issertion, considering that the most barbarous, 

unlearned times have been most subject to 
ditions, and changes. 

as to the judgement of Cato the Censor, he 
•unished for his blasphemy against learning, in 
kind wherein he offended ; for when he was 
score years old, he was taken with an extreme 
e;o to school again, and to learn the Greek 

the end to peruse the Greek authors ; which 

demonstrate that his former censure of the 
earning was rather an affected gravity, than 
to the inward sense of his own opinion. And 
.il's verses, though it pleased him to brave the 
aking to the Romans the art of empire, and 

others the arts of subjects ; yet so much is 
lat the Romans never ascended to that height 
till the time they had ascended to the height of 

For in the time of the two first Caesars, which 
-t of government in greatest perfection, there 
best poet, Virgilius Maro ; the best historio- 
itus Livius ; the best antiquary, Marcus Varro ; 
est, or second orator, Marcus Cicero, that to 
ry of man are known. As for the accusation 

c 



r8 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING, [ll. 

of Socrates, the time must be remembered when it ^ 
prosecuted ; which was under the Thirty Tyrants, tl 
most base, bloody, and envious persons that have g< 
verned; which revolution of state was no sooner ove 
but Socrates, whom they had made a person crimina 
was made a person heroical, and his memory accumulai 
with honours divine and human ; and those discourses < 
his which were then termed corrupting of manners, wei 
after acknowledged for sovereign medicines of the mir 
and manners, and so have been received ever since t 
this day. Let this therefore serve for answer 1 
fpolitiques, which in their humorous severity, or in the 
Teigned gravity, have presumed to throw imputatioi 
I upon learning^ which redargution nevertheless (save 
we know not whether our laboiurs may extend to oth< 
ages) were not needful for the present, in regard of tl: 
love and reverence towards learning, which the examp 
and countenance of two so learned princes, Que€ 
Elizabeth and your Majesty, being as Castor and PoUu: 
lucida stdera, stars of excellent light and most be 
influence, hath wrought in all men of place and authorii 
in our nation. 

III. I. Now therefore we come to that third sort ( 
discredit or diminution of credit that groweth unt 
learning from learned men themselves, which con 
monly cleaveth fastest : it is either from their fortuiv 
or from their manners, or from the nature of the 
studies. For the first, it is not in their power ; and 
second is accidental ; the third only is iM*oper to 1: 
handled : but because we are not in hand with t 
measure, but with popular estimation and c it 

not ami to »k somewhat of the two fo 1 

4 lio sr re i | iw to lean 



m. 1.] THE FIRST BOOK. I9 

fortune or condition of learned men,, a xe either in respect 
"of scarcity 01 inean§ ». Q.r> in respect of privateness of life 
jnd meanness of employments . 
2. Concerning want, and that it is the case of learned 

men usually to begin with little, and not to grow rich so 

» 

fast as other men, by reason they convert not their labours 
chiefly to lucre and increase, it were good to leave the 
common place in commendation of poverty to some friar 
to handle, to whom much was attributed by Machiavel in 
this point ; when he said, T/ia/ the kingdom of the clergy had 
been long be/ore at an end^ if the reputation and reverence 
towards the poverty of friars had not borne out the scandal 
of the superfluities and excesses of bishops and prelates. So 
a man might say that the felicity and delicacy of princes 
and great persons had long since turned to rudeness 
and barbarism, if the poverty of learning had not kept up 
civility and honour of life : but without any such advan- 
tages, it is worthy the observation what a reverent and 
honoured thing poverty of fortune was for some ages in 
the Roman state, which nevertheless was a state without 
paradoxes. For we see what Titus Livius saith in his 
introduction : CcBterum aut me amor negotii suscepti fallit, 
out nulla unquam respublica nee major y nee sanctior, nee 
bonis exemplis ditior fuit ; nee in quam tarn sercB avaritia 
uriaque immigraverint ; nee ubi tantus ae tarn diu pau- 
pertaii ac parsimonice honos fuerit. We see likewise, after 
that the state of Rome was not itself, but did degenerate, 
how that person that took upon him to be counsellor to 
Jolins Caesar after his victory where to begin his restora- 
tioii rf the state, maketh it of all points the most sum- 
take away the estimation of wealth : Verum hcBc 
la^ cum honore pecunicB desinent; si neque 

' alia vulgo cupienda, venalia erunt. To 
c 2 



11 



20 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [lIL 

conclude this point, as it was truly said, that Rubor e 
virtutis color, though sometime it come from vice; so 
may be fitly said that Pauper tas est virtutis /or tuna, thoug 
sometimes it may proceed from misgovernment and ac 
cident. Surely Salomon hath pronounced it both ii 
censure, Qui festinat ad divitias non erit insons ; and 
precept; Buy the truth, and sell it not ; and so of wist 
and knowledge £j.udging that means were to be spen 
upon learning, and not learning to be applied to m 
And as for the privateness or obscureness (as it may u 
in vulgar estimation accounted) of life of contemplativ 
men ; it is a theme so common to extol a private life, nc 
taxed with sensuality and sloth, in comparison and to 1 
disadvantage of a civil life, for safety, liberty, pleasun 
and dignity, or at least freedom from indignity, as n 
man handleth it but handleth it well ; such a consonanc 
it hath to men's conceits in the expressing, and to men 
consents in the allowing. This only I will add, th; 
learned men forgotten in states and not Kving in the ey( 
of men, are like the images of Cassius and Brutus in tl 
funeral of Junia ; of which not being represented, as mar 
others were, Tacitus saith, Eo ipso prce/ulgebant, quod m 
viselantur, 
J 3. And for meanness of employment, that which 
most traduced to contempt is that the government • 
youth is commonly allotted to them ; which age, becaui 
it is the age of least authority, it is transferred to tl 
disesteeming of those employments wherein youth is coi 
versant, and which are conversant about youth. But ho 
unjust this traducement is (if you will reduce things fro 
popularity of opinion to measure of reason) may appe: 
in that we see men are more curious what they put into 
new vessel than into a vessel seasoned ; and what mou 



III. 3.] THE FIRST BOOK. 21 

they lay about a young plant than about a plant cor- 
roborate; so as the weakest terms and times of all things 
use to have the best appHcations and helps. And will 
you hearken to the Hebrew rabbins ? Four young men 
ihall see visions ^ and your old men shall dream dreams ; say 
they youth is the worthier age, for that visions are nearer 
apparitions of God than dreams ? And let it be noted, 
that howsoever the condition of life oi pedantes hath been 
scomed upon theatres, as the ape of tyranny ; and that 
the modem looseness or negligence hath taken no due 
regard to the choice of schoolmasters and tutors ; yet the 
ancient wisdom of the best times did always make a just 
complaint, that states were too busy with their laws and 
too negligent in point of education : which excellent part 
of ancient discipline hath been in some sort revived of 
late times by the colleges of the Jesuits; of whom, al- 
though in regard of their superstition I may say. Quo 
melioresy eo deieriores ; yet in regard to this, and some 
other points concerning human learning and moral mat- 
ters, I may say, as Agesilaus said to his enemy Pharna- 
t)azus. Talis quum sis, utinam nosier esses. And thus 
much touching the discredits drawn from the fortunes of 
learned men. 

4. As touching the manners of learned men, it is a 
thing personal and individual : and no doubt there be 
imongst them, as in other professions, of all tempera- 
tures : but yet so as it is not without truth which is said, 
that Abeunt siudia in mores, studies have an influence and 
operation upon the manners of those that are conversant 
in them. 

5. But upon an attentive and indifferent review, I for 
my part cannot find any disgrace to learning can pro- 
ceed from the manners of learned men; not inherent 



/ 



22 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [lILj 

to them as they are learned ; except it be a fault (whicl 
was the supposed fault of Demosthenes, Cicero, Cato thi 
second, Seneca, and many more) that because the time; 
they read of are commonly better than the times they livi 
in, and the duties taught better than the duties practised 
they contend sometimes too far to bring things to per 
fection, and to reduce the corruption of manners t 
honesty of precepts or examples of too great heighl 
And yet hereof they have caveats enough in their owi 
walks. For Solon, when he was asked whether he ha 
given his citizens the best laws, answered wisely, Fea c 
such as they would receive : and Plato, finding that his ow 
heart could not agree with the corrupt manners of hi 
country, refused to bear place or office; saying, Thai 
mart's country was to he used as his parents tvere, that i 
with humble persuasions^ and not with contestations. An 
Caesar's counsellor put in the same caveat, Non ad vetei 
instituta revocans qucB jampridem corruptis morihus ludihr 
sunt: and Cicero noteth this error directly in Cato tl 
second, when he writes to his friend Atticus ; Cato optii 
sentit, sed nocet interdum reipubliccB ; loquitur enim tanqua 
in repuhlicd Platonis, non tanquam in face Romuli. Ai 
the same Cicero doth excuse and expound the phil 
sophers for going too far and being too exact in the 
prescripts, when he saith, Isti ipsi prcBceptares virtuiis 
magistri videntur fines officiorum paulo longius qtiam natm 
vellet protulisse^ ut cum ad uitimum ammo contendissemus^ i 
iamen, ubi oportet^ amsisieremus : and yet himself mig 
have said, Monitis sttm mmar ipse meis ; for it was I 
own fault, though not in so extreme Si degree. , 

6. Another &ult i much of this kind hath ba 
indd to ] ; i is^ that they have e 

If I , and honour of 



III.6.J THE FIRST BOOK, 23 

countries or masters before their own fortu nes or safetie s. 
For so saiih Demosthenes unto the Athenians ; If it 
please you to note it, my counsels unto you are not such 
whereby I should grow great amongst you, and you become 
little amongst the Grecians ; but they be of that nature, as 
they are sometimes not good for me to give, but are always 
good for you iofolloiJu. And so Seneca, after he had con- 
secrated that Quinquennium Neronis to the eternal glory 
of learned governors, held on his honest and loyal course 
of good and free coimsel, after his master grew extremely 
comipt in his government. Neither can this point other- 
wise be £forlearning endueth men's minds with a true 
sense of the frailty of their persons, the casualty of their 
fortunes, and the dignity of their soul and vocationTj so 
that it is impossible for them to esteem that any greamess 
of their own fortune can be a true or worthy end of their 
being and ordainment ; and therefore are desirous to give 
their account to God, and so likewise to their masters 
er God (as kings and the states that they serve) in these 
words; Ecce tibi lucrefeci, and not Ecce mihi lucrefeci : 
whereas the corrupter sort of mere politiques, that have 
not their thoughts established by learning in the love and 
apprehension of duty, nor never look abroad into univers- 
ality, do refer all things to themselves, and thrust them- 
selves into the centre of the world, as if all lines should 
meet in them and their fortunes ; never caring in all 
tempests what becomes of the ship of estates, so they 
may ^e themselves in the cockboat of their own for- 
: whereas men that feel the weight of duty and 
w the limits of self-love, use to make good their 
1 duties; though with peril ; and if they stand in 
and violent alterations, it is rather the reverence 
5S both adverse parts do give to honest}^, 



X 



24 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [l 

than any versatile advantage of their own carriage, 
for this point of tender sense and fast obligation of ( 
which learning doth endue the mind withal, howso 
fortune may tax it, and many in the depth of their cor 
principles may despise it, yet it will receive an c 
allowance, and therefore needs the less disproof or 
cusation. 

7. Another fault incident commonly to learned n 
which may be more probably defended than truly der 
is, that they fail sometimes in applyingthQpi& 
jartici;l aj p ersgps : which want ot exact applica 
aj lieth from two causes ; the one, because the largei 
of their mind can hardly confine itself to dwell in 
exquisite observation or examination of the nature 
customs of one person : for it is a speech for a lover, 
not for a w ise man, Sa/i's magnum alter alien theat. 
sumus, (JNTevertheless I shall yield, that he that car 
contract the sight of his mind as well as disperse 
dilate it, wanteth a great fac ulty/? But there is a sec 
cause, which is no inability, but a rejection upon ch 
and judgement. For the honest and just bounds of 
servation by one person upon another, extend no fur 
but to understand him sufficientiy,. whereby not to ] 
him offence, or whereby to be able to give him fait 
counsel, or whereby to stand upon reasonable guard 
caution in respect of a man's self. But to be specula 
into another man to the end to know how to work hin 
wind him, or govern him, proceedeth from a heart ths 
double and cloven and not entire and ingenuous ; wl 
as in friendship it is want of integrity, so towards prii 
or superiors is want of duty. For the custom of 
Levant, which is that subjects do forbear to gaze 
fix their eyes upon princes, is in the outward cerem 



y 



III. 7.] THE FIRST BOOK. 25 

barbarous, but the moral is good :[i2L ™^^ ought not by 
cunning and bent observations to pierce and penetrate 
into the hearts of kings, which the scripture hath de- — — 
id to be inscrutable^ 
8. There is yet another fault (with which I will con- 
clude this part) which is often noted in learned men, that 
tjiey do many times fail to observe decency and discre- h( 
tion in their behaviour and carriage) and commit errors 
In small and ordinary points of action, so as the vulgar 
sort of capacities do make a judgement of them in greater 
matters by that which they find wanting in them in 
ler. B.ut this consequence doth oft deceive men, 
for which I do refer them over to that which was said by 
Phemistocles, arrogantly and uncivilly being applied to 
himself out of his own mouth, but, being applied to the 
general state of this question, pertinently and justly; 
when being invited to touch a lute he said He could 
not fiddle, but he could make a small town a great state. 
So no doubt many may be well seen in the passages of 
government and policy, which are to seek in little and 
punctual occasions. I refer them also to that which 
Plato said of his master Socrates, whom he compared 
to the gallipots of apothecaries, which on the outside had 
apes and owls and antiques but contained within so- 
vereign and precious liquors and confections ; acknow- 
ledging that to an external report he was not without 
superficial levities and deformities, but was inwardly re- 
plenished with excellent virtues and powers. And so 
much touching the point of manners of learned men. 

9. But in the mean time I have no purpose to give 
allowance to some conditions and courses base and 
unworthy, wherein divers professors of learning have 
wronged themselves and gone too far; such as were 



2,6 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING, [ll 

those trencher philosophers which in the later age 

the Roman state were usually in the houses of g. 

)^ persons, being little better than sole mn parasites; 

which kind, Lucian maketh a merry description of 

philosopher that the great lady took to ride with hei 

her coach, and would needs have him carry her 1 

dog, which he doing officiously and yet uncomely, 

page scoffed and said, Tha^ he doubted the philosof. 

of a Stoic would turn to he a Cynic, But above all 

rest, the gross and palpable flattery, whereunto m; 

not unlearned have abased and abused their wits ; 

pens, turning (as Du Bartas saith) Hecuba into Hele 

and Faustina into Lucretia, hath most diminished 

"* — price and estimation of learning. [Neither is the mod 

. w dedication of books and writings, as to patrons, to 

^ commended : for that books (such as are worthy the na 

— of books) ought to have no patrons but truth and reas 

And the ancient custom was to dedicate them only 

private and equal friends, or to entitle the books ^ 

their names : or if to kings and great persons, it was 

some such as the argument of the book was fit and p 

per for : but these and the like courses may dese 

rather reprehension than defence. 

lo. Not that I can tax or- condemn the morigerat 

or application of learned men to men in fortune. 1 

the answer was good that Diogenes made to one t 

' asked him in mockery. How it came to pass that ph 

\ sophers were the followers of rich men, and not rich 

\ of philosophers ? He answered soberly, and yet sharj 

I Because the one sort knew what they had need of and 

, other did not. And of the like nature was the ans^ 

which Aristippus made, when having a petition to D 
nysius, and no ear given to him, he fell down at his fe 



I 10.] THE FIRST BOOK, 27 

liereupon Dionysius stayed and gave him the hearing, 
nd granted it; and afterward some person, tender on 
le behalf of philosophy, reproved Aristippus that he 
' • d offer the profession of philosophy such an indig- 
ity as for a private suit to fall at a tyrant's feet : but he 
I answered, // was not his fault, but it was the fault of 
^'(mysius, that had his ears in his feet. Neither was it 
ccounted weakness but discretion in him that would not 
dispute his best with Adrianus Caesar ; excusing himself, 
That it was reason to yield to him that commanded thirty 
kgions. These and the like applications and stooping to 
points of necessity and convenience cannot be disallow- 
ed; for though they may have some outward baseness, 
yet in a judgement truly made they are to be accounted 
submissions^ the occasion and not to the person. 

IV. I. cNow I proceed to those errors and vanities 
which have intervened amongst the studies themselves 
of the learned^ which is that which is principal and 
proper to the present argument ; wherein my purpose is 
not to make a justification of the errors, butlby a censure"*^^ 
and separation of the errors to make a justification of V/* 
that which is good and sound, and to deliver that from 
the aspersion of the other/J For we see that it is the 
manner of men to scandalize and deprave that which 
retaineth the state and virtue, by taking advantage upon 
that which is corrupt and degenerate : as the heathens 
in the primitive church used to blemish and taint the 
Christians with the faults and corruptions of heretics. 
But nevertheless I have no meaning at this time to make 
any exact animadversion of the errors and impediments 
in matters of learning, which are more secret and remote 
from vulgar opinion, but only to speak unto such as do 
lall under or near unto a popular observation. 



28 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [iV. 

^y^2. There be therefore chiefly three vanities in sti 
whereby learning hath been most traduced. For th 
things we do esteem vain, which are either false or i 
volous, those which either have no truth or no use : a 
those persons we esteem vain, which are either cred 
or curious ; and curiosity is either in matter or wordF 
so that in reason as well as in experience th ere fal l 
i p be th e se three distempers ( | as I may term theiol 
learning; : t he first s fantastical learning^ ; the second ^ coi 
tenti^ys learning : and the last, ^fflj^^ff^^ ^^^P^^^fTr \ 
imagiaatifiins, va in altercatio ns, and v ain affectation s ; i 
with the last I will begin. Martin Luther, conducted (i 
doubt) by an higher providence, but in discourse of rea- 
son, finding what a province he had undertaken against 
the bishop of Rome and the degenerate traditions of the 
church, and finding his own solitude, being no ways 
aided by the opinions of his own time, was enforced to 
awake all antiquity, and to call former times to his suc- 
cours to make a party against the present time : so that 
the ancient authors, both in divinity and in humanity, 
which had long time slept in libraries, began generally 
to be read and revolved. This by consequence did draw 
on a necessity of a more exquisite travail in the lan- 
guages original, wherein those authors did write, for the 
better understanding of those authors, and the better 
advantage of pressing and applying their words. And 
thereof grew again a delight in their manner of style and 
phrase, and an admiration of that kind of writing ; which 
was much furthered and precipitated by the enmity and 
opposition that the propounders of those primitive but 
seeming new opinions had against the schoolmen; who 
were generally of the contrary part, and whose writings 
were altogether in a differing style and form; taking 



J.] THE FIRST BOOK. 7,g 

;rty to coin and frame new terms of art to express 
own sense, and to avoid circuit of speech, without 
ird to ^he pureness, pl eas antnes s, and (as I may cal l \ 

l^wfnlT^^<| ^ of the p fiy^S^ nr AygrH AnH a^rain, hprancA | 

»i great labour then was with the people (of whom the 

t;es were wont to say, Execrabilis isia iurha^ quce 
•w navii legem), for the winning and persuading of them, 
e grew of necessity in chief price and request elo- 
lence and variety of discourse, as the fittest and forci- 
t access into the capacity of the vulgar sort : so that 
mese four causes concurring, the admiration of ancient 
authors, the hate of the schoolmen, the exact study of 
languages, and the efficacy of preaching, did bring in an 
affectionate study of eloquence and copie of speech, which 
then began to flourish. This grew speedily to an excess ; 
for men began to hunt more after words than matter; 
more after the choiceness of the phrase, and the round 
and clean composition of the sentence, and the sweet 
falling of the clauses, and the varying and illustration of 
their works with tropes and figures, than after the weight 
of matter, worth of subject, soundness of argument, life 
')f invention, or depth of judgement. Then grew the 
lowing and watery vein of Osorius, the Portugal bishop, 
to be in price. Then did Sturmius spend such infinite 
and curious pains upon Cicero the Orator, and Hermo- 
genes the Rhetorician, besides his own books of Periods 
and Imitation, and the like. Then did Car of Cam- -V 
bri( and Ascham with their lectures and writings 
ost deify Cicero and Demosthenes, and allure all 
ng men that were studious unto that delicate and 
p led kind of learning. Then did Erasmus take oc- 
\ to make the scoffing echo. Decern annos consumpsi 
w kgendo Cicerone ; and the echo answered in Greek 



X 



\ 



30 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [P 

One, A sine. Then grew the learning of the schoi 
to be utterly despised as barbarous. In sum, the wl 
inclination and bent of those times was rather towa 
copie than weight. 

3. Here therefore is the first distemper of leami 
when men study words and not matter ; whereof, thi 
I have represented an example of late times, yet it 
been and will be secundum majus ei minus in all 1 
And how is it possible but this should have an operal 
to discredit learning, even with vulgar capacities, wl 
they see learned men's works like the first letter oi 
patent, or limned book ; which though it hath large floB 
rishes, yet it is but a letter ? It seems to me that Pyi 
lion's frenzy is a good emblem or portraiture of t 
vanity : for words are but the ima ges of matt er ; a 
except they have life of reason and invention, to fall i 
love with them is all one as to fall in love with a picture. 

4. But yet notwithstanding it is a thing not hastily t 
be condemned, to clothe and adorn the obscurity eve 
of philosophy itself with sensible and plausible elocutioi 
For hereof we have great examples in Xenophon, Cicen 
Seneca, Plutarch, and of Plato also in some degree ; an 
hereof likewise there is great use : for surely, to tl 
severe inquisition of truth and the deep progri 
philosophy, it is some hindrance ; because it is too ear 
satisfactory to the mind of man, an d quencheth the d 
sire of further search, Jbefarg^jye^ come to a ju st peric 
!but then i/a man be to have any use of such knowled^ 
in civil occasions, of conference, counsel, pers sion, d 
course, or the like, then shall he find it pre] ed to 1 
hands in those authors which write in that mam 1 
the excess of this is so justly contemptible, t E 
cules, when he saw the image of Adonis, Veu 



r.4.] THE FIRST BOOK. 3 1 

I temple, said in disdain, Nil sacri es; so there is none 
Hercules' followers in learning, that is, the more severe 
id laborious sort of inquirers into truth, but will despise 
ose delicacies and affectations, as indeed capable of no 
vineness. And thus much of the first disease or dis- 
mper of learning. 

5. [The second which followeth is in nature worse than 
e fbraiSt : for as substance of matter is better than 
auty of words, so contrariwise vain matter is worse 
an vain words^ wherein it seemeth the reprehension of 
lint Paul was not only proper for those times, but pro- 
letical for the times following ; and not only respective 
' divinity, but extensive to all knowledge : Deviia pro- 
mos vocum noviiaies, ei oppositiones falsi nominis scienticE. 
or he "assigneth two marks and badges of suspected 
id falsified science : the one, the novelty and strange- 
2ss of terms; the other, the strictness of positions, 
hich of necessity doth induce oppositions, and so ques- 
)ns and altercations. Surely, like as many substances 
nature which are solid do putrify and corrupt into 
orms ; so it is the property of good and sound know- 
dge to putrify and dissolve into a number of subtle, 
unwholesome, and (as I may term them) vermiculate 
stions, which have indeed a kind of quickness and 
of spirit, but no soundness of matter or goodness of 
ity. ^his kind of degenerate learning did chiefly 
1 amongst the schoolmen : who having sharp and 
rong wits, and abundance of leisure, and small variety 
' reading, but their wits being sl^t_ uj) jp-tb<»-r<4k^{^a 
wauthor s (chiefly Aristotle their dictator) as their per- 
tns were shut up in the cells of monasteries and col- 
i, and knowing little history, either of nature or 
ne, did out of no great quantity of matter and infinite j 



32 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [ 

agitation of wit spin out unto us those laborious wel 
Ipgr n in o- w D icb are extant in their books, ror the 
and mind of man, if it work upon matter, which is 
contemplation of the creatures of God, worketh ac( 
ing to the stuff and is limited thereby ; but if it ' 
upon itself, as the spider worketh his web, then 
endless, and brings forth indeed c obwebs of lean 
admirable for the fineness of thread and work, bi 

no-substanfiejOT profit. ~" 

6. This same unprofitable subtility or curiosity 
two sorts ; either in the subject itself that they ha 
when it is a fruitless speculation or controversy (wh( 
there are no small number both in divinity and p 
sophy), or in the manner or method of handling 
knowledge, which amongst them was this ; upon e 
particular position or assertion to frame objections, 
to those objections, solutions ; which solutions wen 
the most part not confutations, but distinctions : wh( 
indeed the strength of all sciences is, as the streng 
the old man's faggot, in the bond. For the harmony 
science, supporting each part the other, is and ougl 
be the true and brief confutation and suppression c 
the smaller sort of objections. But, on the other si« 
you t^ke out every axiom, as the sticks of the faggot, 
by one, you may quarrel with them and bend them 
break them at your pleasure : so that as was sai 
Seneca, Verborum minuiiis rerum frangit Pondera^ 
man may truly say of the schoolmen, Qucestionum mit 
scientiarum frangunt soliditatem. For were it not b 
for a man in a fair room to set up one great ligt 
branching candlestick of lights, than to go about 
a small watch candle into every corner? And su« 
their method, that rests not so much upon evidenc 



ir.6.] THE FIRST BOdK. 33 

rath proved by arguments, authorities, similitudes, ex- 
Jes, as upon particular confutations and solutions of 
?ei7 scruple, cavillation, and objection ; breeding for the 
t part one question as fast as it solveth another ; even 
ts in the former resemblance, when you carry the light 
ttto one comer, you darken the rest ; so that the fable 
ind fiction of Scylla seemeth to be a lively image of this 
: of philosophy or knowledge ; which was trans- 
led into a comely virgin for the upper parts ; but 
. Candida succinciam latrantibus inguina monstris : so 
he generalities of the schoolmen are for a while good 
proportionable ; but then when you descend into 
iieir distinctions and decisions, instead of a fruitful 
ffomb for the use and benefit of man's life, they end 
n monstrous altercations and barking questions. So 
IS it is not possible but this quality of knowledge must 
fall under popular contempt, the people being apt to 
contemn truth upon occasion of controversies and alter- 
cations, and to think they are all out of their way which 
never meet; and when they see such digladiation about 
subtilties, and matter of no use or moment, they easily 
fall upon that judgement of Dionysius of Syracusa, Verba 
ista sunt senum otiosorum, — • 

7. Notwithstanding, certain it is that if those school- 
men to their great thirst of truth and unwearied travail 
of wit had joined variety and universality of reading 
and contemplation, they had proved excellent lights, to 
the great advancement of all learning and knowledge ; 
but as they are, they are great imdertakers indeed, and *\ 
fierce with dark keeping. But as in the inquiry of the 
divine truth, their pride inclined to leave the oracle of 
God's word, and to vanish in the mixture of their own 
inventions ; so in the inquisition of nature, they ever left 

D 



34 0^ THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [] 

the oracle of God's works, and adored the deceiving 
deformed images which the miequal mirror of their 
minds, or a few received authors or principles, die 
present mito them. And thus much for the se 
disease of learning. 
\ 8. For the third vice or disease of learning, ^ 
\ concemeth deceit or untruth, it is of all the rest 
— J foulest ; as that which doth destroy the essential : 
of knowledge, which is nothing but a representatio 
truth : for the truth of being and the truth of kno 
are one, diflfering no more than the direct beam anc 
beam reflected. This vice therefore brancheth itself 
two sorts ; delight in deceiving and aptness to be 
ceived; i mpostur e an d credulity ; which, although 
appear to be of a diverse nature, the one seemin 
proceed of cunning and the other of simplicity, 
certainly they do for the most part concur: for, as 
verse noteth, 

Percontatorem fiigito, nam garrulus idem est, 

an inquisitive man is a prattler ; so upon the like re 
a credulous man is a deceiver : as we see it in fame, 
he that will easily believe rumours, will as easily augi 
rumours and add somewhat to them of his own ; \( 
Tacitus wisely noteth, when he saith, Fingunt simtd 
duntque : so great an affinity hath fiction and belief. 

9. This facility of credit and accepting or admi 
things weakly authorized or warranted, is of two \ 
according to the subject : for it is either a beli( 
history, or, as the lawyers speak, matter of fact ; or 
of matter of art and opinion. As to the former, 
see the experience and inconvenience of this erro 
ecclesiastical history ; which hath too easily received 
registered reports and narrations of miracles wroogfa 



IV. 9] THE FIRST BOOK. 35 

rtyrs, hermits, or monks of the desert, and other holy 
men, and their relics, shrines, chapels, and images : 
which though they had a passage for a time by the 
^orance of the people, the superstitious simplicity of 
some, and the politic toleration of others, holding them 
bat as divine poesies ; yet after a period of time, when 
die mist began to clear up, they grew to be esteemed but 
as old wives' fables, impostures of the clergy, illusions of 
s, and badges of Antichrist, to the great scandal and 
detr nt of religion. 

10. So in natural history, we see there hath not been 
that choice and judgement used as ought to have been 
as may appear in the writings of Plinius, Cardanus, 
Albertus, and divers of the Arabians, being fraught with 
much fabulous matter, a great part not only imtried, 
but notoriously untrue, to the great derogation of the 
credit of natural philosophy with the grave and sober 
kind of wits : wherein the wisdom and integrity of 
Aristotle is worthy to be observed; that, having made 
so diligent and exquisite a history of living creatures, 
hath mingled it sparingly with any vain or feigned 
matter : and yet on the other side hath cast all pro- 
digious narrations, which he thought worthy the record- 

, into one book : excellently discerning ^^t matter 
of manifest truth, such whereupon observation and rule 
was to be built, " ^as not to be mingled or weakened 
with matter of doubtful credit ; and yet again, that 



;// 



■*^ 



rarities and reports that seem uncredible are not to be 
suppressed or denied to the memory of men. 

II. And as for the facility of credit which is yielded to 
arts and opinions, it is likewise of two kinds ; either when 
too much belief is attributed to the arts themselves, or 
to certain authors in any art. The sciences themselves, 

D 2 



36 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [iV 

which have had better intelligence and confederacy > 
the imagination of man than with his reason, are tl 
in number ; astrology, natural magic, and alcher 
of which sciences, nevertheless, the ends or preter 
are noble. For astrology pretendeth to discover 
correspondence or concatenation which is between 
superior globe and the inferior : natural magic pretenc 
to call and r educe natural philosophy from variet) 
speculations to the magnitude of works : and alchc 
pretendeth to make separation of all the unlike p 
of bodies which in mixtures of nature are incorpor 
But the derivations and prosecutions to these ends, t 
in the theories and in the practices, are full of e 
and vanity; which the great professors themselves 1: 
sought to veil over and conceal by enigmatical writi] 
and referring themselves to auricular traditions and s 
other devices, to save the credit of impostures. And 
surely to alchemy this right is due, that it may 
compared to the husbandman whereof iEsop ms 
the fable; that, when he died, told his sons that 
had left unto them gold buried under ground in 
vineyard ; and they digged over all the ground, 
gold they found none ; but by reason of their stin 
and digging the mould about the roots of their vi 
they had a great vintage the year following : so assure 
the search and stir to 'make gold hath brought to ligl 
great niunber of good and fruitful inventions and 
periments, as well for the disclosing of nature as for 
use of man's life. 

12. And as for the overmuch credit that hath t 
given unto authors in sciences, in making them dictat 
that their words should stand, and not consuls to \ 
advice ; the damage is infinite that sciences have recei 



IV. 12.] THE FIRST BOOK. 37 

thereby, as the principal cause that hath kept them low 
at a stay without growth or advancement. For hence 
it hath comen, that in arts mechanical the first deviser 
comes shortest, and time addeth and perfecteth ; but in 
sciences the first author goeth furthest, and time leeseth 
and comipteth. So we see, artillery, sailing, printing, and 
the like, were grossly managed at the first, and by time 
accommodated and refined : but contrariwisq^Jhe philo- 
sophies and sciences of Aristotl^ Plato, Democritus, 
Hippocrates, Euclides, Archimedes, of most vigour at 
first and by time degenerate and imbasedT whereof 
reason is no other, but that in the former many wits 
and industries have contributed in one ; and in the latter 
many wits and industries have been spent about the wit 
of some one, whom many times they have rather de- 
praved than illustrated. For as water will not ascend 
higher than the level of the first springhead from whence 
it descendeth, so knowledge derived from Aristotle, and 
exempted from Hberty of examination, will not rise again 
higher than the knowledge of Aristotle. And therefore 
although the position be good, Oportet discentem credere, 
yet it must be coupled with this, Oportet edoctum judicare ; 
for disciples do ow e unto masters only a temp.Qrary belief 
and a suspen sion of* their ow n ^judgement till -they be 
^y mstructedy and no t an absolute resignation or per^ 
petual captivi ty : and therefore, to conclude this point, '^ 
I will say no more, but so let great authors have their 
due, as time, which is the author of authors, be not 
deprived of his due, which is, further and further to 
discover truth. Thus have I gone over these three 
diseases of learning; besides the which there are some 
other rather peccant humours than formed diseases, 
^which nevertheless are not so secret and intrinsic but 



I 



38 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [iV. i». 

that they fall under a popular observation and traduce- 
ment, and therefore are not to be passed over. 

V, I. The first of these is the extreme affecting 
two extremities : the one antiquity, the other novelty; 
virherein it seemeth the children of time do take after 1 
nature and malice of the father. For as he dev< tli 
his children, so one of them seeketh to devour and 
suppress the other ; while antiquity envieth there should 
be new additions, and novelty cannot be content to add 
but it must deface : surely the advice of the propl 
the true direction in this matter, Sfa/e super vtas anl 
ef videte qucenam sit via recta et bona et ambulate in nu 
Antiquity deserveth that reverence, that men should make 
a stand thereupon and discover what is the best way; 
but when the discovery is well taken, then to make pro- 
gression. And to speak truly, Antiquitas scBculi juoentm 
mundi. These times are the ancient times, when the 
world is ancient, and not those which we accoxmt ancient 
ordine reirogrado, by a computation backward from our- 
selves. 

2. Another error induced by the former is a disti 
that anything should be now to be found out, w i 
the world should have missed and passed over so lo 
time ; as if the same objection were to be made to tii , 
that Lucian maketh to Jupiter and other the hea 1 
gods ; of which he wondereth that they begot so y 
children in old time, and begot none in his time; and 
asketh whether they were become septuagenaiy, or 
whether the law Papia, made against old men's mar- 
riages, had restrained them. So it seemeth men doHbt 
lest time is become past children and generatioii; 
wherein contrariwise we see commonly the levity and 
unconstancy of men's judgements, which till a matter 



J THE FIRST BOOK. 39 

ione, wonder that it can be done ; and as soon as 
done, wonder again that it was no sooner done : 
re see in the expedition of Alexander into Asia, 
li at first was prejudged as a vast and impossible 
prise ; and yet afterwards it pleaseth Livy to make 
ore of it than this, Nil alitid quhm bene ausus vana 
mere. And the same happened to Columbus in the -4^ 
m navigation. But in intellectual matters it is 
more common ; as may be seen in most of the 
sitions of Euclid; which till they be demonstrate, 
eem strange to our assent ; but being demonstrate, 
lind accepteth of them by a kind of relation (as the 
s speak) as if we had known them before. 
Another error, that hath also some affinity with the 
*, is a conceit that of former opinions or sects after 
' and examination the best hath still prevailed and 
:ssed the rest ; so as if a man should begin the 
of a new search, he were but like to light upon 
^hat formerly rejected, and by rejection brought into 
n : as if the multitude, or the wisest for the mult- 
sake, were not ready to give passage rather to that 
is popular and superficial, than to that which is 
itial and profound ; for the truth is, that time 
h to be of the nature of a river or stream, which 
ii down to us that which is light and blown up, and 
1 and drowneth that which is weighty and solid. 
Another error, of a diverse nature from all the 
, is the over-early and peremptory reduction of 
idge into arts and methods ; from which time 
)nly sciences receive small or no augmentation, 
young men, when they knit and shape perfectly, 
lom grow to a further stature ; so knowledge, while 
I aphorisms and observations, it is in growth : but 



40 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. 

when it once is comprehended in exact methods, it 
perchance be further polished and illustrate and ac 
modated for use and practice ; but it increaseth no 
in bulk and substance. 
( ///S . 5' Another error which doth succeed that whic 
^O^ last mentioned, is, that after the distribution of parti 
arts and sciences, men have abandoned universalit 
• philosophia prima : which cannot but cease and sto 
; progression. For no perfect discovery can be made " 
a flat or a level : neither is it possible to discovei 
more remote and deeper parts of any science, if 
stand but upon the level of the same science, and as 
not to a higher science. 

6. Another error hath proceeded from too gr( 
reverence, and a kind of adoration of the mind 
understanding of man ; by means whereof, men 
withdrawn themselves too much from the contempl 
of nature, and the observations of experience, and 
tumbled up and down in their own reason and con 
Upon these intellectualists, which are notwithstai 
commonly taken for the most sublime and divine j 
sophers, Heraclitus gave a just censure, saying, 
sough/ truth in their own little worlds, and not in the 
and common world ; for they disdain to spell, and 
degrees to read in the volume of God's works : 
contrariwise by continual meditation and agitation < 
do urge and as it were invocate their own spiri 
divine and give oracles unto them, whereby thej 
deservedly deluded. 

7. Another error that hath some coimexion wit! 
latter is, that men have used to infect their medita 
opinions, and doctrines, with some conceits which 
have most admired, or some sciences which tbej 



)V.7.] THE FIRST BOOK, 41 

most applied ; and given all things else a tincture accord- 
ing to them, utterly untrue and unproper. So hath Plato 
intermingled his philosophy with theology, and Aristotle 
with logic ; and the second school of Plato, Proclus and 
the rest, with the mathematics. For these were the arts 
which had a kind of primogeniture with them severally. 
So have the alchemists made a philosophy out of a few 
experiments of the furnace ; and Gilbertus our country- 
man hath made a philosophy out of the observations of a 
loadstone. So Cicero, when, reciting the several opinions 
of the nature of the soul, he found a musician that held 
soul was but a harmony, saith pleasantly, JItc ah arte 
sua non recessit, dsc. But of these conceits Aristotle speak- 
eth seriously and wisely when he saith, Qui respiciunt 
ad pauca de facili pronunciant. 

8. Another error is an impatience of doubt, and haste 
to assertion without due and mature suspension of judge- 
ment. For the two ways of contemplation are not unlike 
the two ways of action commonly spoken of by the 
ancients : the one plain and smooth in the beginning, 
and in the end impassable ; the other rough and trouble- 
some in the entrance, but after a while fair and even : so 
it is in contemplation ; if a man will begin with certain- 
ties, he shall end in doubts ; but if he will be content to 
begin with doubts, he shall end in certainties. 

9. Another error is in the manner of the tradition and 
delivery of knowledge, which is for the most part magis- 
tral and peremptory, and not ingenuous and faithful; 
in a sort as may be soonest believed, and not easiliest 
examined. It is true that in compendious treatises for 
practice that form is not to be disallowed : but in the 
trae handling of knowledge, men ought not to fall either 
(m the one side into the vein of Velleius the Epicurean, 



42 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNINQ. [v.(» 

Nil lam melums, quam ne dubilare ali'qua de re videretar^ 
nor on the other side into Socrates his ironical doubting 
of all things ; but to propound things sincerely with mor« 
or less asseveration, as they stand in a man's own judge- 
ment proved more or less. 

lo. Other errors there are in the scope that men 
propound to themselves, whereunto they bend their en- 
doa\'ours ; for whereas the more constant and devote 
kind of professors of any science ought to propound to 
themselves (o make some additions to their science, ibey 
convert their labours to aspire to certain second prizes: 
as 10 be a profound interpreter or conunenter, to be 1 
sharp chiimpion or defender, to be a methodical com- 
pounder or abridger, and so thi; patrimony of knowledge 
comcth to be sometimes improved, but seldom aag- 

ir. But the greatest error of all the rest is the mis- 

1 taking or misplacing of the last or furthest end of know- 

[ ledge. For men have entered into a de^re of learning 

and knowledge, sometimes upon a natural curiosity and 

inquisiiii'e appetite; sometimes to entertain their mindi 

with variet\- and delight ; sometimes for ornament and 

reputation ; and sometimes to enable them to victory of 

vit and contradiction ; and most times for lucre and 

profession ; and seldom sincerely to gi^~e a true acconnt 

of thdr gift <^ reason, to the benefit and use of men : as 

if there wei« sought in knowledge « oooch i^ierenpon to 

-. restless spirit ; or %. tenaoe for a 

C.itt mind to walk up and down with 

% fair ix-c>>)>e>.; ; or a tower of State for a prood nnnd to 

ii« itself uyicn; or a fort or commanding gioaiid ibr 

^^gb snd CMHrniioa; or a shop for profit tx sde; and 

le far dw shxy of tbe Creator aad die 



r.ii] THE FIRST BOOK. 43 

relief of man's estate. But this is that which will indeed 
dignify and exalt knowledge, if contemplation and action 
may be more nearly and straitly conjoined and united 
together than they have been; a conjunction like unto 
that of the two highest planets, Saturn, the planet of rest 
and contemplation, and Jupiter, the planet of civil society 
md action. Howbeit, I do not mean, when I speak of use 

action, that end before-mentioned of the applying of 
Bowledge to lucre and profession ; for I am not ignorant 
ow much that diverteth and interrupteth the prosecution 

advancement of knowledge, like unto the golden ball 
irown before Atalanta, which while she goeth aside and 
oopeth to take up, the race is hindered, 

Declinat cursus, aurumque volubile tollit. 

either is my meaning, as was spoken of Socrates, to 

II philosophy down from heaven to converse upon 

e earth ; that is, to leave natural philosophy aside, and 

apply knowledge only to manners and policy. But as 

th heaven and earth do conspire and contribute to the 

5 and benefit of man; so the end ought to be, from 

th philosophies to separate and reject vain speculations, 

d whatsoever is empty and void, and to preserve and 

lent whatsoever is solid and fruitful : that knowledge 

not be as a courtesan, for pleasure and vanity only, 

a bond-woman, to acquire and gain to her master's 

* ; but as a spouse, for generation, fruit, and comfort. 

i«. Thus have I described and opened, as by a kind 

dissection, those peccant humours (the principal of 

) which have not only given impediment to the 

of learning, but have given also occasion to 

anent thereof: wherein if I have been too plain, 

temembeTed, Jidelia vulnera amantis, sed dolosa 

fumiis. This I think I have gained, that I 



44 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [V. rJ 

ought to be the better believed in that which I shall 
pertaining to commendation; because I have proceed 
so freely in that which concerneth censure. And yet 
have no purpose to enter into a laudative of learning, 
to make a hymn to the Muses (though I am of opi 
that it is long since their rites were duly celebrated), 
my intent is, without varnish or amplification ji ' 
weigh the dignity of knowledge in the balance with o1 
things, and to take the true value thereof by testimo 
and arguments divine and human. 

VI. I. First therefore let us seek the dignity of knoi 
ledge in the arch-type or first platform, which is in 1 
attributes and acts of God, as far as they are revealed t( 
man and may be observed with sobriety ; wherein we 
not seek it by the name of learning ; for all learning 
knowledge acquired, and all knowledge in God is origii 
and therefore we must look for it by another name, that j- 
of wisdom or sapience, as the scriptures call it. ; 

2. It is so then, that in the work of the creation we see ^ 
a double emanation of virtue from God ; the one referring ^ 
more properly to power, the other to wisdom; the one v 
expressed in making the subsistence of the matter, and ]■ 
the other in disposing the beauty of the form. This being '^ 
supposed, it is to be observed that for anything which J 
appeareth in the history of the creation, the confused mass , 
and matter of heaven and earth was made in a moment ; 
and the order and disposition of that chaos or mass was 
the work of six days ; such a note of difference it pleased 
God to put upon the works of power, and the works of 
wisdom; wherewith concurreth, that in the for • it 
not set down that God said, Le/ there he heaven m w 
as it is set down of the works following; but ac I 

God made heaven and earth : the one carryi t 



1 2,] THE FIRST BOOK. 45 

a manufacture, and the other of a law, decree, or 
imsel. 

3. To proceed to that which is next in order from God 
spirits ; we find, as far as credit is to be given to the 
jstial hierarchy of that supposed Dionysius the senator 
Vthens, the first place or degree is given to the angels 
love, which are termed seraphim ; the second to the 
els of light, which are termed cherubim ; and the 
d, and so following places, to thrones, principalities, 
the rest, which are all angels of power and ministry ; 
IS the angels of knowledge and illumination are placed 
)re the angels of ofl&ce and domination. 
. To descend from spirits and intellectual forms to 
lible and material forms, we read the first form that 

created was light, which hath a relation and cor- 
•ondence in nature and corporal things to knowledge 
pirits and incorporal things. 

. So in the distribution of days we see the day 
rein God did rest and contemplate his own works, 
blessed above all the days wherein he did effect and 
tmplish them. 

After the creation was finished, it is set down unto 
hat man was placed in the garden to work therein; 
h work, so appointed to him, could be no other than 

1 of contemplation ; that is, when the end of work is 
for exercise and experiment, not for necessity; for 

2 being then no reluctation of the creature, nor sweat 
be brow, man's employment must of consequence 
: been matter of delight in the experiment, and not 

of labour for the use. Again, the first acts which 

Drmed in Paradise consisted of the two summary 

i of knowledge; the view of creatures, and the im- 

don of names. As for the knowledge which induced 



46 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [^ 

the fall, it was, as was touched before, not the nat 
knowledge of creatures, but the moral knowledge of g 
and evil ; wherein the supposition was, that God's o 
mandments or prohibitions were not the originals of g 
and evil, but that they had other beginnings, which i 
aspired to know; to the end to make a total defec 
from God and to depend wholly upon himself. 

7. To pass on : in the first event or occurrence a 
the fall of man, we see (as the scriptures have infi 
mysteries, not violating at all the truth of the story 
letter) an image of the two estates, the contemp 
state and the active state, figured in the two pers 
of Abel and Cain, and in the two simplest and n 
primitive trades of life ; that of the shepherd (who, 
reason of his leisure, rest in a place, and living in vieT? 
heaven, is a lively image of a contemplative life), and 1 
of the husbandman : where we see again the favour ; 
election of God went to the shepherd, and not to the 
of the groimd. 

8. So in the age before the flood, the holy recc 
within those few memorials which are there entered ; 
registered, have vouchsafed to mention and honour 
name of the inventors and authors of music and work 
metal. In the age after the flood, the first great juc 
ment of God upon the ambition of man was the coi 
sion of tongues ; whereby the open trade and intercoi 
of learning and knowledge was chiefly imbarred. 

9. To descend to Moyses the lawgiver, and God's 
pen : he is adorned by the scriptures with this addi' 
and commendation, na/ he was seen in all the lee 

the Egyptians ; which nation we know was one 01 
most ancient schools of the world : for so Plato bring! 
the Egyptian priest saying unto Solon, You Grtciam 



] THE FIRST BOOK. 47 

children ; you have no knowledge of antiquity^ nor 
tiiy of knowledge. Take a view of the ceremonial 
f Moyses ; you shall find, besides the prefiguration 
;t, the badge or diflference of the people of God, 
xercise and impression of obedience, and other 

uses and fruits thereof, that some of the most 
d Rabbins have travailed profitably and profoundly 
erve, some of them a natural, some of them a moral, 
or reduction of many of the ceremonies and or- 
es. As in the law of the leprosy, where it is said, 

whiteness have overspread the flesh, the patient may 
ibroad for clean ; but if there he any whole flesh 
ing, he is to be shut up for unclean ; one of them 

a principle of nature, that putrefaction is more 
ious before maturity than after : and another noteth 
tion of moral philosophy, that men abandoned to 
D not so much corrupt manners, as those that are 
)od and half evil. So in this and very many other 

in that law, the/e is to be found, besides the theo- 

sense, much aspersion of philosophy. 
So likewise in that excellent book of Job, if it be 
;d with diligence, it will be found pregnant and 
g with natural philosophy ; as for example, cos- 
phy, and the roundness of the world, Qui extendit 
em super vacuum, et appendit terram super nihilum ; 
n the pensileness of the earth, the pole of the north, 
e finiteness or convexity of heaven are manifestly 
d. So again, matter of astronomy; Spiritus ejus 
' ccbIos, et obstetricante manu ejus eductus est Coluber 
IS. And in another place, Nunquid conjungere 

micantes stellas Pleiadas, aut gyrum Arcturi poteris 

re? Where the fixing of the stars, ever standing 

distance, is with great elegancy noted. And in 



48 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING, [vi. ifh 

another place, Quifacit Ar durum, et Oriona, et Hyadas, e* 
interior a Auslri ; where again he takes knowledge of 
depression of the southern pole, calling it the secrets ( 
the south, because the southern stars were in that clii 
unseen. Matter of generation ; Annon sicuf lac mulmi 
me, et sicut caseum coagulasti me ? &c. Matter of minerals 
Habet argentum venarum suarum principia : et auro iocUi 
est in quo conflatur,/errum de terra tollitur, et lapis solutm 
calore in ces vertitur : and so forwards in that chapter. 

II. So likewise in the person of Salomon the king, we 
see the gift or endowment of wisdom and learning, both 
in Salomon's petition and in God's assent thereunto 
preferred before all other terrene and temporal felicity 
By virtue of which grant or donative of God Salon 
became enabled not only to write those excellent parat 
or aphorisms concerning divine and moral philosophy 
but also to compile a natural history of all verdure, fron 
the cedar upon the mountain to the moss upon the wall 
(which is but a rudiment between putrefaction and an 
herb), and also of all things that breathe or move. Nay, 
the same Salomon the king, although he excelled in the 
glory of treasure and magnificent buildings, of shipping 
and navigation, of service and attendance, of fame and 
renown, and the like, yet he maketh no claim to any rf 
those glories, but only to the glory of inquisition of truth; 
for so he saith expressly, The glory of God is to conceal a 
thing, hut the glory of the king is to find it out ; as if, accord- 
ing to the innocent play of children, the Divine Majesty 
took delight to hide his works, to the end to have them 
found out ; and as if kings could not obtain a greatei 
honour than to be God's playfellows in that game; con- 
sidering the great commandment of wits and means, 
whereby nothing needeth to be hidden from tiiem. 



/1. 12.] THE FIRST BOOK. 49 

12. Neither did the dispensation of God vary in the 
s after our Saviour came into the world ; for our 
laviour himself did first show his power to subdue 
ranee, by his conference with the priests and doctors 
of the law, before he showed his power to subdue nature 
by his miracles. And the coming of the Holy Spirit was 
chiefly figured and expressed in the similitude and gift of 
tongues, which are but vehicula scientice. 

13. So in the election of those instruments, which it 
pleased God to use for the plantation of the faith, not- 
withstanding that at the first he did employ persons 
altogether imlearned, otherwise than by inspiration, more 
evidently to declare his immediate working, and to abase 
all human wisdom or knowledge ; yet nevertheless that 
counsel of his was no sooner performed, but in the next 
vicissitude and succession he did send his divine truth into 
the world, waited on with other learnings, as with servants 
or handmaids : for so we see Saint Paul, who was only 
learned amongst the Apostles, had his pen most used in 
the scriptures of the New Testament. 

14. So again we find that many of the ancient bishops 
md fathers of the Church were excellently read and 
studied in all the learning of the heathen; insomuch . 
iiat the edict of the Emperor Julianus (whereby it was ■ 
dieted unto Christians to be admitted into schools, 
ectures, or exercises of learning) was esteemed and ac- 
x)unted a more pernicious engine and machination 
gainst the Christian Faith, than were all the sanguinary 
>rosecutions of his predecessors ; neither could the 
mulation and jealousy of Gregory the first of that name, 
lishop of Rome, ever obtain the opinion of piety or de- 
otion; but contrariwise received the censure of humour, 
oaligm^ and pusillanimity, even amongst holy men; in 

s 



50 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING, [^ 

that he designed to obliterate and extinguish the me 
of heathen antiquity and authors. But contrariwise : 
the Christian church, which, amidst Ae inundations < 
Scythians on the one side from the north-west, an 
Saracens from the east, did preserve in the sracred la] 
bosom thereof the precious relics even of heathen 1 
ing, which otherwise had been extinguished as if no 
thing hadever been. 

15. And we see before our eyes, that in the a: 
ourselves and our fathers, when it pleased God tc 
the Church of Rome to account for their deger 
manners and ceremonies, and sundry doctrines obno 
and framed to uphold the same abuses ; at one an( 
same time it was ordained by the Divine Providence, 
there should attend withal a renovation and new s 
of all other knowledges. And, on the other side w 
the Jesuits, who partly in themselves and partly b 
emulation and provocation of their example, have : 
quickened and strengthened the state of learning, w 
(I say) what notable service and reparation they have 
to the Roman see. 

1 6. Wherefore to conclude this part, let it be obs( 
that there be two principal duties and services, b< 
ornament and illustration, which philosophy and h 
learning do perform to faith and religion. The 
because they are an effectual inducement to the 
ation of the glory of God. For as the Psalms and 
scriptures do often invite us to consider and magni 
great and wonderful works of God, so if we shoulc 
only in the contemplation of the exterior of them a! 
first offer themselves to our senses, we should do i 
injury unto the majesty of God, as if we should 
or construe of the store of some excellent je^ 



VI. 1 6.] THE FIRST BOOK. 5 1 

that only which is set out toward the street in his shop. 
The other, because they minister a singular help and 
preservative against unbelief and error. For our Saviour 
saith, Vou err, not knowing the scriptures, nor the power 
fGod; laying before us two books or volumes to study, 
if we will be secured from error; first the scriptures, 
revealing the will of God, and then the creatures ex- 
pressing his power ; whereof the latter is a key unto the 
former : not only opening our understanding to conceive 
the true sense of the scriptures, by the general notions 
of reason and rules of speech ; but chiefly opening our 
belief, in drawing us into a due meditation of the omni- 
potency of God, which is chiefly signed and engraven 
upon his works. Thus much therefore for divine testi- 
ly and evidence concerning the true dignity and value 
of learning. 

VIL I. As for human proofs, it is so large a field, as 

in a discourse of this nature and brevity it is fit rather to 

choice of those things which we shall produce, than 

to embrace the variety of them. First therefore, in the 

jees of human honour amongst the heathen, it was 
the highest to obtain to a veneration and adoration as a 
God. This unto the Christians is as the forbidden fruit. 
But we speak now separately of human testimony: ac- 
cording to which, that which the Grecians call apotheosis, 
and the Latins relatio inter divos, was the supreme honour 
which man could attribute unto man: specially when it 
was given, not by a formal decree or act of state, as it 
was used among the Roman Emperors, but by an inward 
assent and belief. Which honour, being so high, had 
also a degree or middle term : for there were reckoned 
above human honours, honours heroical and divine: in 
the aftlnbation and distribution of which honours we see 

E 2 



52 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [viLi. 

antiquity made this diiOference : that whereas founders 
and uniters of states and cities, lawgivers, extirpers of 
tyrants, fathers of the people, and other eminent persons 
in civil merit, were honoured but with the titles of worthies 
or demi-gods ; such as were Hercules, Theseus, Minos, 
Romulus, and the like : on the other side, such as were 
inventors and authors of new arts, endowments, and 
commodities towards man's life, were ever consecrated 
amongst the* gods themselves; as was Ceres, Bacchus, 
Mercurius, AppUo, and others ; and justly ; for the merit 
of the former is confined within the circle of an age or a 
nation ; and is like fruitful showers, which though they be 
profitable and good, yet serve but for that season, and (os 
2L latitude of ground where they fall ; but the other is 
indeed like the benefits of heaven, which are permanent 
and universal. The former again is mixed with strife 
and perturbation ; but the latter hath the true character of 
Divine Presence, coming in aura lent, without noise or 
agitation. 

2. Neither is certainly that other merit of learning, in re- 
pressing the inconveniences which grow from man to man, 
much inferior to the former, of relieving the necessities 
which arise from nature ; which merit was lively set forth 
by the ancients in that feigned relation of Orpheus' theatre, 
where all beasts and birds assembled ; and forgetting their 
several appetites, some of prey, some of game, some of 
quarrel, stood all sociably together listening unto the airs 
and accords of the harp; the sound whereof no sooner 
ceased, or was drowned by some louder noise, but every 
beast returned to his own nature: wherein is aptly de- 
scribed the nature and condition of men, who are fbU of 
savage and imreclaimed desires, of profit, of lust^ ol 
venge ; which as long as they give ear to preceptSi to 



THE FIRST BOOK. 53 

ion, sweetly touched with eloquence and persuasion 
:s, of sermons, of harangues, so long is society and 
naintained ; but if these instruments be silent, or 
lition and tumult make them not audible, all things 
\ into anarchy and confusion, 
ut this appeareth more manifestly, when kings 
ves, or persons of authority under them, or other 
)rs in commonwealths and popular estates, are en- 
ith learning. For although he might be thought 
his own profession, that said Then should people 
tes be happy y when either kings were philosophers^ or 
hers kings ; yet so much is verified by experience, 
ier learned princes and governors there have been 
J best times : for howsoever kings may have their 
ctions in their passions and customs; yet if they be 
te by learning, they have those notions of religion, 
ind morality, which do preserve them and refrain 
om all ruinous and peremptory errors and ex- 
whispering evermore in their ears, when coun- 
ind servants stand mute and silent. And senators 
sellers likewise, which be learned, do proceed upon 
afe and substantial principles, than counsellors 
re only men of experience : the one sort keeping 
afar off, whereas the other discover them not till 
me near hand, and then trust to the agility of 
; to ward or avoid them. 

hich felicity of times under learned princes (to 
.1 the law of brevity, by using the most eminent 
cted examples) doth best appear in the age which 
rom the death of Domitianus the emperor until the 
Commodus ; comprehending a succession of six 
all learned, or singular favourers and advancers of 
, which age for temporal respects was the most 



54 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [VII., 

happy and flourishing that ever the Roman empire (whic 
then was a model of the world) enjoyed; a matter reveale 
and prefigured unto Domitian in a dream the night befoi 
he was slain; for he thought there was grown behin 
upon his shoulders a neck and a head of gold: whic 
came accordingly to pass in those golden times whic 
succeeded : of which princes we will make some con 
memoration ; wherein although the matter will be vulga 
and may be thought fitter for a declamation than agreeab 
to a treatise infolded as this is, yet because it is pertinei 
to the point in hand, yique st infer arcum tendit Apol 
and to name them only were too naked and cursory, I w 
not omit it altogether. The first was Nen-a ; the excelle 
temper of whose government is by a glance in Comeli 
Tacitus touched to the life: Pcsiquam divus Kerva i 
ohm insocialih'S miscuissii, imperium €t liber taiem. And 
token of his learning, the last act of his short reign 1 
to memory was a missive to his adopted son Trajan, pi 
ceeding upon some inward discontent a: the ingratitude 
the times, comprehended in a verse of Homer's : 

Tdis, Pfcfoebe, tnis bcnrmas oIcisceFc nostras. 

5. Tiajan, who succeeded, was for his person i 
leanied: but if we will hearken to the speech of c 
Saviourp that saitfa, Ht thai rtaivtih aprcflut in the na 
^mfnfJki skail kave a frifkf/s rncard^ he deserveth 
be phoed amoQgst ibe most learned princes: for th< 
not a gVMter admirer of learning or benefactor 
; a fauider of famous lilwaries, a perpetual i 
of fcanwd men to office, and a familiar conver 
pn tt sao n and preceptors who were noi 
dien mocit credit in coon. On the other si 
Tnjan'a nrtue and goi^emment was admii 
mtdj no testinKmy of grax-e and faitli 




\ 



VII. 5.] TEE FIRST BOOK. ^^ 

history doth more lively set forth, than that legend tale 
of Gregorius Magnus, bishop of Rome, who was noted' 
for the extreme envy he bare towards all heathen excel- 
lency : and yet he is reported, out of the love and estim- 
ation of Trajan's moral virtues, to have made unto God 
passionate and fervent prayers for the delivery of his soul 
out of hell : and to have obtained it, with a caveat that 
he should make no more such petitions. In this prince's 
time also the persecutions against the Christians received 
interaiission, upon the certificate of Plinius Secundus, a 
man of excellent learning and by Trajan advanced. 

6. Adrian, his successor, was the most curious man 
Aat lived, and the most universal inquirer ; insomuch as 
it was noted for an error in his mind, that he desired to 
comprehend all things, and not to reserve himself for the 
worthiest things : falling into the like humour that was 
bag before noted in Philip of Macedon ; who, when he 
*wiki needs over-rule and put down an excellent musician 
Bi an argument touching music, was well answered by 
ium again, God forhid, sir (saith he), that your fortune 
fiould be so body as to know these things better than /. 
It pleased God likewise to use the curiosity of this em- 
peior as an inducement to the peace of his Church in 
4o8e dajrs. For having Christ in veneration, not as a 
God or Saviour but as a wonder or novelty, and having 
!» ^cture in his gallery, matched with ApoUonius (with 
*liom in his vain imagination he thought he had some 
ODofonnity), yet it served the turn to allay the bitter 
htred of those times against the Christian name, so as 
k Qmich had peace during his time. And for his 
Stvvenunent civil, although he did not attain to that of 
lean's in glory of arms or perfection of justice, yet 
tt deserving of the weal of the subject he did exceed 



56 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [VII.*. 

him. For Trajan erected many famous monuments and 
buildings ; insomuch as Constantine the Great in emit 
ation was wont to call him Parielan'a, wall-flower, became 
his name was upon so many walls : but his buildings and 
works were more of glory and triumph than use and 
necessity. But Adrian spent his whole reign, which wu 
peaceable, in a perambulation or survey of the Roman 
empire; giving order and making assignation where he 
went, for re-edifying of cities, towns, and forts decayed; 
and for cutting of rivers and streams, and for making 
bridges and passages, and for policing of cities and coia- 
monalties with new ordinances and constitutions, and 
granting new franchises and incorporations ; so that hii 
whole time was a very restoration of all the lapses aod 
decays of former times. 

7. Antoninus Pius, who succeeded him, was a pnnce 
excellently learned, and had the patient and subtle irit 
of a schoolman ; insomuch as in common speeck 
(which leaves no virtue untaxed) he was called Cymin 
Sector, a carver or a divider of cummin seed, which il 
one of the least seeds; such a patience he had and 
settled spirit, to enter into the least and most exact 
differences of causes ; a fruit no doubt of the exceeding 
tranquillity and serenity of his mind ; which being no 
ways charged or incumbered, either with fears, remorwi, 
or scruples, but having been noted for a man of the 
purest goodness, without all fiction or affectation, ibit 
hath reigned or lived, made his mind continually present 
and entire. He likewise approached a degree neara 
unto Christianity, and became, as Agrippa said uotc 
S. Paul, ha!/ a Chrhtian ; holding their religion and 
law in good opinion, and not only ceasing persecution 
but giving way to the advancement of Christians. 



8.] THE FIRST BOOK. 57 

. There succeeded him the first Dtvi /r aires, the two 
ptive brethren, Lucius Commodus Venis, son to -fflius 
us, who delighted much in the softer kind of learning, 

was wont to call the poet Martial his Virgil ; and 
cus Aurelius Antoninus; whereof the latter, who ob- 
ed his colleague and survived him long, was named 
Philosopher : who, as he excelled all the rest in 
ling, so he excelled them likewise in perfection of all 
l1 virtues ; insomuch as Julianus the emperor, in his 
k intituled CcBsares, being as a pasquil or satire to 
de all his predecessors, feigned that they were all 
ted to a banquet of the gods, and Silenus the jester 
at the nether end of the table, and bestowed a scoff 
jvery one as they came in ; but when Marcus Philo- 
lus came in, Silenus was gravelled and out of coun- 
nce, not knowing where to carp at him ; save at the 
he gave a glance at his patience towards his wife. 

the virtue of this prince, continued with that of his 

lecessor, made the name of Antoninus so sacred in 

world, that though it were extremely dishonoured 

Commodus, Caracalla, and Heliogabalus, who all bare 

name, yet when Alexander Severus refused the name 

use he was a stranger to the family, the senate wdth 

acclamation said, Quomodo Augustus y sic et Antoninus, 

uch renown and veneration was the name of these 

princes in those days, that they would have had it 

perpetual addition in all the emperors' style. In this 

eror's time also the Church for the most part was 

e; so as in this sequence of six princes we do 

\A [ effects of learning in sovereignty, painted 

greatest table of the world. 

\ ta t or picture of smaller volume (not 

of your Majesty that liveth), in my 



58 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [VII 

judgement the most excellent is that of Queen Elizabe 
your immediate predecessor in this part of Britain; aprii 
that, if Plutarch were now alive to write lives by par 
lels, would trouble him I think to find for her a para 
amongst women. This lady was endued with learni 
in her sex singular, and rare even amongst mascul 
princes; whether we speak of learning, of language, 
of science, modern or ancient, divinity or humanity : a 
unto the very last year of her life she accustomed to i 
point set hours for reading, scarcely any young stud( 
in an university more daily or more duly. As for 1 
government, I assure myself, I shall not exceed, if I 
affirm that this part of the island never had forty-f 
years of better times ; and yet not through the caln 
of the season, but through the wisdom of her regim 
For if there be considered of the one side, the truth 
religion established, the constant peace and securi 
the good administration of justice, the temperate use 
the prerogative, not slackened, nor much strained, 1 
flourishing state of learning, sortable to so excellent 
patroness, the convenient estate of wealth and mea 
both of crown and subject, the habit of obedience, a 
the moderation of discontents ; and there be considei 
on the other side the differences of religion, the trou 
of neighbour countries, the ambition of Spain, and < 
position of Rome ; and then that she was solitary and 
herself; these things I say considered, as I could 
have chosen an instance so recent and so proper, s< 
suppose I could not have chosen one more remarka 
or eminent to the purpose now in hand, which a 
ceming the conjunction of learning in the {ttin 
felicity in the people. 

lo. Neither hath leami an i 



THE FIRST BOOK. 59 

civil merit and moral virtue, and the arts or 
2 of peace and peaceable government ; but 
bath no less power and efficacy in enablement 
artial and military virtue and prowess ; as may 
represented in the examples of Alexander the 
Caesar the dictator, mentioned before, but 
place to be resumed: of whose virtues and 
• there needs no note or recital, having been 
s of time in that kind: but of their affections 
irning, and perfections in learning, it is per- 
ly somewhat. 

zander was bred and taught under Aristotle 
hilosopher, who dedicated divers of his books 
phy unto him : he was attended with Callis- 
1 divers other learned persons, that followed 
up, throughout his journeys and conquests. 
; and estimation he had learning in doth not- 
r in these three particulars : first, in the envy 
express that he bare towards Achilles, in this, 
1 so good a trumpet of his praises as Homer's 
:ondly, in the judgement or solution he gave 
lat precious cabinet of Darius, which was found 
jewels ; whereof question was made what thing 
r to be put into it ; and he gave his opinion for 
orks : thirdly, in his letter to Aristotle, after he 
rth his books of nature, wherein he expostul- 
him for publishing the secrets or mysteries of 
; and gave him to understand that himself 
X more to excel other men in learning and 
than in power and empire. And what use 
learning doth appear, or rather shine, in all 
es and answers, being full of science and use 
, and that in all variety. 



6o OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING, [v 

12. And herein again it may seem a thing schola 
and somewhat idle, to recite things that every man 1 
eth ; but yet, since the argument I handle leadet 
thereunto, I am glad that men shall perceive I a 
willing to flatter (if they will so call it) an Alexand 
a Csesar, or an Antoninus, that are dead many hw 
years since, as any that now liveth ; for it is the dis 
ing of the glory of learning in sovereignty that I 
pound to myself, and not an humour of declaimi: 
any man's praises. Observe then the speech he us 
Diogenes, and see if it tend not to the true state of o 
the greatest questions of moral philosophy ; wheth( 
enjoying of outward things, or the contemning of i 
be the greatest happiness : for when he saw Diogen 
perfectly contented with so little, he said to those 
mocked at his condition. Were I no f Alexander, I\ 
wish to he Diogenes, But Seneca inverteth it, and \ 
Plus erat^ qmd hie nollet accipere, quhm quod ilk ^ 
dare. There were more things which Diogenes would 
re/used, than those were which Alexander could have 
or enjoyed, 

13. Observe again that speech which was usual 
him, That he felt his mortality chiefly in two things^ 
and lust ; and see if it w^ere not a speech extracted c 
the depth of natural philosophy, and liker to have C( 
out of the mouth of Aristotle or Democritus, than 
Alexander. 

14. See again that speech of humanity and p 
when upon the bleeding of his wounds, he called 
him one of his flatterers, that was wont to ascribe to 
divine honour, and said, Look, this is very blood; /> 
not such a liquor as Homer speaketh of, which ran ^ 
Venus hand, when it was pierced by Diomedes. 



fl. IS.] THE FIRST BOOK. 6l 

' 15. See likewise his readiness in reprehension of logic, 

the speech he used to Cassander, upon a complaint 

lat was made against his father Antipater: for when 

Jexander happed to say, Do you think these men would 

baoe come from so far to complain^ except they had just 

cause of grief ? and Cassander answered, Vea, that was 

the matter y because they thought they should not be disproved; 

said Alexander laughing : See the subtilties of Aristotle^ to 

take a matter both ways, pro et contra^ dec, 

16. But note again how well he could use the same 
art, which he reprehended, to serve his own humour: 
when bearing a secret grudge to Callisthenes, because 
he was against the new ceremony of his adoration, feast- 
ing one night where the same Callisthenes was at the 
table, it was moved by some after supper, for entertain- 

aent sake, that Callisthenes, who was an eloquent man, 

night speak of some theme or purpose at his own 

iioice ; which Callisthenes did ; choosing the praise of 

lie Macedonian nation for his discourse, and performing 

be le with so good manner as the hearers were much 

d : whereupon Alexander, nothing pleased, said, // 

!wx easy to be eloquent upon so good a subject: but saith 

e, Turn your style, and let us hear what you can say 

r/ us : which Callisthenes presently undertook, and 

with that sting and life, that Alexander interrupted 

md said, The goodness of the cause made him eloquent 

k/orey and despite made him eloquent then again. 

17. Consider further, for tropes of rhetoric, that ex- 
cellent use of a metaphor or translation, wherewith he 
iaied Antipater, who was an imperious and tyrannous 
governor: for when one of Antipater's friends com- 

nded him to Alexander for his moderation, that he 
not degenerate, as his other lieutenants did, into the 



62 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [VII 

Persian pride, in use of purple, but kept the ancient h 
of Macedon, of black ; True (saith Alexander), du/ A 
pater is all purple within. Or that other, •when Farm 
came to him in the plain of Arbela, and showed him 
innumerable multitude of his enemies, specially as 
appeared by the infinite number of lights, as it had 1 
a new firmament of stars, and thereupon advised hin 
assail them by night : whereupon he answered, Tha 
would not steal the victory, 

1 8. For matter of policy, weigh that significant 
tinction, so much in all ages embraced, that he n 
between his two friends Hephaestion and Craterus, t« 
he said, That the one loved Alexander, and the other i 
the king : describing the principal difference of prir 
best servants, that some in affection love their per 
and other in duty love their crown. 

19. Weigh also that excellent taxation of an e 
ordinary with counsellors of princes, that they coi 
their masters according to the model of their own r 
and fortune, and not of their masters' ; when i 
Darius' great offers Parmenio had said, Surely I u 
accept these offers, were I as Alexander ; saith Alexai 
So would I were I as Parmenio, 

20. Lastly, weigh that quick and acute reply, whic 
made when he gave so large gifts to his friends 
servants, and was asked what he did reserve for hin 
and he answered, Hope: weigh, I say, whether he 
not cast up his account aright, because hope must b< 
portion of all that resolve upon great enterprises, 
this was Caesar's portion when he went first into < 
his estate being then utterly overthrown with large 
And this was likewise the portion of that noble pi 
howsoever transported with ambition, Henry Duk 



/n. 20.] THE FIRST BOOK. 6'^ 

}uise, of whom it was usually said, that he was the 
.1 ;t usurer in France, because he had turned all his 
te into obligations. 

21. To conclude therefore: as certain critics are used 
to say hyperbolically, Thai if all sciences were lost they 
night he found in Virgil^ so certainly this may be said 
truly, there are the prints and footsteps of learning in • 
those few speeches which are reported of this prince: 
the admiration of whom, when I consider him not as 
Alexander the Great, but as Aristotle's scholar, hath 
carried me too far. 

22. As for Julius Caesar, the excellency of his learning 
fieedeth not to be argued from his education, or his 
company, or his speeches ; but in a further degree doth 
declare itself in his writings and works ; whereof some 
are extant and permanent, and some unfortunately 
perished. For first, we see there is left unto us that 
excellent history of his own wars, which he intituled only 
a Commentary, wherein all succeeding times have admired 
*lie solid weight of matter, and the real passages and 

J images of actions and persons, expressed in the 
grea t propriety of words and perspicuity of narration 
that ever was; which that it was not the effect of a 
natural gift, but of learning and precept, is well witnessed 
bjr that work of his intituled De Analogia, being a gram- 
matical philosophy, wherein he did labour to make this 
same Vox ad placitum to become Vox ad licitum, and to 
neduce custom of speech to congruity of speech; and 
iook as it were the pictures of words from the life of 
reason. 

23. So we receive from him, as a monument both of \ 
lis power and learning, the then reformed computation S 
i the year; well expressing that he took it to be as • 



64 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [VII- «, 

great a glory to himself to observe and know the la-w ^^ 
the heavens, as to give law to men upon the earth. 

24. So likewise in that book of his, Antt-Cato^ it n 
easily appear that he did aspire as well to victory of 1^* 
as victory of war : undertaking therein a conflict agaii 
the greatest champion with the pen that then lived, Cicer^ 
the orator. 

25. So again in his book of Apophthegms which I 
collected, we see that he esteemed it more honour MO 
make himself but a pair of tables, to take the wise ai 
pithy words of others, than to have every word of \ 
own to be made an apophthegm or an oracle ; as vain. 
princes, by custom of flattery, pretend to do. And yet if 
I should enumerate divers of his speeches, as I did those 
of Alexander, they are truly such as Salomon noteth, when 
he saith. Verba sapientum ianqtiam aculei, ei tanquam dm 
in altum defixi: whereof I will only recite three, not so de- 
lectable for elegancy, but admirable for vigour and efficacy. 

26. As first, it is reason he be thought a master of ' 
words, that could with one word appease a mutiny in his 
army, which was thus. The Romans, when their geneiah 
did speak to their army, did use the word MiliUs^ but 
when the magistrates spake to the people, they did use 
the word Quiriies, The soldiers were in tumult, and 
seditiously prayed to be cashiered; not that they so 
meant, but by expostulation thereof to draw Csesar to 
other conditions ; wherein he being resolute not to give 
way, after some silence, he began his speech, Ego Qmrites^ 
which did admit them already cashiered; wherewith t |f 
were so surprised, crossed, and confused, as they w< 

not sufler him to go on in his speech, but relin 
their demands, and made it their suit to be ; 
by the name of MiliUs. 



1.27.] THE FIRST BOOK. 65 

27. The second speech was thus : Caesar did extremely 

iffect the name of king ; and some were set on as he 

Kissed by, in popular acclamation to salute him king. 

Vhereupon, finding the cry weak and poor, he put it ofif 

in a kind of jest, as if they had mistaken his sur- 

s ; Non Rex sum, sed Ccesar ; a speech, that if it be 
arched, the life and fulness of it can scarce be ex- 
essed. For, first, it was a refusal of the name, but yet 
t serious : again, it did signify an infinite confidence 
d magnanimity, as if he presumed Caesar was the 
Jater title; as by his worthiness it is come to pass 
this day. But chiefly it was a speech of great allure- 

toward his own purpose ; as if the state did strive 
h him but for a name, whereof mean families were 
ted ; for Rex was a surname with the Romans, as well 
King is with us. 

18. The last speech which I will mention was used to 
tellus : when Caesar, after war declared, did possess 

slf of the city of Rome ; at which time entering into 
inner treasury to take the money there accumulate, 
Melius being tribune forbade him. Whereto Caesar 
I, That if he did not desist, he would lay him dead in 
place. And presently taking himself up, he added, 
ng man, it is harder for me to speak it than to do it ; 
lescens, durius est mihi hoc dicere quhm facere, A 
;ch compounded of the greatest terror and greatest 
lency that could proceed out of the mouth of 
I. 
9. But to return and conclude with him, it is evident 

ilf knew well his own perfection in learning, and 

it upon him ; as a{)peared when, upon occasion that 
e what a strange resolution it was in Lucius 

to r< 1 his dictature; he scoffing at him^ to his 

F 



66 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING, [vil. 29 

own advantage, answered, TAaf Sylla could not skill 9 
letters y and therefore knew not how to dictate. 

30. And here it were fit to leave this point, toucl 
the concurrence of military virtue and learning (for v 
example should come with any grace after those two 
Alexander and Caesar?), were it not in regard of the rare 
ness of circumstance, that I find in one other particular 
as that which did so suddenly pass from extreme scorr 
extreme wonder : and it is of Xenophon the philosopha 
who went from Socrates' school into Asia, in the expc 
of Cyrus the younger against King Artaxerxes. 1 
Xenophon at that time was very young, and never ha( 
seen the wars before; neither had any command in the 
army, but only followed the war as a voluntary, for the 
love and conversation of Proxenus his friend. He ^ 
present when Falinus came in message from the great 
king to the Grecians, after that Cyrus was slain in 
field, and they a handful of men left to themselves in 
midst of the king's territories, cut off from their coi ' 
by many navigable rivers, and many hundred miles. The 
message imported that they should deliver up their a 
and submit themselves to the king's mercy. To wl i 
message before answer was made, divers of the a 
conferred familiarly with Falinus; and amongst the r 
Xenophon happened to say, Why^ Falinus, we h. n 
hut these two things lefty our arms and our virtue ; < if 
we yield up our arms, how shall we make use of our virtue? 
Whereto Falinus smiling on him said. If I he not deceived^ 
young gentleman, you are an Athenian : and I believe you 
study philosophy, and it is pretty that you jqy : hut you are 
much abused, if you think your virtue can withstand (he 
kin^s power. Here was the scorn ; the wonder followed: 
which was, that this young scholar, or philosopher^ after 



I VII. 30.] THE FIRST BOOK. 6j 

lU the captains were murdered in parley by treason, con- 
lucted those ten thousand foot, through the heart of all 
the king's high countries, from Babylon to Grecia in 
safety, in despite of all the king's forces, to the astonish- 
ment of the world, and the encouragement of the Grecians 
in times succeeding to make invasion upon the kings of 
Pe] as was after purposed by Jason the Thessalian, 
apted by Agesilaus the Spartan, and achieved by 
:ander the Macedonian, all upon the ground of the 
act of that young scholar. 
VIII. I. To proceed now from imperial and military 
to moral and private virtue ; first, it is an assured 
truth, which is contained in the verses, 

Scilicet ingenuas didicisse fideliter artes 
Emollit Qiores, nee sinit esse feros. 

It taketh away the wildness and barbarism and fierceness 
of men's minds; but indeed the accent had need be upon 
iMt'ler : for a little superficial learning doth rather work 
a contrary effect. It taketh away all levity, temerity, and 
ency, by copious suggestion of all doubts and diffi- 
;s, and acquainting the mind to balance reasons on 
es, and to turn back the first offers and conceits 
3f the mind, and to accept of nothing but examined and- 
tried. It taketh away vain admiration of anything, which 
is the root of all weakness. For all things are admired 
cither because they are new, or because they are great. 
For novelty, no man that wadeth in learning or con- 
templation throughly, but will find that printed in his 
heart, Nt'I novt super ierram. Neither can any man 
marvel at the play of puppets, that goeth behind the 
curtain, and adviseth well of the motion. And for mag- 
nitude, as Alexander the Great, after that he was used to 
great annies, and the great conquests of the spacious 

F 2 



68 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [^ 

provinces in Asia, when he received letters out of G 
of some fights and services there, which were com 
for a passage, or a fort, or some walled town at the 
he said, // seemed to him, that he was advertised 
battles of the frogs' and the mice, that the old tales u 
So certainly, if a man meditate much upon the un 
frame of nature, the earth with men upon it (the c 
ness of souls except) will not seem much other tl 
ant-hill, whereas some ants carry corn, and some 
their young, and some go empty, and all to and fro 
heap of dust. It taketh away or mitigateth fear of 
or adverse fortune ; which is one of the greatest ir 
ments of virtue, and imperfections of manners. F( 
man's mind be deeply seasoned with the considerat 
the mortality and corruptible nature of things, h 
easily concur with Epictetus, who went forth one dj 
saw a woman weeping for her pitcher of earth thj 
broken, and went forth the next day and saw a v 
weeping for her son that was dead, and thereupor 
Heri vidi fragilem frangi, hodie vidi mortaUm 
And therefore Virgil did excellently and profoundly « 
the knowledge of causes and the conquest of all 
together, as concomiiantia. 

Felix, qui potuit renim cognoscere causas, 
Quique metus omnes, et inexorabile fatom 
Subjecit pedibus, strepitumqae Acherontis avari. 

2. It were too long to go over the partici rei 
which learning doth minister to all the d ]us i 
mind; sometimes purging the ill humours, ! n 
opening the obstructions, sometimes helpii < 
sometimes increasing appetite, sometim i 

wounds and ulceratii t o^ i 
therefi) T 



111.2.] THE FIRST BOOK. 6g 

tins; which is, that it disposeth the constitution of the 
d not to be fixed or settled in the defects thereof, but 
ill to be capable'and susceptible of growth and reform- 
ion. For the unlearned man knows not what it is to 
iscend into himself, or to call himself to account, nor 
e pleasure of that suavissima vita, indies sentire se fieri 
iliorem. The good parts he hath he will learn to show 
the full, and use them dexterously, but not much to 
crease them. The faults he hath he will learn how to 
de and colour them, but not much to amend them ; like 
I ill mower, that mows on still, and never whets his 
ythe. Whereas with the learned man it fares otherwise, 
at he doth ever intermix the correction and amend- 
ent of his mind with the use and employment thereof. 
ay further, in general and in sum, certain it is that 
triias and Boniias differ but as the seal and the print ^-^ 
r Truth prints Goodness, and they be the clouds of ^ 
ror which descend in the storms of passions and per- 
rbations. 

3. From moral virtue let us pass on to matter of power 

commandment, and consider whether in right reason 

5 be any comparable with that wherewith know- 

Ige investeth and crowneth man's nature. We see the 

^nity of the commandment is according to the dignity 

the commanded : to have commandment over beasts, 

herdmen have, is a thing contemptible : to have com- 

indment over children, as schoolmasters have, is a 

;er of small honour: to have commandment over 

/as is a disparagement rather than an honour. 

Ls the commandment of tyrants much better, over 

which have put off the generosity of their minds : 

we it was ever holden that honours in free 

commonwealths had a sweetness more 



7© OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNISO. [VIII.3. 

than in tyrannies, because the commandment extendelh 
more over the wills of men, and not only over their deeds 
and services. And therefore, when Virgil putteth himself 
forth to attribute to Augustus Cresar the best of human 
honours, he doth it in these words : 

Per populoi dat jara, viamque affectat Olympo. 
But yet the commandment of knowledge is yet higher 
than the commandment over the will : for it is a com' 
mandment over the reason, belief, and understanding of 
man, which is the highest part of the mind, and giveth 
law to the will itself. For there is no power on earth 
which setteth up a throne or ch^ of estate in the spirits 
and souls of men, and in their cogitations, im^^nationi, 
opinions, and beliefs, but knowledge and learning. And 
therefore we see the detestable and extreme pleasure thai 
arch -heretics, and false prophets, and impostors are trans- 
ported with, when they once find in themselves that the] 
have a superiority in the faith and conscience of men; a, 
great as if they have once tasted of it, it is seldom seei 
that any torture or persecution can make them reljnquisl 
or abandon it. But as this is that which the author of th 
Revelation calleth the depth or profoundness of Satai 
so by argument of contraries, the just and lawful aove 
reignty over men's understanding, by force of truth lightl 
interpreted, is that which approacheth nearest to the ipmil 
itude of the divine rule. 

4. As for fortune and advancement, the beneficence c 
teaming is not so confined to give fortune only to state 
and commonwealths, as it doth not likevise give fortDn 
to partjcuhr pe noni. For it vu wdl noted long agi 
h given more men their livings, than eitht 
c Csesar, or Augustus ever did, notwithsiandiii 



'111.4.] THE FIRST BOOK. 7 1 

beir great largesses and donatives, and distributions of 
inds to so many legions. And no doubt it is hard to 
ly whether arms or learning have advanced greater 
umbers. And in case of sovereignty we see, that if arms 
r descent have carried away the kingdom, yet learning 
ith carried the priesthood, which ever hath been in some 
)mpetition with empire. 

5. Again, for the pleasure and delight of knowledge 
id learning, it far surpasseth all other in nature. For, 
lall the pleasures of the affections so exceed the plea- 
ire of the sense, as much as the obtaining of desire or 
ctory exceedeth a song or a dinner ? and must not of 
msequence the pleasures of the intellect or understand- 
g exceed the pleasures of the affections ? We see in all 
her pleasures there is satiety, and after they be used, 
eir verdure departeth ; which showeth well they be but 
;ceits of pleasure, and not pleasures: and that it was 
e novelty which pleased, and not the quality. And 
erefore we see that voluptuous men turn friars, and 
ibitious princes turn melancholy. But of knowledge 
ere is no satiety, but satisfaction and appetite are per- 
tually interchangeable; and therefore appeareth to be 
od in itself simply, without fallacy or accident. Nei- 
ti is that pleasure of small efficacy and contentment 
the mind of man, which the poet Lucretius describeth 
:gandy, 

Suave mari magno, turbantibus aequora ventis, &c. 

It is a view of delight (saith he) to stand or walk upon 

p h f side^ and to see a ship tossed with tempest upon the 

w he in a fortified tower ^ and to see two battles join 

But it is a pleasure incomparable^ for the 

ie , tied, landedy and fortified in the cer- 

from thence to descry and behold the 



72 OF THE ADVANCEMEST OF LEARNING. [VII 

errors, perttirbatiotK, labours, and wandirings up and d 
0/ other men. 

6. Lastly, leaving the vulgar arguments, that by lej 
ing man excelleth man in that wherein man excel 
beasts; that by learning man ascendeih to the heav 
and their motions, where in body he cannot come ; s 
the Uke ; let us conclude with the dignity and excellei 
of knowledge and learning in that whereunto man's : 
tare doth most aspire, which is immortality or conlii 
ance ; for to this tendeth generation, and raising of hoo 
and families; to this tend buildings, foundations, a 
monuments ; to this tendeth the desire of memory, &i 
and celebration ; and in effect the strength of all ot) 
human desires. We see then how far the monuments 
wit and learning are more durable than the monume 
of power or of the hands. For have not the verses 
Homer continued twenty- five hundred years, or mo 
without the loss of a syllable or letter ; during which til 
infinite palaces, temples, castles, cities, have been decaj 
and demolished ? It is not possible to have the true p 
tures or statuaes of Cyrus, Alexander, Caesar, no nor 
the kings or great personages of much later years ; 
the originals cannot last, and the copies cannot but le< 
of the life and truth. But the images of men's wits i 
knowledges remain in books, exempted from the wrc 
of time and capaUe of perpetual renovation. Neit) 
are diey fldj to be called images, because they gener 
^till, vdA cut ftdr seeds in the minds of odiers, p 
{ and canaing infinite actions and opinions in s 
) that if the invention of the ship \ 
fe tadbl^ whidt canietb ridtes and commodii 
^4l>'y^|^ and consociateth the most rem 
|r |afii(»puion of their buiia, how much mi 



are ttteyfldj i 
b rtill, vdA cut 



III. 6.] THE FIRST BOOK. 73 

re letters to be magnified, which as ships pass through 
tie vast seas of time, and make ages so distant to par- 
icipate of the wisdqin, illuminations, and inventions, the 
)ne of the other ? Nay further, we see some of the phi- 
losophers which were least divine, and most immersed in 
the senses, and denied generally the immortality of the 
soul, yet came to this point, that whatsoever motions the 
spirit of man could act and perform without the organs of 
the body, they thought might remain after death ; which 
were only those of the understanding, and not of the 
affection; so immortal and incorruptible a thing did 
knowledge seem unto them to be. But we, that know 
by divine revelation that not only the understanding but 
the affections purified, not only the spirit but the body 
dianged, shall be advanced to immortality, do disclaim 
in these rudiments of the senses. But it must be re- 
membered, both in this last point, and so it may like- 
wise be needful in other places, that in probation of 
the dignity of knowledge or learning, I did in the be- 
ginning separate divine testimony from human, which 
method I have pursued, and so handled them both 
apart 

7. Nevertheless I do not pretend, and I know it will 

be impossible for me, by any pleading of mine, to reverse 

Ihe judgement, either of uEsop's cock, that preferred the 

barley-corn before the gem ; or of Midas, that being 

Ao I judge between Apollo, president of the Muses, 

Pan, god of the flocks, judged for plenty; or of 

judged for beauty and love against wisdom 

] I •; or of Agrippina, occidat matrem, modo tm- 

preferred empire with any condition never so 

; or of Ulysses, qm vetulam prcetulit immori- 

a figure of those which prefer custom and 



74 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [VIII. 7. 

habit before all excellency ; or of a number of the like 
popular judgements. For these things must continue as 
they have been: but so will that also continue where- 
upon learning hath ever relied, and which faileth not: 
Justificaia est sapientia afiliis sut's. 



THE 

SECOND BOOK OF FRANCIS BACON; 

OF THE PROFICIENCE OR 

ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING, 

DIVINE AND HUMAN. 

To the King. 

I. TT might seem to have more convenience, though it 
come often otherwise to pass (excellent king), that 
Aose which are fruitful in their generations, and have in 
themselves the foresight of immortality in their descend- 
ants, should likewise be more careful of the good estate 
»f re times, unto which they know they must transmit 

commend over their dearest pledges. Queen Eliza- 
•eth was a sojourner in the world in respect of her un- 

ed life, and was a blessing to her own times; and 
et so as the impression of her good government, besides 
ler happy memory, is not without some effect which doth 

ive her. But to your Majesty, whom God hath already 
1 with so much royal issue, worthy to continue and 
fepresent you for ever, and whose youthful and fruitful 
Ijed doth yet promise many the like renovations, it is 
proper and agreeable to be conversant not only in the 
transitory parts of good government, but in those acts 
also which are in their nature permanent and perpetual, 
^ongst the which (if affection do not transport me) there 



y6 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. 

is not any more worthy than the further endowme 
the world with sound and fruitful knowledge. For 
should a few received authors stand up like Hen 
columns, beyond which there should be no sailing oj 
covering, since we have so bright and benign a st: 
your Majesty to conduct and prosper us? To n 
therefore where we left, it romaineth to consider of 
kind those acts are which have been undertaken and 
formed by kings and others for the increase and adva 
ment of learning : wherein I purpose to speak act 
without digressing or dilating. 

2. Let this ground therefore be laid, that all work; 
overcommen by antiplitude of reward, by soundne^ 
direction, and by the conjunction of labours. The 
multiplieth endeavour, the second preventeth error, 
the third supplieth the frailty of man. But the prin 
of these is direction : for claudus in via anteotriil curs 
extra viam; and Salomon excellenUy setteth it d 
1/ the iron be not sharp, it requireth more strength; 
wisdom is that which preuaiUth ; signifying that 
invention or election of the mean is more etTectual 
any inforcement or accumulation of endeavours. 

I am induced to speak, for that (not derogating fron 
noble intention of any that have been deservers tow 
the state of learning) I do observe nevertheless 
their works and acts are rather matters of magnific 
and memory, than of progression and proficience, 
tend rather to augment the mass of learning in the i 
itude of learned men, than to rectify or raise the sde 
themselves. 

3. The works or acts of merit towards learning 
conversant about three objects ; the places of lean 

i of learning, and the persons of the leai 



THE SECOND BOOK. 77 

water, whether it be the dew of heaven, or the 
, of the earth, doth scatter and leese itself in the 
, except it be collected into some receptacle, where 
by union comfort and sustain itself: and for that 
he industry of man hath made and framed spring- 
conduits, cisterns, and pools, which men have 
>med likewise to beautify and adorn with accom- 
^nts of magnificence and state, as well as of use 
2cessity : so this excellent liquor of knowledge, 
r it descend from divine inspiration, or spring 
luman sense, would soon perish and vanish to 
a, if it were not preserved in books, traditions, 
;nces, and places appointed, as universities, col- 
and schools, for the receipt and comforting of 
ne. 

'he works which concern the seats and places of 
g are four ; foundations and buildings, endowments 
venues, endowments with franchises and privileges, 
ions and ordinances for government; all tending 
itness and privateness of life, and discharge of 
ind troubles; much like the stations which Virgil 
beth for the hiving of bees : 

Principio sedes apibus statioque petenda* 
Quo neqae sit ventis aditus, &c. 

Tie works touching books are two: first, libraries 

are as the shrines where all the relics of the an- 

aints, full of true virtue, and that without delusion 

\ je, are preserved and reposed ; secondly, new 

of authors, with more correct impressions, more 

ranslations, more profitable glosses, more diligent 

and the like. 

1 a pertaining to the persons of learned men 

nnent and countenancing of them in 



70 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. 

general) are tn-o : the reward and designation of rea 
in sciences already extant and invented; and the re^ 
and designation of writers and inquirers concerning 
parts of learning not sufficiently laboured and proseci 

7. These are summarily the works and acts, whe 
the merits of many excellent princes and other wo 
personages have been conversant As for any partic 
commemorations, I call to mind what Cicero said, w 
he gave general thanks ; Difficile non aJiqtum, ingra 
qumquam prcrlcrire. Let us rather, according to 
scriptures, look unto that part of the race which is bel 
us, than look back to that which is already attained. 

8. First therefore, amongst so many great founds 
of colleges in Europe, I find strange that they are 
dedicated to professions, and none left free to arts ; 
sciences at large. For it men judge that learning she 
bo referred to action, they judge well ; but in this t 
fall into the error described in the ancient fable, in wl 
the other parts of the body did suppose the stomach 
been idle, because it neither performed the office of 1 
tion, as the limbs do, nor of sense, as the head dc 
but }'et notwithstanding it is the stomach that diges 
and distribuieth to all the rest. So if any man think 
losophy and universaliff to be idle studies, he doth 
MD^der dttt all professions are bom. tbence served 
w^plkd. And Ab I take to be a great cause that ) 

of learning, becaose d 

t ban been studied but in ] 

^ a tive bear more fruit I 

mytbing jxn can do to 

■ of the caiih and pot 

I that BH« mufc it Nd 

k ihft Ak dedioliiv of finmdati 




THE SECOND BOOK, 79 

tions to professory learning hath not only had a 
spect and influence upon the growth of sciences, 
also been prejudicial to states and governments, 
ce it proceedeth that princes find a solitude in 
)f able men to serve them in causes of estate, 
there is no education collegiate which is free ; 
ch as were so disposed mought give themselves 
ies, modern languages, books of policy and civil 
J, and other the like enablements unto service 

• 

d because founders of colleges do plant, and 
, of lectures do water, it followeth well in order 
of the defect which is in public lectures ; namely, 
mallness and meanness of the salary or reward 
1 most places is assigned unto them; whether 
lectures of arts, or of professions. For it is 
y to the progression of sciences that readers be 
lost able and sufficient men ; as those which are 
I for generating and propagating of sciences, and 
ransitory use. This cannot be, except their con- 
id endowment be such as may content the ablest 
appropriate his whole labour and continue his 
re in that function and attendance ; and therefore 
ve a proportion answerable to that mediocrity or 
ncy of advancement, which may be expected 
profession or the practice of a profession. So 
will have sciences flourish, you must observe 
military law, which was, Tha^ those which staid 
carriage should have equal part with those which 
uHan ; else will the carriages be ill attended. 
sciences are indeed the guardians of the 
»visions of sciences, whence men in active 
jd, and therefore ought to have equal 



Ho OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. 

entertainment with them; otherwise if the fathers 
sciences be of the weakest sort or be ill maintained, 

Et patnim invalidi referent jejunia nati. 

ID. Another defect I note, wherein I shall need sc 
alchemist to help me, who call upon men to sell tl 
books, and to build furnaces; quitting and forsak 
Minerva and the Muses as barren virgins, and rely 
upon Vulcan. But certain it is, that unto the de 
fruitful, and operative study of many sciences, specii 
natural philosophy and physic, books be not only 
instrumental ; wherein also the beneficence of men h 
not been altogether wanting. For we see spheres, glot 
astrolabes, maps, and the like, have been provided 
appurtenances to astronomy and cosmography, as y 
as books. We see likewise that some places instituted 
physic have annexed the commodity of gardens 
simples of all sorts, and do likewise command the 
of dead bodies for anatomies. But these do respect 
a few things. In general, there will hardly be any m 
proficience in the disclosing of nature, except there 
some allowance for expenses about experiments; w 
ther they be experiments appertaining to Vulcanus 
Daedalus, furnace or engine, or any other kind. I 
therefore as secretaries and spials of princes and sts 
bring in bills for intelligence, so you must allow 
spials and intelligencers of nature to bring in their bi 
or else you shall be ill advertised. 

II. And if Alexander made such a liberal assignatio: 
At tie of treasure for the allowance of hunters, fowl 
i iiSy and the like, that he mought compile an hist 
of are, much better do they deserve it that travai 

defisct ivUch I nole^ is an intermissior 



THE SECOND BOOK. 8 1 

in those which are governors in universities, 
iiltation, and in princes or superior persons, of 
1 : to enter into account and consideration, whe- 

readings, exercises, and other customs apper- 
unto learning, anciently begun and since conti- 
; well instituted or no ; and thereupon to ground 
adment or reformation in that which shall be 
nconvenient. For it is one of your Majesty's 
•St wise and princely maxims, That in all usages 
cedents, the times he considered wherein they first 
which if they were weak or ignorant, it derogateth 
? authority of the usage, and leaveth it for suspect, 
refore inasmuch as most of the usages and orders 
niversities were derived from more obscure times, 
J more requisite they be re-examined. In this 
will give an instance or two, for example sake, 
s that are the most obvious and familiar. The 
matter, which though it be ancient and general, 
)ld to be an error ; which is, that scholars in 
ties come* too soon and too unripe to logic 
toric, arts fitter for graduates than children and 
For these two, rightly taken, are the gravest of 
, being the arts of arts ; the one for judgement,. 
IX for ornament. And they be the rules and 
IS how to set forth and dispose matter: and 
e for minds empty and unfraught with matter, 
ich have not gathered that which Cicero calleth 
supellex, stuff and variety, to begin with those 
if one should learn to weigh, or to measure, or to 

wind) doth work but this effect, that the wisdom 

5, which is great and universal, is almost made 

Dtible, and is degenerate into childish sophistry 

ous affectation. And further, the untimely 

Q 



82 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNINO. [12. 

learning of them hath drawn on by consequence the 
superficial and unprofitable teaching and writing of thenii 
as fitteth indeed to the capacity of children. Another is 
a lack I find in the exercises used in the universities, 
which do make too great a divorce between invention 
and memory. For their speeches are either premeditate, 
in ver3is concep/is, where nothing is left to invention; or 
merely extemporal, where little is left to memory. Whereas 
in life and action there is least use of either of these, but 
rather of intermixtures of premeditation and invention* 
notes and memory. So as the exercise fitteth not the 
practice, nor the image the life ; and it is ever a true rale 
in exercises, that they be framed as near as may be ta 
the life of practice ; for otherwise they do pervert the 
motions and faculties of the mind, and not prepare them. 
The truth whereof is not obscure, when scholars come 
to the practices of professions, or other actions of civil 
life ; which when they set into, this want is soon found 
by themselves, and sooner by others. But this part, 
touching the amendment of the institutions and orders of 
universities, I will conclude with the clause of Caesar's 
letter to Oppius and Balbus, Hoc quemadmodum finri 
possity nonnulla mihi in mentem veniunt, tt muita rtperiri 
possunt : de us rebus rogo vos ut cogiiaiitmem suscipiaHs, 

13. Another defect which I note, ascendeth a little 
higher than the precedent. For as the proficience ol 
learning consisteth much in the orders and institutions 
of universities in the same states and kingdoms, so it 
would be yet more advanced, if there were more intd- 
ligence mutual between the universities of Europe t 
now there is. We see there be many orders and foa ?- 
ations, which though they be divided 1 er 1 1 
soveieigntics and ttfritories, yet dicgr take 



1 THE SECOND BOOK. 83 

■ 

/e a kind of contract, fraternity, and correspondence 
e with the other, insomuch as they have provincials 
d generals. And surely as nature createth brotherhood 
families, and arts mechanical contract brotherhoods 
communalties, and the anointment of God super- 
duceth a brotherhood in kings and bishops, so in 
;e manner there cannot but be a fraternity in learning 
id illumination, relating to that paternity which is attri- 
ated to God, who is called the Father of illuminations 
r lights. 

14. The last defect which I will note is, that there hath 

ot been, or very rarely been, any public designation of 

ni s or inquirers, concerning such parts of knowledge 

may appear not to have been already sufficiently 

Hired or undertaken ; unto which point it is an 

jment to enter into a view and examination what 

1 of learning have been prosecuted and what omitted. 

?or opinion of plenty is amongst the causes of want, 

the great quantity of books maketh a show rather 

)f superfluity than lack ; which surcharge nevertheless is 

not to be remedied by making no more books, but by 

making more good books, which, as the serpent of Moses, 

aought devour the serpents of the enchanters. 

15, The removing of all the defects formerly enu- 
merate, except the last, and of the active part also of 
liie last (which is the designation of writers), are opera 
ksiUca; towards which the endeavours of a private man 
be but as an image in a crossway, that may point 
H way, but cannot go it. But the inducing part 
latter (which is the survey of learning) may be 
to 1 by pri\jis travail. Wherefore I will now 
to make a ^i^^^ral and faithful perambulation 
b an inquw|r what parts thereof lie fresh 

G 2 



84 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [i 

and waste, and not improved and converted by tl 
industry of man ; to the end that such a plot made ai 
recorded to memory, may both minister light to ai 
public designation, and also serve to excite voluntai 
endeavours. Wherein nevertheless my purpose is at th 
time to note only omissions and deficiences, and not t 
make any redargution of errors or incomplete proseci 
tions. For it is one thing to set forth what ground liet 
unmanured, and another thing to correct ill husbandry i 
that which is manured. 

In the handling and undertaking of which work I as 
not ignorant what it is that I do now move and attempi 
nor insensible of mine own weakness to sustain my pui 
pose. But my hope is, that if my extreme love to lean 
carry me too far, I may obtain the excuse of affection 
for that // IS not granted to man to love and to be zvisi 
But I know well I can use no other liberty of judgemer 
than I must leave to others ; and I for my part shall b 
indifferently glad either to perform myself, or accept fr 
another, that duty of humanity ; Nam qui erranti c 't 
monstrat viam, dec, I do foresee likewise that of thos 
things which I shall enter and register as deficiences an 
omissions, many will conceive and censure that soi 
of them are already done and extant ; others to be 1 
curiosities, and things of no great use ; and others to b 
of too great difficulty, and almost impossibility to be com 
passed and effected. But for the two first, I refer myse! 
to the particulars. For the last, touching impossibility, 
take it those things are to be held possible which may b 
done by some person, though r"*- by every one; an' 
which may be done by many, t ^^h not by any one 
\ h may be done in '^'^.^ssion of ages, thong! 

the hourglass o' ^at man's' life; and whic 



IS-] THE SECOND BOOK. 85 

may be done by public designation, though not by private 

endeavour. But notwithstanding, if any man will take to 

himself rather that of Salomon, Dicitpiger, Leo est in via, 

than that of Virgil, Possunt quia posse videniur, I shall be 

content that my labours be esteemed but as the better 

Jort of wishes : for as it asketh some knowledge to de- 

nand a question not impertinent, so it requireth some 

to make a wish not absurd. 

1. 1 'T'HE parts olf human learning have reference 

to the three parts of man's understanding, 

iiiiich is the seat of learning : history to his memory, 

?oesy to his imagination, and philosophy to his reason. 

Divine learning receiveth the same distribution ; for the 

It of man is the same, though the revelation of oracle 

md sense be diverse. So as theology consisteth also of 

bistory of the church ; of parables, which is divine poesy ; 

md of holy doctrine or precept. For as for that part 

:h seemeth supernumerary, which is prophecy, it is 

divine history ; which hath that prerogative over 

1 , as the narration may be before the fact as well 

IS alter. 

2. History is natural, civil, ecclesiastical, and literary ; 

eof the three first I allow as extant, the ^i^toria 

th I :e as deficient. For no man hath uterarum. 

led to himself the general state of 

f to be described and represented from age to 

, as many have done the works of nature, and the 

civil and ecclesiastical; without which the history 

1 ^ rid seemeth to me to be as the statua of 

with his eye out ; that part being wanting 

Joth most show the spirit and life of the person. 

I am not ignorant that in divers particular 



88 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. 

scruple of entering into these things for inquisiti< 
truth, as your Majesty hath showed in your own exar 
who with the two clear eyes of religion and natural j 
sophy have looked deeply and wisely into these shac 
and yet proved yourself to be of the nature of the 
which passeth through pollutions and itself remaii 
pure as before. But this I hold fit, that these narral 
which have mixture with superstition, be sor ted by t 
selves^nd not to be mingled with the narrations v 
are merely and sincerely natural. But as for the 
rations touching the prodigies and miracles of rel 
they are either not true, or not natural; and ther 
impertinent for the story of nature. 

5. For history of nature wrought or mechanic 
find some collections made of agricu 
and likewise of manual arts ; but comn 
With a rejection of experiments famihai 
vulgar. For it is esteemed a kind of dishonour 
learning to descend to inquiry or meditation 
matters mechanical, except they be such as ma 
thought secrets, rarities, and special subtilties ; ^ 
humour of vain and supercilious arrogancy is ; 
derided in Plato ; where he brings in Hippias, a vau 
sophist, disputing with Socrates, a true and unf 
inquisitor of truth ; where the subject being tou 
beauty, Socrates, after his wandering manner of ii 
tions, put first an example of a fair virgin, and then 
fair horse, and then of a fair pot well glazed, wJ 
Hippias was offended, and said. More than for cow 
sake, he did think much to dispute with any that did 
such base and sordid instances. Whereunto Socrate: 
swereth, Vou have reason, and it becomes you well, be 
man so trim in your vestiments, <S:c., and so goeth on 



Is*] THE SECOND BOOK. 89 

Tony. But the truth is, they be not the highest instances 
hat give the securest information ; as may be well ex- 
•ressed in the tale so common of the philosopher, that 
hile he gazed upwards to the stars fell into the water ; 
)r if he had looked down he might have seen the stars 

the water, but looking aloft he could not see the water 

the stars. So it cometh often to pass, that mean and 
[1 things discover great, better than great can discover 
e small : and therefore Aristotle noteth well, 77ia/ the 
iture of everything is best seen in his smallest portions, 
ad for that cause he inquireth the nature of a common- 
salth, first in a family, and the simple conjugations of 
an and wife, parent and child, master and servant, which 

in every cottage. Even so likewise the nature of this 
eat city of the world, and the policy thereof, must be 
•St sought in mean concordances and small portions. 
we see how that secret of nature, of the turning of 
on touched with the loadstone towards the north, was 
)und out in needles of iron, not in bars of iron. 

6. But if my judgement be of any weight, the use of 

istory mechanical is of all others the most radical and 

amental towards natural philosophy; such natural 

Dsophy as shall not vanish in the fume of subtile, 

me, or delectable speculation, but such as shall be 

'perative to the endowment and benefit of man's life. 

'or it will not only minister and suggest for the present 

nany ingenious practices in all trades, by a connexion 

lad transferring of the observations of one art to the use 

)f another, when the experiences of several mysteries 

Wl fall under the consideration of one man's mind ; 

5it further, it will give a more true and real illumination 

^nceming causes and axioms than is hitherto attained. 

Por like as a man's disposition is never well known till 



88 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [l- 

scniple of entering into these things for inquisition 
truth, as your Majesty hath showed in your own exampj 
who with the two clear eyes of religion and natural phi 
sophy have looked deeply and wisely into these shadow 
and yet proved yourself to be of the nature of the s 
which passeth through pollutions and itself remains i 
pure as before. But this I hold fit, that these narr 
which have mixture with superstition, be sor ted by tl 
selves^nd not to be mingled with the narrations whic 
are merely and sincerely natural. But as for the 
rations touching the prodigies and miracles of religi 
they are either not true, or not natural; and theref 
impertinent for the story of nature. 

5. For history of nature wrought or mechanical, 
find some collections made of agricultiiT' 
and likewise of manual arts ; but common] 
With a rejection of expenments familiar 
vulgar. For it is esteemed a kind of dishonour 
learning to descend to inquiry or meditation upo 
matters mechanical, except they be such as may I 
thought secrets, rarities, and special subtilties ; whi( 
humour of vain and supercilious arrogancy is 
derided in Plato ; where he brings in Hippias, a vaun 
sophist, disputing with Socrates, a true and unfeij 
inquisitor of truth ; where the subject being touchii 
beauty, Socrates, after his wandering manner of indt 
tions, put first an example of a fair virgin, and then oi 
fair horse, and then of a fair pot well glazed, when 
Hippias was offended, and said. More than for courtes 
sake, he did think much to dispute with any that did all 
such base and sordid instances. Whereunto Socrates ^ 
swereth, Vou have reason^ and it becomes you weU, bein£ 
man so trim in your vestiments, d:c., and so goeth on in 



I 



.5.] THE SECOND BOOK. 89 

ronj. But the truth is, they be not the highest instances 
iat give the securest information ; as may be well ex- 
pressed in the tale so common of the philosopher, that 
while he gazed upwards to the stars fell into the water ; 
for \f he had looked down he might have seen the stars 
in the water, but looking aloft he could not see the water 
n the stars. So it cometh often to pass, that mean and 
1 things discover great, better than great can discover 
Jie 11: and therefore Aristotle noteth well. That the 
ire of everything is best seen in his smallest portions. 
And for that cause he inquireth the nature of a common- 
wealth, first in a family, and the simple conjugations of 
man and wife, parent and child, master and servant, which 
are in every cottage. Even so likewise the nature of this 
great city of the world, and the policy thereof, must be 
first sought in mean concordances and small portions. 
So we see how that secret of nature, of the turning of 
i touched with the loadstone towards the north, was 
d out in needles of iron, not in bars of iron. 
6. But if my judgement be of any weight, the use of 
history mechanical is of all others the most radical and 
imdamental towards natural philosophy; such natural 
Mosophy as shall not vanish in the fume of subtile, 
me, or delectable speculation, but such as shall be 
pe ve to the endowment and benefit of man's life, 
^or it will not only minister and suggest for the present 
' ingenious practices in all trades, by a connexion 
and transferring of the observations of one art to the use 
of another, when the experiences of several mysteries 
M fall under the consideration of one man's mind ; 
but further, it will give a more true and real illumination 
concerning causes and axioms than is hitherto attained. 
'Or like as a man's disposition is never well known till 



90 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [l. 

he be crossed, nor Proteus ever changed shapes till 
was straitened and held fast ; so the passages and va 
ations of nature cannot appear so fully in the liberty 
nature as in the trials and vexations of art. 

II. I. For civil history, it is of three kinds ; not 
fitly to be compared with the three kinds of pictur 
or images. For of pictures or images, we see some 
unfinished, some are perfect, and some are defaced. S 
of histories we may find three kinds, memorials, perfe 
histories, and antiquities ; for memorials are history 
finished, or the first or rough draughts of history; ai 
antiquities are history defaced, or some remnants of hi 
tory which have casually escaped the shipwreck of time. 

2. Memorials, or preparatory history, are of two sort! 
whereof the one may be termed commentaries, and tl 
other registers. Commentaries are they which set do^ 
a continuance of the naked events and actions, witho 
the motives or designs, the counsels, the speeches, tl 
pretexts, the occasions and other passages of action : f 
this is the true nature of a commentary (though CaesJ 
in modesty mixed with greatness, did for his pleast 
apply the name of a commentary to the best history 
the world). Registers are collections of public acts, 
decrees of council, judicial proceedings, declarations a 
letters of estate, orations and the like, without a pcrf^ 
continuance or contexture of the thread of the narratit 

3. Antiquities, or remnants of history, are, as was 
tanquam tabtda naufragii : when industrious persons, 
an exact and scrupulous diligence and observation, out 
monuments, names, words, proverbs, traditions, privj 
records and evidences, fragments of stories, passages 
books that concern not story, and the like, do save a 
recover somewhat from the deluge of time. 



[,] THE SECOND BOOK. 9 1 

4. In these kinds of unperfect histories I do assign 

leficience, for they are tanquam imperfecte mista ; and 

jfore any deficience in them is but their nature. 

s for the corruptions and moths of history, which are 

jitomes, the use of them deserveth to be banished, as 

I men of sound judgement have confessed, as those 

have fretted and corroded the sound bodies of many 

excellent histories, and wrought them into base and 

unprofitable dregs. 

5. History, which may be called just and perfect his- 
tory, is of three kinds, according to the object which 
it propoundeth, or pretendeth to represent : for it either 
representeth a time, or a person, or an action. The first 
we call chronicles, the second lives, and the third narra- 
tions or relations. Of these, although the first be the 
most complete and absolute kind of history, and hath 
most estimation and glory, yet the second excelleth it in 
profit and use, and the third in verity and sincerity. For 
history of times representeth the magnitude of actions, 
Mid the public faces and deportments of persons, and 
passeth over in silence the smaller passages and motions 
of men and matters. But such being the workmanship 
of God, as he doth hang the greatest weight upon the 
smallest wires, maxima } minimis suspendens^ it comes 
therefore to pass, that such histories do rather set forth 
^e pomp of business than the true and inward resorts 
^reof But lives, if they be well written, propounding to 
^emselves a person to represent, in whom actions both 
greater and smaller, public and private, have a commix- 
ture, must of necessity contaui a more true, native, and 
Wy representation. So again narrations and relations 
of actions, as the war of Peloponnesus, the expedition of 
Cyrus Minor, the conspiracy of Catiline, cannot but be 



92 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [II.5. 

more purely and exactly true than histories of tim 
because they may choose an argument comprehensil 
within the notice and instructions of the writer : whereas 
he that undertaketh the story of a time, specially of any 
length, cannot but meet with many blanks and spaces 
which he must be forced to fill up out of his own wit 
and conjecture. 

6. For the history of times (I mean of civil history), 
the providence of God hath made the distribution. For 
it hath pleased God to ordain and illustrate two exemplar 
states of the world for arms, learning, moral virtue, policy, 
and laws; the state of Grecia and the state of Rome; 
the histories whereof, occupying the middle part of time, 
have more ancient to them histories which may by one 
common name be termed the antiquities of the world: 
and after them, histories which may be likewise called by 
the name of modern history. 

7. Now to speak of the deficiences. As to the hea- 
then antiquities of the world, it is in vain to note them 
for deficient. Deficient they are no doubt, consisting 
most of fables and fragments ; but the deficience cannot 
be holpen ; for antiquity is like fame, caput inter nubila 
condit, her head is muffled from our sight. For the his- 
tory of the exemplar states it is extant in good perfection. 
Not but I could wish there were a perfect course of 
history for Grecia from Theseus to Philopoemen (what 
time the affairs of Grecia drowned and extinguished 
in the affairs of Rome), and for Rome from Romulus 
to Justinianus, who. may be truly said to be ulHmm 
Romanorum, In which sequences of story the text of 
Thucydides and Xenophon in the one, and the texts 
of Livius, Polybius, Sallustius, Caesar, Appianus, Tadtiis, 
Herodianus in the other, to be kept entire witfaout any 



[I. 7.] THE SECOND BOOK. 93 

diminution at all, and only to be supplied and continued. 
But this is matter of magnificence, rather to be com- 
mended than required: and we speak now of parts of 
learning supplemental and not of supererogation. 

8. But for modem histories, whereof there are some 
few very worthy, but the greater part beneath medipcrity, 
leaving the care of foreign stories to foreign states, be- 
cause I will not be curiosus in aliena republican I cannot 
fail to represent to your Majesty the unworthiness of the 
history of England in the main continuance thereof, and 
the partiality and obliquity of that of Scotland in the 
latest and largest author that I have seen : supposing that 
it would be honour for your Majesty, and a work very 
memorable, if this island of Great Brittany, as it is now 
joined in monarchy for the ages to come, so were joined 
in one history for the times passed ; after the manner of 
the sacred history, which draweth down the story of the 
ten tribes and of the two tribes as twins together. And 
if it shall seem that the greatness of this work may make 
it less exactly performed, there is an excellent period 
of a much smaller compass of time, as to the story of 
England ; that is to say, from the uniting of the Roses to 
the uniting of the kingdoms ; a portion of time wherein, 
to my understanding, there hath been the rarest varieties 
that in like number of successions of any hereditary 
monarchy hath been known. For it beginneth with the 
mixed adeption of a crown by arms and title; an entry 
by batde, an establishment by marriage ; and therefore 
times answerable, like waters after a tempest, full of 
working and swelling, though without extremity of storm ; 
but well passed through by the wisdom of the pilot, 
being one of the most sufficient kings of all the number. 
Then followeth the reign of a king, whose actions, howso- 



94 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [lL8 

ever conducted, had much intermixture with the aflfairs oi 
Europe, balancing and inclining them variably ; in wh 
time also began that great alteration in the state ec I- 
siastical, an action which seldom cometh upon the st F 
Then the reign of a minor: then an offer of an usurp N) 
(though it was but zs/edrt's ephemera). Then the r t OJ 
a queen matched with a foreigner : then of a queen 
lived solitary and unmarried, and yet her govemm* 
masculine, as it had greater impression and ope 
upon the states abroad than it any way§ received fi 
thence. And now last, this most happy and glori 
event, that this island of Brittany, divided from all 
world, should be united in itself: and that oracle of 
given to ^Eneas, aniiquam exquiriie matrem^ should n 
be performed and fulfilled upon the nations of Euj 1 
and Scotland, being now reunited in the ancient mo 
name of Brittany, as a full period of all instability ; 
peregrinations. So that as it cometh to pass in i J 

bodies, that they have certain trepidations and wa^ 
before they fix and settle, so it seemeth that by the pro- 
vidence of God this monarchy, before it was to settle in 
your majesty and your generations (in which I hope k is 
now established for ever), it had these prelusive changes 
and varieties. 

9. For lives, I do find strange that these times have so 
little esteemed the virtues of the times, as that the writings 
of lives should be no more frequent For although there 
be not many sovereign princes or absolute commanders, 
and that states are most collected into monarchies, yet 
are there many worthy personages that deserve better 
than dispersed report or barren elogies. For herein 
the invention of one of the late poets is proper, and 
doth well enrich the ancient fiction. For he fisigneCh 



I. 9.] THE SECOND BOOK, 95 

hat at the end of the thread or web of every man's life 
here was a little medal containing the person's name, 
md that Time waited upon the shears, and as soon as 
the thread was cut, caught the medals, and carried them 
to the river of Lethe ; and about the bank there were 
many birds flying up and down, that would get the 
medals and carry them in their beak a httle while, and 
then let them fall into the river. Only there were a few 
swans, which if they got a name would carry it to a 
temple where it was consecrate. And although many 
men, more mortal in their affections than in their bodies, 
do esteem desire of name and memory but as a vanity 
and ventosity, 

Ammi nil magnx laudis egentes ; 

which opinion cometh from that root, Non prius laudes 
coniempstmuSj quam laudanda facer e desivimus : yet that 
will not alter Salomon's judgement, Memoria justt cum 
lauMus, at impiorum nomen puirescet : the one flourisheth, 
the other either consumeth to present oblivion, or turneth 
to an ill odour. And therefore in that style or addition, 
which is and hath been long well received and brought 
in use, felicis memortcB, picB memoricB, bonce memoricB, we 
do acknowledge that which Cicero saith, borrowing it 
from Demosthenes, that bona fama propria possessio de- 
funciorum ; which possession I cannot but note that in 
our times it Heth much waste, and that therein there is a 
deficience. 

10. For narrations and relations of particular actions, 
there were also to be wished a greater diligence therein ; 
for there is no great action but hath some good pen 
which attends it. And because it is an ability not com- 
mon to write a good history, as may well appear by the 
small mmiber of them; yet if particularity of actions 



96 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [ll. i< 

memorable were but tolerably reported as they pass, 1 I 
compiling of a complete history of times mought be tb 
better expected, when a writer should arise that were fi 
for it: for the collection of such relations mought be| 
as a nursery garden, whereby to plant a fair and statelj 
garden, when time should serve. 

II. There is yet another partition of history whid 
Cornelius Tacitus maketh, which is not to be forgotten, 
specially with that application which he accoupleth it 
withal, annals and journals : appropriating to the fora 
matters of estate, and to the latter acts and accidents of a 
meaner nature. For giving but a touch of certain mag- 
nificent buildings, he addeth. Cum ex dignitaU populi Ror 
mani reperium sit, res illustres annalibus, ialia diurnis ur5a 
acHs niandare. So as there is a kind of contemplative 
heraldry, as well as civil. And as nothing doth derogate 
from the dignity of a state more than confusion of de- 
grees, so it doth not a little imbase the authority of an 
history, to intermingle matters of triiunph, or matters of 
ceremony, or matters of novelty, with matters of state. 
But the use of a journal hath not only been in the history 
of time, but likewise in the history of persons, and chiefly 
of actions ; for princes in ancient time had, upon point 
of honour and policy both, journals kept, what passed 
day by day. For we see the chronicle which was read 
before Ahasuenis, when he could not take rest, contained 
matter of affairs indeed, but such as had passed in his 
own time and very lately before. But the journal of 
Alexander's house expressed every small particularity, 
even concerning his person and court; and it is yet 
an use well received in enterprises memorable, as expe- 
ditions of war, navigations, and the like, to keep diaries 
of that which passeth continually. 



[. 12.] THE SECOND BOOK. 97 

12. I cannot likewise be ignorant of a form of writing 
vhich some grave and wise men have used, containing a 
scattered history of those actions which they have thought 
worthy of memory, with politic discourse and observation 
thereupon: not incorporate into the history, but separ- 
ately, and as the more principal in their intention ; which 
kind of r uminat ed jijstory I thin^more fit to place amongst 
books of policy, whereof we shall hereafter speak, than 
amongst books of history. For it is the true ofl5ce of his- 
tory to represent the events themselves together with the 
counsels, and to leave the observations and conclusions 
thereupon to the liberty and faculty of every man's judge- 
ment. But mixtures are things irregular, whereof no man 
can define. 

13. So also is there another kind of history manifoldly 
mixed, and that is history of cosmography : being com- 
pounded of natural history, in respect of the regions 
themselves ; of history civil, in respect of the habitations, 
regiments, and manners of the people; and the mathe- 
matics, in respect of the climates and configurations to- 
wards the heavens : which part of learning of all others 
in this latter time hath obtained most proficience. For 
it may be truly afl&rmed to the honour of these times, 
and in a virtuous emulation with antiquity, that this great 
building of the world had never through-lights made in it, 
till the age of us and our fathers. For although they had 
bowledge of the antipodes, 

Nosque ubi primus equis Oriens afflavit anhelis, 
Illic sera rul)ens accendit lumina Vesper, 

yet that mought be by demonstration, and not in fact; 
and if by travel, it requireth the voyage but of half the 
globe. But to circle the earth, as the heavenly bodies do, 
was not done nor enterprised till these later times : and 

H 



98 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [ll. i 

therefore these times may justly bear in their word, not 
only plus ui/ra, in precedence of the ancient non ultra^ 
and imitahile fulnun, in precedence of the ancient mn 
tmiiabtle fulmen, 

Demens qui nimbos et non imitabile fiilmen, &c. 

but likewise imitahile ccelum; in respect of the manj 
memorable voyages after the manner of heaven about 
the globe of the earth. 

14. And this proficience in navigation and discoverirt 
may plant also an expectation of the further proficience 
and augmentation of all sciences ; because it may seem 
they are ordained by God to be coevals, that is, to meet 
in one age. For so the prophet Daniel speaking of the 
latter times foretelleth, Plurimi pertransibunty et multiplex 
erit scientia : as if the openness and through-passage of 
the world and the increase of knowledge were appointed 
to be in the same ages ; as we see it is already performed 
in great part : the learning of these later times not much 
giving place to the former two periods or returns of learn- 
ing, the one of the Grecians, the other of the Romans. 

III. I. History ecclesiastical receiveth the same divi- 
sions with history civil : but further in the propriety 
thereof may be divided into the history of the church, 
by a general name ; history of prophecy ; and history of 
providence. The first describeth the times of the milit- 
ant church, whether it be fluctuant, as the ark of Noah, 
or moveable, as the ark in the wilderness, or at rest, as 
the ark in the temple : that is, the state of the church in 
persecution, in remove, and in peace. This part I ought 
in no s(Mt to note as deficient ; only I would the virtue 
and sincerity of it were according to the mass and 
q tity.' But I am not now in hand with censures, bot 



I. 2.] THE SECOND BOOK. 99 

2. The second, which is history of prophecy, consisteth 
f two relatives, the prophecy, and the accomplishment ; 
nd therefore the nature of such a work ought to be, that 
very prophecy of the scripture be sorted with the event 
ulfilling the same, throughout the ages of the world ; both 
or the better confirmation of faith, and for the better 
Uumination of the Church touching those parts of pro- 
)hecies which are yet unfulfilled : allowing nevertheless 
hat latitude which is agreeable and familiar unto divine 
3rophecies ; being of the nature of their author, with 
yhom a thousand years are but as one day ; and there- 
ore are not fulfilled punctually at once, but have 
jpringing and germinant accomplishment 
throughout many ages; though the height . 

or fulness of them may refer to some one 
age. This is a work which I find deficient ; but is to 
be done with wisdom, sobriety, and reverence, or not 
at all. 

3. The third, which is history of providence, con- 
taineth that excellent correspondence which is between 
God's revealed will and his secret will: which though 
it be so obscure, as for the most part it is not legible 
to the natural man; no, nor xsazny times to those that 
t d it from the tabernacle; yet at some times it 

seth God, for our better establishment and the con- 

ig of those which are as without God in the world, 

JO write it in such text and capital letters, that, as the 

phet saith, He that runneth by may read it; that is, 

sensual persons, which hasten by God's judge- 

I y and never bend or ^n their cogitations upon 

, are nevertheless in their passage and race urged 

to discern it Such are the notable events and examples 

^ Gpd'i judgements, chastisements, deliverances, and 

H 2 



lOO OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING, [ill. 

blessings : and this is a work which hath passed thro 
the labour of many, and therefore I cannot present 
omitted. 

4. There are also other parts of learning which j 
appendices to history. For all the exterior proceedin 
of man consist of words and deeds; whereof histc 
doth properly receive and retain in memory the dee( 
and if words, yet but as inducements and passages 
deeds ; so are there other books and writings, which a 
appropriate to the custody and receipt of words onl 
which likewise are of three sorts; orations, letters, 
brief speeches or sayings. Orations are pleadin| 
speeches of counsel, laudatives, invectives, apoloj 
reprehensions, orations of formality or ceremony, ai 
the like. Letters are according to all the variety of c 
casions, advertisements, advices, directions, propositioi 
petitions, commendatory, expostulatory, satisfactory, 
compliment, of pleasure, of discourse, and all other ] 
sages of action. And such as are written from wise m 
are of all the words of man, in my judgement, the bes 
for they are more natural than orations, and pub 
speeches, and more advised than conferences or pr 
speeches. So again letters of affairs from such 
manage them, or are privy to them, are of all others 1 
best instructions for history, and to a diligent reader 1 
best histories in themselves. For apophthegms, it ij 
great loss of that book of Caesar's; for as his history, a 
those few letters of his which we have, and those a] 
phthegms which were of his own, excel all men's else, 
suppose would his collection of apophthegms have do 
For as for those which are collected by others, eithe 
have no taste in such matters, or else their choice h: 
not been happy. But upon these three kinds of writii 



11.4.] ^^^ SECOND BOOK. lOI 

I do not insist, because I have no deficiences to propound 
concerning them. 

5. Thus much therefore concerning history, which is 
that part of learning which answereth to one of the cells, 
domiciles, or offices of the mind of man ; which is that 
of the memory. 

IV. I. Poesy is a part of learning in measure of words 
for the most part restrained, but in all other points ex- 
tremely licensed, and doth truly refer to the imagination ; 
which, being not tied to the laws of matter, may at plea- 
sure join that which nature hath severed, and sever that 
which nature hath joined ; and so make unlawful matches 
and divorces of things ; Pidoribus atque poetis^ dsc. It 
is taken in two senses in respect of words or matter. 
In the first sense it is but a character of style, and be- 
longeth to arts of speech, and is not pertinent for the 
present. In the latter it is (as hath been said) one of the 
principal portions of learning, and is nothing else but 
feigned history, which may be styled as well in prose as 
in verse. 

2. The use of this feigned history hath been to give 
some shadow of satisfaction to the mind of man in those 
points wherein the nature of things doth deny it, the 
world being in proportion inferior to the soul ; by reason 
whereof there is, agreeable to the spirit of man, a more 
ample greatness, a more exact goodness, and a more 
absolute variety, than can be found in the nature of 
thmgs. Therefore, because the acts or events of true 
history have not that magnitude which satisfieth the mind 
of man, poesy feigneth acts and events greater and more 
heroical. Because true history propoundeth the successes 
and issues of actions not so agreeable to the merits of 
Nirtue and vice, therefore poesy feigns them more just in 



lOZ OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [Vi 

retribution, and more according to revealed provider 
Because true history representeth actions and events m 
ordinary and less interchanged, therefore poesy endu 
them with more rareness, and more unexpected j 
alternative variations. So as it appeareth that po 
serveth and conferreth to magnanimity, morality, and 
delectation. And therefore it was ever thought to h 
some participation of divineness, because it doth r: 
and erect the mind, by submitting the shows of thi 
to the desires of the mind ; whereas reason doth bu( 
and bow the mind unto the nature of things. And 
see that by these insinuations and congruities with mi 
nature and pleasure, joined also with the agreement 
consort it hath with music, it hath had access and est 
ation in rude times and barbarous regions, where o 
learning stood excluded. 

3. The division of poesy which is aptest in the ] 
priety thereof (besides those divisions which are comi 
unto it with history, as feigned chronicles, feigned li 
and the appendices of history, as feigned episties, feig 
orations, and the rest) is into poesy narrative, repres 
ative, and allusive. The narrative is a mere imitatio 
history, with the excesses before remembered ; choo 
for subject commonly wars and love, rarely state, 
sometimes pleasure or mirth. Representative is a 
visible history ; and is an image of actions as if they ^ 
present, as history is of actions in nature as they are, ( 
is) past. Allusive or parabolical is a narration app 
only to express some special purpose or conceit. W 
latter kind of parabolical wisdom was much more in 
in the ancient times, as by the fables of ^sop, and 
brief sentences of the seven, and the use of hieroglyp 
may appear. And the cause was, for that it was the 



V.3.] THE SECOND BOOK, IO3 

necessity to express any point of reason which was more 

ihaip or subtile than the vulgar in that manner, because 

hose times wanted both variety of examples and 

ilty of conceit. And as hieroglyphics were before 

etters, so parables were before arguments : and never- 

heless now and at all times they do retain much life 

ind vigour, because reason cannot be so sensible, nor 

examples so fit. 

4. But there remaineth yet another use of poesy para- 
bolical, opposite to that which we last mentioned : for 
that tendeth to demonstrate and illustrate that which is 
taught or delivered, and this other to retire and obscure 
it: that is, when the secrets and mysteries of religion, 
policy, or philosophy, are involved in fables or parables. 
Of this in divine poesy we see the use is authorised. In 
heathen poesy we see the exposition of fables doth fall 
out sometimes with great felicity ; as in the fable that the 
giants being overthrown in their war against the gods, 
the earth their mother in revenge thereof brought forth 
Fame : 

Illam terra parens, ira irritata Deoram, 

Extremam, ut perhibent, Coeo Enceladoque sororem 

Progenuit. 

Expounded that when princes and monarchs have sup- 
pressed actual and open rebels, then the malignity of 
people (which is the mother of rebellion) doth bring forth 
fcls and slanders, and taxations of the states, which is 
of the same kind with rebellion, but more feminine. So 
in the fable that the rest of the gods having conspired 
to bind Jupiter, Pallas called Briareus with his hundred 
hands to his aid : expounded that monarchies need not 
fear any curbing of their absoluteness by mighty sub- 
jects, as long as by wisdom they keep the hearts of the 



104 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [V 

people, who will be sure to come in on their side. Sc 
the fable that Achilles was brought up under Chiron 
centaur, who was part a man and part a beast, expounc 
ingeniously but corruptly by Machiavel, that it belonge 
to the education and discipline of princes to know 
well how to play the part of the lion in violence, and 
fox in guile, as of the man in virtue and justice. Nev( 
theless, in many the like encounters, I do rather thi 
that the fable was first, and the exposition devised, th 
that the moral was first, and thereupon the fable fram( 
For I find it was an ancient vanity in Chrysippus, 
troubled himself with great contention to fasten t 
assertions of the Stoics upon the fictions of the ancic 
poets ; but yet that all the fables and fictions of the po< 
were but pleasure and not figure, I interpose no opinic 
Surely of those poets which are now extant, even Hon: 
himself (notwithstanding he was made a kind of scri 
ture by the later schools of the Grecians), yet I shoi 
without any diflBiculty pronounce that his fables h 
no such inwardness in his own meaning. But wl 
they might have upon a more original tradition, is i 
easy to afl&rm ; for he was not the inventor of many 
them. 

5. In this third part of learning, which is poesy, I c 
report no deficience. For being as a plant that com' 
of the lust of the earth, without a formal seed, it h 
sprung up and spread abroad more than any other ki 
But to ascribe unto it that which is due, for the express 
of affections, passions, corruptions, and customs, we 
beholding to poets more than to the philosophers' wor 
and for wit and eloquence, not much less than to orati 
harangues. But it is not good to stay too long in 
theatre. Let us now pass on to the judicial place or p 



THE SECOND BOOK. I05 

lind, which we are to approach and view with 
erence and attention. 

The knowledge of man is as the waters, some 
ig from above, and some springing from" be- 
16 one informed by the light of nature, the other 
by divine revelation. The light of nature con- 
the notions -of the mind and the reports of the 
for as for knowledge which man receiveth by 
it is cumulative and not original ; as in a water 
as his own spring-head is fed with other springs 
US. So then, according to these two differing 
Dns or originals, knowledge is first of all divided 
ity and philosophy. 

ihilosophy, the contemplations of man do either 
unto God, or are circumferred to nature, or are 
Dr reverted upon himself. Out of which several 
there do arise three knowledges; divine philo- 
itural philosophy, and human philosophy or 
For all things are marked and stamped with 
character, of the power of God, the difference 
and the use of man. But because the distribu- 
I partitions of knowledge are not like several 
meet in one angle, and so touch but in a point; 
:e branches of a tree, that meet in a stem, which 
.mension and quantity of entireness and con- 
before it come to discontinue and break itself 
; and boifghs: therefore it is good, before we 
the former distribution, to erect and constitute 
jrsal science, by the name oi philosophia prima^ 
or summary philosophy, as the main and com- 
before we come where the ways part and divide 
s; which science whether I should report as 
or no, I stand doubtful. For I find a certain 



Io6 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [V. «- 

rhapsody of natural theology, and of divers parts of logic; 
and of that part of natural philosophy which concemetb 
the principles, and of that other part of natural phflo- 
sophy which concemeth the soul or spirit; all these* 
strangely commixed and confused ; but being examined, 
it seemeth to me rather a depredation of other sciences, 
advanced and exalted unto some height of terms, than 
anything solid or substantive of itself. Nevertheless I 
cannot be ignorant of the distinction which is current, 
that the same things are handled but in several respects. 
As for example, that logic considereth of many things as 
they are in notion, and this philosophy as they are in 
nature; the one in appearance, the other in existence; 
but I find this difference better made than pursued. For 
if they had considered quantity, similitude, diversity, and 
the rest of those extern characters of things, as philo- 
sophers, and in nature, their inquiries must of force have 
been of a far other kind than they are. For doth any 
of them, in handling quantity, speak of the force of union, 
how and how far it multiplieth virtue? Doth any give 
the reason, why some things in nature are so common, 
and in so great mass, and others so rare, and in so small 
quantity? Doth any, in handling similitude and divers- 
ity, assign the cause why iron should not move to iron, 
which is more like, but move to the load-stone, which is 
less like ? Why in all diversities of things there should 
be certain participles in nature, which are almost am- 
biguous to which kind they should be referred? But 
there is a mere and deep silence touching the nature and 
operation of those common adjuncts of things, as in 
nature : and only a resuming and repeating of the force 
and use of them in speech or argument Therefore, 
because in a writing of this nature I avoid all snbtOitj, 



.] THE SECOND BOOK. I07 

meaning touching this original or universal philo- 

y is thus, in a plain and gross description by nega- 

Thaf it he a receptacle for all such profitable observ- 

and axioms as fall not within the compass of any 

special parts of philosophy or sciences, but are more 

m and of a higher stage. 

Now that there are many of that kind need not be 
sd. For example : is not the rule, Si incequalibus 
''a addas, omnia erunt incequalia, an axiom as well of 
; as of the mathematics? and is there not a true 
dence between commutative and distributive justice, 
irithmetical and geometrical proportion? Is not 
ther rule, Qucb in eodem tertio conveniunt, et inter se 
iunty a rule taken from the mathematics, but so 
: in logic as all syllogisms are built upon it? Is 
le observation, Omnia mutantur, nil interit, a con- 
ation in philosophy thus, that the quantum of nature 
-nal ? in natural theology thus, that it requireth the 
omnipotency to make somewhat nothing, which at 
St made nothing somewhat ? according to the scrip- 
Didici quod omnia opera, qucB fecit Detis, perseverent 
petuum ; non possumus eis quicquam addere nee au- 
Is not the ground, which Machiavel wisely and 
y discourseth concerning governments, that the way 
tablish and preserve them, is to reduce them ad 
'pia, a rule in religion and nature, as well as in civil 
listration ? Was not the Persian magic a reduction 
rrespondence of the principles and architectures of 
e to the rules and policy of governments ? Is not 
•recept of a musician, to fall from a discord or harsh 
rd upon a concord or sweet accord, alike true in 
don? Is not the trope of music, to avoid or slide 
the close or cadence, common with the trope of 



lo8 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNI^ 

rhetoric of deceiving expectation ? Is not the 
the quavering upon a stop in music the same 
playing of light upon the water ? 

Spleudet tremulo sub lumine pontus. 

Are not the organs of the senses of one kind 
organs of reflection, the eye with a glass, the < 
cave or strait, determined and bounded? N< 
these only similitudes, as men of narrow observ 
conceive them to be, but the same footsteps 
treading or printing upon several subjects o: 
This science therefore (as I understand it) I : 
report as deficient: for I see sometimes the p 

sort of wits, in handling some 
Philosophia argument, will now and then draw 

prima, she ^^ ^^^^^ ^^^ ^^ ^^^^ ^^y ^^^ ^^^ 
de fonttbus . t i i r- 

scientiarum. ^^e : but the sprmg-head thereof s 
me not to have been visited; be 
excellent use both for the disclosing of natur 
abridgement of art 

VI. I. This science being therefore first pi 
common parent like unto Berecynthia, whic 
much heavenly issue, omnes ccelicolaSj omnes s 
tenenies ; we may return to the former distribu 
three philosophies, divine, natural, and human, 
concerning divine philosophy or natural theo 
that knowledge or rudiment of knowledge c 
God, which may be obtained by the conten 
his creatures; which knowledge may be tru 
"divine in respect of the object, and natural in 
the light The bounds of this knowledge a 
sufficeth to convince atheism, but not to infoni 
and therefore there was never miracle wrough 
to convert an atheist, because the light of nal 



. I.] TBE SECOND BOOK. I09 

?e led him to confess a God : but miracles have been 
3ught to convert idolaters and the superstitious, be- 
use no light of nature extendeth to declare the will and 
worship of God. For as all works do show forth 
power and skill of the workman, and not his image, 
it of the works of God, which do show the omni- 
cy and wisdom of the maker, but not his image, 
id therefore therein the heathen opinion differeth from 
sacred truth ; for they supposed the world to be the 
je of God, and man to be an extract or compendious 
e of the world; but the scriptures never vouchsafe 
I attribute to the world that honour, as to be the image 
' God, but only /ke work of his hands ; neither do they 
»ak of any other image of God, but man. Wherefore 
y the contemplation of nature to induce and enforce 
be acknowledgement of God, and to demonstrate his 
lower, providence, and goodness, is an excellent argu- 
iient, and hath been excellently handled by divers. But 
•n tlie other side, out of the contemplation of nature, or 
ind of human knowledges, to induce any verity or 
sion concerning the points of faith, is in my judge- 
t not safe : Da fidei qucB fidei sunt. For the heathen 
\ slves conclude as much in that excellent and divine 
I of the golden chain : That men and gods were not 
ibU to draw Jupiter down to the earth; but contrariwise 
Jt^iler was able to draw them up to heaven. So as we 
ought not to attempt to draw down or to submit the 
mysteries of God to our reason ; but contrariwise to raise 
and advance our reason to the divine truth. So as in 
this part of knowledge, touching divine philosophy, I am 
so far from noting any deficience, as I rather note an 
excess: whereunto I have digressed because of the ex- 
treme prejudice which both religion and philosophy hath 



no OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [VI 

received and may receive by being commixed togetl 
as that which undoubtedly will make an heretical relig: 
and an imaginary and fabulous philosophy. 

2. Otherwise it is of the nature of angels and spir 
which is an appendix of theology, both divine and na 
and is neither inscrutable nor interdicted. For althi 
the scripture saith, Let no man deceive you in sublime A 
course touching the worship of angels^ pressing into that 
knoweih noty &c., yet notwithstanding if you observe i« 
that precept, it may appear thereby that there be ti 
things only forbidden, adoration of them, and opin 
fantastical of them, either to extol them further tl 
appertaineth to the degree of a creature, or to extol a 
man's knowledge of them further than he hath ground 
But the sober and grounded inquiry, which may arise oat 
of the passages of holy scriptures, or out of the grada- 
tions of nature, is not restrained. So of degenerate and 
revolted spirits, the conversing with them or the employ- 
ment of them is prohibited, much more any venerati 
towards them ; but the contemplation or science of 1 
nature, their power, their illusions, either by scripture d 
reason, is a part of spiritual wisdom. For so the apostle 
saith. We are not ignorant of his stratagems. And it is nc 
more unlawful to inquire the nature of evil spirits, than tc 
inquire the force of poisons in nature, or the nature o 
sin and vice in morality. But this part touching ang 
and spirits I cannot note as deficient, for many haw 
occupied themselves in it ; I may rather challenge it, ii 
many of the writers thereof, as fabulous and fantasticaL 

VII. I. Leaving therefore divine philosophy or natu 
theology (not divinity or inspired theology, which we re 
serve for the last of all as the haven and sabh \ of 
man's contemplations) we will now pzooeed 



VII. 1.] THE SECOSD BOOK. Ill 

philosophy. If dien it be rnie ±2: Democnrjs soi^. 

tha/ ihd iruSh ofnaiun hUih hid in arijin Je:f r.ivs an J 

cares ; and if ii be true likewise that ihe alchem:s:s do so 

ch inculcate, that Vulcan is a second nanire, and im- 

Uateth that deiterouslv and com-^endiouslv which nature 

worketh bv aniba£res and leneth of dme : i: were eood :o 

divide natural philosophy into the mine and the furnace. 

ind to make two professions or occupations of nanirai 

philosophers, some to be pioneers and some smiihs : 

some to dig, and some to refine and hammer. And surely 

I do hest allow of a di\ision of that kind, though in more 

^miliar and scholastical terms ; namely, that these be the 

two parts of natural philosophy, the inquisition of causes. 

the produciion of effects ; speculauve, and operative ; 

natural science, and natural prudence. For as in ci\il 

matters there is a wisdom of discourse, and a wisdom of 

ction; so is it in natural. And here I ^ill make a 

request, that for the latter (or at least for a part thereof) 

I may revive and reintegrate the misapplied and abused 

name of natural magic; which in the true sense is but 

natural wisdom, or natural prudence ; taken according to 

the ancient acception, purged from vanity and super- 

)iL Now although it be true, and I know it well, 

there is an intercourse between causes and effects, 

80 as both these knowledges, speculative and operative, 

have a great connexion between themselves ; yet because 

true and fruitful natural philosophy hath a double 

s or ladder, ascendent and descendent, ascending 

fr experiments to the invention of causes, and de- 

» idi firom causes to the invention of new experi- 

otB ; t re I judge it most requisite that these two 

pa « se all]r o idered and handled. 

«• \ or theory is divided into physic and 



112 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNINi 

jietaphysic : wherein I desire it may be concei 

use the word metaphysic in a differing sense 

that is received. And in like manner, I doul 

it will easily appear to men of judgement, th 

and other particulars, wheresoever my conce 

notion may differ from the ancient, yet I am s 

keep the ancient terms. For hoping well 

myself from mistaking, by the order and p< 

expressing of that I do propound; I am 

zealous and affectionate to recede as little from 

either in terms or opinions, as may stand with 

the proficience of knowledge. And herein I 

little marvel at the philosopher Aristotle, that di 

in such a spirit of difference and contradictioi 

all antiquity: undertaking not only to frame r 

of science at pleasure, but to confound and exti 

ancient wisdom : insomuch as he never nametl 

tioneth an ancient author or opinion, but to co 

reprove ; wherein for glory, and drawing folic 

disciples, he took the right course. For certa 

cometh to pass, and hath place in human t: 

which was noted and pronounced in the high< 

Veni in nomine patris, nee recipHis me ; si quis 

nomine suo eum recipietis. But in this divine 

(considering to whom it was applied, namely 

Christ, the highest deceiver) we may discern 

the coming in a man's own name, without i 

antiquity or paternity, is no good sign of truth, 

it be joined with the fortime and success of 

recipietis. But for this excellent person Aristo; 

think of him that he learned that humour of his 

with whom it seemeth he did emulate ; the one 

quer all opinions, as the other to conquer all 



i 

■ i 



>r 



I 



.] THE SECOND BOOK. II3 

herein nevertheless, it may be, he may at some men's 
, that are of a bitter, disposition, get t like title as 
cholar did : 

Felix terranim praedo, non utile mundo 
Editus exemplum, &c. 

Felix doctrinsB praedo. 

me on the other side that do desire as much as 

• 

in my pen to gromid a sociable intercourse between 
y and proficience, it seemeth best to keep way 

antiquity usque ad aras ; and therefore to retain the 

ent terms, though I sometimes alter the uses and 
efinitions, according to the moderate proceeding in civil 
[overament; where although there be some alteration, 
et that holdeth which Tacitus wisely noteth, eadem ma- 

atuum vocabula. 
3. To return therefore to the use and acception of the 
term metaphysic, as I do now understand the word; it 
ippeareth, by that which hath been already said, that i 
ntend philosophia prima^ summary philosophy and meta- 
physic, which heretofore have been confounded as one, 
be two distinct things. For the one I have made as 
a parent or common ancestor to all knowledge ; and the 

: I have now brought in as a branch or descendant 
of natural science. It appeareth likewise that I have 
assigned to summary philosophy the common principles 
and axioms which are promiscuous and indifferent to 
several sciences: I have assigned unto it likewise the 
uiry touching the operation of the relative and ad- 
ventive characters of essences, as quantity, similitude, 
diversity, possibility, and the rest: with this distinction 
and provision ; that they be handled as they have efficacy 
in nature, and not logically. It appeareth likewise that 

I 



IJ4 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [VII._ 

natural theology, which heretofore hath been handkd 
confusedly with metaphysic, I have inclosed and bounded 
by itself. It is therefore now a question what is left 
remaining for metaphysic ; wherein I may without pre- 
judice preserve thus much of the conceit of antiquit7, 
that physic should contemplate that which is inherent in 
matter, and therefore transitory; and metaphysic that 
which is abstracted and fixed. And again, that physic 
should handle that which supposeth in nature only ^ 
being and moving; and metaphysic should handle that 
which supposeth further in nature a reason, understand- 
ing, and platform. But the difference, perspicuously ex- 
pressed, is most familiar and sensible. For as we divided 
natural philosophy in general into the inquiry of causes, 
and productions of eflfects : so that part which concemeth 
the inquiry of causes we do subdivide according to the 
received and sound division of causes. The one part, 
which is physic, inquireth and handleth the material and 
eflScient causes; and the other, which is metaphysic, 
handleth the formal and final causes. 

4. Physic (taking it according to the derivation, and 
not according to our idiom for medicine) is situate in a 
middle term or distance between natural history and 
metaphysic. For natural history describeth the variety 
of things; physic the causes, but variable or respective 
causes ; and metaphysic the fixed and constant causes. 

Limus ut hie durescit, et hsBC ut cen liquesdt, 
Uno eodemque igni. 

Fire is the cause of induration, but respective to clay ; 
fire is the cause of colliquation, but respective to wax, 
But fire is no constant cause either of induration or colli- 
quation : so then the physical causes are but the effici* 
and the matter. Physic hath three parts, whereof twc 



^.] THE SECOND BOOK. 1 15 

ct nature united or collected, the third contemplateth 
e diffused or distributed. Nature is collected either 
Dne entire total, or else into the same principles or 
. So as the first doctrine is touching the contexture 
)nfiguration of things, as de mundo, de universitate 
I. The second is the doctrine concerning the prin- 
; or originals of things. The third is the doctrine 
jrning all variety and particularity of things ; whether 
of the differing substances, or their differing qualities 
latures ; whereof there needeth no enumeration, this 
being but as a gloss or paraphrase that attendeth 

the text of natural history. Of these three I 
)t report any as deficient. In what truth or per- 
n they are handled, I make not now any judge- 
; but they are parts of knowledge not deserted by 
,bour of man. 
For metaphysic, we have assigned unto it the in- 

of formal and final causes; which assignation, as 
e former of them, may seem to be nugatory and 

because of the received and inveterate opinion, 
he inquisition of man is not competent to find out 
tial forms or true differences : of which opinion we 
ake this hold, that the invention of forms is of all 
parts of kno)^ledge the worthiest to be sought, if it 
)ssible to be found. As for the possibility, they are 
scoverers that think there is no land, when they can 
othing but sea. But it is manifest that Plato, in his 
Dn of ideas, as one that had a wit of elevation 
e as upon a cliff, did descry that forms were the 
object of knowledge ; but lost the real fruit of his 
on, by considering of forms as absolutely abstracted 
matter, and not confined and determined by matter ; 
K) turning his opmion upon theology, wherewith all 

I 2 



IJ4 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [VII.3 

natural theology, which heretofore hath been hai: 
confusedly with metaphysic, I have inclosed and bounded 
by itself. It is therefore now a question what is lefl 
remaining for metaphysic ; wherein I may without pre- 
judice preserve thus much of the conceit of antiquit7, 
that physic should contemplate that which is inherent in 
matter, and therefore transitory; and metaphysic that 
which is abstracted and fixed. And again, that physic 
should handle that which supposeth in nature only ai 
being and moving; and metaphysic should handle that 
which supposeth further in nature a reason, understand- 
ing, and platform. But the difference, perspicuously ex- 
pressed, is most familiar and sensible. For as we divided 
natural philosophy in general into the inquiry of causes, 
and productions of eflfects ; so that part which concemeth 
the inquiry of causes we do subdivide according to the 
received and soimd division of causes. The one part, 
which is physic, inquireth and handleth the material and 
efficient causes; and the other, which is metaphysic, 
handleth the formal and final causes. 

4. Physic (taking it according to the derivation, and 
not according to our idiom for medicine) is situate in a 
middle term or distance between natural history and 
metaphysic. For natural history describeth the variety 
of things; physic the causes, but variable or respective 
causes ; and metaphysic the fixed and constant causes. 

Limus ut hie durescit, et hsec ut cera liquesdt, 
Uno eodemque igni. 

Fire is the cause of induration, but respective to day : 
fire is the cause of coUiquation, but respective to wax 
But fire is no constant cause either of induration or colli* 
quation : so then the physical causes are but the efficien 
and the matter. Physic hath three parts, whereof tw( 



. 4-] THE SECOND BOOK. 1 15 

pect nature united or collected, the third contemplateth 
ure diffused or distributed. Nature is collected either 
) one entire total, or else into the same principles or 
ds. So as the first doctrine is touching the contexture 
configuration of things, as de mundo, de universitate 
urn. The second is the doctrine concerning the prin- 
ks or originals of things. The third is the doctrine 
icerning all variety and particularity of things ; whether 
)e of the differing substances, or their differing qualities 
i natures ; whereof there needeth no enumeration, this 
rt being but as a gloss or paraphrase that attendeth 
on the text of natural history. Of these three I 
mot report any as deficient. In what truth or per- 
tion they are handled, I make not now any judge- 
int; but they are parts of knowledge not deserted by 
; labour of man. 
5. For metaphysic, we have assigned imto it the in- 

j^ of formal and final causes; which assignation, as 
the former of them, may seem to be nugatory and 
id, because of the received and inveterate opinion, 
It the inquisition of man is not competent to find out 

[itial forms or true differences : of which opinion we 
U take this hold, that the invention of forms is of all 
ler parts of kno^^ledge the worthiest to be sought, if it 
possible to be found. As for the possibility, they are 
discoverers that think there is no land, when they can 
; nothing but sea. But it is manifest that Plato, in his 
inion of ideas, as one that had a wit of elevation 
aate as upon a cliff, did descry that forms were the 
te object of knowledge ; but lost the real fruit of his 
inion, by considering of forms as absolutely abstracted 
m matter, and not confined and determined by matter ; 
d so turning his opinion upon theology, wherewith all 

I 2 



IJ4 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [VII. 

natural theology, which heretofore hath been hand! 
confusedly with metaphysic, I have inclosed and bound 
by itself. It is therefore now a question what is Idt 
remaining for metaphysic; wherein I may without pre- 
judice preserve thus much of the conceit of antiquity, 
that physic should contemplate that which is inherent in 
matter, and therefore transitory; and metaphysic that 
which is abstracted and fixed. And again, that physic 
should handle that which supposeth in nature only a 
being and moving; and metaphysic should handle tbat 
which supposeth further in nature a reason, understand- 
ing, and platform. But the difference, perspicuously ex- 
pressed, is most familiar and sensible. For as we divided j 
natural philosophy in general into the inquiry of causes, 
and productions of effects ; so that part which concemeth : 
the inquiry of causes we do subdivide according to tbc 
received and sound division of causes. The one part, 
which is physic, inquireth and handleth the material and 
efficient causes; and the other, which is metaphysic, 
handleth the formal and final causes. 

4. Physic (taking it according to the derivation, and 
not according to our idiom for medicine) is situate in a 
middle term or distance between natural history and 
metaphysic. For natural history describeth the variety 
of things; physic the causes, but variable or respective 
causes ; and metaphysic the fixed and constant causes. 

Limus ut hie durescit, et hsBC ut cera liquesdt, 
Uno eodemque igni. 

Fire is the cause of induration, but respective to day; 
fire is the cause of colliquation, but respective to wax. 
But fire is no constant cause either of induration or colB- 
quation : so then the physical causes are but the efficient 
and the matter. Physic hath three parts, whereof two 



TI. 4.] THE SECOND BOOK. IT5 

respect nature united or collected, the third contemplateth 
nature diflfused or distributed. Nature is collected either 
into one entire total, or else into the same principles or 
seeds. So as the first doctrine is touching the contexture 
or configuration of things, as de mundoy de universitaie 
^erum. The second is the doctrine concerning the prin- 
:iples or originals of things. The third is the doctrine 
:oncerning all variety and particularity of things ; whether 
t be of the differing substances, or their differing qualities 
ind natures ; whereof there needeth no enumeration, this 
}art being but as a gloss or paraphrase that attendeth 
ipon the text of natural history. Of these three I 
:annot report any as deficient. In what truth or per- 
fection they are handled, I make not now any judge- 
ment; but they are parts of knowledge not deserted by 
the labour of man. 

5. For metaphysic, we have assigned imto it the in- 
quiry of formal and final causes; which assignation, as 
to the former of them, may seem to be nugatory and 
void, because of the received and inveterate opinion, 
that the inquisition of man is not competent to find out 
essential forms or true differences : of which opinion we 
will take this hold, that the invention of forms is of all 
other parts of kno^^ledge the worthiest to be sought, if it 
be possible to be found. As for the possibility, they are 
in discoverers that think there is no land, when they can 
see nothing but sea. But it is manifest that Plato, in his 
opinion of ideas, as one that had a wit of elevation 
situate as upon a cliff, did descry that forms were the 
'rue object of knowledge ; but lost the real fruit of his 
)pinion, by considering of forms as absolutely abstracted 
rom matter, and not confined and determined by matter ; 
nd so turning his opmion upon theology, wherewith all 

I 2 



IJ4 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [VII. 

natural theology, which heretofore hath been handle 
confusedly with metaphysic, I have inclosed and bouni 
by itself. It is therefore now a question what is Id 
remaining for metaphysic; wherein I may without pre- 
judice preserve thus much of the conceit of antiquitfi 
that physic should contemplate that which is inherent in 
matter, and therefore transitory; and metaphysic that 
which is abstracted and fixed. And again, that physic 
should handle that which 'supposeth in nature only a 
being and moving; and metaphysic should handle that 
which supposeth further in nature a reason, understand- 
ing, and platform. But the difference, perspicuously ex- 
pressed, is most familiar and sensible. For as we divided 
natural philosophy in general into the inquiry of causes, 
and productions of eflfects : so that part which concemeth 
the inquiry of causes we do subdivide according to the 
received and sound division of causes. The one part, 
which is physic, inquireth and handleth the material and 
efficient causes; and the other, which is metaphysic, 
handleth the formal and final causes. 

4. Physic (taking it according to the derivation, and 
not according to our idiom for medicine) is situate in a 
middle term or distance between natural history and 
metaphysic. For natural history describeth the variety 
of things; physic the causes, but variable or respective 
causes ; and metaphysic the fixed and constant causes. 

Limus ut hie durescit, et haec ut cera liquesdt, 
Uno eodemque igni. 

Fire is the cause of induration, but respective to day ; 
fire is the cause of colliquation, but respective to wax 
But fire is no constant cause either of induration or coUi 
quation : so then the physical causes are but the eflfici' 
and the matter. Physic hath three parts, whereof tw( 



Vn. 4.] THE SECOND BOOK. 1 15 

respect nature united or collected, the third contemplateth 
nature diffused or distributed. Nature is collected either 
into one entire total, or else into the same principles or 
seeds. So as the first doctrine is touching the contexture 
or configuration of things, as de mundo, de universitaie 
rerum. The second is the doctrine concerning the prin- 
ciples or originals of things. The third is the doctrine 
concerning all variety and particularity of things ; whether 
it be of the diff"ering substances, or their diJGfering qualities 
and natures ; whereof there needeth no enumeration, this 
part being but as a gloss or paraphrase that attendeth 
upon the text of natural history. Of these three I 
cannot report any as deficient. In what truth or per- 
fection they are handled, I make not now any judge- 
ment; but they are parts of knowledge not deserted by 
the labour of man. 

5. For metaphysic, we have assigned imto it the in- 
quiry of formal and final causes; which assignation, as 
to the former of them, may seem to be nugatory and 
void, because of the received and inveterate opinion, 
that the inquisition of man is not competent to find out 
essential forms or true differences : of which opinion we 
will take this hold, that the invention of forms is of all 
other parts of knowledge the worthiest to be sought, if it 
be possible to be found. As for the possibility, they are 
ill discoverers that think there is no land, when they can 
see nothing but sea. But it is manifest that Plato, in his 
opinion of ideas, as one that had a wit of elevation 
situate as upon a cliff, did descry that forms were the 
true object of knowledge ; but lost the real fruit of his 
opinion, by considering of forms as absolutely abstracted 
From matter, and not confined and determined by matter ; 
md so turning his opmion upon theology, wherewith all 

I 2 



Il6 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [VILp 

his natural philosophy is infected. But if any man 
keep a continual watchful and severe eye upon j ion, ^ 
operation, and the use of knowledge, he may advise and 
take notice what are the forms, the disclosures whereof 
are fruitful and important to the state of man. For as 
to the forms of substances (man only except, of whom it 
is said, Formavit hominem de limo ierrcBy ei spiravit in 
faciem ejtcs spiraculum vitcBy and not as of all other crea- 
tures, Producant aquce, producat terrd)^ the forms of sub- ' 
stances I say (as they are now by compounding and 
transplanting multiplied) are so perplexed, as they are not 
to be inquired ; no more than it were either possible or 
to purpose to seek in gross the forms of those sounds 
which make words, which by composition and trans- 
position of letters are infinite. But on the other side 
to inquire the form of those sounds or voices which make 
simple letters is easily comprehensible ; and being knovn 
induceth and manifesteth the forms of all words, which 
consist and are compounded of them. In the same man- 
ner to inquire the form of a lion, of an oak, of gold; nay, 
of water, of air, is a vain pursuit : but to inquire the fonns 
of sense, of voluntary motion, of vegetation, of colours, 
of gravity and levity, of density, of tenuity, of heat, of 
cold, and all other natures and qualities, which, like an 
alphabet, are not many, and of which the essences (up- 
held by matter) of all creatures do consist ; to inquire, I 
say, the true forms of these, is that part of metaphysic 
which we now define of. Not but that physic doth make 
inquiry and take consideration of the same natures : but 
how? Only as to the material and efiScient causes of 
them, and not as to the forms. For example, if the 
cause of whiteness in snow or froth be inquired, and it 
be rendered thus, that the subtile intermixture of air and 



^I. 5.] THE SECOJ^D BOOK, 1 1 7 

^ater is the cause, it is well rendered ; but nevertheless 
5 this the form of whiteness ? No ; but it is the efficient, 
rhich is ever but vehiculum formce. This 
art of metaphysic I do not find laboured Metapkysica 
nd performed : whereat I marvel not : be- *"!^ ^\^. 

'^ mis etfint- 

ause I hold it not possible to be invented busrerum, 
J that course of invention which hath been 
ised ; in regard that men (which is the root of all error) 
lave made too untimely a departure and too remote a 
ecess from particulars. 

6. But the use of this part of metaphysic, which I re- 
x)rt as deficient, is of the rest the most excellent in two 
espects : the one, because it is the duty and virtue of all 
bowledge to abridge the infinity of individual experience, 
as much as the conception of truth will permit, and to 
remedy the complaint of vita brevi's, ars longa ; which is 
performed by uniting the notions and conceptions of 
sciences. For knowledges are as pyramides, whereof 
history is the basis. So of natural philosophy, the basis is 
natural history; the stage next the basis is physic; the 
stage next the vertical point is metaphysic. As for the 
vertical point, optis quod operatur Detis a principio usque ad 
fnem, the summary law of nature, we know not whether 
man's inquiry can attain imto it. But these three be the 
trae stages of knowledge, and are to them that are de- 
praved no better than the giants' hills : 

Ter sunt conati imponere Pelio Ossam, 

Scilicet, atque Ossx frondosum involvere Olympum. 

^ut to those which refer all things to the glory of God, 
bey are as the three acclamations, Sancie, sancte, sancte I 
oly in the description or dilatation of his works ; holy 
1 the connexion or concatenation of them ; and holy in 



Il8 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [y]Li 

the union of them in a perpetual and uniform law. Anc 
therefore the speculation was excellent in Parmenides anc 
Plato, although but a speculation in them, that all tl 
by scale did ascend to unity. So then always that know- 
ledge is worthiest which is charged with least multiplicity, 
which appeareth to be metaphysic; as that which coD' 
sidereth the simple forms or differences of things, whid 
are few in number, and the degrees and co-ordinations 
whereof make all this variety. The second respect, whidi 
valueth and commendeth this part of metaphysic, is 
it doth enfranchise the power of man unto the greatest 
liberty and possibility of works and effects. For physic 
carrieth men in narrow and restrained ways, subject 
many accidents of impediments, imitating the ordi 
flexuous courses of nature. But lafcB undt'gue sun/ sapt • 
dus vice : to sapience (which was anciently defined to be 
rerum divinarum et humanarum scientid) there is ever 
choice of means. For physical causes give light to new 
invention in simili materia. But whosoever knoweth any 
form, knoweth the utmost possibility of superinducing that 
nature upon any variety of matter ; and so is less re- 
strained in operation, either to the basis of the matter, 
or the condition of the efficient ; which kind of knowledge 
Salomon likewise, though in a more divine sense, elegantly 
describeth; non arctahuntur gressus fuiy et currem nm 
hahehis offmdiculum. The ways of sapience are not much 
liable either to particularity or chance. 

7. The second part of metaphysic is the inquiry of 
final causes, which I am moved to report not as omitted 
but as misplaced. And yet if it were but a fault in order, 
I would not speak of it : for order is matter of illustration, 
but pertaineth not to the substance of sciences. But tWs 
misplacing hath caused a deficience, or at least a great 



THE SECOND BOOK. II9 

:ience in the sciences themselves. For the hand- 
final causes, mixed with the rest in physical in- 
hath intercepted the severe and diligent inquiry 
;al and physical causes, and given men the occa- 
stay upon these satisfactory and specious causes, 
great arrest and prejudice of further discovery. 
; I find done not only by Plato, who ever anchor- 
•n that shore, but by Aristotle, Galen, and others 
o usually likewise fall upon these flats of discours- 
ses. For to say that the hairs of the eye-lids are/or 
ei and fence about the sight ; or that the firmness of 
: and hides of living creatures is to defend them from 
emities of heat or cold ; or that the bones are for the 
or beams, whereupon the fr anus of the bodies of living 
r are built : or that the leaves of trees are for pro- 
f the fruit ; or that the clouds are for watering of 
i ; or that the solidness of the earth is for the station 
nsion of living creatures, and the like, is well in- 
and collected in metaphysic, but in physic they 
ertinent. Nay, they are indeed but remoraes and 
:es to stay and slug the ship from further sailing ; 
e brought this to pass, that the search of the 

causes hath been neglected and passed in silence, 
refore the natural philosophy of Democritus and 
hers, who did not suppose a mind or reason in 
.e of things, but attributed the form thereof able 
tain itself to infinite essays or proofs of nature, 
ey term fortune, seemeth to me (as far as I can 
' the recital and fragments which remain unto us) 
:ularities of physical causes more real and better 

than that of Aristotle "and Plato; whereof both 
gled final causes, the one as a part of theology, 
other as a part of logic, which were the favourite 



I20 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [VII. 7. 

Studies tespectively of both those persons. Not because 
those final causes are not trae, and worthy to be inquired, 
being kept within their own province ; but because their 
excursions into the limits of physical causes hath bred a 
vastness and solitude in that tract. For otherwise, keep- 
ing their precincts and borders, men are extremely de- 
ceived if they think there is an enmity or repugnancy at 
all between them. For the cause rendered, that /Ae hairs 
about the eye-lids are for the safeguard of the sight, doth 
not impugn the cause rendered, that pilosity is incident to 
orifices of moisture ; muscosi fontes, &c. Nor the cause 
rendered, that the firmness of hides is for the armour (^thi 
body against extremities of heat or cold^ doth not impugn 
the cause rendered, that contraction of pores is incident to 
the outwardest parts, in regard of their adjacence to foreign 
or unlike bodies : and so of the rest : both causes being 
true and compatible, the one declaring an intention, the 
other a consequence only. Neither doth this call in ques- 
tion, or derogate from divine providence, but highly con- 
firm and exalt it. For as in civil actions he is the greater 
and deeper politique, that can make other men the instru- 
ments of his will and ends, and yet never acquaint them 
with his purpose, so as they shall do it and yet not know 
what they do, than he that imparteth his meaning to those 
he employeth ; so is the wisdom of God more admirable, 
when nature intendeth one thing, and providence draweth 
forth another, than if he had communicated to particular 
creatures and motions the characters and impressions of 
his providence. And thus much for metaphysic: the 
latter part whereof I allow as extant, but wish it confined 
to his proper place. 

VIIL I. Nevertheless there remaineth yet another 
part of natural philosophy, which is commonly made a 



VIII. I.] THE SECOND BOOK. 121 

principal part, and holdeth rank with physic special and 
metaphysic, which is mathematic; but I think it more 
agreeable to the nature of things, and to the light of order, 
to place it as a branch of metaphysic. For the subject of 
it being quantity, not quantity indefinite, which is but a 
relative, and belongeth to philosophia prima (as hath been 
said), but quantity determined or proportionable, it appear- 
eth to be one of the essential forms of things, as that that 
is causative in nature of a number of effects ; insomuch as 
we see in the schools both of Democritus and of Pytha- 
goras, that the one did ascribe figure to the first seeds of 
things, and the other did suppose numbers to be the 
principles and originals of things. And it is true also that 
of all other forms (as we understand forms) it is the most 
abstracted and separable from matter, and therefore most 
proper to metaphysic ; which hath likewise been the cause 
why it hath been better laboured and inquired than any 
of the other forms, which are more immersed into matter. 
For it being the nature of the mind of man (to the extreme 
prejudice of knowledge) to delight in the spacious liberty 
of generalities, as in a champain region, and not in the 
inclosures of particularity, the mathematics of all other 
knowledge were the goodliest fields to satisfy that appetite. 
But for the placing of this science, it is not much ma- 
terial : only we have endeavoured in these our partitions 
to observe a kind of perspective, that one part may cast 
light upon another. 

2. The mathematics are either pure or mixed. To the 
pure mathematics are those sciences belonging which handle 
quantity determinate, merely severed from any axioms of 
natural philosophy; and these are two, geometry and 
arithmetic ; the one handling quantity continued, and the 
other dissevered. Mixed hath for subject some axioms 



122 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [VIII. 2. 

or parts of natural philosophy, and considereth quantity 
determined, as it is auxiliary and incident unto them. 
For many parts of nature can neither be invented with 
sufl5cient subtilty, nor demonstrated with sufl&cient per- 
spicuity, nor accommodated unto use with suflQcient dex- 
terity, without the aid and intervening of the mathematics; 
of which sort are perspective, music, astronomy, cosmo- 
graphy, architecture, enginery, and divers others. In the 
mathematics I can report no deficience, except it be that 
men do not sufficiently understand the excellent use of the 
pure mathematics, in that they do remedy and cure many 
defects in the wit and faculties intellectual For if the 
wit be too dull, they sharpen it ; if too wandering, they 
fix it; if too inherent in the sense, they abstract it. So 
that as tennis is a game of no use in itself, but of great 
use in respect it maketh a quick eye and a body ready to 
put itself into all postures; so in the mathematics, that 
use which is collateral and intervenient is no less worthy 
than that which is principal and intended. And as for the 
mixed mathematics, I may only make this prediction, 
that there cannot fail to be more kinds of them, as nature 
grows further disclosed. Thus much of natural science, 
or the part of nature speculative. 

3. For natural prudence, or the part operative of na- 
tural philosophy, we will divide it into three parts, experi- 
mental, philosophical, and magical: which three parts 
active have a correspondence and analogy with the three 
parts speculative, natural history, physic, and metaphysic. 
For many operations have been invented, sometime by 
a casual incidence and occurrence, sometimes by a pur- 
posed experiment : and of those which have been found 
by an intentional experiment, some have been found out 
by varying or extending the same experiment, some by 



THE SECOND BOOK. 1 23 

ing and compounding divers experiments the one 
other, which kind of invention an empiric may 
Again by the knowledge of physical causes 
nnot fail to follow many indications and designa- 
new particulars, if men in their speculation will 
e eye upon use and practice. But these are but 
s along the shore premendo littus iniqmim : for 
jth to me there can hardly be discovered any 
or fundamental alterations and innovations in 
either by the fortune and essays of experiments, 
he light and direction of physical causes. If 
3 we have reported metaphysic defi- ^^^^ .. 
must follow that we do the like of Magia dve 
magic, which hath relation thereunto. Physica 
for the natural magic whereof now Operativa 
mention in books, containing certain ^^^^^ 
IS and superstitious conceits and observations of 
ies and antipathies, and hidden proprieties, and 
Lvolous experiments, strange rather by disguise- 
in in themselves, it is as far differing in truth of 
rom such a knowledge as we require, as the story 
Arthur of Britain, or Hugh of Bourdeaux, differs 
esar's Commentaries in truth of story. For it is 
; that Csesar did greater things de vero than those 
ry heroes were feigned to do. But he did them 
hat fabulous manner. Of this kind of learning 
i of Ixion was a figure, who designed to enjoy 
le goddess of power; and instead of her had 
Dn with a cloud, of which mixture were begotten 
and chimeras. So whosoever shall entertain 
d vaporous imaginations, instead of a laborious 
er inquiry of truth, shall beget hopes and beliefs 
je and impossible shapes. And therefore we may 



124 O^ ^^^ ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. \y\\\.i* 

note in these sciences which hold so much of imagination 
and belief, as this degenerate natural magic, alchemy, 
astrology, and the like, that in their propositions the de- 
scription of the means is ever more monstrous than the 
pretence or end. For it is a thing more probable, that 
he that knoweth well the natures of weight, of colour, of 
pliant and fragile in respect of the hammer, of volatile and 
fixed in respect of the fire, and the rest, may superinduce 
upon some metal the nature and form of gold by sucl 
mechanique as longeth to the production of the nature 
afore rehearsed, than that some grains of the medicin* 
projected should in a few moments of time turn a s 
of quicksilver or other material into gold. So it is mor 
probable that he that knoweth the nature of arefactior 
the nature of assimilation of nourishment to the thini 
nourished, the manner of increase and clearing of spirit! 
the manner of the depredations which spirits make upo 
the humours and solid parts, shall by ambages of dieti 
bathings, anointings, medicines, motions, and the like 
prolong life, or restore. some degree of youth or vivacit) 
than that it can be done with the use of a few drops o 
scruples of a liquor or receipt. To conclude therefore 
the true natural magic, which is that great liberty an* 
latitude of operation which dependeth upon the know 
ledge of forms, I may report deficient, as the relativ 
thereof is. To which part, if we be serious and inclin 
not to vanities and plausible discoiu*se, besides the deriv 
ing and deducing the operations themselves from meta 
physic, there are pertinent two points of much purpose 
Inventarium the One by way of preparation, the other b; 
opum hum- way of caution. The first is, that there b 
anarum. made a kalendar, resembling an inventory c 
the estate of man, containing all the inventions (bein^ 



mi. 3.] THE SECOND BOOK. 125 

works or fruits of nature or art) which are now 
« , and whereof man is already possessed ; out of 
which doth naturally result a note, what things are yet 
held impossible, or not invented: which kalendar will 
be the more artificial and serviceable, if to every reputed 
impossibility you add what thing is extant which cometh 
the nearest in degree to that impossibility; to the end 
that by these optatives and potentials man's inquiry may 
be the more awake in deducing direction of works from 
the speculation of causes.' And secondly, that those ex- 
periments be not only esteemed which have an immediate 
and present use, but those principally which are of most 
universal consequence for invention of other experiments, 
and those which give most light to the invention of causes. 
For the invention of the mariner's needle, which giveth 
the direction, is of no less benefit for navigation than the 
invention of the sails which give the motion. 

4. Thus have I passed through natural philosophy 
and the deficiences thereof; wherein if I have differed 
from the ancient and received doctrines, and thereby 
shall move contradiction, for my part, as I affect not 
to dissent, so I piu*pose not to contend. If it be 
truth, 

Non canimns surdis, respondent omnia sylvae; 

the voice of nature will consent, whether the voice of 

man do or no. And as Alexander Borgia was wont to 

say of the expedition of the French for Naples, that 

they came with chalk in their hands to mark up their 

lodgings, and not with weapons to fight ; so I like better 

that entry of truth which cometh peaceably with chalk 

to mark up those minds which are capable to lodge 

and harbour it, than that which cometh with pugnacity 

and contention. 



126 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [VIIL^ 

5. But there remaineth a division of natural philosophy 
according to the report of the inquiry, and nothing con- 
cerning the matter or subject : and that is positive and 
considerative ; when the inquiry reporteth either an asser- 
tion or a doubt. These doubts or non liqueis are of two 
sorts, particular and total. For the first, we see a good 
example thereof in Aristode's Problems, which deserved 
to have had a 'better continuance; but so nevertheless 
as there is one point whereof warning is to be given and 
taken. The registering of doubts hath two excellent 
uses : the one, that it saveth philosophy from errors and 
falsehoods ; when that which is not fully appearing is not 
collected* into assertion, whereby error might draw error, 
but reserved in doubt : the other, that the entry of doubts 
are as so many suckers or sponges to draw use of know- 
ledge ; insomuch as that which, if doubts had not pre- 
ceded, a man should never have advised, but passed i' 
over without note, by the suggestion and solicitation 
doubts is made to be attended and applied. But botl 
these commodities do scarcely countervail an inconven: 
ence, which will intrude itself if it be not debarred ; whic 
is, that when a doubt is once received, men labour rathe 
how to keep it a doubt still, than how to solve it ; an 
accordingly bend their wits. Of this we see the famili; 
example in lawyers and scholars, both which, if they ha> 
once admitted a doubt, it goeth ever after authorised f< 
a doubt But that use of wit and knowledge is to I 
allowed, which laboureth to make doubtful things certai 
and not those which labour to make certain things doub 
ful. Therefore these kalendars of doubts I conunei 
as excellent things ; so that there be this caution use 
that when they be throughly sifted and brought to resol 
tion, they be from thenceforth omitted, decarded, and n 



VIII. S.] THE SECOND BOOK. 12/ 

continued to cherish and encourage men in doubting. 

To which kalendar of doubts or problems, I 

advise be annexed another kalendar, as much ^ , , 

Prohlema'- 

or more material, which is a kalendar of ^^^ ^^ ^_ 

popular errors : I mean chiefly in natural tura. 

history, such as pass in speech and conceit, Catahgus 

and are nevertheless apparently detected and /^^"'^'"'w 

convicted of untruth : that man's knowledge ^^^^^ ^"^ 

^ tn htstorta 

be not weakened nor imbased by such dross naiura. 
and vanity. As for the doubts or non liquets 
general or in total, I understand those differences of 
opinions touching the principles of nature, and the funda- 
mental points of the same, which have caused the diversity 

I of sects, schools, and philosophies, as that of Empedocles, 
Pythagoras, Democritus, Parmenides, and the rest. For 
although Aristotle, as though he had been of the race of 
the Ottomans, thought he could not reign except the 
first thing he did he killed all his brethren ; yet to those 
that seek truth and not magistrality, it cannot but seem 
a matter of great profit, to see before them the several 

I opinions touching the foundations of nature. Not for any 
fxact truth that can be expected in those theories ; for as 
the same phenomena in astronomy are satisfied by the 
received astronomy of the diurnal motion, and the proper 

^ motions of the planets, with their eccentrics and epicycles, 
and likewise by the theory of Copernicus, who supposed 
earth to move, and the calculations are indifferently 
jeable to both, so the ordinary face and view of expe- 
rience is many times satisfied by several theories and 
philosophies; whereas to find the real truth requireth 
another manner of severity and attention. For as Aris- 
totle saith, that children at the first will call every wo- 
man mother, but afterward they come to distingui<?h 



128 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING, [Vin.^- 

according to truth ; so experience, if it be in childhoods 

will call every philosophy mother, but when it cometl* 

to ripeness it will discern the true mother. So as in 

. . the mean time it is good to see the several 

De antiquts , , ^ 

philosophiis. grosses and opmions upon nature, whereat 
it may be every one in some one point hatb 
seen clearer than his fellows, therefore I wish some col- 
lection to be made painfully and understandingly de 
anitquis philosophns, out of all the possible light which 
remaineth to us of them : which kind of work I find 
deficient. But here I must give warning, that it be done 
distinctly and severedly ; the philosophies of every one 
throughout by themselves, and not by titles packed and 
faggoted up together, as hath been done by Plutarch. 
For it is the harmony of a philosophy in itself which 
giveth it light and credence; whereas if it be singled 
and broken, it will seem more foreign and dissonant. 
For as when I read in Tacitus the actions of Nero or 
Claudius, with circumstances of times, inducements, and 
occasions, I find them not so strange ; but when I read 
them in Suetonius Tranquillus, gathered into titles and 
bundles and not in order of time, they seem more mon- 
strous and incredible : so is it of any philosophy reported 
entire, and dismembered by articles. Neither do I ex- 
clude opinions of latter times to be likewise represented 
in this kalendar of sects of philosophy, as that of Theo- 
phrastus Paracelsus, eloquently reduced into an harmony 
by the pen of Severinus the Dane ; and that of Tilesius, 
and his scholar Donius, being as a pastoral philosophy, 
full of sense, but of no great depth ; and that of Fracas* 
torius, who, though he pretended not to make any new 
philosophy, yet did use the absoluteness of his own sense 
upon the old; and that of Gilbertus our countryman, who 



L5.J THE SECOND BOOK. 129 

ved, with some alterations and demonstrations, the 
lions of Xenophanes; and any other worthy to be 
itted. 

Thus have we now dealt with two of the three 
as of man's knowledge ; that is radius directus, which 
ferred to nature, radius re/raciuSy which is referred to 
, and cannot report truly because of the inequality of 
nedium. There resteth radius reflexus, whereby man 
Ideth and contemplateth himself. 
\. I. We come therefore now to that knowledge 
eunto the ancient oracle directeth us, which is the 
dedge of ourselves; which deserveth the more ac- 
e handling, by how much it toucheth us more nearly, 
knowledge, as it is the end and term of natural phi- 
hy in the intention of man, so notwithstanding it is 
I portion of natural philosophy in the continent of 
e. And generally let this be a rule, that all partitions 
owledges be accepted rather for lines and veins than 
ections and separations; and that the continuance 
entireness of knowledge be preserved. For the 
ary hereof hath made particular sciences to become 
n, shallow, and erroneous, while they have not bee^ 
ished and maintained from the common fountain, 
^e see Cicero the orator complained of Socrates and 
:hool, that he was the first that separated philosophy 
•hetoric ; whereupon rhetoric became an empty and 
il art. So we may see that the opinion of Copernicus 
ling the rotation of the earth, which astronomy itself 
ot correct, because it is not repugnant to any of the 
wmenay yet natural philosophy may correct. So we 
ilso that the science of medicine if it be destituted 
forsaken by natural philosophy, it is not much better 
an empirical practice. With this reservation therefore 

K 



130 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [iX. x. 

we proceed to human philosophy or humanity, which 
hath two parts: the one considereth man segregate or 
distributively ; the other congregate, or in society. So as 
human philosophy is either simple and particular, or con- 
jugate and civil. Humanity particular consisteth of the 
same parts whereof man consisteth; that is, of know- 
ledges which respect the body, and of knowledges that 
respect the mind. But before we distribute so far, it is 
good to constitute. For I do take the consideration in 
general, and at large, of human nature to be fit to be 
emancipate and made a knowledge by itself: not so mud* 
in regard of those delightful and elegant discourses whicli 
have been made of the dignity of man, of his miseries, of 
his state and life, and the like adjuncts of his commofi- 
and undivided nature ; but chiefly in regard of the know- 
ledge concerning the sympathies and concordances be- 
tween the mind and body, which being mixed cannot be 
properly assigned to the sciences of either. 

2. This knowledge hath two branches: for as all 
leagues and amities consist of mutual intelligence and 
mutual offices, so this league of mind and body hath 
these two parts ; how the one discloseth the other, and 
how the one worketh upon the other; discovery and 
impression. The former of these hath begotten two 
arts, both of prediction or prenotion ; whereof the one 
is honoured with the inquiry of Aristotle, and the other 
of Hippocrates. And although they have of later time 
been used to be coupled with superstitious and fantastical 
arts, yet being purged and restored to their true state, 
they have both of them a solid ground in nature, and a 
profitable use in life. The first is physiognomy, which 
discovereth the disposition of the mind by the linf^m^^ntg 
of the body. The second is the exposition of natural 



IX. 2.] THE SECOND BOOK. I31 

dreams, which discovereth the state of the body by the 
imaginations of the mind. In the former of these I note 
a deficience. For Aristotle hath very ingeni- p^^^ Phssio- 
ously and diligently handled the factm^es of gnomics, 
the body, but not the gestures of the body, de gestu sive 
wliich are no less comprehensible by art, and '""'^ *°^" 
of greater use and advantage. For the linea- ^"' 
ments of the body do disclose the disposition and inclina- 
tion of the mind in general ; but the motions of the coun- 
tenance and parts do not only so, but do further disclose 
the present humour and state of the mind and will. For 
as your majesty saith most aptly and elegantly. As the 
torque speakeih to the ear so the gesture speaketh to the eye. 
And therefore a number of subtile persons, whose eyes 
do dwell upon the faces and fashions of men, do well 
know the advantage of this observation, as being most 
part of their ability; neither can it be denied, but that 
it is a great discovery of dissimulations, and a great direc- 
tion in business. 

3. The latter branch, touching impression, hath not 
been collected into art, but hath been handled dispers- 
edly; and it hath the same relation or antisirophe that 
the former hath. For the consideration is double : either, 
how and how far the humours and affects of the body do 
alter or work upon the mind ; or again, how and how far 
the passions or apprehensions of the mind do alter or 
work upon the body. The former of these hath been 
inquired and considered as a part and appendix of medi- 
cine, but much more as a part of religion or superstition. 
For the physician prescribeth cures of the mind in phren- 
sies and melancholy passions; and pretendeth also to 
exhibit medicines to exhilarate the mind, to confirm the 
courage, to clarify the wits, to corroborate the memory, 

E 2 



132 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [iX. 5- 

and the like : but the scruples and superstitions of diet 
and other regiment of the body in the sect of the Pytha- 
goreans, in the heresy of the Manichees, and in the laW 
of Mahomet, do exceed. So likewise the ordinances in 
the ceremonial law, interdicting the eating of the blood 
and the fat, distinguishing between beasts clean an^J 
unclean for meat, are many and strict Nay the faitJ* 
itself being clear and serene from all clouds of ceremony^ 
yet retaineth the use of fastings, abstinences, and othe*^ 
macerations and humiliations of the body, as things real^ 
and not figurative. The root and life of all which pre^ 
scripts is (besides the ceremony) the consideration of that 
dependency which the affections of the mind are submit-^ 
ted unto upon the state and disposition of the body. And- 
if any man of weak judgement do conceive that this suflfer-' 
ing of the mind from the body doth either question the 
immortality, or derogate from the sovereignty of the soul, 
he may be taught in easy instances, that the infant in the 
mother's womb is compatible with the mother and yet 
separable ; and the most absolute monarch is sometimes 
led by his servants and yet without subjection. As for 
the reciprocal knowledge, which is the operation of the 
conceits and passions of the mind upon the body, we see 
all wise physicians, in the prescriptions of their regiments 
to their patients, do ever consider acddentia animi as of 
great force to further or hinder remedies or recoveries : 
and more specially it is an inquiry of great depth and 
worth concerning imagination, how and how far it altereth 
the body proper of the imaginant. For although it hath 
a manifest power to hurt, it foUoweth not it hath the same 
degree of power to help. No more than a man can con- 
clude, that because there be pestilent airs, able suddenly to 
kill a man in health, therefore there should be sovereign 



IX, i] THE SECOND BOOK. 133 

airs, able suddenly to cure a man in sickness. But the 
inquisition of this part is of great use, though it needeth, 
as Socrates said, a Delian diver, being difficult and pro- 
found. But unto all this knowledge de communi vinculo, 
of the concordances between the mind and the body, 
that part of inquiry is most necessary, which considereth 
of the seats and domiciles which the several faculties of 
the mind do take and occupate in the organs of the body; 
which knowledge hath been attempted, and is contro- 
verted, and deserveth to be much better inquired. For 
the opinion of Plato, who placed the understanding in 
the brain, animosity (which he did unfitly call anger, 
having a greater mixture with pride) in the heart, and 
concupiscence or sensuality in the liver, deserveth not to 
be despised ; but much less to be allowed. So then we 
have constituted (as in our own wish and advice) the 
inquiry touching human nature entire, as a just portion 
of knowledge to be handled apart. 

X. I. The knowledge that concerneth man's body is 
divided as the good of man's body is divided, unto which 
it referreth. The good of man's body is of four kinds, 
health, beauty, strength and pleasure : so the knowledges 
are medicine, or art of cure : art of decoration, which is 
called cosmetic ; art of activity, which is called athletic ; 
and art voluptuary, which Tacitus truly calleth eruditus 
luxus. This subject of man's body is of all other things 
in nature most susceptible of remedy; but then that 
remedy is most susceptible of error. For the same sub- 
tility of the subject doth cause large possibility and easy 
failing ; and therefore the inquiry ought to be the more 
exact. 

2. To speak therefore of medicine, and to resume 
that we have said, ascending a little higher : the ancient 



134 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [X. a. 

opinion that man was microcosmus, an abstract or model 
of the world, hath been fantastically strained by Paracelsus 
and the alchemists, as if there were to be found in man's 
body certain correspondences and parallels, which should 
have respect to all varieties of things, as stars, planetSj 
minerals, which are extant in the great world. But thus 
much is evidently true, that of all substances which nature 
hath produced, man's body is the most extremely com- 
pounded. For we see herbs and plants are nourishec 
by earth and water; beasts for the most part by herbj 
and fruits ; man by the flesh of beasts, birds, fishes, herbs 
grains, fruits, water, and the manifold alterations, dress- 
ings and preparations of these several bodies, before the) 
come to be his food and aliment. Add hereunto thai 
beasts have a more simple order of life, and less change 
of affections to work upon their bodies ; whereas man ir 
his mansion, sleep, exercise, passions, hath infinite varia- 
tions : and it cannot be denied but that the body of mar 
of all other things is of the most compounded mass. The 
soul on the other side is the simplest of substances, as is 
well expressed : 

Puramqae reliqnit 
^thereum sensum atqne aural simplicis ignem. 

So that it is no marvel though the soul so placed enjo) 
no rest, if that principle be true, that Mofus rerum es. 
rapidus extra locum, placidus in loco. But to the purpose 
this variable composition of man's body hath made it as 
an instrument easy to distemper j and therefore the poets 
did well to conjoin music and medicine in Apollo, be 
cause the office of medicine is but to tune this curious 
harp of man's body and to reduce it to harmony. Sc 
then the subject being so variable, hath made the an 
by consequent more conjectural; and the art bein^ 



2.] THE SECOND BOOK. 1 35 

jectural hath made so much the more place to Jbe left 
imposture. For almost all other arts and sciences 
iudged by acts or masterpieces, as I may term them, 
not by the successes and events. The lawyer is 
ed by the virtue of his pleading, and not by the issue 
e cause. The master in the ship is judged by the 
ting his course aright, and not by the fortune of the 
je. But the physician, and perhaps the politique, 
no particular acts demonstrative of his ability, but 
iged most by the event; which is ever but as it is 
I : for who can tell, if a patient die or recover, or if a 
be preserved or ruined, whether it be art or accident? 
therefore many times the impostor is prized, and 
nan of virtue taxed. Nay, we see [the] weakness 
credulity of men is such, as they will often prefer a 
itebank or witch before a learned physician. And 
fore the poets were clear-sighted in discerning this 
me folly, when they made JEsculapius and Circe bro- 
and sister, both children of the sun, as in the verses. 

Ipse repertorem medicinae talis et artis 

Fulmine Phcebigeaam Stygias detrusit ad undas: 

again. 

Dives inaccessos ubi Solis filia lucos, &;c. 

n all times, in the opinion of the multitude, witches 
)ld women and impostors have had a competition 
physicians. And what followeth? Even this, that 
cians say to themselves, as Salomon expresseth it 

an higher occasion, ly it hefal to me as befalleth to 
ols^ why should I labour to he more wise ? And there- 
I cannot much blame physicians, that they use 
lonly to intend some other art or practice, which 
fancy, more than their profession. For you shall 

of them antiquaries, poets, humanists, statesmen, 



136 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [X. 

merchants, divines, and in every of these better seen thi 
in their profession ; and no doubt upon this ground, that 
they find that mediocrity and excellency in their art 
maketh no difference in profit or reputation towards their 
fortune; for the weakness of patients, and sweetness 
of life, and nature of hope, maketh men depend upon 
physicians with all their defects. But nevertheless these 
things which we have spoken of are courses begotten 
between a little occasion, and a great deal of sloth and 
default ; for if we will excite and awake our observation, 
we shall see in familiar instances what a predominant 
faculty the subtilty of spirit hath over the variety of 
matter or form. Nothing more variable than faces and 
countenances : yet men can bear in memory the infinite 
distinctions of them ; nay, a painter with a few shells of 
colours, and the benefit of his eye, and habit of his 
imagination, can imitate them all that ever have been, 
are, or may be, if they were brought before hino. No- 
thing more variable than voices; yet men can likewise 
discern them personally: nay, you shall have a duffbn 
or panfommusj will express as many as he pleaseth. 
Nothing more variable than the differing sounds of words; 
yet men have found the way to reduce them to a few 
simple letters. So that it is not the insuflSciency or in- 
capacity of man's mind, but it is the remote standing or 
placing thereof, that breedeth these mazes and incom- 
prehensions. For as the sense afar off is full of mistaking, 
but is exact at hand, so is it of the understanding : the 
remedy whereof is, not to quicken or strengthen the 
organ, but to go nearer to the object ; and therefore there 
is no doubt but if the physicians will learn and use the 
true approaches and avenues of nature, they may assume 
as much as the poet saith : 



^ X2.] THE SECOND BOOK, 1 37 

^ Et quoniam variant morbi, variabimus artes; 

i, Mille mail species, mille salutis erunt. 

^ Which that they should do, the nobleness of their art 

' ' _ ioth deserve ; well shadowed by he poets, in that they 

'^ I iEsculapius to be the son of [the] sun, the one being 

^; the fountain of life, <the other as the second stream : but 

infinitely more honoured by the example of our Saviour, 

who made the body of man the object of his miracles, as 

soul was the object of his doctrine. For we read not 

that ever he vouchsafed to do any miracle about honour 

or money (except that one for giving tribute to Caesar), 

but only about the preserving, sustaining, and healing 

the body of man. 

3. Medicine is a science which hath been (as we have 
i) more professed than laboured, and yet more la- 
boured than advanced; the labour having been, in my 
judgement, rather in circle than in progression. For I 
find much iteration, but small addition. It considereth 
causes of diseases, with the occasions or impulsions ; the 
diseases themselves, with the accidents; and the cures, 
with the preservations. The deficiences which I think 
good to note, being a few of many, and those such as 
are of a more open and manifest nature, I will enumerate 
and not place. 

4. The first is the discontinuance of the ancient and 
serious diligence of Hippocrates, which used 

to set down a narrative of the special cases •^'"''^^''onM 

ri_* A.' ^ jt_ ii_ jj J tnedicinales, 

of his patients, and now they proceeded, and 
how they were judged by recovery or death. Therefore 
having an example proper in the father of the art, I shall 
not need to allege an example foreign, of the wisdom 
of the lawyers, who are careful to report new cases and 
decisions, for the direction of future judgements. This 



138 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. \X.i 

continuance of medicinal history I find deficient ; whid 
I understand neither to be so infinite as to extend b 
every common case, nor so reserved as to s 
none but wonders : for many things are new in 
manner, which are not new in the kind; and if mer 
will intend to observe, they shall find much worthy ti 
observe. 

5. In the inquiry which is made by anatomy, I find 
much deficience : for they inquire of tbc 
comparata, P^^^s, and their substances, figures, and col- 
locations ; but they inquire not of the diver- 
sities of the parts, the secrecies of the passages, and 
seats or nestling of the humours, nor much of the foot- 
steps and impressions of diseases. The reason of whidi 
omission I suppose to be, because the first inquiry 
be satisfied in the view of one or a few anatomies : but 
the latter, being comparative and casual, must arise from 
the view of many. And as to the diversity of parts, there 
is no doubt but the facture or framing of the inward parts 
is as full of difference as the outward, and in that is the 
cause continent of many diseases ; which not being ob- 
served, they quarrel many times with the humours, which 
are not in fault ; the fault being in the very frame and 
mechanique of the part, which cannot be removed by 
medicine alterative, but must be accommodate and pal- 
liate by diets and medicines familiar. And for the pas- 
sages and pores, it is true which was anciently noted, 
that the more subtile of them appear not in anatomies, 
because they are shut and latent in dead bodies, though 
they be open and manifest in live: which being supposed, 
though the inhumanity of anaiomia vivorum was by Cdsus 
justly reproved, yet in regard of the g^eat use of this 
observation, the inquiry needed not by him so slightly 



:. 5-] THE SECOND BOOK. I39 

a have been relinquished altogether, or referred to the 
lal practices of surgery ; but mought have been well 
iiverted upon the dissection of beasts alive, which not- 
withstanding the dissimilitude of their parts may suffi- 
ciently satisfy this inquiry. And for the humours, they 
are commonly passed over in anatomies as purgaments ; 
whereas it is most necessary to observe, what cavities, 
tests, and receptacles the humours do find in the parts, 
the differing kind of the humour so lodged and 
sceived. And as for the footsteps of diseases, and their 
astations of the inward parts, impostumations, exul- 
ons, discontinuations, putrefactions, consumptions, 
ontractions, extensions, convulsions, dislocations, ob- 
tractions, repletions, together with all preternatural sub- 
*s, as stones, carnosities, excrescences, worms and 
like; they ought to have been exactly observed by 
Qultitude of anatomies, and the contribution of men's 
everal experiences, and carefully set down both histo- 
ically according to the appearances, and artificially with 
I reference to the diseases and symptoms which resulted 
rom them, in case where the anatomy is of a defunct 
^Kitient ; whereas now upon opening of bodies they are 
passed over slightly and in silence. 

6. In the inquiry of diseases, they do abandon the 
cures of many, some as in their nature in- inquisitio 
curable, and others as passed the period of ulterior de 
cure; so that Sylla and the Triumvirs never morhis in- 
proscribed so many men to die, as they do by ^onabilibus, 
their ignorant edicts : whereof numbers do escape with 
less difficulty than they did in the Roman proscriptions. 
Therefore I will not doubt to note as a deficience, that 
they inquire not the perfect cures of many diseases, or 
extremities of diseases ; but pronouncing them incurable 



I40 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [X 

do enact a law of neglect, and exempt ignorance fi 
discredit. 

7. Nay further, I esteem it the office of a ph; 
not only to restore health, but to mitigate ] 1 
dolors ; and not only when such mitigation may cor 

to recovery, but when it may serve to i 
. a fair and easy passage. For it is no 

asta extert' -^ ^ ° 

^g felicity which Augustus Caesar was wont 

wish to himself, that same Euthanasia; \ 
which was specially noted in the death of Antoninus Ki 
whose death was after the fashion and semblance of 
kindly and pleasant sleep. So it is written of Epicnrn 
that after his disease was judged desperate, he drown^ 
his stomach and senses with a large draught and 11 
gurgitation of wine ; whereupon the epigram was i 
Hinc Siygias ehrius hausit aquas; he was not so 
enough to taste any bitterness of the Stygian water, 
the physicians contrari\^^se do make a kind of sen 
and religion to stay with the patient after the disease 
deplored ; whereas in my judgement they ought both to 
inquire the skill, and to give the attendances, for the facfl- 
itating and assuaging of the pains and agonies of death. 

8. In the consideration of the cures of diseases, I find 

a deficience in the receipts of propriety, re- 

MedtcttKB specting the particular cures of diseases : for 

^ , the physicians have frustrated the fruit of 

tradition and experience by their magistral- 
ities, in adding and taking out and changing quid pn 
quo in their receipts, at their pleasures ; commanding so 
over the medicine, as the medicine cannot command 
over the disease. For except it be treacle and mUhri 
datum, and of late diascordtumy and a few more, they tie 
themselves to no receipts severely and religiously. For at 



8.] THE SECOND BOOK. 14I 

9 the confections of sale which are in the shops, they 
for readiness and not for propriety. For they are 
1 general intentions of purging, opening, comforting, 
ring, and not much appropriate to particular diseases, 
and this is the cause why empirics and old women are 
>re ipy many times in their cures than learned phy- 
s, because they are more religious in holding their 
cines. Therefore here is the deficience which I find, 
physicians have not, partly out of their own practice, 
ly out of the constant probations reported in books, 
id partly out of the traditions of empirics, set down and 
slivered over certain experimental medicines for the cure 
f particular diseases, besides their own conjectural and 
•al descriptions. For as they were the men of the 
est composition in the state of Rome, which either being 
inclined to the people, or being tribunes inclined 
) senate ; so in the matter we now handle, they be 
best physicians, which being learned incline to the 
)ns of experience, or being empirics incline to the 
lods of learning. 
9. In preparation of medicines I do find strange, 
:ially considering how mineral medicines jmitath 
i been extolled, and that they are safer naiurain 
for the outward than inward parts, that no balneis, et 
man hath sought to make an imitation by art ''^"" '^^'" 
of natural baths and medicinable fountains : ""^ ' "** 
which nevertheless are confessed to receive their virtues 
from minerals : and not so only, but discerned and dis- 
tinguished from what particular mineral they receive tinc- 
ture, as sulphur, vitriol, steel, or the like : which nature, 
if it may be reduced to compositions of art, both the 
variety of them will be increased, and the temper of them 
will be more commanded. 



14a OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [X. 

10. But lest I grow to be more particular than is agr© 
Filum me- ^^^^ either to my intention or to proport: 
dicinale, sive I will conclude this part with the note of 
devicibus deficience more, which seemeth to 1 
mediana- greatest consequence ; which is, that the pn 
"""• scripts in use are too compendious to ; 
their end : for, to my understanding, it is a vain and 1 
tering opinion to think any medicine can be so so' 

or so happy, as that the receipt or use of it can work 
great effect upon the body of man. It were a stra 
speech which spoken, or spoken oft, should reclaim 
man from a vice to which he were by nature subject U 
is order, pursuit, sequence, and interchange of applka- 
tion, which is mighty in nature; which although it re- 
quire more exact knowledge in prescribing, and 
precise obedience in observing, yet is recompensed 1 
the magnitude of effects. And although a man w« 
think, by the daily visitations of the physicians, that there 
were a pursuance in the ciure : yet let a man look 
their prescripts and ministrations, and he shall find tli 
but inconstancies and every day's devices, without 
settled providence or project Not that every scrupulc 
or superstitious prescript is effectual, no more than eveiy 
straight way is the way to heaven ; but the truth of die 
direction must precede severity of observance. 

11. For cosmetic, it hath parts civil, and parts effemin- 
ate : for cleanness of body was ever esteemed to iffo- 
ceed from a due reverence to Grod, to society,, and tc 
ourselves. As for artificial decoration, it is well worth) 
of the deficiences which it hath; being neither fim 
enough to deceive, nor handsome to use, nor wholesomi 
to please. 

12. For athletic, I take the subject of it largely, tha 



X 13.] THE SECOND BOOK. 1 43 

is to say, for any point of ability whereunto the body of 
man may be brought, whether it be of activity, or of 
patience; whereof activity hath two parts, strength and 
jwiftness ; and patience likewise hath two parts, hardness 
inst wants and extremities, and endurance of pain or 
joi it; whereof we see the practices in tumblers, in 
3 s, and in those that suffer punishment. Nay, if 
here be any other faculty which falls not within any of 
he former divisions, as in those that dive, that obtain a 
ge power of containing respiration, and the like, I 
it to this part. Of these things the practices are 
bown, but the philosophy which concerneth them is not 
1 inquired ; the rather, I think, because they are sup- 
posed to be obtained, either by an aptness of nature, 
:h cannot be taught, or only by continual custom, 
which is soon prescribed : which though it be not true, 
fet I forbear to note any deficiences : for the Olympian 
les are down long since, and the mediocrity of these 
g[s is for use ; as for the excellency of them it serveth 
or the most part but for mercenary ostentation. 

13. For arts of pleasure sensual, the chief deficience in 

h is of laws to repress them. For as it hath been 

observed, that the arts which flourish in times while 

drtue is in growth, are military; and while virtue is in 

are liberal; and while virtue is in declination, are 

vc uary : so I doubt that this age of the world is some- 

upon the descent of the wheel. With arts voluptuary 

1 couple practices joculary; for the deceiving of the 

S( ;s is one of the pleasures of the senses. As for 

s of recreation, I hold them to belong to civil life 

education. And thus much of that particular human 

phi phy which concerns the body, which is but the 

tal a of the mind. 



144 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XI. i 

XI. I. For human knowledge which concerns thi 
mind, it hath two parts; the one that inqnireth of thi 
substance or nature of the soul or mind, the other tha 
inquireth of the faculties or functions thereof. Unto tlu 
first of these, the considerations of the original of tiK 
soul, whether it be native or adventive, and how far i 
is exempted from laws of matter, and of the immortalitj 
thereof, and many other points, do appertain: whid 
have been not more laboriously inquired than variouslj 
reported ; so as the travail therein taken seemeth to have 
been rather in a maze than in a way. But although I 
of opinion that this knowledge may be more really anc 
soundly inquired, even in nature, than it hath been; ye 
I hold that in the end it must be bounded by religion, o; 
else it will be subject to deceit and delusion. For as th< 
substance of the soul in the creation was not extractec 
out of the mass of heaven and earth by the benedictioi 
of a producaf, but was immediately inspired from God, S( 
it is not possible that it should be (otherwise than b; 
accident) subject to the laws of heaven and earth, whicl 
are the subject of philosophy; and therefore the tru 
knowledge of the nature and state of the soul must com 
by the same inspiration that gave the substance. Unt 
this part of knowledge touching the soul there be twt 
appendices ; which, as they have been handled, hav 
rather vapoured forth fables than kindled truth; divir 
ation and fascination. 

2. Divination hath been anciently and fitly dividet 
into artificial and natural ; whereof artificial is, when th 
mind maketh a prediction by argument, conduding upoi 
signs and tokens ; natural is, when the mind hath a pre 
sention by an internal power, without the inducdnen 
of a sign. Artificial is of two sorts; either when th« 



XI. 2-1 THE SECOND BOOK. 1 45 

argument is coupled with a derivation of causes, which is 
rational ; or when it is only grounded upon a coincidence 
5f the effect, which is experimental : whereof the latter 
for the most part is superstitious ; such as were the hea- 
then observations upon the inspection of sacrifices, the 
flights of birds, the swarming of bees ; and such as was 
the Chaldean astrology, and the like. For artificial divin- 
ition, the several kinds thereof are distributed amongst 
jarticular knowledges. The astronomer hath his predic- 
tions, as of conjunctions, aspects, eclipses, and the like. 
The physician hath his predictions, of death, of recovery, 
of the accidents and issues of diseases. The politique 
hath his predictions ; O urbem venalem, et cito periiuram, 
n emptorem irwemrit I which stayed not long to be per- 
formed, in Sylla first, and after in Caesar. So as these 
predictions are now impertinent, and to be referred over. 
But the divination which springeth from the internal 
nature of the soul, is that which we now speak of; which 
hath been made to be of two sorts, primitive and by 
influxion. Primitive is grounded upon the supposition, 
that the mind, when it is withdrawn and collected into 
itself, and not diffused into the organs of the body, hath 
some extent and latitude of prenotion ; which therefore 
appeareth most in sleep, in ecstasies, and near death, and 
more rarely in waking apprehensions ; and is induced and 
furthered by those abstinences and observances which 
make the mind most to consist in itself. By influxion, is 
grounded upon the conceit that the mind, as a mirror or 
glass, should take illumination from the foreknowledge of 
God and spirits : unto which the same regiment doth like- 
wise conduce. For the retiring of the mind within itself 
is the state which is most susceptible of divine influxions ; 
save that it is accompanied in this case with a fervency 

L 



146 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF, LEARNING. [XI.i 

and elevation (which the ancients noted by fury), and not 
with a repose and quiet, as it is in the other. 

3. Fascination is the power and act of imagination 
intensive upon other bodies than the body of the imagin- 
ant, for of that we spake in the proper place. Wherein 
the school of Paracelsus, and the disciples of pretended 
natural magic have been so intemperate, as they have 
exalted the power of the imagination to be much one 
with the power of miracle-working faith. Others, that 
draw nearer to probability, calling to their view the secret 
passages of things, and specially of the contagion that 
passeth from body to body, do conceive it should like- 
wise be agreeable to nature, that there should be some 
transmissions and operations from spirit to spirit without 
the mediation of the senses ; whence the conceits have 
grown (now almost made civil) of the mastering spirit, 
and the force of confidence and the like. Incident unto 
this is the inquiry how to raise and fortify the imagin- 
ation : for if the imagination fortified have power, then 
it is material to know how to fortify and exalt it And 
herein comes in crookedly and dangerously a palliation 
of a great part of ceremonial magic. For it may be 
pretended that ceremonies, characters, and charms do 
work, not by any tacit or sacramental contract with evil 
spirits, but serve only to strengthen the ims^nation of him 
that useth it ; as images are said by the Roman phurch 
to fix the cogitations and raise the devotions of them that 
pray before them. But for mine own judgeme^it. if it 
be admitted that imagination hath power, and that cere- 
monies fortify imagination, and that they be used sin- 
cerely and intentionally for that purpose; yet I should 
hold them unlawful, as opposing to that first edict which 
God gave unto man. In sudore vulius camedes panem iuum. 



XI. 3.] ^^^ SECOND BOOK. 147 

For they propound those noble effects, which God hath 
set forth unto man to be bought at the price of labour, to 
be attained by a few easy and slothful observances. De- 
ficiences in these knowledges I will report none, other 
than the general deficience, that it is not known how 
much of them is verity, and how much vanity. 

XII. I. The knowledge which respecteth the faculties 

of the mind of man is of two kinds ; the one respecting 

his understanding and reason, and the other his will, 

appetite, and affection; whereof the former produceth 

position or decree, the latter action or execution. It is 

true that the imagination is an agent or nunctus, in both 

provinces, both the judicial and the ministerial. For 

sense sendeth over to imagination before reason have 

judged: and reason sendeth over to imagination before 

the decree can be acted. For imagination ever precedeth 

voluntary motion. Saving that this Janus of imagination 

hath differing faces : for the face towards reason hath the 

print of truth, but the face towards action hath the print 

of good; which nevertheless are faces, 

Quales decet esse sororum. 

Neither is the imagination simply and only a messenger ; 
but is invested with, or at least wise usurpeth no small 
authority in itself, besides the duty of the message. For 
it was well said by Aristotle, Thai the mind hath over the 
body thai commandment y which the lord hath over a bond- 
man; but that reason hath over the imagination that com- 
mandment which a magistrate hath over a free citizen ; who 
may come also to rule in his turn. For we see that, in 
matters of faith and religion, we raise our imagination 
above our reason ; which is the cause why religion sought 
ever access to the mind by similitudes, types, parables, 
visions, dreams. And again, in all persuasions that are 

L 2 



148 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXLU 

wrought by eloquence, and other impressions of like 
nature, which do paint and disguise the true appearance 
of things, the chief recommendation unto reason is from 
the imagination. Nevertheless, because I find not any 
science that doth properly or fitly pertain to the imagin- 
ation, I see no cause to alter the former division. For 
as for poesy, it is rather a pleasure or play of imagination, 
than a work or duty thereof. And if it be a work, we 
speak not now of such parts of learning as the imagin- 
ation produceth, but of such sciences as handle and con- 
sider of the imagination. No more than we shall speak 
now of such knowledges as reason produceth (for thai 
extendeth to all philosophy), but of such knowledges 
do handle and inquire of the faculty of reason: so ai 
poesy had his true place. As for the power of tb 
imagination in nature, and the manner of fortifying th< 
same, we have mentioned it in the doctrine De Animc 
whereunto most fitly it belongeth. And lastly, for imagin 
ative or insinuative reason, which is the subject of rhetoric 
we think it best to refer it to the arts of reason. So there 
fore we content ourselves with the former division, tk 
human philosophy, which respecteth the faculties of th 
mind of man, hath two parts, rational and moral. 

2. The part of human philosophy which is rational, i 
of all knowledges, to the most wits, the least delightfu 
and seemeth but a net of subtility and spinosity. For 2 
it was truly said, that knowledge is pabulum animi; so i 
the nature of men's appetite to this food, most men ai 
of the taste and stomach of the Israelites in the deser 
that would fain have returned ad olios camium^ and wei 
weary of manna; which, though it were celestial, y< 
seemed less nutritive and comfortable. So generally me 
taste well knowledges that are drenched in flesh and bloo< 



JJ. 2.] THE SECOND BOOK. ' 1 49 

ivil history, morality, policy, about the which men's aflfec- 

i( , praises, fortunes do turn and are conversant. But 

;ame lumen si'ccum doth parch and offend most men's 

V ry and soft natures. But to speak truly of things as 

are in worth, rational knowledges are the keys of 

other arts : for as Aristotle saith aptly and elegantly, 

That the hand is the instrument of instruments^ and the mind 

t the form of forms ; so these be truly said to be the art 

)f arts. Neither do they only direct, but likewise confirm 

ind strengthen : even as the habit of shooting doth not 

enable to shoot a nearer shoot, but also to draw 

a stronger bow. 

3. The arts intellectual are four in number; divided 
according to the ends whereunto they are referred: for 
man's labour is to invent that which is sought or pro- 
pounded; or to judge that which is invented; or to 
retain that which is judged; or to deliver over that 
which is retained. So as the arts must be four: art 
of inquiry or invention : art of examination or judge- 
ment: art of custody or memory: and art of elocution 
or tradition. 

XIII. I. Invention is of two kinds much differing: the 
one of arts and sciences, and the other of speech and 
arguments. The former of these I do report deficient; 
which seemeth to me to be such a deficience as if, in the 
making of an inventory touching the state of a defunct, it 
should be set down that there is no ready money. For 
as money will fetch all other commodities, so this know- 
ledge is that which should purchase all the rest. And like 
as the West Indies had never been discovered if the use 
of the mariner's needle had not been first discovered, 
the I the one be vast regions, and the other a small 
don; so it cannot be found strange if sciences be no 



150 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XIILj 

further discovered, if the art itself of invention and (fis 
covery hath been passed over. 

2. That this part of knowledge is wanting, to 
judgement standeth plainly confessed; for first, logi 
doth not pretend to invent sciences, or the axioms < 
^ciences, but passeth it over with a cuique in sua ar 
credendum. And Celsus acknowledgeth it gravely, speal 
ing of the empirical and dogmatical sects of physicia 
That medicines and cures were first found ouiy and then afL 
the reasons and causes were discoursed; and not the cam 
first found out, and by light from them the medicines at 
cures discovered. And Plato in his Theaetetus noteth ^ 
That particulars are infinite, and the higher generalities gi 
no sufficient direction : and that the pith of all sciences, whi 
maketh the artsman differ from the inexpert, is in the midc 
propositions, which in every particular knowledge are tak 
from tradition and experience. And therefore we see, th 
they which discourse of the inventions and originals 
things refer them rather to chance than to art, and rath 
to beasts, birds, fishes, serpents, than to men. 

Dictamnum genetrix Cretaea carpit ab Ida, 
Puberibus caulem foliis et flore comantem 
Purpureo; non ilia feris incognita capris 
Gramina, cum tergo volucres hxsere sagittae. 

So that it was no marvel (the manner of antiquity beir 
to consecrate inventors) that the Egyptians had so fe 
human idols in their temples, but almost all brute: 

Omnigenumque Deum monstra, et latrator Anubis, 
Contra Neptunum, et Venerem, contraque MinerTam, &c 

And if you like better the tradition of the Grecians, ai 
ascribe the first inventions to men, yet you will 
believe that Prometheus first stroke the flints^ and n 
veiled at the spark, than that when he first stroke tl 



2.] THE SECOND BOOK. 151 

he expected the spark : and therefore we see the 
\ Indian Prometheus had no intelligence with the 
pean, because of the rareness with them of flint, 
^ave the first occasion. So as it should seem, that 
rto men are rather beholden to a wild goat for sur- 
er to a nightingale for music, or to the ibis for some 
of physic, or to the pot- lid that flew open for artillery, 
jnerally to chance or anything else than to logic for 
nvention of arts and sciences. Neither is the form 
vention which Virgil describeth much other : 

Ut varias usus meditando extunderet artes 
Paulatim. 

f you observe the words well, it is no other method 
that which brute beasts are capable of, and do put 
e ; which is a perpetual intending or practising some 
thing, urged and imposed by an absolute necessity 
)Tiservation of being. For so Cicero saith very truly, 
uni ret deditus et naturam et artem scBpe vinciL And 
:fore if it be said of men. 

Labor omnia vincit 
Improbus, et duris urgens in rebus egestas, 

likewise said of beasts, Quis psittaco docuit suum 
? Who taught the raven in a drowth to throw 
)les into an hollow tree, where she spied water, that 
.vater might rise so as she might come to it ? Who 
ht the bee to sail through such a vast sea of air, and 
nd the way from a field in flower a great way off to 
hive? Who taught the ant to bite every grain of 
I that she burieth in her hill, lest it should take root 
grow? Add then the word extundere, which im- 
eth the extreme difficulty, and the word paulatim^ 
:h importeth the extreme slowness, and we are where 



1^2, OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XIII. 

we were, even amongst the Egyptians' gods ; there beii 
httle left to the faculty of reason, and nothing to the i 
of art, for matterof invention. 

3. Secondly, me induction which the logicians s 
of, and which seemeth familiar with Plato, whereby 
principles of sciences may be pretended to be invente( 
and so the middle propositions by derivation from th 
principles; their form of induction, I say, is utterl 
vicious and incompetent : wherein their error th 
^/^ fouler, because it is the duty of art to perfect and • 
nature ; but they contrariwise have wronged, abused, 
traduced nature. For he that shall attentively 1 
how the mind doth gather this excellent dew of kr 
ledge, like unto that which the poet speaketh of, Aer 
mellis ccelesiia dona, distilling and contriving it out < 
particulars natural and artificial, as the flowers of 
field and garden, shall find that the mind of herself t 
nature doth manage and act an induction much bett< 
than they describe it. For to conclude upon an enume 
ation of particulars, without instance contradictory, 
no conclusion, but a conjecture j for who can assu 
(in many subjects) upon those particulars which appe 
of a side, that there are not other on the contrary si( 
which appear not? As if Samuel should have rest< 
upon those sons of Issay which were brought befo 
him, and failed of David which was in the field. Ai 
this form (to say truth) is so gross, as it had not be 
possible for wits so subtile as have managed these thin 
to have offered it to the world, but that they hasted 
their theories and dogmaticals, and were imperious aj 
scornful toward particulars ; which their manner "was 
use but as lictores and vtaiores, for sergeants and whifiSe 
ad summovendam iurham^ to make way and make room f 



Xin. 3.] THE SECOND BOOK. 1 53 

Jieir opinions, rather than in their true use and service. 
jM Certainly it is a thing may touch a man with a religious 
■ wonder, to see how the footsteps of seducement are the 
very same in divine and human truth: for as in divine 
truth man cannot endure to become as a child; so in 
human, they reputed the attending the inductions (whereof 
we speak) as if it were a second infancy or childhood. 

4. Thirdly, allow some principles or axioms were rightly 
induced, yet nevertheless certain it is that middle propos- 
itions cannot be deduced from them in subject of nature 
by syllogism, that is, by touch and reduction of them to 
principles in a middle term. It is true that in sciences 
popular, as moralities, laws, and the like, yea, and divinity 
(because it pleaseth God to apply himself to the capacity of 
the simplest), that form may have use ; and in natural phi- 
losophy likewise, by way of argument or satisfactory reason, 
QucB assensum parity opens effoeta est: but the subtilty of 
nature and operations will not be enchained in those bonds. 
For arguments consist of propositions, and propositions of 
words, and words are but the current tokens or marks 
of popular notions of things ; which notions, if they be 
grossly and variably collected out of particulars, it is not 
the laborious examination either of consequences or argu- 
ments, or of the truth of propositions, that can ever cor- 
rect that error, being (as the physicians speak) in the first 
digestion. And therefore it was not without cause, that so 
many excellent philosophers became Sceptics and Aca- 
demics, and denied any certainty of knowledge or com- 
prehension ; and held opinion that the knowledge of man 
extended only to appearances and probabilities. It is true 
that in Socrates it was supposed to be but a form of irony, 
Sdentiam dissimulando simulavit : for he used to disable 
his knowledge, to the end to enhance his knowledge : like 



154 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING, [XIII. 4^ 

the humour of Tiberius in his beginnings, that would 
reign, but would not acknowledge so much. And in the 
later Academy, which Cicero embraced, this opinion 
of acatalepsia (I doubt) was not held sincerely: for 
all those which excelled in copie of speech seem to have 
chosen that sect, as that which was fittest to give glory to 
their eloquence and variable discourses ; being rather like 
progresses of pleasure, than journeys to an end. But 
assuredly many scattered in both Academies did hold it 
in subtilty and integrity. But here was their chief error; 
they charged the deceit upon the senses; which in my 
judgement (notwithstanding all their cavillations) are very 
sufficient to certify and report truth, though not always 
immediately, yet by comparison, by help of instrument, 
and by producing and urging such things as are too 
subtile for the sense to some effect comprehensible by 
the sense, and other like assistance. But they ought to 
have charged the deceit upon the weakness of the intel- 
lectual powers, and upon the manner of collecting and 
concluding upon the reports of the senses. This I speak, 
not to disable the mind of man, but to stir it up to seek 
help : for no man, be he never so cunning or practised, 
can make a straight line or perfect circle by steadiness of 
hand, which may be easily done by help of a ruler or 
compass. 

5. This part of invention, concerning the invention of 
Experientia sciences, I purpose (if God give me leave) 
literata, and hereafter to propound, having digested it into 
interpretatio ^q parts ; whereof the one I term experim- 
natural, ^^^ liter ata, and the other interpretatio nahirce: 

the former being but a degree and rudiment of the latter. 
But I will not dwell too long, nor speak too great upon a 
promise. 



(I S:in.6.] THE SECOND BOOK. 1 55 

6. The invention of speech or argument is not properly 
ir J an invention : for to invent is to discover that we know 
not, and not to recover or resummon that which we 
already know : and* the use of this invention is no other 
but, out of the knowledge whereof our mind is already 
possessed, to draw forth or call before us that which may 
be pertinent to the purpose which we take into our con- 
sideration. So as to speak truly, it is no invention, but a 
lembrance or suggestion, with an appKcation; which 
is the cause why the schools do place it after judgement, 
as subsequent and not precedent. Nevertheless, because 
we do account it a chase as well of deer in an inclosed 
park as in a forest at large, and that it hath already 
obtained the name, let it be called invention: so as it 
be perceived and discerned, that the scope and end of 
this invention is readiness and present use of our know- 
ledge, and not addition or amplification thereof. 

7. To procure this ready use of knowledge there are 
two courses, preparation and suggestion. The former of 
these seemeth scarcely a part of knowledge, consisting 
rather of diligence than of any artificial erudition. And 
herein Aristotle wittily, but hurtfully, doth deride the 
Sophists near his time, saying, TTiey did as if one that 
professed the art of shoe-making should not teach how to 
make up a shoe, but only exhibit in a readiness a number of 
shoes of all fashions and sizes. But yet a man might reply, 
that if a shoemaker should have no shoes in his shop, 
but only work as he is bespoken, he should be weakly 
customed. But our Saviour, speaking of divine know- 
ledge, saith. That the kingdom of heaven is like a good house- 
holder ^ that bringeth forth both new and old store : and we 
see the ancient writers of rhetoric do give it in precept, 
that pleaders should have the places, whereof they have 



156 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXSLf 

most continual use, ready handled in all the variety 
may be ; as that, to speak for the literal interpretation <* 
the law against equity, and contrary ; and to speak for 
presumptions and inferences against testimony, and con- 
trary. And Cicero himself, being broken unto it by great 
experience, delivereth it plainly, that whatsoever a man 
shall have occasion to speak of (if he will take the p s), 
he may have it in effect premeditate and handled 
/hest. So that when he cometh to a particular he sh 
have nothing to do, but to put to names, and times, 
places, and such other circumstances of individuals. We 
see likewise the exact diligence of Demosthenes; who, 
in regard of the great force that the entrance and access 
into causes hath to make a good impression, had ready 
framed a number of prefaces for orations and speeches, v 
All which authorities and precedents may overweigh 
Aristotle's opinion, that would have us change a rich 
wardrobe for a pair of shears. ^ 

8. But the nature of the collection of this provision or 
preparatory store, though it be conunon both to logfic and 
rhetoric, yet having made an entry of it here, where it 
came first to be spoken of, I think fit to refer over the 
further handling of it to rhetoric. 

9. The other part of invention, which I term sugges- 
tion, doth assign and direct us to certain marks, or places, 
which may excite our mind to return and produce such 
knowledge as it hath formerly collected, to the end we 
may make use thereof. Neither is this use (truly taken) 
only to furnish argument to dispute probably with others, 
but likewise to minister unto our judgement to conclude 
aright within ourselves. Neither may these places serve 
only to apprompt our invention, but also to direct our 
inquiry. For a faculty of wise interrogating is half a 



>.] THE SECOND BOOK. 157 

bowledge. For as Plato saith, Whosoever seekefh, knoweih 

fhat which he seekethfor in a general notion : else how shall 

he know ii when he hath found it? And therefore the larger 

70ur anticipation is, the more direct and compendious is 

your search. But the same places which will help us 

to produce of that which we know already, will also 

us, if a man of experience were before us, what ques- 

ti :o ask ; or, if we have books and authors to instruct 

what points to search and revolve; so as I cannot 

report that this part of invention, which is that which the 

schools call topics^ is deficient. 

10. Nevertheless, topics are of two sorts, general and 
special. The general we have spoken to; but the par- 
ticular hath been touched by some, but rejected generally 
as inartificial and variable. But leaving the humour which 
hath reigned too much in the sfchools (which is, to be 
vainly subtile in a few things which are within their com- 
mand, and to reject the rest), I do receive particular 
topics, that is, places or directions of invention and 
inquiry in every particular knowledge, as things of great 
use, being mixtures of logic with the matter of sciences. 
For in these it holdeth, ars inveniendi adolescit cum inventis; 
for as in going of a way, we do not only gain that part of 
the way which is passed, but we gain the better sight of 
that part of the way which remaineth : so every degree of 
proceeding in a science giveth a light to that which fol- 
loweth ; which light if we strengthen by drawing it forth 
into questions or places of inquiry, we do greatly advance 
our pursuit. 

XIV. I. Now we pass unto the arts of judgement, 
which handle the natures of proofs and demonstrations ; 
which as to induction hath a coincidence with invention. 
For in all inductions, whether in good or vicious form, the 



158 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XlV.i. 

same action of the mind which inventeth, judgeth; all 
one as in the sense. But otherwise it is in proof by syl- 
logism ; for the proof being not immediate, but by mean, 
the invention of the mean is one thing, and the judge- 
ment of the consequence is another; the one exciting 
only, the other examining. Therefore, for the real and 
exact form of judgement, we refer ourselves to that which 
we have spoken of interpretation of nature. 

2. For the other judgement by syllogism, as it is a 
thing most agreeable to the mind of man, so it hath been 
vehemently and excellently laboured. For the nature of 
man doth extremely covet to have somewhat in his under- 
standing fixed and unmoveable, and as a rest and support 
of the mind. And therefore as Aristotle endeavoureth to 
prove, that in all motion there is some point quiescent; 
and as he elegantly expoimdeth the ancient fable of Atlas 
(that stood fixed, and bare up the heaven from falling) to 
be meant of the poles or axle-tree of heaven, whereupon 
the conversion is accomplished : so assuredly men have a 
desire to have an Atlas or axle-tree within to keep them 
from fluctuation, which is like to a perpetual peril of 
falling. Therefore men did hasten to set down some 
principles about which the variety of their disputations 
might turn. 

3. So then this art of judgement is but the reduction of 
propositions to principles in a middle term. The prin- 
ciples to be agreed by all and exempted from argument ; 
the middle term to be elected at the liberty of every man's 
invention ; the reduction to be of two kinds, direct and 
inverted; the one when the proposition is reduced to 
the principle, which they term a probation ostensive ; the 
other, when the contradictory of the proposition is re- 
duced to the contradictory of the prindplei which is 



nv.3.] THE SECOND BOOK. 1 59 

which they call per incommodumy or pressing an ab- 
lity; the number of middle terms to be as the pro- 
position standeth degrees more or less removed from 
the principle. 

4. But this art hath two several methods of doctrine, 
one by way of direction, the other by way of caution ; 

the former frameth and setteth down a true form of con- 
ace, by the variations and deflections from which 
errors and inconsequences may be exactly judged. To- 
1 the composition and structure of which form, it is 
incident to handle the parts thereof, which are propos- 
, and the parts of propositions, which are simple 
words. And this is that part of logic which is compre- 
hended in the Analytics. 

5. The second method of doctrine was introduced for 
expedite use and assurance sake; discovering the more 

\ forms of sophisms and illaqueations with their 
re actions, which is that which is termed clenches. For 
ough in the more gross sorts of fallacies it happeneth 
(as Seneca maketh the comparison well) as in juggling 
feats, which, though we know not how they are done, 
yet we know well it is not as it seemeth to be ; yet the 
more subtile sort of them doth not only put a man besides 
his answer, but doth many times abuse his judgement. 

6. This part concerning elenches is excellently handled 
by Aristode in precept, but more excellently by Plato in 
example; not only in the persons of the Sophists, but even 
in Socrates himself, who, professing to affirm nothing, 
but to infirm that which was affirmed by another, hath 
exactly expressed all the forms of objection, fallace, and 
redargution. And although we have said that the use of 
this doctrine is for redargution, yet it is manifest the de- 
generate and corrupt use is for caption and contradiction, 



l6o OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XlV.di 

which passeth for a great faculty, and no doubt is ol 
very great advantage ; though the difference be good 
which was made between orators and sophisters, that 
one is as the greyhound, which hath his advantage in 
race, and the other as the hare, which hath her advantage 
the turn, so as it is the advantage of the weaker creature. 

7. But yet further, this doctrine of eUnches hath a ( 
ample latitude and extent than is perceived ; namely, i] 
divers parts of knowledge ; whereof some are labourec 
and other omitted. For first, I conceive (though it ma] 
seem at first somewhat strange) that that part which 
variably referred, sometimes to logic, sometimes to meta 
physic, touching the common adjuncts of essences, is be 
an elenche. For the great sophism of all sophisms beinj 
equivocation or ambiguity of words and phrase, speciall 
of such words as are most general and intervene in ever 
inquiry, it seemeth to me that the true and fruitful us 
(leaving vain subtilities and speculations) of the inquiry ( 
majority, minority, priority, posteriority, identity, diversit] 
possibility, act, totality, parts, existence, privation, and 1 
like, are but wise cautions against ambiguities of speed 
So again the distribution of things into certain tribe 
which we call categories or predicaments, are but cai 
tions against the confusion of definitions and divisions. 

8. Secondly, there is a seducement that worketh \ 
the strength of the impression, and not by the subtili 
of the illaqueation ; not so much perplexing the reaso: 
as overruling it by power of the imagination. But th 
part I think more proper to handle when I shall spea 
of rhetoric. 

9. But lastly, there is yet a much more impOTtant ai 
profound kind of fallacies in the mind of man, which 
find not observed or inquired at all, and think good t 



OV. 9-] THE SECOND BOOK, i6t 

place here, as that which of all others appertaineth most 
to rectify judgement: the force whereof is such, as it 
doth not dazzle or snare the understanding in some par- 
ticulars, but doth more generally and inwardly infect and 
corrupt the state thereof. For the mind of man is far 
from the nature of a clear and equal glass, wherein the 
beams of things should reflect according to their true 
incidence ; nay, it is rather like an enchanted glass, full 
i superstition and imposture, if it be not delivered and 
reduced. For this pxirpose, let us consider the false ap- 
pearances that are imposed upon us by the general nature 
of the mind, beholding them in an example or two; as 
first, in that instance which is the root of all superstition, 
namely, that to the nature of the mind of all men it is 
consonant for the affirmative or active to affect more than 
the negative or privative. So that a few times hitting or 
presence, countervails oft-times failing or absence ; as was 
well answered by Diagoras to him that showed him in 
Neptune's temple the great number of pictures of such as 
had scaped shipwreck, and had paid their vows to Nep- 
tune, saying, Advise now, you that think it folly to invocate 
Neptune in tempest. Yea, but (saith Diagoras) where are 
they painted that are drowned? Let us behold it in another 
instance, namely, that the spirit of man, being of an equal 
and uniform substance, doth usually suppose and feign in 
nature a greater equality and uniformity than is in truth. 
Hence it cometh, that the mathematicians cannot satisfy 
themselves except they reduce the motions of the celestial 
bodies to perfect circles, rejecting spiral lines, and labour- 
ing to be discharged of eccentrics. Hence it cometh, that 
whereas there are many things in nature, as it were 
monodica^ sui juris ; yet the cogitations of man do feign 
unto them relatives, parallels, and conjugates, whereas no 

M 



l62 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING, [ 

such thing is ; as they have feigned an element of ; 
keep square with earth, water, and air, and the like, 
it is not credible, till it be opened, what a num 
fictions and fantasies the similitude of human actioi 
arts, together with the making of man communis mt 
have brought into natural philosophy; not much 
than the heresy of the Anthropomorphites, bred 
cells of gross and solitary monks, and the opinion c 
curus, answerable to the same in heathenism, wh 

osed the gods to be of human shape. And th 
Velleius the Epicurean needed not to have aske< 
God should have adorned the heavens with stars, i 
had been an cedt'lis, one that should have set fortt 
magnificent shows or plays. For if that great 
master had been of an human disposition, he wou] 
cast the stars into some pleasant and beautiful woi 
orders, like the frets in the roofs of houses ; where 
can scarce find a posture in square, or triangle, or s 
line, amongst such an infinite number; so differ 
harmony there is between the spirit of man and th 
of nature. 

ID. Let us consider again the false appearanc 
posed upon us by every man's own individual 
and custom, in that feigned supposition that Plato : 
of the cave : for certainly if a child were continue 
grot or cave under the earth until maturity of a| 
came suddenly abroad, he would have strange and 
imaginations. So in like manner, although our j 
live in the view of heaven, yet our spirits are inch 
the caves of our own complexions and customs, 
minister unto us infinite errors and vain opini 

' v be not recalled to examination. But her 
given many examples in one of the err< 



} IV. 10.] THE SECOND BOOK. 1 63 

5 )eccant humours, which we ran briefly over m our first 

30ok. 
^ II. And lastly, let us consider the false appearances 
are imposed upon us by words, which are framed 
applied according to the conceit and capacities of 
he VI r sort: and although we think we govern our 
m and prescribe it well loquendum ut vulgus senti- 
ui sapientes ; yet certain it is that words, as a 
's bow, do shoot back upon the understanding of 
^ ;t, and mightily entangle and pervert the judge- 
ment. So as it is almost necessary, in all controversies and 
itations, to imitate the wisdom of the mathematicians, 
in setting down in the very beginning the definitions 
of our words and terms, that others may know how 
we accept and understand them, and whether they con- 
cur with us or no. For it cometh to pass, for want 
of this, that we are sure to end there where we ought to 
have begun, which is, in questions and differences about 
words. To conclude therefore, it must be confessed that 
it is not possible to divorce ourselves from these fallacies 
and false appearances, because they are inseparable from 
our nature and condition of life ; so yet nevertheless the 
caution of them (for all elenches, as was said, „, , . 
are but cautions) doth extremely import the rnagni, she 
trae conduct of human judgement. The de idolis ani- 
particular clenches or cautions against these nUbumani 
three false appearances, I find altogether ^^^^^^ ^' 

deficient. adveruitiis, 

12. There remaineth one part of judgement of great 
excellency, which to mine understanding is so slightly 
touched, as I may report that also deficient; which is the 
application of the differing kinds of proofs to the differing 
kinds of subjects. For there being but four kinds of 

M 2 



164 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [Xl\ 

demonstrations, that is, by the immediate consent oi 
mind or sense, by induction, by syllogism, and by 
gniity, which is that which Aristotle calleth demonstn 
in orb or circle, and not a notiorihus^ every of these 
certain subjects in the matter of sciences, in whicl 
spectively they have chiefest use; and certain ot 
from which respectively they ought to be excluded ; 
the rigour and curiosit)' in requiring the more s€ 
proofs in some things, and chiefly the facility in 
tenting ourselves with the more remiss proofs in ot 
hath been amongst the greatest cause: 
e an ogta ^QiYrnxQ^^^ and hindrance to knowledere. 

demonstra" ° 

tionum. distributions and assignations of demon 

tions, according to the analogy of scier 
I note as deficient. 

XV. I. The custody or retaining of knowledge is ej 
in writing or memory; whereof writing hath two p 
the nature of the character, and the order of the ei 
For the art of characters, or other visible notes of w 
or things, it hath nearest conjugation with granmiar; 
therefore I refer it to the due place. For the dispos: 
and collocation of that knowledge which we preserv 
writing, it consisteth in a good digest of common-p 
wherein I am not ignorant of the prejudice imput 
the use of common-place books, as causing a retarda 
of reading, and some sloth or relaxation of men: 
But because it is but a counterfeit thing in knowle< 
to be forward and pregnant, except a man be deep 
full, I hold the entry of common-places to be a 1 tt( 
great use and essence in studying, as that w 1 s 
eth copie of invention, and contracteth judge 
strength. But this is true, that of the methods of coin 
places that I have seen, there is none of any sv 



XV. I.] THE SECOND BOOK. l6 



^ 



worth : all of them carrying merely the face of a school, 
and not of a world ; and referring to vulgar matters and 
pedantical divisions, without all life or respect to action. 

2. For the other principal part of the custody of know- 
ledge, which is memory, I find that faculty in my judge- 
ment weakly inquired of. An art there is extant of it ; 
but it seemeth to me that there are better precepts than 
that art, and better practices of that art than those re- 
ceived. It is certain the art (as it is) may be raised to 
points of ostentation prodigious : but in use (as it is now 
managed) it is barren, not burdensome, nor dangerous to 
natural memory, as is imagined, but barren, that is, not 
dexterous to be applied to the serious use of business 
and occasions. And therefore I make no more estima- 
tion of repeating a great number of names or words 
upon once hearing, or the pouring forth of a number of 
verses or rhymes ex tempore^ or the making of a satirical 
simile of everything, or the turning of everything to a 
jest, or the falsifying or contradicting of everything by 
cavil, or the like (whereof in the faculties of the mind 
there is great copie, and such as by device and practice 
may be exalted to an extreme degree of wonder), than 
I do of the tricks of tumblers, funambuloes, baladines ; 
the one being the same in the mind that the other is in 
the body, matters of strangeness without worthiness. 

3. This art of memory is but built upon two intentions ; 
the one prenotion, the other emblem. Prenotion dis- 
chargeth the indefinite seeking of that we would re- 
member, and directeth us to seek in a narrow compass, 
that is, somewhat that hath congruity with our place of 
memory. Emblem reduceth conceits intellectual to images 
sensible, which strike the memory more ; out of which 
axioms may be drawn much better practique than that 



l66 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [X' 

in use ; and besides which axioms, there are divers 
touching help of memory, not inferior to them. But I 
in the beginning distinguish, not to report those thi 
deficient, which are but only ill managed. 

XVI. I. There remaineth the fourth kind of ratic 
knowledge, which is transitive, concerning the express 
or transferring our knowledge to others; which I 
term by the general name of tradition or delivery. 1 
dition hath three parts ; the first concerning the orgai 
tradition ; the second concerning the method of traditi 
and the third concerning the illustration of tradition. 

2. For the organ of tradition, it is either speech 
writing : for Aristotle saith well, Words are the imager 
cogitations, and letters are the images of words. But 
it is not of necessity that cogitations be expressed 
the medium of words. For whatsoever is capable 
suflQcient differences, and those perceptible by the sei 
is in nature competent to express cogitations. And tb 
fore we see in the commerce of barbarous people, 
understand not one another's language, and in the pi 
tice of divers that are dumb and deaf, that men's mi 
are expressed in gestures, though not exactly, yet 
serve the turn. And we understand further, that i 
the use of China, and the kingdoms of the High Lev 
to write in characters real, which express neither let 
nor words in gross, but things or notions ; insomucl 
countries and provinces, which understand not one 
other's language, can nevertheless read one anott 
writings, because the characters are accepted more gei 
ally than the languages do extend; and therefore 1 
have a vast multitude of characters, as many (I supp 
as radical words. 

3. These notes of cogitations are of two sorts; the 



THE SECOND BOOK. l6j 

e note hath some similitude or congruity with the 
the other ad placiium^ having force only by con- 
acceptation. Of the former sort are hieroglyphics 
tures. For as to hieroglyphics (things of ancient 
I embraced chiefly by the Egyptians, one of the 
cient nations), they are but as continued impreses 
)lems. And as for gestures, they are as transitory 
phics, and are to hieroglyphics as words spoken 
vords written, in that they abide not; but they 
srmore, as well as the other, an affinity with the 
gnified. As Periander, being consulted with how 
rve a tyranny newly usurped, bid the messenger 
.nd report what he saw him do; and went into 
en and topped all the highest flowers ; signifying, 
Dnsisted in the cutting off" and keeping low of the 
and grandees. Ad placiium, are the characters 
Dre mentioned, and words : although some have 
ling by curious inquiry, or rather by apt feigning, 
derived imposition of names from reason and 
ent; a speculation elegant, and, by reason it 
h into antiquity, reverent; but sparingly mixed 
th, and of small fruit. This por- 

'^ De notis 

knowledge, touchmg the notes of 
.nd cogitations in general, I find not 
, but deficient. And although it may seem of no 
;e, considering that words and writings by letters 
seel all the other ways ; yet because this part con- 
as it were the mint of knowledge (for words are 
ns current and accepted for conceits, as moneys 
values, and that it is fit men be not ignorant that 

may be of another kind than gold and silver). 
It good to propound it to better inquiry, 
mcerning speech and words, the consideration of 



l68 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XVI.4 

them hath produced the science of grammar. For mai 
still striveth to reintegrate himself in those benedictions 
from which by his fault he hath been deprived ; and a 
he hath striven against the first general curse by the in 
vention of all other arts, so hath he sought to come fc 
of the second general curse (which was the confusion c 
tongues) by the art of grammar ; whereof the use in 
mother tongue is small, in a foreign tongue more ; 1 
most in such foreign tongues as have ceased to be vulga 
tongues, and are turned only to learned tongues. Th 
duty of it is of two natures : the one popular, which is fo 
the speedy and perfect attaining languages, as well fo 
intercourse of speech as for understanding of authors 
the other philosophical, examining the power and natur 
of words, as they are the footsteps and prints of reason 
which kind of analogy between words and reason i 
handled sparstm, brokenly though not entirely; and there 
fore I cannot report it deficient, though I think it ver 
worthy to be reduced into a science by itself. 

5. Unto grammar also belongeth, as an appendix, tb 
consideration of the accidents of words ; which are mea 
sure, sound, and elevation or accent, and the sweetnes 
and harshness of them ; whence hath issued some curioi 
observations in rhetoric, but chiefly poesy, as we consid< 
it, in respect of the verse and not of the argmnen 
Wherein though men in learned tongues do tie themselv( 
to the ancient measures, yet in modern languages 
seemeth to me as free to make new measures of vers< 
as of dances : for a dance is a measured pace, as a ver 
is a measured speech. In these things the sense is bett 
judge than the art ; 

CoenaB fercula nostras 
Mallem convivis quam placuisse cods. 



XVr. 5.] THE SECOND BOOK, 1 69 

And of the servile expressing antiquity in an unlike and 
an unfit subject, it is well said, Quod tempore antiquum 
', id incongruitate est maxime novum, 

6. For ciphers, they are commonly in letters, or alpha- 
bets, but may be in words. The kinds of ciphers (besides 
the simple ciphers, with changes, and intermixtures of 
nulls and non-significants) are many, according to the 
nature or rule of the infolding, wheel-ciphers, key-ciphers, 
doubles, &c. But the virtues of them, whereby they are 
to be preferred, are three ; that they be not laborious to 
write and read; that they be impossible to decipher; 
and, in some cases, that they be without suspicion. The 
highest degree whereof is to write omnia per omnia ; which 
is undoubtedly possible, with a proportion quintuple at 
most of the writing infolding to the writing infolded, and 
no other restraint whatsoever. This art of ciphering hath 
for relative an art of deciphering, by supposition unpro- 
fitable, but, as things are, of great use. For suppose that 
ciphers were well managed, there be multitudes of them 
which exclude the decipherer. But in regard of the raw- 
ness and unskilfulness of the hands through which they 
pass, the greatest matters are many times carried in the 
Weakest ciphers. 

7. In the enumeration of these private and retired arts, 
it may be thought I seek to make a great muster-roll of 
sciences, naming them for show and ostentation, and to 
little other purpose. But let those which are skilful in 
them judge .whether I bring them in only for appearance, 
or whether in that which I speak of them (though in few 
words) there be not some seed of proficience. And this 
must be remembered, that as there be many of great 
account in their countries and provinces, which, when they 
come up to the seat of the estate, are but of mean rank 



I70 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XVI. 1 

and scarcely regarded ; so these arts, being here place 
with the principal and supreme sciences, seem pett 
things ; yet to such as have chosen them to spend the 
labours 'and studies in them, they seem great matters. 
XVII. I. For the method of tradition, I see it 
moved a controversy in our time. But as in civil bus 
ness, if there be a meeting, and men fall at words, thei 
is commonly an end of the matter for that time, and n 
proceeding at all ; so in learning, where there is muc 
controversy, there is many times little inquiry. For th; 
part of knowledge of method seemeth to me so weak! 
inquired as I shall report it deficient. 

2. Method hath been placed and that not amiss, i 
logic, as a part of judgement. For as the doctrine < 
syllogisms comprehendeth the rules of judgement upc 
that which is invented, so the doctrine of method coi 
taineth the rules of judgement upon that which is to 1 
delivered ; for judgement precedeth delivery, as it follow 
eth invention. Neither is the method or the nature 
the tradition material only to the use of knowledge, b 
likewise to the progression of knowledge : for since i 
labour and life of one man cannot attain to perfection 
knowledge, the wisdom of the tradition is that which i 
spire th the felicity of continuance and proceeding. A: 
therefore the most real diversity of method is of meth< 
referred to use, and method referred to progressio 
whereof the one may be termed magistral, and the otl: 
of probation. 

3. The latter whereof seemeth to be vza deserta ei inii 
clusa. For as knowledges are now delivered, there is 
kind of contract of error between the deliverer arid t 
receiver. For he that delivereth knowledge, desireth 
deliver it in such form as may be best believed, and i 



XVII. 3.] THE SECOND BOOK. 171 

as may be best examined ; and he that receiveth know- 
ledge, desireth rather present satisfaction, than expectant 
inquiry ; and so rather not to doubt, than not to err : 
glory making the author not to lay open his weakness, 
and sloth making the disciple not to know his strength. 

4. But knowledge that is delivered as a thread to be 
spun on, ought to be delivered and intimated, if it were 
possible, in the same method wherein it was invented : and 
so is it possible of knowledge induced. But in this same 
anticipated and prevented knowledge, no man knoweth 
how he came to the knowledge which he hath obtained. 
But yet nevertheless, secundum majus et minus ^ a man may 
revisit and descend unto the foundations of his know- 
ledge and consent ; and so transplant it into another, as 
it grew in his own mind. For it is in knowledges as it 
is in plants : if you mean to use the plant, it is no matter 
for the roots ; but if you mean to remove it to grow, then 
it is more assured to rest upon roots than slips : so the 
delivery of knowledges (as it is now used) is as of fair 
bodies of trees without the roots ; good for the carpenter, 
but not for the planter. But if you will have sciences 
grow, it is less matter for the shaft or body of the tree, so 
}'ou look well to the taking up of the roots, d^ metbodo 
Of which kind of delivery the method of the sincera, she 
mathematics, in that subject, hath some adJUios 
shadow: but generally I see it neither put ^'^^^^rum, 
in ure nor put in inquisition, and therefore note it for 
deficient. 

5. Another diversity of method there is, which hath 
some affinity with the former, used in some cases by 
the discretion of the ancients, but disgraced since by 
the impostures of many vain persons, who have made it 
as a fiailse light for their counterfeit merchandises; and 



172 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING [XVIi 

that is, enigmatical and disclosed. The pretence whei 
is, to remove the vulgar capacities from being admil 
to the secrets of knowledges, and to reserve them 
selected auditors, or wits of such sharpness as can pic 
the veil. 

6. Another diversity of method, whereof the cor 
quence is great, is the delivery of knowledge in apt 
isms, or in methods ; wherein we may observe t 
hath been too much taken into custom, out of a 
axioms or observations upon any subject, to mak( 
solemn and formal art, filling it with some discoun 
and illustrating it with examples, and digesting it i 
a sensible method. But the writing in aphorisms h 
many excellent virtues, whereto the writing in met] 
doth not approach. 

7. For first, it trieth the writer, whether he be superfi 
or solid : for aphorisms, except they should be ridicule 
cannot be made but of the pith and heart of sciem 
for discourse of illustration is cut off; recitals of exj 
pies are cut off; discourse of connexion and ordei 
cut off; descriptions of practice are cut off. So tl 
remaineth nothing to fill the aphorisms but some g 
quantity of observation : and therefore no man can sufl 
nor in reason will attempt, to write aphorisms, but he 
is sound and grounded. But in methods, 

Tantnm series juncturaque poUet, 
Tantum de medio sumptis accedit honoris, 

as a man shall make a great show of an art, which, : 
were disjointed, would come to little. Secondly, meth 
are more fit to win consent or belief, but less fit 
point to action ; for they carry a kind of demonstrai 
in orb or circle, one part illuminating another, and th( 
fore satisfy. But particulars being dispersed do 1 



XVII. 7.] THE SECOND BOOK. 1 73 

agree with dispersed directions. And lastly, aphorisms, 
representing a knowledge broken, do invite men to in- 
quire further; whereas methods, carr)dng the show of 
a total, do secure men, as if they were at furthest. 

8. Another diversity of method, which is likewise of 
great weight, is the handling of knowledge by assertions 
and their proofs, or by questions and their deter- 
minations. The latter kind whereof, if it be immoderately 
followed, is as prejudicial to the proceeding of learning, 
as it is to the proceeding of an army to go about to 
besiege every little fort or hold. For if the field be kept, 
and the sum of the enterprise pursued, those smaller 
things will come in of themselves : indeed a man would 
not leave some important piece enemy at his back. In 
like manner, the use of confutation in the delivery of 
sciences ought to be very sparing; and to serve to re- 
move strong preoccupations and prejudgements, and not 
to minister and excite disputations and doubts. 

9. Another diversity of methods is, according to the 
subject or matter which is handled. For there is a great 
<lifference in delivery of the mathematics, which are the 
most abstracted of knowledges, and policy, which is the 
most immersed. And howsoever contention hath been 
moved, touching an uniformity of method in multiformity 
of matter, yet we see how that opinion, besides the weak- 
ness of it, hath been of ill desert towards learning, as 
that which taketh the way to reduce learning to cer- 
tain empty and barren generalities; being but the very 
husks and shells of sciences, all the kernel being forced 
out and expulsed with the torture and press of the method. 
And therefore as 1 did allow well of particular topics for 
invention, so I do allow likewise of particular methods of 
tradition. 



1 74 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING, [XVII. la 

10. Another diversity of judgement in the delivery 
teaching of knowledge is, according unto the light aod 
presuppositions of that which is delivered. For that know- 
ledge which is new, and foreign from opinions received, 
is to be delivered in another form than that that is ag^e^ 
able and familiar ; and therefore Aristode, when he thinks 
to tax Democritus, doth in truth commend him, where he 
saith, I/we shall indeed dispute^ and not follow after nadBr 
tudesj 4kc, For those whose conceits are seated in popular 
opinions, need only but to prove or dispute ; but those 
whose conceits are beyond popular opinions, have a 
double labour; the one to make themselves conceived, 
and the other to prove and demonstrate. So that it i> 
of necessity with them to have recourse to similitudes and 
translations to express themselves. And therefore in the 
infancy of learning, and in rude times, when those con- 
ceits which are now trivial were then new, the world wai 
full of parables and similitudes ; for else would men either 
have passed over without mark, or else rejected for para- 
doxes that which was offered, before they had understood 
or judged. So in divine learning, we see how frequent 
parables and tropes are : for it is a nile, that whatsoever 
science is not consonant to presuppositions, must pray in 
aid of similitudes. 

11. There be also other diversities of methods vulgar 
and received : as that of resolution or analysis, of con- 
stitution or systasis, of concealment or cryptic &c., which 
I do allow well of, though I have stood upon those which 
Depruden- ^1*6 least handled and observed. All which 
tia tradi- I have remembered to this purpose, because 
ttonis. I v'ould erect and constitute one general in- 
quiry (which seems to me deficient) touching the wisdom 
of tradition. 



XVII.I2.] THE SECOND BOOK. 1 75 

12. But unto this part of knowledge, concerning method, 
doth further belong not only the architecture of the whole 

of a work, but also the several beams and columns 
*of ; not as to their stuff, but as to their quantity and 
And therefore method considereth not only the 
disposition of the argument or subject, but likewise the 
propositions : not as to their truth or matter, but as to 
their limitation and manner. For herein Ramus merited 
better a great deal in reviving the good rules of proposi- 
Ko^oXov TTp&Tov, Kara iravros &c., than he did in intro- 
ducing the canker of epitomes; and yet (as it is the 
condition of human things that, according to the ancient 
faWes, /^ mosf precious things have the most pernicious 
keepers) it was so, that the attempt of the one made him 
ipon the other. For he had need be well conducted 
that should design to make axioms convertible, if he 
make them not withal circular, and non-promovent, or 
incurring into themselves; but yet the intention was 
excellent 

13. The other considerations of method, concerning 
propositions, are chiefly touching the utmost proposi- 

s, which limit the dimensions of sciences : for every 
knowledge may be fidy said, besides the profundity 
(which is the truth and substance of it, that makes it 
solid), to have a longitude and a latitude ; accounting 
the latitude towards other sciences, and the longitude 
towards action ; that is, from the greatest generality to 
the most particular precept. The one giveth rule how 
far one knowledge ought to intermeddle within the pro- 
vince of another, which is the rule they call Ka^avro ; the 
other giveth rule unto what degree of particularity a 
knowledge should descend : which latter I find passed 
over in silence, being in my judgement the more material. 



sermonts 
privati 



1 80 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XVIII. f. 

in private speech it is easy for the greatest orators to 
want: whilst, by the observing their well- 
■^^f'^f*^^ graced forms of speech, they leese the volu- 
bility of application: and therefore it shal 
not be amiss to recommend this to better 
inquiry, not being curious whether we place it here, or in 
that part which concerneth policy. 

6. Now therefore will I descend to the deficiences, 
Colores boni which (as I said) are but attendances : and 
et mcdU ^st, I do not find the wisdom and diligence 

simplicis et of Aristotle well pursued, who began to make 
comparatt. ^ collection of the popular signs and colours 
of good and evil, both simple and comparative, which are 
as the sophisms of rhetoric (as I touched before). For 
example : 

Soplusma, 
Quod laudatur, bonum: quod vituperatur, malum. 

Redargittio. 
Laudat venales qui vult eztrudere meices. 

Malum est, malum est (jnquit emptor) ; sed cum recesserit 
turn gloriabitur I The defects in the labour of Aristotl< 
are three : one, that there be but a few of many ; anothei 
that their clenches are not annexed ; and the third, tha 
he conceived but a part of the use of them : for their US' 
is not only in probation, but much more in impression 
For many forms are equal in signification which are 
fering in impression ; as the difference is great in ih 
piercing of that which is sharp and that which is flat 
though the strength of the percussion be the same. Fo 
there is no man but will be a litde more raised by hearin 
it said, Your enemies will be glad of this^ 

Hoc Ithacus velit, et magoo mexceotnr Atrida^ 

than by hearing it said only, This is evil for ymu 



XVIII. I.] THE SECOND BOOK. 1 77 

shdtbe to him as God ; yet with people it is the more 
mighty : for so Salomon saith, Sapiens corde appellabitur 
prudens, sed dulcis eloquio major a reperiet ; signifying that 
profoundness of wisdom will help a man to a name or 
admiration, but that it is eloquence that prevaileth in an 
active life. And as to the labouring of it, the emulation 
of Aristotle with the rhetoricians of his time, and the 
experience of Cicero, hath made them in their works of 
rhetorics exceed themselves. Again, the excellency of 
examples of eloquence in the orations of Demosthenes 
and Cicero, added to the perfection of the precepts of 
eloquence, hath doubled the progression in this art ; and 
therefore the deficiences which I shall note will rather be 
in some collections, which may as handmaids attend the 
art, than in the rules or use of the art itself. 

2. Notwithstanding, to stir the earth a little about the 
roots of this science, as we have done of the rest; the 
duty and office of rhetoric is to apply reason to imagina- 
tion for the better moving of the will. For we see reason 
is disturbed in the administration thereof by three means ; 
by illaqueation or sophism, which pertains to logic ; by 
imagination or impression, which pertains to rhetoric; and 
by passion or affection, which pertains to morality. And 
as in negotiation with others, men are wrought by cun- 
ning, by importunity, and by vehemency; so in this 
negotiation within ourselves, men are undermined by in- 
consequences, solicited and importuned by impressions 
or observations, and transported by passions. Neither is 
the nature of man so unfortunately built, as that those 
powers and arts should have force to disturb reason, and 
not to establish and advance it. For the end of logic is to 
teach a form of argument to secure reason, and not to en- 
tiap it. The end of morality is td procure the affections to 

N 



1 78 OF TEE ADVASCEJiEST OF LEARSIXG. \T 

obej reason, and not to invade iL TlieeiidofifaeloiicistD 
fill the imagination to second reason, and doc to op^ ;*. 
for these abuses of arts come in but ex Migmo^ Sxx ca 

3. And therefore it was great injustice in Hato, tt 
springing out of a just hatred to the iheUMidans of 
time, to esteem of rhetoric but as a voIiq)tiiaz7 art, le- 
sembling it to cookeiy, that did mar wholesome lis 
and help unwholesome by variety of sauces to the | 
sure of the taste. For we see that speech is much n 
conversant in adorning that which is good, than b 
colouring that which is evil ; for there is no man I 
speaketh more honestly than he can do or think: s 
it was excellently noted by Thucydides in Cleon, 
because he used to hold on the bad side in cai 
estate, therefore he was ever inveighing against ek) 
quence and good speech; knowing that no man cai 
speak fair of courses sordid and base. And therefor 
as Plato said elegantly, That virtue^ if she could be sen 
would move great l<rve and affection; so seeing that 
cannot be showed to the sense by corporal shape, th 
next degree is to show her to the imagination in live) 
representation : for to show her to reason only in 
tility of argument was a thing ever derided in Chrysi] 
pus and many of the Stoics, who thought to thru 
virtue upon men by sharp disputations and condosion 
which have no sympathy with the will of man. 

4. Again, if the affections in themselves were pliant ai 
obedient to reason, it were true there should be no gre 
use of persuasions and insinuations to the will, more thj 
of naked proposition and proofs; but in regard of tl 
continual mutinies and seditions of the affectionSi 

Video meliora, proboqae» 
Deteriora se<jtior, 



XVIII. 4.] THE SECOND BOOK. 1 79 

reason would become captive and servile, if eloquence 
of persuasions did not practise and win the imagination 
from the aflfections' part, and contract a confederacy be- 
tween the reason and imagination against the affections ; 
for the affections themselves carry ever an appetite to 
good, as reason doth. The difference is, that the affection 
beholdeth merely the present ; reason beholdeth the future 
and sum of time. And therefore the present filling the 
imagination more, reason is commonly vanquished ; but 
after that force of eloquence and persuasion hath made 
tilings future and remote appear as present, then upon 
the revolt of the imagination reason prevaileth. 

5. We conclude therefore that rhetoric can be no 
more charged with the colouring of the worse part, than 
logic with sophistry, or morality with vice. For we know 
the doctrines of contraries are the same, though the use 
be opposite. It appeareth also that logic differeth from 
rhetoric, not only as the fist from the palm, the one close, 
the other at large; but much more in this, that logic 
handleth reason -exact and in truth, and rhetoric handleth 
t as it is planted in popular opinions and manners. And 
herefore Aristotle doth wisely place rhetoric as between 
ogic on the one side, and moral or civil knowledge on 
he other, as participating of both : for the proofs and 

lonstrations of logic are toward all men indifferent 
nd the same ; but the proofs and persuasions of rhetoric 
ught to differ according to the auditors : 

Orpheus in sylvis, inter delphinas Anon. 

iliich application, in perfection of idea, ought to extend 

) far, that if a man should speak of the same thing to 

eral persons, he should speak to them all respectively 

id several ways : though this politic part of eloquence 

N a 



l8o OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XVIII. 5. 

in private speech it is easy for the greatest orators to 
want: whilst, by the observing their weil- 

De prudentta graced forms of Speech, they leese the volu- 

p^ ^'^^y of appUcation: and therefore it shaU 
not be amiss to recommend this to better 

inquiry, not being curious whether we place it here, or in 

that part which concemeth policy. 

6* Now therefore will I descend to the deficiences, 

Coloret bom ^^^^^ (^ ^ ^^^^) ^^ ^^t attendances : and 
et malt, first, I do not find the wisdom and diligence 

simplieis *i of Aristotle well pursued, who began to make 
comparatu ^ collection of the popular signs and colours 
of good and evil, both simple and comparative, which are 
as the sophisms of rhetoric (as I touched before). For 
example : 

Sophitma, 
Qnod landatur, bonum: quod vituperatnr, maluni. 

Redargutio. 
Landat venalet qui volt cxtrudere mercet. 

Malum est, malum est {tnquit emptor) ; sed cum recesstrit^ 
turn gloriahitur ! The defects in the labour of Aristotle 
are three : one, that there be but a few of many ; another, 
that their elenches are not annexed ; and the third, that 
he conceived but a part of the use of them : for their use 
is not only in probation, but much more in impressioD. 
For many forms are equal in sig^fication which are dif- 
fering in impression ; as the difference is great in the 
piercing of that which is sharp and that which is flat, 
though the strength of the percussion be the same. For 
there is no man but will be a little more raised by hearing 
it said. Your enemies will he glad of this^ 

Hoc Ithacus velit, et magno merceatttr Atiid% 

than by hearing it said only. This is evil for ycu. 



^Vlll.y.] THE SECOND BOOK. l8l 

?. Secondly, I do resume also that which I mentioned 
^fore, touching provision or preparatory store for the 
tmiture of speech and readiness of invention, which ap- 
)eareth to be of two sorts ; the one in resemblance to a 
hop of pieces unmade up, the other to a shop of things 
sady made up ; both to be applied to that which is fre- 
uent and most in request. The former of these I will 

antitheta^ and the X'aXX&x formula, 

8. Antitheta are theses argued pro et contra; wherein 
en may be more 4arge and laborious : but 

n such as are able to do it) to avoid prolixity 
' entry, I wish the seeds of the several argu- 

its to be cast up into some brief and acute sentences, 
Dt to be cited, but to be as skeins or bottoms of thread, 
) be unwinded at large when they come to be used; 
applying authorities and examples by reference. 

Pro verbis legis, 
Non est interpretatio, sed divinatio, quae recedit a litera : 
Cum receditur a litera, judex transit in legislatorem. 

Pro sententia legis. 
Ex omnibus verbis est eliciendus sensus qui interpretatur singula. 

9. FormulcB are but decent and apt passages or con- 
eyances of speech, which may serve indifferently for 
iffering subjects ; as of preface, conclusion, digression, 
ansition, excusation, &c. For as in buildings there is 
reat pleasure and use in the well casting of the stair- 
ises, entries, doors, windows, and the like ; so in speech, 
e conveyances and passages are of special ornament 
id effect. 

A conclusion in a deliberative, 

So may we redeem the faults passed, and prevent the inconveniences 
future. 

XIX. I. There remain two appendices touching the 



l8'Z OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING, [XIX. i, 

tradition of knowledge, the one critical, the other pedant- 
ical. For all knowledge is either delivered by teachers, 
or attained by men's proper endeavours: and therefore 
as the principal part of tradition of knowledge concemeth 
chiefly writing of books, so the relative part thereof con- 
cemeth reading of books ; whereunto appertain incidently 
these considerations. The first is concerning the true 
correction and edition of authors; wherein nevertheless 
rash diligence hath done great prejudice. For these 
critics have often presumed that that which they under- 
stand not is false set down: as the priest that, where 
he found it written of S. Paul Demt'ssus est per sporUm^ 
mended his book, and made it Demtssus est per portam; 
because sporia was an hard word, and out of his reading: 
and siuely their errors, though they be not so palpable 
and ridiculous, yet are of the same kind. And therefore, 
as it hath been wisely noted, the most corrected copies 
are commonly the least correct. 

The second is concerning the exposition and explic- 
ation of authors, which resteth in annotations and com- 
mentaries : wherein it is over usual to blanch the obscure 
places and discoiuse upon the plain. 

The third is concerning the times, which in many cases 
give great light to true interpretations. 

The fourth is concerning some brief censure and judge- 
ment of the authors ; that men thereby may make some 
election unto themselves what books to read. 

And the fifth is concerning the syntax and disposition 
of studies ; that men may know in what order or pursuit 
to read. 

2. For pedantical knowledge, it containeth that differ- 
ence of tradition which is proper for youth j whereunto 
appertain divers considerations of great fruit. 



'U. 2.] THE SECOND BOOK. I83 

As first, the timing and seasoning of knowledges ; as 
ith what to initiate them, and from what for a time to 
frain them. 

Secondly, the consideration where to begin with the 
siest, and so proceed to the more difficult ; and in what 
oirses to press the more difficult, and then to turn them 
the more easy : for it is one method to practise swim- 
ing with bladders, and another to practise dancing with 
avy shoes. 

A third is the application of learning according unto 
e propriety of the wits ; for there is no defect in the 
culties intellectual, but seemeth to have a proper cure 
mtained in some studies : as, for example, if a child be 
rd-witted, that is, hath not the faculty of attention, the 
lathematics giveth a remedy thereunto ; for in them, if 
le wit be caught away but a moment, one is new to 
egin. And as sciences have a propriety towards faculties 
)r cure and help, so faculties or powers have a sympathy 
)wards sciences for excellency or speedy profiting : and 
lerefore it is an inquiry of great wisdom, what kinds of 
its and natures are most apt and proper for what sciences. 
Fourthly, the ordering of exercises is matter of great 
msequence to hurt or help : for, as is well observed by 
icero, men in exercising their faculties, if they be not 
ell advised, do exercise their faults and get ill habits as 
ill as good ; so as there is a great judgement to be had 
the continuance and intermission of exercises. It were 
3 long to particularise a number of other considerations 
this nature, things but of mean appearance, but of 
tgular efficacy. For as the wronging or cherishing of 
ids or young plants is that that is most important 
their thriving, and as it was noted that the first six 
igs being in truth as tutors of the state of Rome in the 



184 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XIX. J 

infancy thereof was the principal cause of the immens 
greatness of that state which followed, so the cultui 
and manurance of minds in youth hath such a forcibl 
(though unseen) operation, as hardly any length of 1 
or contention of labour can countervail it afterward! 
And it is not amiss to observe also how small and m- 
faculties gotten by education, yet when they fall into gr 
men or great matters, do work great and import 
effects : whereof we see a notable example in Taci 
of two stage players, Percennius and Vibulenus, who b 
their faculty of playing put the Pannonian armies 
an extreme tumult and combustion. For there a ig 
mutiny amongst them upon the death of Augustus Cs 
Blsesus the lieutenant had committed some of the mutin 
ers, which were suddenly rescued; whereupon Vibulenu 
got to be heard speak, which he did in this manner 
TTiese poor innocent wretches appointed to cruel death, y&^ 
have restored to behold the light; but who shall restore rn 
brother to mCy or life unto my brother^ that was sent hi 
in message from the legions of Germany^ to treat of ih 
common cause ? and he hath murdered him this last 
by some of his fencers and ruffians^ that he hath about hh 
for his executioners upon soldiers. Answer^ BIcbsus, who 
is done with his body ? The mortalest enemies do not din 
burial. When I have performed my last duties to the corp^ 
with kisses, with tears, command me to be slain besides him 
so that these my fellows, for our good meaning and our trt 
hearts to the legions, may have leave to bury us. With whic 
speech he put the army into an infinite fury and uproai 
whereas truth was he had no brother, neither was the: 
any such matter ; but he played it merely as if he 1 
been upon the stage. 

3. But to returil : we are now come to a period 



XIX. 3.] THE SECOND BOOK. 1 85 

rational knowledges ; wherein if I have made the divi- 
sions other than those that are received, yet would I not 
be thought to disallow all those divisions which I do not 
use. For there is a double necessity imposed upon me 
of altering the divisions. The one, because it differeth 
in end and purpose, to sort together those things which 
are next in nature, and those things which are next in 
use. For if a secretary of estate should sort his papers, 
it is like in his study or general cabinet he would sort 
together things of a nature, as treaties, instructions, &c. 
But in his boxes or particular cabinet he would sort 
together those that he were like to use together, though 
of several natures. So in this general cabinet of know- 
ledge it was necessary for me to follow the divisions of 
the natiu-e of things ; whereas if myself had been to 
handle any particular knowledge, I would have respected 
the divisions fittest for use. The other, because the 
bringing in of the deficiences did by consequence alter 
the partitions of the rest. For let the knowledge extant 
(for demonstration sake) be fifteen. Let the knowledge 
*ith the deficiences be twenty; the parts of fifteen are 
not the parts of twenty ; for the parts of fifteen are three 
and five ; the parts of twenty are two, four, five, and ten. 
So as these things are without contradiction, and could 
not otherwise be. 

XX. I. Ay\7E proceed now to that knowledge which 

considereth of the appetite and will of 
man: whereof Salomon saith, Anfe omnia, Jilt, cusiodi cor 
iuum ; nam inde procedunt actiones vitcz. In the handling 
of this science, those which have written seem to me to 
have done as if a man, that professed to teach to write, 
did only exhibit fair copies of alphabets and letters 



1 86 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXi. 

joined, without giving any precepts or directions for the 
carriage of the hand and framing of the letters. So have 
they made good and fair exemplars and copies, carrying 
the draughts and portraitures of good, virtue, duty, felicity; 
propounding them well described as the true objects and 
scopes of man's will and desires. But how to attain 
these excellent marks, and how to frame and subdue the 
will of man to become true and conformable to these 
pursuits, they pass it over altogether, or slightly and un- 
profitably. For it is not the disputing, that moral virtues 
are in the mind of man by habit and not by nature ; or 
the distinguishing, that generous spirits are won by doc- 
trines and persuasions, and the vulgar sort by reward and 
punishment ; and the like scattered glances and touches, 
that can excuse the absence of this part. 

2. The reason of this omission I suppose to be that 
hidden rock whereupon both this and many other barks 
of knowledge have been cast away ; which is, that men 
have despised to be conversant in ordinary and common 
matters, the judicious direction whereof nevertheless is 
the wisest doctrine (for life consisteth not in novelties 
nor subtilities), but contrariwise they have compounded 
sciences chiefly of a certain resplendent or lustrous mass 
of matter, chosen to give glory either to the subtility of 
disputations, or to the eloquence of discourses. But 
Seneca giveth an excellent check to eloquence, Nocei 
tilt's eloqmntia^ quibus non rerum cupiditatem faciS^ sed sia. 
Doctrine should be such as should make men in love 
with the lesson, and not with the teacher ; being directed 
to the auditor's benefit, and not to the author's com- 
mendation. And therefore those are of the right kind 
which may be concluded as Demosthenes condades his 
counsel, Qucs si feceritis, non o atorem duniaxai m prm* 



XX.?.] THE SECOND BOOK. 187 

sen/ta lauddbiiis^ sed vosmetipsos etiam non iia multo post 
statu rerum vesifaram meliore, 

3. Neither needed men of so excellent parts to have 
despaired of a fortune, which the poet Virgil promised 
himself, and indeed obtained, who got as much glory of 
eloquence, wit, and learning in the expressing of the 
nations of husbandry, as of the heroical acts of 
^neas : 

Nee sum animi dubins, verbis ea vincere magnum 
Quam sit, et angustis his addere rebus honorem. 

And surely, if the purpose be in good earnest, not to 
write at leisure that which men may read at leisure, but 
really to instruct and suborn action and active life, these 
Georgics of the mind, concerning the husbandry and 
[ je thereof, are no less worthy than the heroical de- 
scriptions of Virtue, duty, and felicity. Wherefore the 
main and primitive division of moral knowledge seemeth 
to be into the exemplar or platform of good, and the 
regiment or culture of the mind : the one describing the 
nature of good, the other prescribing rules how to subdue, 
apply, and accommodate the will of man thereunto. 

4. The doctrine touching the platform or natiue of 

good considereth it either simple or compared; either 

the kinds of good, or the degrees of good ; in the latter 

whereof those infinite disputations which were touching 

the supreme degree thereof, which they term felicity, 

beatitude, or the highest good; the doctrines concerning 

which were as the heathen divinity, are by the Christian 

faith discharged. And as Aristotle saith. That young men 

may he happy, hut not otherwise hut hy hope ; so we must 

all acknowledge our minority, and embrace the felicity 

which is by hope of the future world. 

Freed therefore and delivered from this doctrine of 



1 88 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XX. 5. 

the philosopher's heaven, whereby they feigned an higher 
elevation of man's nature than was (for we see in ^ 
height of style Seneca writeth, Vere magnum, Aadere/ra- 
gilitatem homimSy securitatem Dei), we may with more 
sobriety and truth receive the rest of their inqturies and 
labours. Wherein for the nature of good positive or 
simple, they have set it down excellently in describ 
the forms of virtue and duty, with their situations and 
postures; in distributing them into their kinds, parts, 
provinces, actions, and administrations, and the like : nay 
further, they have commended them to man's nature and 
spirit with great quickness of argument and beauty of 
persuasions ; yea, and fortified and entrenched them (as 
much as discourse can do) against corrupt and popular 
opinions. Again, for the degrees and comparative nature 
of good, they have also excellently handled it in their 
triplicity of good, in the comparisons between a contem- 
plative and an active life, in the distinction between virtue 
with reluctation and virtue secured, in then* encounters 
between honesty and profit, in their balancing of virtue 
with virtue, and the like ; so as this part deserveth to be 
reported for excellently laboured. 

6. Notwithstanding, if before they had comen to the 
popular and received notions of virtue and vice, pleasure 
and pain, and the rest, they had stayed a little longer 
upon the inquiry concerning the roots of good and evil, 
and the strings of those " roots, they had given, in my 
opinion, a great light to that which followed ; and spe- 
cially if they had consulted with nature, they had made 
their doctrines less prolix and more profound: which 
being by them in part omitted and in part handled with 
much confusion, we will endeavour to resume and open 
in a more clear manner. 



XX. 7.] THE SECOND BOOK. 1 89 

7. There is formed in every thing a double nature of 
good : the one, as every thing is a total or substantive in 
itself; the other, as it is a part or member of a greater 
body : whereof the latter is in degree the greater and 
worthier, because it tendeth to the conservation of a 
more general form. Therefore we see the iron in par- 
ticular s)anpathy moveth to the loadstone ; but yet if if 
exceed a certain quantity, it forsaketh the affection to the 
loadstone, and like a good patriot moveth to the earth, 
which is the region and country of massy bodies : so may 
we go forward, and see that water and massy bodies 
move to the centre of the earth ; but rather than to suffer 
a divulsion in the continuance of nature, they will move 
upwards from the centre of the earth, forsaking their duty 
to the earth in regard of their duty to the world. This 
double nature of good, and the comparative thereof, is 
much more engraven upon man, if he degenerate not : 
unto whom the conservation of duty to the public ought 
to be much more precious than the conservation of life 
and being : according to that memorable speech of Pom- 
peius Magnus, when being in commission of purveyance 
for a famine at Rome, and being dissuaded with great 
vehemency and instance by his friends about him, that 
he should not hazard himself to sea in an extremity of 
weather, he said only to them, Necesse est ut earn, non ut 
vivam. But it may be truly afl&rmed that there was never 
any philosophy, religion, or other discipline, which did 
so plainly and highly exalt the good which is commun- 
icative, and depress the good which is private and par- 
ticular, as the Holy Faith ; well declaring that it was the 
same God that gave the Christian law to men, who gave 
those laws of nature to inanimate creatures that we spake 
of before; for we read that the elected saints of God have 



190 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XX.7. 

wished themselves anathematized and razed out of tbe 
book of life, in an ecstasy of charity and infinite feeling 
of communion. 

8. This being set down and strongly planted, doth 
judge and determine most of the controversies wherein 
moral philosophy is conversant. For first, it decideth the 
question touching the preferment of the contemplative or 
active life, and decideth it against Aristotle. For all the 
reasons which he bringeth for the contemplative are pri- 
vate, and respecting the pleasure and dignity of a man's 
self (in which respects no question the contemplative life 
hath the pre-eminence), not much imlike to that com- 
parison, which Pythagoras made for the gracing and 
magnifying of philosophy and contemplation : who being 
asked what he was, answered, Tka/ if Hiero were ever at 
the Olympian games j he knew the manner, that some came 
to try their fortune for the prizes, and some came cu mer* 
chants to utter their commodites, and some came to make 
good cheer and meet their friends, and some came to lock 
on; and that he was one of them that came to look on* 
But men must know, that in this theatre of man's life it is 
reserved only for God and angels to be lookers on. Neither 
could 11 ;e like question ever have been received in tbe 
church, notwithstanding their Pretiosa in oculis Domini 
mors sanctorum ejus, by which place they would exalt 
their civil death and regular professions, but upon this 
defence, that the monastical life is not simple contem- 
plative, but performeth the duty either of incessant prayers 
and supplications, which hath been truly esteemed as an 
ofiice in the church, or else of writing or taking instruc- 
tions for writing concerning the law of God, as Moses 
did when he abode so long in the mount. And sc 
we see Henoch the seventh from Adam, who was the firsi 



THE SECOND BOOK. I9I 

lative and walked with God, yet did also endow 
:h with prophecy, which Saint Jude citeth. But 
implation which should be finished in itself, with- 
ng beams upon society, assuredly divinity knoweth 

iecideth also the controversies between Zeno and 
, and their schools and successions, on the one 

placed felicity in virtue simply or attended, the 
and exercises whereof do chiefly embrace and 
society ; and on the other side, the Cyrenaics and 
ins, who placed it in pleasure, and made virtue 

used in some comedies of errors, wherein the 
and the maid change habits) to be but as a 
without which pleasure cannot be served and 
; and the reformed school of the Epicureans, 
laced it in serenity of mind and freedom from 
tion; as if they would have deposed Jupiter 
id restored Saturn and the first age, when there 
summer nor winter, spring nor autumn, but all 
e air and season ; and Herillus, which placed 
n extinguishment of the disputes of the mind, 
no fixed nature of good and evil, esteeming things 
:g to the clearness of the desires, or the reluct- 
^hich opinion was revived in the heresy of the 
ists, measuring things according to the motions 
)irit, and the constancy or wavering of belief: all 
re manifest to tend to private repose and con- 
t, and not to point of society. 
: censureth also the philosophy of Epictetus, which 
Dseth that felicity must be placed in those things 
re in our power, lest we be liable to fortune and 
nee : as if it were not a thing much more happy 

1 good and virtuous ends for the public, than to 



19a OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XX. i< 

obtain all that We can wish to ourselves in our prope 
fortune ; as Consalvo said to his soldiers, showing ther 
Naples, and protesting he had rather die one foot foi 
wards, than to have his life secured for long by one foe 
of retreat. Whereunto the wisdom of that heavenly leade 
hath signed, who hath affirmed that a good conscience is < 
continual /east ; showing plainly that the conscience c 
good intentions, howsoever succeeding, is a more con 
tinual joy to nature, than all the provision which can b 
made for security and repose. 

11. It censureth likewise that abuse of philosoph) 
which grew general about the time of Epictetus, in coe 
verting it into an occupation or profession ; as if th 
purpose had been, not to resist and extinguish perturl 
ations, but to fly and avoid the causes of them, and t 
shape a particular kind and course of life to that end 
introducing such an health of mind, as was that health ( 
body of which Aristotle speaketh of Herodicus, who di 
nothing all his life long but intend his health : whereas 
men refer themselves to duties of society, as that heall 
of body is best, which is ablest to endure all alteradoi 
and extremities ; so likewise that health of mind is mo 
proper, \' Ir.ch can go through the greatest temptatioi 
and perturbations. So as Diogenes' opinion is to I 
accepted, who commended not them which aibstaine 
but them which sustained, and could refrain their miii 
in prcBcipitio, and could give unto the mind (as is used i 
horsemanship) the shortest stop or turn. 

12. Lastly, it censureth the tenderness and want < 
application in some of the most ancient and reveren 
philosophers and philosophical men, that did retire tG 
easily from civil business, for avoiding of indignities an 
perturbations : whereas the resolution of men tnil7 mo 



XX, 12.] THE SECOND BOOK. 1 93 

ought to be such as the same Consalvo said the honour 
of a soldier should be, e teld crassiore^ and not so fine as 
every thing should catch in it and endanger it. 

XXL I. To resume private or particular good, it 
falleth into the division of good active and passive : for 
this difference of good (not unlike to that which amongst 
the Romans was expressed in the familiar or household 
terms oipromus and condtis) is formed also in all things, 
and is best disclosed in the two several appetites in crea- 
tures; the one to preserve or continue themselves, and 
the other to dilate or multiply themselves; whereof the 
latter seemeth to be the worthier: for in nature the 
heavens, which are the more worthy, are the agent ; and 
the earth, which is the less worthy, is the patient. In the 
pie es of living creatures, that of generation is greater 

Q that of food. In divine doctrine, heatius est dare 
q acctpere. And in life, there is no man's spirit so 
soft, but esteemeth the effecting of somewhat that he hath 
fixed in his desire, more than sensuality; which priority 
of the active good, is much upheld by the consideration 
of our estate to be mortal and exposed to fortune. For 
if we mought have a perpetuity and certainty in our plea- 
sures, the state of them would advance their price. But 
when we see it is but magni cEstimamus mori tardius, and 
ne glorieris de crastino, nescis par turn dtei^ it maketh us to 
desire to have somewhat secured and exempted from 
time, which are only our deeds and works : as it is said. 
Opera eorum sequuntur eos. The preeminence likewise of ^ 
this active good is upheld by the affection which is natural 
in man towards variety and proceeding; which in the 
pleasures of the sense, which is the principal part of,, 
passive good, can have no great latitude. Cogita quam- 
diu eadem /eceris ; cibusy somnus, Indus; per hunc circulum 





194 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXI. 

curriiur; mori velle non ianium/ortts, aut miser, autp, 
sed etiam fastidiosus potest. But in enterprises, pur 
and purposes of life, there is much variety; whereof r 
are sensible with pleasure in their inceptions, progre 
sions, recoils, reintegrations, approaches and attain 
to their ends. So as it was well said, Vita sine propc 
languida et vaga est. Neither hath this active good ai 
identity with the good of society, though in some c 
hath an incidence into it. For although it do many i 
bring forth acts of beneficence, yet it is with a resp< 
private to a man's own power, glory, amplification, cc 
tinuance ; as appeareth plainly, when it findeth a cont 
subject. For that gigantine state of mind which p< 
sesseth the troublers of the world, such as was Luc 
Sylla and infinite * other in smaller model, who woi 
have all men happy or unhappy as they were their friei 
or enemies, and would give form to the world, accordi 
to their own humours (which is the true theomach 
pretendeth and aspireth to active good, though it reced 
furthest from good of society, which we have determii 
to be the greater. 

2. To resume passive good, it receiveth a subdivisioi 
conservative and perfective. For let us take a brief rev 
of that which we have said : we have spoken first of 
good of society, the intention whereof embraceth 
form of human nature, whereof we are members J 
portions, and not our own proper and individual for 
we have spoken of active good, and supposed it a 
part of private and particular good. And rightly, for th 
is impressed upon all things a triple desire or appe 
proceeding from love to themselves ; one of preserv 
and continuing their form; another of advancing j 
perfecting their form; and a third of muldpljing 5 



XXI. 2.] THE SECOND BOOK. J 95 

extending their form upon other things: whereof the 
multiplying, or signature of it upon other things, is that 
which we handled by the name of active good. So as 
there remaineth the conserving of it, and perfecting or 
raising of it; which latter is the highest degree of 
e good. For to preserve in state is the less, 
to preserve with advancement is the greater. So in 
man, 

Igneus est ollis rigor, et caelestis origo. 

His approach or assumption to divine or angelical na- 
ture is the perfection of his form; the error or false 
imitation of which good is that which is the tempest of 
human life ; while man, upon the instinct of an advance- 
ment formal and essential, is carried to seek an ad- 
ement local. For as those which are sick, and find 
no remedy, do tumble up and down and change place, 
as if by a remove local they could obtain a remove in- 
tei I; so is it with men in ambition, when failing of 
mean to exalt their nature, they are in a perpetual 
e< ion to exalt their place. So then passive good is, 
as was said, either conservative or perfective. 

3. To resume the good of conservation or comfort, 
^ I consisteth in the fruition of that which is agree- 
to our natures; it seemeth to be the most pure 
and natural of pleasures, but yet the softest and the 
lowest. And this also receiveth a difference, which hath 
neither been well judged of, nor well inquired: for the 
good of fruition or contentment is placed either in the 
sincereness of the fruition, or in the quickness and 
vigour of it; the one superinduced by equality, the 
other by vicissitude ; the one having less mixture of evil, 
the other more impression of good. Whether of these is 
the greater good is a question controverted; but whether 

o 2 



196 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING, [XXI. 3. 

man's nature may not be capable of both, is a question 
not inquired. 

4. The former question being debated between Socrates 
and a sophist, Socrates placing felicity in an equal and 
constant peace of mind, and the sophist in much de- 
siring and much enjoying, they fell from argument to ill 
words : the sophist saying that Socrates' felicity was the 
felicity of a block or stone; and Socrates saying that 
the sophist's felicity was the felicity of one that had the 
itch, who did nothing but itch and scratch. And both 
these opinions do not want their supports. For the 
opinion of Socrates is much upheld by the general con- 
sent even of the Epicures themselves, that virtue bear- 
eth a great part in felicity ; and if so, certain it is, that 
virtue hath more use in clearing perturbations than 
in compassing desires. The sophist's opinion is much 
favoured by the assertion we last spake of, that good of 
advancement is greater than good of simple preservation; 
because every obtaining a desire hath a show of advance- 
ment, as motion though in a circle hath a show of pro- 
gression. 

5. But the second question, decided the true wa/i 
maketh the former superfluous. For can it be doubted, 
but that there are some who take more pleasure in en- 
joying pleasures than some other, and yet, nevertheless, 
are less troubled with the loss or leaving of them? So 
as this same, Non uti ut turn appetas^ non appetere ut iK^ 
meiuaSy sunt animi pisilli et diffidentis. And it seemeth 
to me, that most of the doctrines of the philosophers ar^ 
more fearful and cautionary than the nature of things 
requireth. So have they increased the fear of death i^ 
offering to cure it. For when they would have a man'' 
whole life to be but a discipline or preparation to di^ 



XXI. 5.] THE SECOND BOOK. I97 

they must needs make men think that it is a terrible 
Jnemy, against whom there is no end of preparing. 
Better saith the poet : 

Qui finem vito extremum inter munera ponat 
Naturae. 

)0 have they sought to make men's minds too uniform 
.nd harmonical, by not breaking them sufl5ciently to con- 
rary motions : the reason whereof I suppose to be, be- 
ause they themselves were men dedicated to a private, 
ree, and unapplied course of life. For as we see, upon 
he lute or like instrument, a ground, though it be sweet 
Jid have show of many changes, yet breaketh not the 
land to such strange and hard stops and passages, as 
I set song or voluntary; much after the same manner 
vas the diversity between a philosophical and a civil 
ife. And therefore men are to imitate the wisdom of 
ewellers ; who, if there be a grain, or a cloud, or an ice 
vhich may be ground forth without taking too much of 
he stone, they help it ; but if it should lessen and abate 
:he stone too much, they will not meddle with it: so 
3ught men so to procure serenity as they destroy not 
magnanimity. 

6. Having therefore deduced the good of man which 
IS private and particular, as far as seemeth fit, we will 
now return to that good of man which respecteth and 
beholdeth society, which we may term duty ; because the 
term of duty is more proper to a mind well framed and 
disposed towards others, as the term of virtue is applied 
to a mind well formed and composed in itself : though 
neither can a man understand virtue without some re- 
lation to society, nor duty without an inward disposition. 
This part may seem at first to pertain to science civil 
and politic: but not if it be well observed. For it 



198 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXI.i 

concemeth the regiment and government of every man 
over himself, and not over others. And as in architecture 
the direction of framing the posts, beams, and other paits 
of building, is not the same with the manner of joining 
them and erecting the building; and in mechanicals, 
the direction how to frame an instrument or engine, is 
not the same with the manner of setting it on work and 
employing it ; and yet nevertheless in expressing of the 
one you incidently express the aptness towards the othCT; 
so the doctrine of conjugation of men in society difiereth 
from that of their conformity thereunto. 

7. This part of duty is subdivided into two parts: 
the common duty of every man, as a man or member 
of a state ; the other, the respective or special duty of 
every man, in his profession, vocation, and place. The 
first of these is extant and well laboured, as hath been 
said. The second likewise I may report rather dispersed 
than deficient; which manner of dispersed writing in 
this kind of argument I acknowledge to be best For 
who can take upon him to write of the proper dutfi 
virtue, challenge, and right of every several vocation, pro- 
fession, and place ? For although sometimes a looker on 
may see more than a gamester, and there be a proverb 
more arrogant than sound, T/iaf the vale best discootfA 
the hill; yet there is small doubt but that men can write 
best and most really and materially in their own profes- 
sions ; and that the writing of speculative men of active 
matter for the most part doth seem to men of experiencCi 
as Phormio's argument of the wars seemed to HanmbA 
to be but dreams and dotage. Only there is one vice 
which accompanieth them that write in their own \f^ 
fessions, that they magnify them in excess. But gen^'' 
ally it were to be wished (as that which would nuO^ 



:XI. 7.] THE SECOND BOOK. 1 99 

earning indeed solid and fruitful) that active men would 
)r could become writers. 

8. In which kind I cannot but mention, honoris causa, 
rour Majesty's excellent book touching the duty of a king: 
I work richly compounded of divinity, morality, and policy, 
^th great aspersion of all other arts ; and being in mine 
)pinion one of the most sound and healthful writings that 
[ have read ; not distempered in the heat of invention, 
nor in the coldness of negligence ; not sick of dizzi- 
ness, as those are who leese themselves in their order, 
nor of convulsions, as those which cramp in matters 
impertinent; not savouring of perfumes and paintings, 
as those do who seek to please the reader more than 
nature beareth; and chiefly well disposed in the spirits 
thereof, being agreeable to truth and apt for action; 
and far removed from that natural infirmity, whereunto 
I noted those that write in their own professions to be 
subject, which is, that they exalt it above measure. For 
your Majesty hath truly described, not a king of Assyria 
or Persia in their extern glory, but a Moses or a David, 
pastors of their people. Neither can I ever leese out 
of my remembrance what I heard your Majesty in the 
same sacred spirit of government deliver in a great 
cause of judicature, which was, T/ia^ kings ruled by their 
toj, as God did by the laws of nature ; and ought as 
barely to put in use their supreme prerogative^ as God doth 
^w pmjoer of working miracles. And yet notwithstanding, 
in your book of a free monarchy, you do well give men 
to understand, that you know the plenitude of the power 
ind right of a king, as well as the circle of his office and 
<iity. Thus have I presumed to allege this excellent 
^Titing of your Majesty, as a prime or eminent example 
ot tractates concerning special and respective duties ; 



iiOO OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXI.8. 

wherein I should have said as much, if it had been written 
a thousand years since. Neither am I moved with certain 
courtly decencies, which esteem it flattery to praise in 
presence. No, it is flattery to praise in absence ; that is, 
when either the virtue is absent, or the occasion is ab- 
sent; and so the praise is not natural, but forced, either in 
truth or in time. But let Cicero be read in his oration 
pro Marcelloy which is nothing but an excellent table d 
Caesar's virtue, and made to his face ; besides the example 
of many other excellent persons, wiser a great deal than 
such observers ; and we will never doubt, upon a fuD 
occasion, to give just praises to present or absent. 

9. But to return : there belongeth further to the hand- 
ling of this part, touching the duties of professions and 
vocations, a relative or opposite, touching the frauds, 
cautels, impostures, and vices of every profession, which 
hath been likewise handled : but how ? rather in a satire 
and cynically, than seriously and wisely: for men have 
rather sought by wit to deride and traduce much of that 
which is good in professions, than with judgement to 
discover and sever. that which is corrupt. For, as Salomon 
saith, he that cometh to seek after knowledge with a 
mind to scorn and censure, shall be sure to find matter 
for his humour, but no matter for his instruction : Qua- 
De cautelis ^^^^^ derisori sctenttam ipsa se ahscondit; s^ 
eitnalis studioso fit obviam. But the managing o 

artihus. this argument with integrity and truth, whid 

I note as deficient, seemeth to me to be one of the bei 
fortifications for honesty and virtue that can be planted 
For, as the fable goeth of the basilisk, that if he see ya 
first, you die for it; but if you see him first, he dieth : so '■ 
it with deceits and evil arts ; which, if they be first eq[»e 
they leese their life; but if they prevent, thejr endanger. S 



XXI. 9.] THE SECOND BOOK. 201 

that we are much beholden to Machiavel and others, that ^' 
write what men do, and not what they ought to do. For 
it is not possible to join serpentine wisdom with the 
columbine innocency, except men know exactly all the 
conditions of the serpent; his baseness and going upon 
his belly, his volubility and lubricity, his envy and sting, 
and the rest ; that is, all forms and natures of evil. For 
without this, virtue lieth open and unfenced. Nay, an 
honest man can do no good upon those that are wicked, 
to reclaim them, without the help of the knowledge of 
evil. For men of corrupted minds presuppose that 
honesty groweth out of simplicity of manners, and be- 
lieving of preachers, schoolmasters, and men's exterior 
language. So as, except you can make them perceive 
that you know the utmost reaches of their own corrupt 
opinions, they despise all morality. Non recipit stultus^ 
i:trba prudeniicB^ nisi ea dixeris qucB versantur in corde ejus. 

10. Unto this part, touching respective duty, doth also 
appertain the duties betw^een husband and wife, parent 
and child, master and servant. So likewise the laws of 
friendship and gratitude, the civil bond of companies, 
colleges, and politic bodies, of neighbourhood, and all 
other proportionate duties; not as they are parts of 
govemment and society, but as to the framing of the 
Blind of particular persons. 

11. The knowledge concerning good respecting society 
doth handle it also, not simply alone, but comparatively; 
^hereunto belongeth the weighing of duties between per- 
son and person, case and case, particular and public. As 
we see in the proceeding of Lucius Brutus against his 
otn , which was so much extolled; yet what was 

Infcliz, utcunque ferent ea fata minores. 



194 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXI. i. 

curritur; mori velle non tantum/oriiSj aut raiser^ autprudem, 
sed etiam fastidiosus potest But in enterprises, pursuits, 
and purposes of life, there is much variety; whereof men 
are sensible with pleasure in their inceptions, progres- 
sions, recoils, reintegrations, approaches and attainings 
to their ends. So as it was well said. Vita sine praposito 
languida et vaga est. Neither hath tliis active good any 
identity with the good of society, though in some case it 
hath an incidence into it. For although it do many times 
bring forth acts of beneficence, yet it is with a respect 
private to a man's own power, glory, amplification, con- 
tinuance ; as appeareth plainly, when it findeth a contrary 
subject For that gigantine state of mind which pos- 
sesseth the troublers of the world, such as was Lucius 
Sylla and infinite ' other in smaller model, who would 
have all men happy or unhappy as they were their friends 
or enemies, and would give form to the world, according 
to their own humours (which is the true theomachy), 
pretendeth and aspireth to active good, though it recedeth 
furthest from good of society, which we have determined 
to be the greater. 

2. To resume passive good, it receiveth a subdivision of 
conservative and perfective. For let us take a brief review 
of that which we have said : we have spoken first of the 
good of society, the intention whereof embraceth the 
form of human nature, whereof we are members and 
portions, and not our own proper and individual form : 
we have spoken of active good, and supposed it as a 
part of private and particular good. And rightly, for there 
is impressed upon all things a triple desire or appetite 
proceeding from love to themselves ; one of preserving 
and continuing their form; another of advancing and 
perfecting their form; and a third of multiplying and 



CXI. a.] THE SECOND BOOK. J 95 

xtending their form upon other things: whereof the 
Qultipl)dng, or signature of it upon other things, is that 
/hlch we handled by the name of active good. So as 
bere remaineth the conserving of it, and perfecting or 
aising of it; which latter is the highest degree of 
>assive good. For to preserve in state is the less, 
preserve with advancement is the greater. So in 
ttan, 

Igneus est ollis rigor, et caelestis origo. 

lis approach or assumption to divine or angelical na- 

iire is the perfection of his form; the error or false 

nitation of which good is that which is the tempest of 

an life ; while man, upon the instinct of an advance- 

nt formal and essential, is carried to seek an ad- 
ancement local. For as those which are sick, and find 
.0 remedy, do tumble up and down and change place, 
s if by a remove local they could obtain a remove in- 
irnal; so is it with men in ambition, when failing of 
le mean to exalt their nature, they are in a perpetual 
ion to exalt their place. So then passive good is, 
5 was said, either conservative or perfective. 

3. To resume the good of conservation or comfort, 
hich consisteth in the fruition of that which is agree- 
i)le to our natures; it seemeth to be the most pure 
ad natural of pleasures, but yet the softest and the 
►west. And this also receiveth a difference, which hath 
either been well judged of, nor well inquired: for the 
ood of fruition or contentment is placed either in the 
ncereness of the fruition, or in the quickness and 
igour of it; the one superinduced by equality, the 
ther by vicissitude ; the one having less mixture of evil, 
le other more impression of good. Whether of these is 
ae greater good is a question controverted ; but whether 

o 2 



20a OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXI, 

So the case was doubtful, and had opinion on both si 
Again, we see when M. Brutus and Cassius invitee 
a supper certain whose opinions they meant to 1 
whether they were fit to be made their associates, 
cast forth the question touching the killing of a tyi 
being an usurper, they were divided in opinion; s( 
holding that servitude was the extreme of evils, and otl 
that tyranny was better than a civil war : and a numbe 
the like cases there are of comparative duty. Amoi 
which that of all others is the most frequent, where 
question is of a great deal of good to ensue of a si 
injustice. WTiich Jason of Thessalia determined aga 
the truth: Aliqtia sunt injuste facimda, ut mtdta juste ^ 
possint. But the reply is good, Auctorem prcesentis 
titiic habeSj spomorcm futurcB non habes. Men must pui 
things which are just in present, and leave the futur 
the divine Providence. So then we pass on from 
general part touching the exemplar and descriptioi 
good. 

XXII. I. Now therefore that we have spoken of 

fruit of life, it remaineth to speak of the \ 

Diodtyra bandr\' that belonsreth thereunto: witl 

'«*hich part the former seemeth to be no b 

than a fair image, or statua, which is beautiful to com 

plate, but is without life and motion ; whereunto Aris: 

hi df subscribeth in these words : S^cesse est scilic 

virh dicere^ et quid sity et ex quihus gtgnatur. In 

tf merit virtuUm quiSem n^^sse. acquirendtz autem 

m '. Xcn enim de rirtuie tantum^ 

m tO^ qtka esiy sed et quj^mcdo sui copiam fai 

m en t\yhpmms^ ei rest i/sjm nosse^ et ejus com^ 

r <miim ex f\\v ir/» sst^vrJ^t. nisi sciamus et ex 

In such full wonls and with such iters 



[XII. I.] THE SECOND BOOK. 203 

0th he inculcate this part. So saith Cicero in great com- 
lendation of Cato the second, that he had applied himself 
) philosophy, Non ita disputandi causa, sed ita vtvendi. 
jid although the neglect of our times, wherein few men 
hold any consultations touching the reformation of 
leir life (as Seneca excellently saith, De partibus dUcb 
uisque deliberate de summa nenio), may make this part 
ttm superfluous ; yef I must conclude with that aphor- 
;m of Hippocrates, Qui gravi morbo correpti dolores non 
miiuni, iis mens (Bgroiat, They need medicine, not only 
3 assuage the disease, but to awake the sense. And if 
: be said, that the cure of men's minds belongeth to 
acred divinity, it is most true : but yet moral philosophy 
oay be preferred unto her as a wise servant and humble 
landmaid. For as the Psalm saith, That the eyes of the 
vmdmaid look perpetually towards the mistress, and yet no 
loubt many things are left to the discretion of the hand- 
naid, to discern of the mistress' will ; so ought moral 
ihilosophy to give a constant attention to the doctrines 
f divinity, and yet so as it may yield of herself (within 

limits) many sound and profitable directions. 

2. This part therefore, because of the excellency thereof, 

cannot but find exceeding strange that it is not reduced 

> written inquiry: the rather, because it consisteth of 

I matter, wherein both speech and action is often 

ersant ; and such wherein the common talk of men 

b is rare, but yet cometh sometimes to pass) is 

than their books. It is reasonable therefore that 

6 propound it in the more particularity, both for the 

Mthiness, and because we may acquit ourselves for 

[X)rting it deficient; which seemeth almost incredible, 

c )therwise conceived and presupposed by those them- 

58 that have written. We will therefore enumerate 



204 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING, [X3 

some heads or points thereof, that it may appea 
better what it is, and whether it be extant. 

3. First therefore in this, as in all things whicl 
practical, we ought to cast up our account, what 
our power, and what not ; for the one may be dealt 
by way of alteration, but the other by way of applic 
only. The husbandman cannot command, neithe 
nature of the earth, nor the seasons of the weathei 
more can the physician the constitution of the patien 
the variety of accidents. So in the culture and a 
the mind of man, two things are without our comn 
points of nature, and points of fortune. For to the 
of the one, and the conditions of the other, our w 
limited and tied. In these things therefore it is left 
us to proceed by application : 

Vincenda est omnis fortuna ferendo: 

and so likewise, 

Vincenda est omnis Natura ferendo. 

But when that we speak of suflfering, we do not sp( 
a dull and neglected suflfering, but of a wise and i 
trious suflfering, which draweth and contriveth use ar 
^'antage out of that which seemeth adverse and con 
which is that properly which we call acconunoc 
or apph-ing. Now the wisdom of application r 
principally in the exact and distinct knowledge c 
precedent state or disposition, unto which we do a 
for we cannot fit a garment, except we first take 
sure of the body. 

4. So then the first article of this knowledge is, 
down sound and true distributions and descriptions 
several characters and tempers of men's natures an 
positk>iis; specially haWng regard to those diflfei 
whiA ire most radical in being the fountains and < 



.] THE SECOND BOOK. 205 

rest, or most frequent in concurrence or com- 
i ; wherein it is not the handling of a few of them in 
J, the better to describe the mediocrities of virtues, 
,n satisfy this intention. For if it deserve to be 
Ted, that there are minds which are proportioned 
it matters, and others to small (which Aristotle 
h or ought to have handled by the name of 
limity), doth it not deserve as well to be con- 
, that there are minds proportioned to intend many 
1, and others to few? So that some can divide 
Ives : others can perchance do exactly well, but it 
►e but in few things at once : and so there cometh 
a narrowness of mind, as well as a pusillanimity, 
gain, that some minds are proportioned to that 
may be dispatched at once, or within a short 
of time ; others to that which begins afar off, and 
I won with length of pursuit : 

Jam turn tenditque fo^etque. 

t there may be fitly said to be a longanimity, which 
monly also ascribed to God as a magnanimity. So 
deserved it to be considered by Aristotle, 7>^/ 
f a disposition in conversation (supposing it in things 
do in no sort touch or concern a maris self) to soothe 
ease; and a disposition contrary to contradict and 
and deserveth it not much better to be considered, 
here is a disposition^ not in conversation or talky but 
ter of more serious nature (and supposing it still in 
merely indifferent^^ to take pleasure in the good of 
•; and a disposition contrariwise^ to take distaste at 
d of another? which is that properly which we call 
nature or ill nature, benignity or malignity: and 
►re I cannot sufficiently marvel that this part of 
jdge, touching the several characters of natures 



206 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [3 

and dispositions, should be omitted both in morali 
policy; considering it is of so great ministry ant 
peditation to them both. A man shall find in the 
itions of astrology some pretty and apt divisions of 
natures, according to the predominances of the pi 
lovers of quiet, lovers of action, lovers of victory, 
of honour, lovers of pleasure, lovers of arts, lov 
change, and so forth. A man shall find in the wise 
of these relations which the Italians make touching 
claves, the natures of the several cardinals hands 
and lively painted forth. A man shall meet w 
every day's conference the denominations of sei 
dry, formal, real, humorous, certain, huomo di pri 
pressione, huomo di uliifna impressione, and the like 
yet nevertheless this kind of observations wander 
words, but is not fixed in inquiry. For the distin 
are found (many of them), but we conclude no pr 
upon them : wherein our fault is the greater ; b 
both history, poesy, and daily experience are as [ 
fields where these observations grow ; whereof we 
a few posies to hold in our hands, but no man br 
them to the confectionary, that receipts mought be 
of them for use of life. 

5. Of much like kind are those impressions of i 
which are imposed upon the mind by the sex, by tl 
by the region, by health and sickness, by beaul 
deformity, and the like, which are inherent an 
extern; and again, those which are caused by 
fortune; as sovereignty, nobility, obscure birth, : 
want, magistracy, privateness, prosperity, adversitj 
slant fortune, variable fortune, rising per saltut 
gradusy and the like. And therefore we see that I 
aaketh it a wonder to see an old man bene 



:XII. 5.] THE SECOND BOOK. 207 

tnignitas hujus ut adolescentuli est. Saint Paxil concludeth 
hat severity of discipline was to be used to the Cretans, 
ncrepa eos dure, upon the disposition of their country, 
Creienses semper mendaces, malm bestice, venires pigri, 
Sallust noteth that it is usual with kings to desire con- 
tradictories : Sed plerumque regies voluniates, ut vehementes 
sunt, sic mobiles, scepeque ipsce sibi adverser, Tacitus ob- 
serveth how rarely raising of the fortune mendeth the 
disposition ; solus Vespasianus mutatus in melius, Pin- 
daras maketh an observation, that great and sudden 
fortune for the most part defeateth men qui magnam/eli" 
ciiatem concoquere non possunt. So the Psalm showeth it 
is more easy to keep a measure in the enjoying of for- 
tune, than in the increase of fortune : Divitice si affluant, 
noltk cor apponere. These observations and the like I 
deny not but are touched a little by Aristotle as in 
passage in his Rhetorics, and are handled in some 
scattered discourses: but they were never incorporate 
•ral philosophy, to which they do essentially apper- 
tain; as the knowledge of the diversity of grounds and 
DO doth to agriculture, and the knowledge of the 
of complexions and constitutions doth to the 
dcian; except we mean to follow the indiscretion 
i empirics, which minister the same medicines to sdi 

6. Another article of this knowledge is the inquiry 

g the affections ; for as in medicining of the body, 

t is order first to know the divers complexions and 

ions; secondly, the diseases; and lastly, the 

I 80 in medicining of the mind, after knowledge of 

C icters of men's natures, it followeth in 

jr diseases and infirmities of the mind, 

than the perturbations and distempers 



208 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXILI 

of the affections. For as the ancient politiques 
popular estates were wont to compare the people to th 
sea, and the orators to the winds; because as S6 
would of itself be calm and quiet, if the winds 
move and trouble it ; so the people would be peac 
and tractable, if the seditious orators did not set them it 
working and agitation : so it may be fitiy said, that ti» 
mind in the nature thereof would be temperate and 
stayed, if the affections, as winds, did not put it into tumob 
and perturbation. And here again I find strai , 
before, that Aristotle should have written divers vc fi 
of Ethics, and never handled the affections, which is 
principal subject thereof; and yet in his Rhetorics, wh 
they are considered but collaterally and in a secow 
degree (as they may be moved by speech), he find 
place for them, and handleth them well for the quantity; 
but where their true place is, he pretermitteth them. For 
it is not his disputations about pleasure and pain that can 
satisfy this inquiry, no more than he that should generallf 
handle the nature of light can be said to handle the nature 
of colours; for pleasure and pain are to the particulir 
affections, as light is to particular colours. Better til- 
vails, I suppose, had the Stoics taken in this argument, as 
far as I can gather by that which we have at second hand. 
But yet it is like it was after their manner, rather in 
subtilty of definitions (which in a subject of this nature 
are but curiosities), than in active and ample descripdons 
and observations. So likewise I find some particular 
writings of an elegant nature, touching some of the af- 
fections ; as of anger, of comfort upon adverse accidentti 
of tenderness of countenance, and other. But the poett 
and writers of histories are the best doctors of this knot* 
ledge ; where we may find painted forth with great life 



XXII. 6.] THE SECOND BOOK. 209 

how affections are kindled ana incited ; and how pacified 

and refrained; and how again contained from act and 

further degree ; how they disclose themselves ; how they 

work ; how they vary ; how they gather and fortify ; how 

they are enwrapped one within another; and how they 

do fight and encounter one with another ; and other the 

like particularities. Amongst the which this last is of 

special use in moral and civil matters; how, I say, to set 

affection against affection, and to master one by another ; 

even as we use to hunt beast with beast, and fly bird 

\vith bird, which otherwise percase we could not so easily 

recover : upon which foundation is erected that excellent 

use of prcemium and poena, whereby civil states consist : 

employing the predominant affections of fear and hope, 

for the suppressing and bridling the rest. For as in the 

government of states it is sometimes necessary to bridle 

one faction with another, so it is in the government 

within. 

7. Now come we to those points which are within our 
own command, and have force and operation upon the 
mind, to affect the will and appetite, and t© alter man- 
ners: wherein they ought to have handled custom, 
exercise, habit, education, example, imitation, emulation, 
company, friends, praise, reproof, exhortation, fame, laws, 
books, studies : these as they have determinate use in 
moralities, from these the mind suflfereth; and of these 
are such receipts and regiments compounded and de- 
scribed, as may serve to recover or preserve the health 
and good estate of the mind, as far as pertaineth to 
human medicine : of which number we will insist upon 
some one or two, as an example of the rest, because it 
were too long to prosecute all; and therefore we do 
resume custom and habit to speak of. 

p 



310 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXII. S. 

8. The opinion of Aristoue seemeth to me a negligent ] 
opinion, that of those things which consist by nature, 
nothing can be changed by custom ; using for exam];Je, 
that if a stone be thrown ten thousand times up, it will 
not leam to ascend ; and that by often seeing or hearing, 
we do not learn to see or hear the better. For though 
this principle be true in things wherein nature is per- 
emptory (the reason whereof we cannot now stand to 
discuss), yet it is otherwise in things wherein nature 
admitteth a latitude. For he mought see that a strait 
glove will come more easily on with use; and that a 
wand will by use bend otherwise than it grew ; and that 
by use of the voice we speak louder and stronger ; and 
that by use of enduring heat or cold, we endure it the 
better, and the like : which latter sort have a nearer re- 
semblance unto that subject of manners he handleth, 
than those instances which he illegeth. But allowing 
his conclusion, that virtues and vices consist in halxt, be 
ought so much the more to have taught the manner of 
superinducing that habit: for there be many precepts 
of the wise ordering the exercises of the mind, as there 

is of ordering the exercises of the body ; whereof we will 
recite a few. 

9. The first shall be, that we beware we take not at 
the first, either too high a strain, or too weak: for if 
too high, in a difiident nature you discourage, in a con- 
fident nature you breed an opinion of facility, and so a 
sloth ; and in all natures you breed a further expectatioD 
than can hold out, and so an insatisfaction in the end : if 
too weak, of the other side, you may not look to perfonn 
and overcome any great task. 

10. Another precept is, to practise all things diiefljrat 
two several times, the one when the mind is besi dis- 



CXII. lo.] THE SECOND BOOK. ail 

% 
)osed, the other when it is worst disposed ; that by the 

)ne you may gain a great step, by the other you may 

vork out the knots and stonds of the mind, and make 

he middle times the more easy and pleasant. 

11. Another precept is, that which Aristotle men- 
aeth by the way, which is to bear ever towards the 

:ontrary extreme of that whereunto we are by nature 
ined; like unto the rowing against the stream, or 
dng a wand straight by bending him contrary to his 

le 1 crookedness. 

12. Another precept is, that the mind is brought to 
uiTthing better, and with more sweetness and happiness, 
f that whereunto you pretend be not first in the intention, 
t)Ut ianqtiam aliud agendo, because of the natural hatred of 
lie mind against necessity and constraint. Many other 
ixioms there are touching the managing of exercise and 
:ustom; which being so conducted, doth prove indeed 
mother nature; but being governed by chance, doth 
:ommonly prove but an ape of nature, and bringeth forth 
hat which is lame and counterfeit. 

13. So if we should handle books and studies, and 
<rhat influence and operation they have upon manners, 

there not divers precepts of great caution and direc- 
ion appertaining thereunto ? Did not one of the fathers 
g^eat indignation call poesy vinum dosmonum^ because 
t increaseth temptations, perturbations, and vain opinions? 
[s not the opinion of Aristotle worthy to be regarded, 
wherein he saith, That young men are no fit auditors of 
al philosophy, because they are not settled from the 
be 1; heat of their affections, nor attempered with time 
and experience ? And doth it not hereof come, that those 
excellent books and discourses of the ancient writers 
(whereby they have persuaded unto virtue most eflfectually, 

p 2 



212 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXII. 

by representing her in state and majesty, and po] 
opinions against virtue in their parasites' coats fit tc 
scorned and derided), are of so little eflfect towards hoE 
of life, because they are not read and revolved by men 
their mature and settled years, but confined almost '■ 
boys and beginners ? But is it not true also, that mu 
less young men are fit auditors of matters of poll 
till they have been throughly seasoned in religion a 
morality; lest their judgements be corrupted, and 
apt to think that there are no true diff'erences of tl 
but according to utility and fortune, as the verse A 
scribes it, Prosperum et felix scelus virtus vocatur; l 
again, Ille crucem preiium sceleris iulity hie diadema : \ 
the poets do speak satirically, and in indignation » 
virtue's behalf; but books of policy do speak it seric 
and positively ; for so it pleaseth Machiavel to say, 2! 
if C(Bsar had been overlhrown, he would have been i 
odious than ever was Catiline; as if there had been no 
difference, but in fortune, between a very fiiry of lust and 
blood, and the most excellent spirit (his ambition reserved) 
of the world ? Again, is there not a caution likewise to 
be given of the doctrines of moralities themselves (some 
kinds of them), lest they make men too precise, arrogant, 
incompatible ; as Cicero saith of Cato, In Marco CaUmt 
hcBc bona quce videmus divina et egregia, ipsius sciiote esse 
propria; quce nonnunquam requirimus^ ea sunt omnia non 
a natura, sed a magistro? Many other axioms and advices 
there are touching those proprieties and effects^ which 
studies do infuse and instil into manners. And so like- 
wise is there touching the use of all those other points, 
of company, fame, laws, and the rest, which we recited in 
the beginning in the doctrine of morality. 

14. But there is a kind of culture of the mind that 



XII. 14.] THE SECOND BOOK, 3I3 

e th yet more accurate and elaborate than the rest, 
1 is built upon this ground ; that the minds of all men 
i at some times in a state more perfect, and at other 
imes in a state more depraved. The purpose therefore 
)f this practice is to fix and cherish the good hours of 
die mind, and to obliterate and take forth the evil. The 
^xing of the good hath been practised by two means, 
vows or constant resolutions, and observances or ex- 
ercises; which are not to be regarded so much in 
themselves, as because they keep the mind in continual 
obedience. The obliteration of the evil hath been prac- 
i by two means, some kind of redemption or expiation 
of that which is past, and an inception or account de novo 
for the time to coriie. But this part seemeth sacred and 
religious, and justly; for all good moral philosophy (as 
was said) is but an handmaid to religion. 

15. Wherefore we will conclude with that last point, 
which is of all other means the most compendious and 
summary, and again, the most noble and effectual to the 
reducing of the mind imto virtue and good estate ; which 
is, the electing and propounding unto a man's self good 
and virtuous ends of his life, such as may be in a reason- 
able sort within his compass to attain. For if these two 
things be supposed, that a man set before him honest 
and good ends, and again, that he be resolute, constant, 
and true unto them; it will follow that he shall mould 
himself into all virtue at once. And this is indeed like 
the work of nature ; whereas the other course is like the^ 
work of the hand. For as when a carver makes an 
image, he shapes only that part whereupon he worketh ; 
as if he be upon the face, that part which shall be the 
body is but a rude stone still, till such times as he comes 
to it. But contrariwise when nature makes a flower or 



214 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXII. ij 

living creature, she formeth rudiments of all the parts & 
one time. ^So in obtaining virtue by habit, while a man 
practiseth temperance, he doth not profit much to forth 
tude, nor the like : but when he dedicateth and appli 
himself to good ends, look, what virtue soever the ] 
suit and passage towards those ends doth commend u 
him, he is invested of a precedent disposition to confonn 
^himself thereunto. Which state of mind Aristotle doth 
excellently express himself, that it ought not to be < I 
virtuous, but divine: his words are these: - 
au^m consentaneum est opponere earn, qua supra humc 
tern esi, heroicam sive divinam viriutem : and a little aj 
Nam ui/ercB neque vitiunt neqtte virtus est^ sic nequt Dei: 
sed hie quidem status altius quiddam virtuie esty Hit cdid 
quiddam a vitio. And therefore we may see what cdai- 
tude of honour Plinius Secundus attributeth to Trajan ia 
his funeral oration ; where he said. That men needed to 
make no other prayers to the gods, but that they would am* 
tinue as good lords to them as Trajan had been; as if he 
had not been only an imitation of divine nature, but a 
pattern of it. But these be heathen and profane passages, 
having but a shadow of that divine state of mind, which 
religion and the holy faith doth conduct men unto, by 
imprinting upon their souls charity, which is excellently 
called the bond of perfection, because it comprehendetli 
and fasteneth ail virtues together. And as it is elegantly 
said by Menander of vain love, which is but a false 
imitation of divine love. Amor melior Sophista lavo aa 
humanam vitam, that love teacheth a man to cany himsell 
better than the sophist or preceptor, which he calletl: 
left-handed, because, with all his rules and preceptions, 
he cannot form a man so dexteriously, nor with thai 
facility to prize himself and govern himself, as love can 



XXn. 15.] THE SECOND BOOK. 315 

do : SO certainly, if a man's mind be truly inflamed with 
charity, it doth work him suddenly into greater perfection 
than all the doctrine of morality can do, which is but a 
sophist in comparison of the other. Nay further, as 
Xenophon observed truly, that all other aflfections, though 
they raise the mind, yet they do it by distorting and 
uncomeliness of ecstasies or excesses ; but only love doth 
exalt the mind, and nevertheless at the same instant doth 
settle and compose it : so in all other excellencies, though 
they advance nature, yet they are subject to excess. Only 
charity admitteth no excess. For so we see, aspiring to 
be like God in power, the angels transgressed and fell ; 
Ascendam, et ero similis altissimo : by aspiring to be like 
God in knowledge, man transgressed and fell; Eritis 
iicui Dii\ scientes bonum et malum : but by aspiring to a 
similitude of God in goodness or love, neither man nor 
angel ever transgressed, or shall transgress. For unto 
that imitation we are called: Diligite immicos vestros, 
hmrfacite eis qui oderunt vos, et orate pro persequentibus et 
calummantibus voSy ut sitis filii Patris vestri qui in ccelis 
fst, qui solem suum oriri facit super boms et malos, etpluit 
iuper justos et injustos. So in the first platform of the 
dinne nature itself, the heathen religion speaketh thus, 
Optimus Maximus: and the sacred scriptures thus, Miseri- 
cordia ejus super omnia opera ejus, 

16. Wherefore I do conclude this part of moral know- 
ledge, concerning the culture and regiment of the mind ; 
wherein if any man, considering the parts thereof which 
I have enumerated, do judge that my labour is but 
to collect into an art or science that which hath been 
pretermitted by others, as matter of common sense and 
experience, he judgeth well. But as Philocrates sported 
with Demosthenes, You may not marvel {Athenians) that 



2l6 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXl 

Demosthenes and I do differ; for he drinketh water ^ i 
drink wine; and like as we read of an ancient paral 
the two gates of sleep, 

Sunt geminsB somni portae: qnaram altera fertur 
Cornea, qua yens fadlis datnr exitus umbris: 
Altera candenti perfecta nitens elephanto. 
Bed falsa ad coelum mittunt insomDia manes: 

so if we put on sobriety and attention, we shall fiud 
sure maxim in knowledge, that the more pleasant li 
{of wine) is the more vaporous, and the braver gat 
ivory) sendeth forth the falser dreams. 

17. But we have now concluded that general pa 
human philosophy, which contemplateth man segre 
and as he consisteth of body and spirit. Wherein we 
further note, that there seemeth to be a relation or 
formity between the good of the mind and the goo 
the body. For as we divided the good of the body 
health, beauty, strength, and pleasure; so the goo 
the mind, inquired in rational and moral knowle( 
tendeth to this, to make the mind sound, and wit 
perturbation; beautiful, and graced with decency; 
strong and agile for all duties of life. These three, a 
the body, so in the mind, seldom meet, and comm 
sever. For it is easy to observe, that many have stre 
of wit and courage, but have neither health from 
turbations, nor any beauty or decency in their doi 
some again have an elegancy and fineness of carri 
which have neither soimdness of honesty, nor substi 
of sufficiency : and some again have honest and refor 
minds, that can neither become themselves nor mai 
business : and sometimes two of them meet^ and n 
all three. As for pleasure, we have likewise determ 
that the mind ought not to be reduced to stupid, bi 



XXII. 1 7.] THE SECOND BOOK, %lj 

retain pleasure ; confined rather in the subject ol it, than 
in the strength and vigour of it. 

XXIII. I. /^^IVIL knowledge is conversant about a 
^^ subject which of all others is most 
immersed in matter, and hardliest reduced to axiom. 
Nevertheless, as Cato the Censor said, That the Romans 
were like sheep ^ for that a man were better drive a flock of 
ihevij than one of them; for in a flock ^ if you could get hut 
some few go right, the rest would follow : so in that respect 
moral philosophy is more difficile than poKcy. Again, 
moral philosophy propoundeth to itself the framing of 
internal goodness ; but civil knowledge requireth only an 
external goodness ; for that as to society sufficeth. And 
therefore it cometh oft to pass that there be evil times 
in good governments : for so we find in the holy story, 
when the kings were good, yet it is added, Sed adhuc 
populus non direxerat cor suum ad Dominum Deum patrum 
morum. Again, states, as great engines, move slowly, 
and are not so soon put out of frame : for as in Egypt 
the seven good years sustained the seven bad, so govern- 
ments for a time well grounded, do bear out errors fol- 
lowing ; but the resolution of particular persons is more 
suddenly subverted. These respects do somewhat qualify 
the extreme difficulty of civil knowledge. 

2. This knowledge hath three parts, according to 
the three summary actions of society; which are con- 
versation, negotiation, and government. For man seeketh 
in society comfort, use, and protection : and they be three 
wisdoms of divers natures, which do often sever : wisdom 
of the behaviour, wisdom of business, and wisdom of 
state. 

3. The wisdom of conversation ought not to be over 



2l8 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXUI.! 

much affected, but much less despised ; for it hath 
only an honour in itself, but an influence also into 1 
ness and government. The poet saith. Nee vuliu desi 
verba tuo: a man may destroy the force of his words 
with his coimtenance : so may he of his deeds, saith 
Cicero, recommending to his brother affability and easy 
access ; Nil interest habere ostium apertum, vultum ciausum; 
it is nothing won to admit men with an open door, and 
to receive them with a shut and reserved countenance 
So we see Atticus, before the first interview between 
Caesar and Cicero, the war depending, did seriously 
advise Cicero touching the composing and ordering of 
his countenance and gesture. And if the government of 
the countenance be of such effect, much more is that 
of the speech, and other carriage appertaining to con- 
versation ; the true model whereof seemeth to me well ex- 
pressed by Livy, thought not meant for this purpose : Ne 
aut arrogans videar, aut obnoxius; quorum alterum est 
alienee liber tatis obliti^ alterum suce : the sum of behaviour 
is to retain a man's own dignity, without intruding upon 
the liberty of others. On the other side, if behaviour 
and outward carriage be intended too much, first it may 
pass into affectation, and then Quid deformius qwm 
scenam in vitam transferrer to act a man*s life? But 
although it proceed not to that extreme, yet it consmnett 
time, and employeth the mind too much. And therefore 
as we use to advise young students from compan} 
keeping, by saying, Amicifures temporis: so certainly the 
intending of the discretion of behaviour is a great thie 
of meditation. Again, such as are accomplished in tha 
form of urbanity please themselves in it, and seldon 
aspire to higher virtue ; whereas those that have defect ii 
it do seek comeliness by reputation; for where reputatioi 



XXUI. 3.] THE SECOND BOOK. 31 9 

is, almost everything becometh ; but where that is 
not, it must be supplied by punios and compliments. 
Again, there is no greater impediment of action than an 
over-curious observance of decency, and the guide of 
decency, which is time and season. For as Salomon 
saith, Qui respicit ad ventos^ non seminal; ei qui respicit 
ad nudes, non meiet: a man must niake his opportunity, 
as oft as find it To conclude, behaviour seemeth to me 
as a garment of the mind, and to have the conditions of 
a garment. For it ought to be made in fashion; it 
ought not to be too curious ; it ought to be shaped so as 
to set forth any good making of the mind and hide any 
deformity; and above all, it ought not to be too strait or 
restrained for exercise or motion. But this part of civil 
bowledge hath been elegantly handled, and therefore I 
cannot report it for deficient. 

4. The wisdom touching negotiation or business hath 
not been hitherto collected into writing, to j)e mgotiis 
the great derogation of learning, and the gerendis. 
professors of learning. For from this root springeth 
chiefly that note or opinion, which by us is expressed in 
adage to this effect, that there is no great concurrence 
between learning and wisdom. For of the three wisdoms 
which we have set down to pertain to civil life, for wisdom 
of behaviour, it is by learned men for the most part de- 
spised, as an inferior to virtue and an enemy to meditation; 
for wisdom of government, they acquit themselves well 
when they are called to it, but that happeneth to few; 
but for the wisdom of business, wherein man's life is most 
conversant, there be no books of it, except some tew 
scattered advertisements, that have nc proportion to the 
magnitude of this subject. For if books were written of 
this as the other, I doubt not but learned men with mean 



220 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXflL, 

experience, would far excel men of long experience ¥ 
out learning, and outshoot them in their own bow. 
5. Neither needeth it at all to be doubted, tl 
knowledge should be so variable as it falleth not under 
precept; for it is much less infinite than science of gown- 
ment, which we see is laboured and in some part it- 
duced. Of this wisdom it seemeth some of the ancient 
Romans in the saddest and wisest times were professois; 
for Cicero reporteth, that it was then in use for senatois 
that had name and opinion for general wise men, as 
Coruncanius, Curius, Lgelius, and many others, to walk 
at certain hours in the Place, and to, give audience to 
those that would use their advice ; and that the particnlar 
citizens would resort unto them, and consult with them of 
the marriage of a daughter, or of the employing of a son, 
or of a purchase or bargain, or of an accusation, and 
every other occasion incident to man's life. So as there 
is a wisdom of counsel and advice even in private causeSi 
arising out of an universal insight into the affairs of tbe 
world ; which is used indeed upon particular cases pro- 
pounded, but is gathered by general observation of cases 
of like nature. For so we see in the book which Q. Cicero 
writeth to his brother, De petitione consulaius (being the 
only book of business that I know written by the ancients) 
although it concerned a particular action then on fi)Ot 
yet the substance thereof consisteth of many wise an< 
politic axioms, which contain not a temporary, but : 
perpetual direction in the case of popular elections. Bi] 
chiefly we may see in those aphorisms which have plac 
amongst divine writings, composed by Salomon the ki 
of whom the scriptures testify that his heart was as tb 
sands of the sea, encompassing the world and all world] 
matters, we see, I say, not a few profound and ezceller 



XXIII. 5.] THE SECOND BOOK, 221 

cautions, precepts, positions, extending to much variety 
)f occasions ; whereupon we will stay a while, offering to 
consideration some number of examples. 

6. Sed et cunciis sermonihus qui dicuntur ne accommodes 
lurem iuam^ ne forte audias servum iuum maledicentem tibi. 
Here is commended the provident stay of inquiry of that 
which we would be loth to find : as it was judged great 
wisdom in Pompeius Magnus that he burned Sertorius' 
papers unperused, 

Vir sapiens, si cum stulto conienderii, sive irascatur, 
rive rideai, non inveniet requiem. Here is described the 
jreat disadvantage which a wise man hath in undertaking 
a lighter person than himself; which is such an engage- 
ment as, whether a man turn the matter to jest, or turn it 
to heat, or howsoever he change copy, he can no ways 
quit himself well of it. 

Qui delicate apueritia nutrit servum suum, postea sentiet 
WOT cmtumacem. Here is signified, that if a man begin 
too high a pitch in his favours, it doth commonly end in 
unkindness and unthankfulness. 

Vidisti virum velocem in opere suo ? coram regihus stahit, 
^c erii inter ignobiles. Here is observed, that of all virtues 
for rising to honour, quickness of despatch is the best; 
for superiors many times love not to have those they 
employ too deep or too sufficient, but ready and diligent. 

Vidi cunctos viventes qui ambulant sub sole, cum adoles- 
^^nk secundo qui consurgit pro eo. Here is expressed that 
which was noted by Sylla first, and after him by Tiberius; 
J^lures adorant solem orientem quam occidentem vel meri" 
dianum. 

Si spiritus potestatem habentis ascenderit super /f, locum 
^um ne dimiseris ; quia curatio faciei cessare peccata 
^xima. Here caution is given, that upon displeasure, 



22::& OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXIIL 6- 

retiring is of all courses the unfittest ; for a man leavedi 
things at worst, and depriveth himself of means to make 
them better. 

Ura/ civitas parva, ef pauci in ea virt: venii contra earn 
rex magnuSy et vallavii eam^ imtruxitque munitioner per 
gyruMf et perfeda est obsidio; inventusque est in ea vir 
pauper et sapiens^ et liberavit earn per sapientiam stuun; ei 
nullus deinceps recordaius est hominis illius pauperis. Here 
the corruption of states is set forth, that esteem not virtue 
or merit longer than they have use of it. 

Mollis responsio frangit iram. Here is noted thai 
silence or rough answer exasperateth ; but an answei 
present and temperate pacifieth. 

Iter pigrorum quasi sepes spinarum. Here is livel) 
represented how laborious sloth proveth in the end : foi 
when things are deferred till the last instant, and nothing 
prepared beforehand, every step findeth a brier or im^ 
pediment, which catcheth or stoppeth. 

Melior est finis orationis quant principium. Here i 
taxed the vanity of formal speakers, that study more abc 
prefaces and inducements, than upon the conclusions anc 
issues of speech. 

Qui cognoscit in judicio faciemy non hemfadt; isie et pfi 
huccella panis deseret veritaiem. Here is noted, that i 
judge were better be a briber than a respecter of per 
sons ; for a corrupt judge oflfendeth not so lightly as j 
facile. 

Vir pauper calumnians pauperes similis est imhri vehem 
entiy in quo paratur fames. Here is expressed the ex 
tremity of necessitous extortions, figured in the anden 
fable of the full and the hungry horseleech. 

Fons turbaius pede, et vena corrupta, est fusfus cadem 
coram impio. Here is noted, that one judicial anc 



XXIII. 6.] THE SECOND BOOK. 22^ 

exemplar iniquity in the face of the world doth trouble 
the fountains of justice more than many particular injuries 
passed over by connivance. 

Qui suhirahit aliquid a paire et a maire, et dicit hoc non 
esse peccaium, pariiceps est homicidii. Here is noted, that 
whereas men in wtonging their best friends use to ex- 
tenuate their fault, as if they mought presume or be bold 
upon them, it doth contrariwise indeed aggravate their 
fault, and turneth it from injury to impiety. 

Noli esse amicus homini iracundOy nee amhulato cum 
homne /urioso. Here caution is given, that in the election 
of our friends we do principally avoid those which are 
impatient, as those that will espouse us to many factions 
and quarrels. 

Qui coniurhai domum suam^ possidebit ventum. Here 
is noted, that in domestical separations and breaches men 
do promise to themselves quieting of their mind and con- 
tentment ; but still they are deceived of their expectation, 
and it turneth to wind. 

Filius sapiens IcEtificai patrem: filius vero stultus moestitia 
est matri suce. Here is distinguished, that fathers have 
most comfort of the good proof of their sons; but 
mothers have most discomfort of their ill proof, because 
women have little discerning of virtue, but of fortune. 

Qui celat delictum ^ qucerit amicitiam; sed qui alter o ser^ 
none repetitj separat fcBderatos, Here caution is given, that 
reconcilement is better managed by an amnesty, and 
passing over that which is past, than by apologies and 
excusations. 

In omni opere bono erii abundantia; ubi autem verba 
^nt plurimay ibi frequenter egestas. Here is noted, that 
words and discourse aboundeth most where there is 
idleness and want 



224 02^ ^^^ ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXIII 

Primus in sim causa Justus ; sed venit altera pars^ 
inquiret in eum. Here is observed, that in all cau 
the first tale possesseth much; in sort, that the ; 
judice thereby wrought will be hardly removed, excep 
some abuse or falsity in the information be detected. 

Verba hilinguis quasi simplicia, et ipsa perveniurd (b 
interiora ventris. Here is distinguished, that flatter 
and insinuation, which seemeth set and artificial, sink 
eth not far ; but that entereth deep which hath show o 
nature, liberty, and simplicity. 

Qui erudit derisorem, ipse sibi injuriam facit ; et 
arguit impiunif sibi maculam generat. Here caution i 
given how we tender reprehension to arrogant and scorn 
ful natures, whose manner is to esteem it for contumelj 
and accordingly to return it. 

Da sapienti occasio7iem^ et addetur ei sapientia. Here i 
distinguished the wisdom brought into habit, and t 
which is but verbal and swimming only in conceit ; fc 
the one upon the occasion presented is quickened a 
redoubled, the other is amazed and confused. 

Quomodo in aquis resplendent vultus prospicieni i 
cor da hominum mani/esta sunt prudentibus. Here the i 
of a wise man is compared to a glass, wherein the ii 
of all diversity of natures and customs are reprei ite< 
from which representation proceedeth that application, 

Qui sapit, innumeris moribus aptus erit. 

7. Thus have I stayed somewhat longer upon the 
sentences politic of Salomon than is agreeable to tl 
proportion of an example; led with a desire to gi 
authority to this part of knowledge, which I noted 
deficient, by so excellent a precedent; and have al 
attended them with brief observations, such as to i 
understanding offer no violence to the sense, though 



XXin. ^] THE SECOND BOOK. 22^ 

know they may be applied to a more divine use: but 
it is allowed, even in divinity, that some interpretations, 
yea, and some writings, have more of the eagle than 
others; but taking them as instructions for life, they 
mought have received large discourse, if I would have 
broken them and illustrated them by deducements and 
examples. 

8. Neither was this in use only with the Hebrews, but 
it is generally to be found in the wisdom of the more 
ancient times; that as men found out any observation 
that they thought was good for life, they would gather 
it and express it in parable or aphorism or fable. But 
for fables, they were vicegerents and supplies where 
eiraunples failed: now that the times abound with his- 
tory, the aim is better when the mark is alive. And 
therefore the form of writing which of all others is fittest 
for this variable argument of negotiation and occasions 
is that which Machiavel chose wisely and aptly for govern- 
ment ; namely, discourse upon histories or examples. For 
knowledge drawn freshly and in our view out of particu- 
lars, knoweth the way best to particulars again. And it 
hath much greater life for practice when the discourse 
attendeth upon the example, than when the example 
attendeth upon the discourse. For this is no point of 
order, as it seemeth at first, but of substance. For 
when the example is the ground, being set down in an 
history at large, it is set down with all circumstances, 
which may sometimes control the discourse thereupon 
made, and sometimes supply it, as a very pattern for 
action ; whereas the examples alleged for the discourse's 
sake are cited succinctly, and without particularity, and 
carry a servile aspect towards the discourse which they 
are brought in to make good. 

Q 



7,26 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXIIlf, 

9. But this difference is not amiss to be remembered, 
that as history of times is the best ground for discourse 
of government, such as Machiavel handleth, so histoiies 
of lives is the most proper for discourse of business, 
because it is more conversant in private actions. Nay 
there is a ground of discourse for this purpose fitte 
than them both, which is discourse upon letters, sud 
as are wise and weighty, as many are of Cicero ai 
Aiiicum^ and others. For letters have a great and men 
particular representation of business than either chronicle! 
or lives. Thus have we spoken both of the mat 
form of this part of civil knowledge, touching negotiati 
which we note to be deficient. 

10. But yet there is another part of this part, whicl 
differeth as much from that whereof we have spokei 
as sapere and sihi sapere, the one moving as it were t( 
the circumference, the other to the centre. For ther< 
is a wisdom of counsel, and again there is a wisdoo 
of pressing a man's own fortune; and they do some 
times meet, and often sever. For many are wise ii 
their own ways that are weak for government or a 
sels; like ants, which is a wise creature for itself, 1 
ver}' hurtful for the garden. This wisdom the R 

did take much knowledge of: Nam pol sapiens ( 1 tb 
comical poet) fingii foriunam sihi; and it grew to a: 
adage, Faher quisque forturuB proprice; and Livy attri 
buted it to Cato the first. In hoc viro tanta vis an 
ei ingenii inerat^ ui quocunque loco ncUus esset sUn ip 
fortunam facturtis videretur. 

11. This conceit or position, if it be too mndi declare 
and professed, hath been thought a thing impolitic ai 
unlucky, as was observed in Timotheus tbe Athenia: 
who, having done many great services tio tbe estate i 



XXIII. II.] THE SECOND BOOK. 227 

his government, and giving an account thereof to the 
people as the manner was, did conclude every particu- 
lar with this clause, And in this fortune had no part. 
And it came so to pass, that he never prospered in any 
thing he took in hand afterward. For this is too high and 
too arrogant, savouring of that which Ezekiel saith of 
Pharaoh, Dicis^ Fluvius est mens ei ego feci memet ipsum : 
or of that which another prophet speaketh, that men offer 
sacrifices to their nets and snares; and that which the 
poet expresseth, 

Dextra mihi Deus, et telum quod missile libro, 
Kunc adsint! 

For these confidences were ever unhallowed, and un- 
blessed: and therefore those that were great politiques 
indeed ever ascribed their successes to their felicity, and 
not to their skill or virtue. For so Sylla sumamed him- 
self Felix, not Magnus. So Caesar said to the master of 
the ship, Ccesarem portas etforiunam ejus, 

12. But yet nevertheless these positions, Faher quis^ 
peforiuncB suce: Sapiens dominahitur astris : Invia virtuti 
rmlla est via, and the like, being taken and used as spurs 
to industry, and not as stirrups to insolency, rather for 
resolution than for the presumption or outward de- 
claration, have been ever thought sound and good; and 
are no question imprinted in the greatest minds, who . 
are so sensible of this opinion, as they can scarce con- 
tain it within. As we see in Augustus Caesar (who was 
rather diverse from his uncle than inferior in virtue), how 
^hen he died he desired his friends about him to give 
him a plaudite, as if he were conscient to himself that he 
had played his part well upon the stage. This part of 
knowledge we do report also as deficient : not but that it 
is practised too much, but it hath not been reduced to 

Q 2 



228 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXIII. 12. 

writing. And therefore lest it should seem to any that 
Faber/or- it is not comprehensible by axiom, it is re- 
tutus, she de quisite, as we did in the former, that we 
ambttu vtta, g^^ down some heads or passages of it. 

13. Wherein it may appear at the first a new and Tin- 
wonted argument to teach men how to raise and make 
their fortune; a doctrine wherein every man perchance 
will be ready to yield himself a disciple, till he see the 
difficulty: for fortune layeth as heavy impositions as 
virtue; and it is as hard and severe a thing to be a 
true politique, as to be truly moral. But the handling 
hereof concerneth learning greatly, both in honour and 
in substance. In honour, because pragmatical men may 
not go away with an opinion that learning is like a lark, 
that can mount, and sing, and please herself, and nothing 
else ; but may know that she holdeth as well of the hawk, 
that can soar aloft, and can also descend and strike upon 
the prey. In substance, because it is the perfect law ol 
inquiry of truth, that nothing be in the globe of matter, 
which should not be likewise in the globe of crystal, 01 
form ; that is, that there be not any thing in being anc 
action, which should not be drawn and collected into con- 
templation and doctrine. Neither doth learning admir( 
or esteeni of this architecture of fortune, otherwise thai 
as of an inferior work: for no man's fortune can b< 
an end worthy of his being ; and many times the worthi 
est men do abandon their fortune willingly for bette 
respects: but nevertheless fortune as an organ of virtU' 
and merit deserveth the consideration. 

14. First therefore the precept which I conceive t< 
be most summary towards the prevailing in fortune, is t< 
obtain that window which Momus did require : who see 
ing in the frame of man's heart such angles and recesses 



XXIII. 14.] THE SECOND BOOK. 22g 

found fault there was not a window to look into them ; 
that is, to procure good informations of particulars 
touching persons, their natures, their desires and ends, 
their customs and fashions, their helps and advantages, 
and whereby they chiefly stand: so again their weak- 
nesses and disadvantages, and where they lie most 
open and obnoxious; their friends, factions, depend- 
ences; and again their opposites, enviers, competitors, 
their moods and times, Sola viri molles aditus et tempora 
noras; their principles, rules, and observations, and the 
like : and this not only of persons, but of actions ; what 
are on foot from time to time, and how they are con- 
ducted, favoured, opposed, and how they import, and the 
Kke. For the knowledge of present actions is not only 
material in itself, but without it also the knowledge of 
persons is very erroneous: for men change with the 
actions ; and whiles they are in pursuit they are one, and 
when they return to their nature they are another. These 
informations of particulars, touching persons and actions, 
are as the minor propositions in eyery active syllogism ; 
for no excellency of observations (which are as the major 
propositions) can suffice to ground a conclusion, if there 
be error and mistaking in the minors. 

15. That this knowledge is possible, Salomon is our 
surety, who saith. Consilium in corde viri ianquam aqua 
profunda; sed vir prudens exhauriet illud. And although 
the knowledge itself falleth not under precept, because it 
is of individuals, yet the instructions for the obtaining of 

it may. 

16. We will begin therefore with this precept, accord- 
ing to the ancient opinion, that the sinews of wisdom 
are slowness of belief and distrust; that more trust be 
given to countenances and deeds than to words ; and in 



230 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXHI. 1^ 

words rather to sudden passages and surprised wo 
than to set and purposed words. Neither let that be 
feared which is said, Fronti nuUa fides, which is meant of 
a general outward behaviour, and not of the private and 
subtile motions and labours of the countenance and 
gesture; which, as Q. Cicero elegandy saith, is Anm 
janua, the gate of the mind. None more close than 
Tiberius, and yet Tacitus saith of Gallus, Eienim mdlu 
offenstonem conjeciaveraL So again, noting the differing 
character and manner of his commending Germamcos 
and Drusus in the senate, he saith, touching his fashion 
wherein he carried his speech of Germanicus, thus; 
Magis in speciem adornatis verbis, quam ui pemtiis seniire 
credereiur : but of Drusus thus ; Paucioribus sed inieniior, 
ei fida oraHone : and in another place, speaking of his 
character of speech, when he did any thing that was 
gracious and popular, he saith, that in other things he 
was velut eluctaniium verborum; but then again, sobUais 
loqtiebatur quando subvenireL So that there is no such 
artificer of dissimulation, nor no such commanded coun- 
tenance {tduUus jussus), that can sever from a feigned 
tale some of these fashions, either a more slight and 
careless fashion, or more set and formal, or more tedious 
and wandering, or coming from a man more drily and 
hardly. 

17. Neither are deeds such assured pledges, as that 
they may be trusted without a judicious consideration of 
their magnitude and nature : Fraus sibi in parvis fidem 
prcBsiruit ut major e emolumenlo fallat; and the Italian 
thinketh himself upon the point to be bought and sold, 
when he is better used than he was wont to be without 
manifest cause. For small favours, they do but lull men 
asleep, both as to caution and as to industiy; and aie, as 



XXIir. 17.] THE SECOND BOOK. 23 1 

Demosthenes calleth them, Alimenta socordtcs. So again 
we see how false the nature of some deeds are, in that 
particular which Mutianus practised upon Antonius Pri- 
mus, upon that hollow and unfaithful reconcilement which 
was made between them ; whereupon Mutianus advanced 
many of the friends of Antonius, Simul amids ejus prce- 
ficiuras et iribunaius largitur: wherein, under pretence to 
strengthen him, he did desolate him, and won from him 
his dependences. 

18. As for words, though they be like waters to phy- 
sicians, full of flattery and uncertainty, yet they are not to 
be despised, specially with the advantage of passion and 
affection. For so we see Tiberius, upon a stinging and 
incensing speech of Agrippina, came a step forth of his 
dissimulation, when he said, You are hurt because you do 
not reign; of which Tacitus saith, Audita hcBc raram 
occulti pectoris vocem elicuere ; correptamque Grceco versu 
admonuity ideo Icedi quia non regnaret. And therefore the 
poet doth elegantly call passions tortures, that urge men 
to confess their secrets : 

Vino tortus et inu 

And experience showeth, there are few men so true to 
themselves and so settled, but that, sometimes upon heat, 
sometimes upon bravery, sometimes upon kindness, some- 
imes upon trouble of mind and weakness, they open 
hemselves ; specially if they be put to it with a counter- 
lissimulation, according to the proverb of Spain, Di men" 
ira^y sacaras verdad: Tell a lie and find a truth. 

19. As for the knowing of men which is at second 
and from reports ; men's weaknesses and faults are best 
nown from their enemies, their virtues and abilities from 
leir friends, their customs and times from their servants, 
leir conceits and opinions from their familiar friends^ 



IJfl OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXIII.19. 

with whom they discourse most. General fame is Ught, 
and the opinions conceived by superiors or equals are 
deceitful; for to such men are more masked: Verior 
fama e domesticis emanaU 

20. But the soundest disclosing and expounding oi 
men is by their natures and ends, wherein the weakest 
sort of men are best interpreted by their natures, and the 
wisest by their ends. For it was both pleasantly and 
wisely said (though I think very untruly) by a nuncio 
of the pope, returning from a certain nation where he 
served as lidger; whose opinion being asked touching 
the appointment of one to go in his place, he wished 
that in any case they did not send one that was too wise: 
because no very wise man would ever imagine what thej 
in that country were like to do. And certainly it is ai 
error frequent for men to shoot over, and to suppose 
deeper ends, and more compass reaches than are: th< 
Italian proverb being elegant, and for the most part true : 

Di danari, di senno, e di fede, 
C'^ ne manco che non credi: 

There is commonly less money, less wisdom, and 1< 
good faith than men do account upon. 

21. But princes, upon a far other reason, are bes 
interpreted by their natures, and private persons by thei 
ends. For princes being at the top of human desire: 
they have for the most part no particular ends wheret 
they aspire, by distance from which a man mought tak 
measure and scale of the rest of their actions and desires 
which is one of the causes that maketh their hearts moi 
inscrutable. Neither is it suflBcient to inform ourselvc 
* "^ men's ends and natures of the variety of them onh 

also of the predominancy, what humour reignet 



XXIII. 21.] THE SECOND BOOK. 233 

most, and what end is principally sought. For so we 
see, wljen Tigellinus saw himself outstripped by Petronius 
Turpilianus in Nero's humours of pleasures, mefus ejus 
rimatur, he wrought upon Nero's fears, whereby he brake 
the other's neck. 

22. But to all this part of inquiry the most com- 
pendious way resteth in three things: the first, to have 
general acquaintance and inwardness with those which 
have general acquaintance and look most into the world ; 
and specially according to the diversity of business, and 
the diversity of persons, to have privacy and conversation 
with some one friend at least which is perfect and well 
intelligenced in every several kind. The second is to 
keep a good mediocrity in liberty of speech and secrecy ; 
in most things liberty : secrecy where it importeth ; for 
liberty of speech inviteth and provoketh liberty to be 
used again, and so bringeth much to a man's knowledge ; 
and secrecy on the other side induceth trust and inward- 
ness. The last is the reducing of a man's self to this 
watchful and serene habit, as to make account and 
purpose, in every conference and action, as well to 
observe as to act. For as Epictetus would have a phi- 
losopher in every particular action to say to himself, Et 
hoc volo, et eiiam institutum servare; so a politic man in 
everything should say to himself, Et hoc volOy ac etiam 
diquid addiscere, I have stayed the longer upon this 
precept of obtaining good information, because it is a 
main part by itself, which answereth to all the rest. But, 
above all things, caution must be taken that men have 
a good stay and hold of themselves, and that this much 
knowing do not draw on much meddling ; for nothing is 
more unfortunate than light and rash intermeddling in 
many matters. So that this variety of knowledge tendeth 



234 O-F THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXIII. 3 ^ 

in conclusion but only to this, to make a better and freer 
choice of. those actions which may concern us, and 
to conduct them with the less error and the more 
dexterity. 

23. The second precept concerning this knowledge is, 
for men to take good information touching their own 
person, and well to understand themselves : knowing 
that, as S. James saith, though men look oft in a glass, 
yet they do suddenly forget themselves; wherein as 
the divine glass is the word of Grod, so the politic glass 
is the state of the world, or times wherein we live, in the 
which we are to behold ourselves. 

24. For men ought to take an unpartial view of their 
own abilities and virtues ; and ag^in of their wants and 
impediments ; accounting these with the most, and those 
other with the least ; and from this view and examination 
to frame the considerations following. 

25. First, to consider how the constitution of their 
nature sorteth with the general state of the times ; which 
if they find agreeable and fit, then in all things to give 
themselves more scope and liberty; but if differing and 
dissonant, then in the whole course of their life to be 
more close retired, and reserved : as we see in Tiberias, 
who was never seen at a play, and came not into the 
Senate in twelve of his last years; whereas Augustus 
Caesar lived ever in men's eyes, which Tacitus observeth, 
alia Tiberio morum via, 

26. Secondly, to consider how their nature sortetli with 
professions and courses of life, and accordingly to make 
election, if they be free; and, if engaged, to make the 
departure at the first opportunity : as we see was done 
by Duke Valentine, that was designed by his father to a 
sacerdotal profession, but quitted it soon after in regard 



XXIII. 26.] THE SECOND BOOK. 2^5 

of his parts and inclination; being such, nevertheless, 
as a man cannot tell well whether they were worse for 
a prince or for a priest. 

27. Thirdly, to consider how they sort with those whom 
they are like to have competitors and concurrents ; and to 

that course wherein there is most solitude, and them- 
selves like to be most eminent : as Caesar Julius did, who 
at first was an orator or pleader ; but when he saw the 
excellency of Cicero, Hortensius, Catulus, and others, 
for eloquence, and saw there was no man of reputation 
for the wars but Pompeius, upon whom the state was 
forced to rely, he forsook his course begun toward a 
civil and popular greatness, and transferred his designs 
to a martial greatness. 

28. Fourthly, in the choice of their friends and de- 
pendences, to proceed according to the composition of 
their own nature: as we may see in Caesar, all whose 
friends and followers were men active and eflfectual, but 
not solemn, or of reputation. 

29. Fifthly, to take special heed how they guide them- 
selves by examples, in thinking they can do as they see 
others do; whereas perhaps their natures and carriages 
are far differing. In which error it seemeth Pompey was, 
of whom Cicero saith, that he was wont often to say, 
Sylla potuit^ ego non poiero? Wherein he was much 
abused, the natures and proceedings of himself and his 
example being the unlikest in the world ; the one being 
fierce, violent, and pressing the fact; the other solemn, 
and full of majesty and circumstance, and therefore the 
less effectual. 

But this precept touching the politic knowledge of our- 
selves hath many other branches, whereupon we cannot 
insist. 



236 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXIII.30. 

30. Next to the well understanding and discerning of 
a man's self, there followeth the well opening and re- 
vealing a man's self; wherein we see nothing more 
usual than for the more able man to make the less 
show. For there is a great advantage in the well set- 
ting forth of a man's virtues, fortunes, merits; and 
again, in the artificial covering of a man's weatnesses, 
defects, disgraces; staying upon the one, sliding from 
the other ; cherishing the one by circumstances, gracing 
the other by exposition, and the like. Wherein we see 
what Tacitus saith of Mutianus, who was the greatest 
politique of his time, Omnium qucB dixerat /eceraique arU 
qttadam osientator: which requireth indeed some art, lest 
it turn tedious and arrogant ; but yet so, as ostentation 
(though it be to the first degree of vanity) seemeth to roc 
rather a vice in manners than in policy : for as it is said. 
Audacter calumniare, semper aliquid hcsret : so, except it 
be in a ridiculous degree of deformity, Audacter U vendiia^ 
semper aliquid hcerei. For it will stick with the more 
ignorant and inferior sort of men, though men of wisdom 
and rank do smile at it and despise it; and yet the 
authority won with many doth countervail the disdain 
of a few. But if it be carried with decency and govern- 
ment, as with a natural, pleasant, and ingenious fashion; 
or at times when it is mixed with some peril and unsafely 
(as in military persons) ; or at times when others are most 
envied ; or with easy and careless passage to it and froin 
it, without dwelling too long, or being too serious; or 
with an equal freedom of taxing a man's self, as well 
as gracing himself; or by occasion of repelling or put- 
ting down others' injury or insolency; it doth greatl) 
add to reputation: and surely not a few solid natures 
tliat want this ventosity and cannot sail in the heigh' 



XXIII. 30.] THE SECOND BOOK. 237 

of the winds, are not without some prejudice and disad- 
vantage by their moderation. 

31. But for these flourishes and enhancements of virtue, 
as they are not perchance unnecessary, so it is at least 
necessary that virtue be not disvalued and imbased under 
the just price ; which is done in three manners : by of- 
fering and obtruding a man s self; wherein men think he 
is rewarded, when he is accepted; by doing too much, 
which will not give that which is weU done leave to settle, 
and in the end induceth satiety ; and by finding too soon 
the fruit of a man's virtue, in commendation, applause, 
honour, favour ; wherein if a man be pleased with a little, 
let him hear what is truly said; Cave ne insuetus rebus 
majoribus vtdeariSy si hcBc te res parva sicuti magna deledat, 

32. But the covering of defects is of no less importance 
than the valuing of good parts ; which may be done like- 
wise in three manners, by caution, by colour, and by con- 
fidence. Caution is when men do ingeniously and dis- 
creetly avoid to be put into those things for which they 
are not proper: whereas contrariwise bold and unquiet 
spirits will thrust themselves into matters without differ- 
ence, and so publish and proclaim all their wants. Colour 
is when men make a way for themselves to have a con- 
struction made of their faults or wants, as proceeding 
from a better cause or intended for some other purpose. 
For of the one it is well said, 

Saepe latet Yitium proximitate boni, 

and therefore whatsoever want a man hath, he must see 
that he pretend the virtue that shadoweth it; as if he 
be dull, he must affect gravity; if a coward, mildness; 
and so the rest. For the second, a man must frame some 
probable cause why he should not do his best, and why 
he should dissemble his abilities; and for that purpose 



2^8 Or THE ADVAyCEMEST OF LEARyiNG. [XXlILji 

must nse to dissemble those abilities which are notorioos 
in him, to give colour that his true wants are 1 
dustries and dissimulations. For confidence, it is the 
but the surest remedy ; namelv, to depress and se o 
despise whatsoever a man cannot attain; observing the 
good principle of the merchants, who endeavour to raise 
the price of their own commodities, and to beat down the 
price of others. But there is a confidence that passetk 
this other; which is to face out a man's own defects, 
in seeming to conceive that he is best in those things 
wherein he is failing ; and, to help that again, to seem on 
the other side that he hath least opinion of himself in 
those things wherein he is best : like as we shall see it 
commonly in poets, that if they show their verses, and you 
except to any, they will say Thai thai line cost them mon 
labour than any of the rest; and presently will seem to 
disable and suspect rather some other line, which they 
know well enough to be the best in the number. But above 
all, in this righting and helping of a man's self in his own 
carriage, he must take heed he show not himself dis- 
mantled and exposed to scorn and injury, by too much 
(lulccncss, goodness, and facility of nature; but show 
some sparkles of liberty, spirit, and edge. Which kind 
of fortified carriage, with a ready rescussing of a man's 
self from scorns, is sometimes of necessity imposed upon 
men by somewhat in their person or fortune ; but it ever 
siiccocilcth with good felicity. 

3^j. Another precept of this knowledge is by all possiUe 
ciuloiivour to frame the mind to be pliant and obedient 
to occasion; for nothing hindereth men's fortunes so 
much as this : Idem mamhat^ neque idem decehat^ men are 
Mkmo ihcy wore, when occasions turn: and therefore 
^lo, wlioni Livy maketh such an architect of fortune. 



III. 33-] THE SECOND BOOK. 1^) 

adcleth that he had versatile tngenium. And thereof 
ometh that these grave solemn wits, which must be 

themselves and cannot make departures, have more 
lity than felicity. But in some it is nature to be 
lewhat viscous and inwrapped, and not easy to turn, 
some it is a conceit that is almost a nature, which is, 

men can hardly make themselves believe that they 
ht to change their course, when they have found good 
t in former experience. For Machiavel noted wisely, 
' Fabius Maximus would have been temporizing still, 
)rding to his old bias, when the nature of the war 

altered and required hot pursuit. In some other 
; want of point and penetration in their judgement, 

they do not discern when things have a period, but 
le in too late after the occasion; as Demosthenes 
ipareth the people of Athens to country fellows, when 
' play in a fence school, that if they have a blow, then 
' remove their weapon to that ward, and not before, 
lome other it is a lothness to leese labours passed, and 
jnceit that they can bring about occasions to their ply ; 
yet in the end, when they see no other remedy, then 
' come to it with disadvantage; as Tarquinius, that 
5 for the third part of Sibylla's books the treble price, 
n he mought at first have had all three for the simple. 

from whatsoever root or cause this restiveness of 
d proceedeth, it is a thing most prejudicial; and 
ling is more politic than to make the wheels of our 
d concentric and voluble with the wheels of fortune. 
4. Another precept of this knowledge, which hath 
e aflBnity with that we last spake of, but with differ- 
j, is that which is well expressed, Fatis accede deisque, 

men do not only turn with the occasions, but also 
with the occasions, and not strain their credit or 



340 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXIII. 34. 

Strength to over-hard or extreme points; but choose in 
their actions that which is most passable: for this will 
preserve men from foil, not occupy them too much about 
one matter, win opinion of moderation, please the most, 
and make a show of a perpetual felicity in all they under- 
take ; which cannot but mightily increase reputation. 

35. Another part of this knowledge seemeth to have 
some repugnancy with the former two, but not as I 
understand it ; and it is that which Demosthenes uttereth 
in high terms ; Ei quemadmodum recepium est^ ut exerciium 
ducat imperaior, sic et a cordatts virts res tpscB ducenda; 
ui qucB tpsts videntury ea gerantur, et non tpsi eventtis per-' 
sequi cogdniur. For if we observe we shall find two 
diflfering kinds of suflBciency in managing of business: 
some can make use of occasions aptly and dexterously, 
but plot little ; some can urge and pursue their own plots 
well, but cannot accommodate nor take in; either of 
which is yery unperfect without the other, 

36. Another part of this knowledge is the observing a 
good mediocrity in the declaring, or not declaring a man's 
self: for although depth of secrecy, and making way 
{qualis est via navis in mari^ which the French calleth 
sourdes menies^ when men set things in work without 
opening themselves at all), be sometimes both prosperous 
and admirable; yet many times dissimulaiio error es parity 
qui dissimulatorem ipsum illaqueant. And therefore we 
see the greatest politiques have in a natural and free 
manner professed their desires, rather than been reserved 
and disguised in them. For so we see that Lucius Sylla 
made a kind of profession, that he wished all men happy or 
unhappy y as they stood his friends or enemies. So Caesar, 
when he went first into Gaul, made no scruple to profess 
That he had rather he first in a village than second at Rome, 



■: XXIII. 38.] THE SECOND BOOK. 243 

1 variety of occasions. But that opinion I may condemn 
vith like reason as Machiavel doth that other, that 

- moneys were the sinews of the wars ; whereas (saith he) 

- the trae sinews of the wars are the sinews of men's arms, 
that is, a valiant, populous, and military nation : and he 
voucheth aptly the authority of Solon, who, when Croesus 
showed him his treasury of gold, said to him, that if 

: another came that had better iron, he would be master 
of his gold. In like manner it may be truly affirmed, 
that it is not moneys that are the sinews of fortune, but 
: it is the sinews and steel of men's minds, wit, courage, 
6 audacity, resolution, temper, industry, and the like. In 
i the third place I set down reputation, because of the 
i peremptory tides and currents it hath ; which, if they be 
not taken in their due time, are seldom recovered, it 
i being extreme hard to play an after game of reputation. 
I And lastly I place honour, which is more easily won by 
any of the other three, much more by all, than any of 
can be purchased by honour. To conclude this pre- 
cept, as there is order and priority in matter, so is there 
in time, the preposterous placing whereof is one of the 
commonest errors : while men fly to their ends when they 
should intend their beginnings, and do not take things in 
order of time as they come on, but marshal them accord- 
ing to greatness and not according to instance; not 
observing the good precept, Quod nunc instat agamus, 

39. Another precept of this knowledge is not to em- 
brace any matters which do occupy too great a quantity 
of time, but to have that sounding in a man's ears, Sed 
fugit inierea fugit irreparahile tempus : and that is the 
cause why those which take their course of rising by pro- 
fessions of burden, as lawyers, orators, painful divines, 
and the like, are not commonly so politic for their own 

R 2 



:=■ mz .i-:-..::-c^-VZj:r :f izarxixg. [xxm.s^ 



•4*i» 



:\".^r'^.se ~z.zil zl :-:eir ^rdinarr w::v. because 
:ne7 ~"ir.: ::n:e :3 "eaiD. pi":::'i:^3. :o waic occasions, and 

xc. Ar.r-.;er ^r=?crp: ::* liiii l-dO'xied^'e is :o iniixe 
ri^rijr.^ -vr.'.r-h ir.:h ~c:i::r.z .r_ ■■•ain: which surely a run 
.r.^.'j- -Jo if he ic -v-r-l in:c-r:acr ".us business, and bend n-x 
ni^ mir.-i T.c niui.h 'izzn ".iia: "i^'hich he prlncipallv in- 
■'•ri'-I^'h. 7>r i T.an :u^::: m every particular icdon 
-f> Vj ':^rr ;■ he rr.r,::.:r-s :i' '.us D::ind. and so to have 
'i*".*^ -.r.-ncr ir-'l-'-^r ir.cr'-.rtT, is if he :annoc have :har he 
■•r'-'-kf-:h .n :r=e '.:f:\z ieirr^e. ye: :c have ic in a second, cr 
r, ^ \ 'V.T-i : -ir.i if he ::in have r.o pan of that which 
r-o p"ir^r,^,-..-l. vit :o rjm the use of it :o somewhat else; 
^n^I S ;,fi cannot make ir.ythir.i: of it for the presen:, yet 
V, jT.jiko [r. a3 a seed :t' ^.tztie-viiat in ume to come: and 
if r.^. can contrive no en-:-:: «:r sue stance from it, vet to 
'.vin ^OTT.e :rcod opinion zy it, or the like. So that he 
shr/nld exact an account of hiniseif of everv action, to 
roap Vimewhat, and not to stfind amazed and confused 
if he fail of that he chief v mean: : for nothino: is more 
impolitic than to mind acrions wholly one by one. For 
hfl that doth so le^r-.eth infinite occasions which inten*ene, 
and are many times more proper and propidous for some- 
what that he shall need afters ards, than for that which he 
nrpjfith for the present; and therefore men must be per- 
fect in that rule, I/cec oporUtfaare, et ilia non omitiere. 

4f . Another precept of this knowledge is, not to engage 
a man's self peremptorily in any thing, though it seem 
not liable to accident ; but ever to have a window to fly 
out at, or a ' ^'^ 'etire : following the wisdom in the 
ancient fa • frogs, which consulted when their 

plash wp* y should go ; and the one moved 

to go d> ause it was not likely the water 



XXIII. 41.] THE SECOND BOOK. 245 

would dry there ; but the other answered, True, but if it 
do, how shall we get out again ? 

42. Another precept of this knowledge is that ancient 
precept of Bias, construed not to any point of perfidious- 
Dess, but only to caution and moderation, Uf ama tan- 
luam inimicus fuiurus et odi ianquam amaiurus. For it 
utterly betrayeth all utility for men to embark themselves 
:oo far into unfortunate friendships, troublesome spleens, 
md childish and humorous envies or emulations. 

43. But J continue this beyond the measure of an 
ixample; led, because I would not have such know- 
edges, which I note as deficient, to be thought things 
maginative or in the air, or an observation or two much 
nade of, but things of bulk and mass, whereof an end is 
lardlier made than a beginning. It must be likewise con- 
:eived, that in these points which I mention and set down, 
iiey are far from complete tractates of them, but only as 
small pieces for patterns. And lastly, no man I suppose 
mil think that I mean fortunes are not obtained without 
ill this ado ; for I know they come timibling into some 
men's laps ; and a number obtain good fortunes by dili- 
gence in a plain way, little intermeddling, and keeping 
liemselves from gross errors. 

44. But as Cicero, when he setteth down an idea of a 
)erfect orator, doth not mean that every pleader should 
)e such; and so likewise, when a prince or a courtier 
lath been described by such as have handled those sub- 
ects, the mould hath used to be made according to the 
>erfection of the art, and not according to common prac- 
ice : so I understand it, that it ought to be done in the 

iption of a poHtic man, I mean politic for his own 
jrtune. 

45. But it must be remembered all this while, that the 



244 O-F THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXHI.i 

fortune, otherwise than in their ordinary way, bees 
they want time to learn particulars, to wait occasii ai 
to devise plots. 

40. Another precept of this knowledge is to imita 
nature which doth nothing in vain ; which surely a 
may do if he do well interlace his business, and bend n 
his mind too much upon that which he principaUy i 
tendeth. For a man ought in every particular actic 
so to carry the motions of his mind, and so to h 
one thing imder another, as if he cannot have that 1 
seeketh in the best degree, yet to have it in a second, < 
so in a third ; and if he can have no part of that 1 
he purposed, yet to turn the use of it to somewhat eb 
and if he cannot make anything of it for the present, y 
to make it as a seed of somewhat in time to come; ai 
if he can contrive no eflfect or substance from it, yet 1 
win some good opinion by ^it, or the like. So that 
should exact an account of himself of every action, 1 
reap somewhat, and not to stand amazed and confuse 
if he fail of that he chiefly meant : for nothing is moi 
impolitic than to mind actions wholly one by one. F( 
he that doth so leeseth infinite occasions which interven< 
and are many times more proper and propitious for soiw 
what that he shall need afterwards, than for that which h 
urgeth for the present ; and therefore men must be po 
feet in that rule, Ilcsc oportet facer e^ et ilia non a Htrt, 

41. Another precept of this knowledge is, not 

a man's self peremptorily in any thing, though it se 
not liable to accident ; but ever to have a window to fl 
out at, or a way to retire : following the wisdom in tl 
ancient fable of the two frogs, which consulted when Ac 
plash was dry whither they should go ; and the one mov< 
to go down into a pit, because it was not likely the wat 



XXIII. 41.] THE SECOND BOOK. 245 

would dry there ; but the other answered, True, but if it 
do, how shall we get out again ? 

42. Another precept of this knowledge is that ancient 
precept of Bias, construed not to any point of perfidious- 
ness, but only to caution and moderation, Et ama tan- 
quam inimicus fuiurus et odi tanquam amaiurus. For it 
utterly betrayeth all utility for men to embark themselves 
too far into unfortunate friendships, troublesome spleens, 
and childish and humorous envies or emulations. 

43. But J continue this beyond the measure of an 
example; led, because I would not have such know- 
ledges, which I note as deficient, to be thought things 
imaginative or in the air, or an observation or two much 
made of, but things of bulk and mass, whereof an end is 
hardlier made than a beginning. It must be likewise con- 
ceived, that in these points which I mention and set down, 
they are far from complete tractates of them, but only as 
small pieces for patterns. And lastly, no man I suppose 
vdll think that I mean fortunes are not obtained without 
all this ado ; for I know they come timibling into some 
nien*s laps ; and a number obtain good fortunes by dili- 
gence in a plain way, little intermeddling, and keeping 
themselves from gross errors. 

44. But as Cicero, when he setteth down an idea of a 
perfect orator, doth not mean that every pleader should 
be such; and so likewise, when a prince or a courtier 
hath been described by such as have handled those sub- 
jects, the mould hath used to be made according to the 
perfection of the art, and not according to common prac- 
tice: so I understand it, that it ought to be done in the 
description of a politic man, I mean politic for his own 
fortune. 

45. But it must be remembered all this while, that the 



2^6 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XX 

precepts which we have set down are of that kind 
may be counted and called BoncB Aries, As for ev: 
if a man would set down for himself that princi 
Machiavel, lliai a man seek not to attain virtue itsi 
the appearance only thereof; because the credit of vi\ 
a help^ hut the use of it is cumber : or that other 
principles, T^at he presuppose, that men are not fitl 
wrought otherwise but by fear ; and therefore that I 
to have every man obnoxious, low, and in strait, 
the Italians call seminar spine, to sow thorns: c 
other principle, contained in the verse which Cicero 
Cadant amici, dummodo inimici inter cidant, as the triu 
which sol<.l every one to other the lives of their f 
for the deaths of their enemies : or that other protes 
of L. Catilina, to set on fire and trouble states, to tl 
to fish iu droumy waters, and to unwrap their foi 
^'<; si quid in fortunis nuis exciiatum sit incendi 
Hcn \xqua Sid ruina resiinguam : or that other pr 
of Lv sunder, 7^i;/ children are to be dtceiitd zcith < 
and men with oaths : and the like eul and corrupt 
lions, whereof (as in all tilings) there are more in n 
than of the good : certainly with these dispensation 
the laws of ch;uity and integrity, the pressing of a 
fortune may be more hasty and compendious. B 
in Hfe as it is in wa\-s, the shonest wav is commoi 
foulest, and suiviv the fairer wav is not much aboui 
46. But nien» if they be in 'J:eir own power, 3 
and sustain themsoht^ and be not carried 
1 a whirlwind or lemjv^t of ar.;b;::on, ou^rh: 
of ot for.uno :o so: before ihtir e\ 

\ letal ip of the wor- A T^jt j-7 thin 
» kV** stirz,\ bu: Ksor.v oiher mor 
du«>:cio!iis: ch:e:?v that. ±at 



46.] THE SECOND BOOK. 247 

t well-being is a curse, and the greater being the 
: curse; and that all virtue is most rewarded, and 
kedness most punished in itself: according as the 
lith excellently: 

Quae yobis, quse digna, viri, pro laudibus istis 
PraBmia posse rear solvi ? pulcherrima primum 
Dli moresque dabunt vestri. 

of the contrary. And secondly they ought to 
p to the eternal providence and divine judgement, 

often subverteth the wisdom of evil plots and 
lations, according to that scripture, He haih con" 
mischief , and shall bring forth a vain thing. And 
yh men should refrain themselves from injury and 
rts, yet this incessant and Sabbathless pursuit of 
I's fortune leaveth not tribute which we owe to 
)f our time; who (we see) demandeth a tenth of 
jbstance, and a seventh, which is more strict, of 
Qe : and it is to small purpose to have an erected 
owards heaven, and a perpetual groveling spirit 
earth, eating dust as doth the serpent, Atque affigit 
divincB particulam aurcB, And if any man flatter 
f that he will employ his fortune well, though he 
[ obtain it ill, as was said concerning Augustus 
, and after of Septimius Severus, That either they 

never have been born, or else they should never have 
ley did so much mischief in the pursuit and ascent 
ir greatness, and so much good when they were 
shed; yet these compensations and satisfactions 
)od to be used, but never good to be purposed, 
astly, it is not amiss for men in their race toward 
fortune, to cool themselves a little with that conceit 

is elegantly expressed by the Emperor Charles the 
in his instructions to the king his son, That fortune 



2,4^ OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXIII.46. 

kafk somewhat of the nature of a woman ^ that if she be k 
much wooed she is the farther off. But this last is but a 
remedy for those whose tastes are corrupted : let mer 
rather build upon that foundation which is as a comer- 
stone of divinity and philosophy, wherein they join close 
namely that same Primum qucerite. For divinity saith 
Primum qucerite regnum Dei, et isia omnia adjicientur vobis 
and philosophy saith, Primum qtuBrite bona animi; cceim 
aut aderunty aut non oberunt. And although the humai 
foundation hath somewhat of the sands, as we see ii 
M. Brutus, when he brake forth into that speech, 

Te colui (Virtus) ut rem ; ast tu nomen inane es ; 

yet the divine foundation is upon the rock. But this ma] 
serve for a taste of that knowledge which I noted ai 
deficient. 

47. Concerning government, it is a part of knowledg( 
secret and retired in both these respects in which thing 
are deemed secret; for some things arje secret becaus 
they are hard to know, and some because they are no 
fit to utter. We see all governments are obscure an 
invisible : 

Totamque infosa per artos 
Mens agitat molem, et magno se coipore misceL 

Such is the description of governments. We see tl 

government of God over the world is hidden, insomuc 

as it seemeth to participate of much irregularity and coi 

fusion. The government of the soul in moving the boc 

is inward and profound, and the passages thereof hard 

to be reduced to demonstration. Again, the wisdom 

gntiqni^ (the shadows whereof are in the poets) in tl 

iption of torments and pains, next onto the crime 

IV 1 was the giants' offence, doth detest t! 

ility, as in Sisyphus and Tantalus. But tl 



;.] THE SECOND BOOK, 249 

sant of particulars: nevertheless even unto the 
rules and discourses of policy and government 
due a reverent and reserved handling. 
But contrariwise in the governors towards the 
jd, all things ought as far as the frailty of man 
2th to be manifest and revealed. For so it is 
ed in the scriptures touching the government of 
lat this globe, which seemeth to us a dark and 
)ody, is in the view of God as crystal : Ei in con- 
edis tanquam mare vitreum simile crystallo. So 
inces and states, and specially towards wise senates 
incils, the natures and dispositions of the people, 
jnditions and necessities, their factions and com- 
is, their animosities and discontents, ought to be, 
•d of the variety of their intelligences, the wisdom 
observations, and the height of their station where 
ep sentinel, in great part clear and transparent. 
Dre, considering that I write to a king that is a 
of this science, and is so well assisted, I think it 
to pass over this part in silence, as wiUing to 
the certificate which one of the ancient philo- 
aspired unto; who being silent, when others 
led to make demonstration of their abilities by 
desired it mought be certified for his part. Thai 
IS one that knew how to hold his peace. 
^Notwithstanding, for the more public part of 
aent, which is laws, I think good to note only one 
ce ; which is, that all those which have written of 
tve written either as philosophers or as lawyers, 
ne as statesmen. As for the philosophers, they 
maginary laws for imaginary commonwealths, and 
scourses are as the stars, which give little light 
they are so high. For the lawyers, they write 



/ 



250 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXIII.. 

according to the states where they live what is rcceiv 
law, and not what ought to be law: for the wisdom of 
lawmaker is one, and of a lawyer is another. For the 
are in nature certain fountains of justice, whence all ci 
laws are derived but as streams : and hke as waters 
take tinctures and tastes from the soils through whi 
they run, so do civil laws vary according to the regio 
and governments where they are planted, though th 
proceed from the same fountains. Again, the wisdom 
a lawmaker consisteth not only in a platform of ji 
but in the application thereof; taking into considerati< 
by what means laws may be made certain, and what a 
the causes and remedies of the doubtfulness and 
tainty of law; by what means laws may be made apt 
easy to be executed, and what are the impediments 
remedies in the execution of laws; what influence la^ 
touching private right of meum and /uum have into tl 
public state, and how they may be made apt and agre 
able ; how laws are to be penned and delivered, wheth 
in texts or in acts, brief or large, with preambles, or witi 
out ; how they are to be pruned and reformed from tin 
to time, and what is the best means to keep them froi 
being too vast in volumes, or too full of multiplicity an 
crossness; how they are to be expounded, when 
causes emergent and judicially discussed, and when uj 
responses and conferences touching general points c 
questions; how they are to be pressed, rigorously < 
tenderly; how they are to be mitigated by equity an 
good conscience, and whether discretion and strict la 
are to be mingled in the same courts, or kept a] '> ^ 
several courts; again, how the practice, profc! n, 
erudition of law is to be censured and governed; 
many other points touching the administration^ and (as 



Ill 49.] THE- SECOND BOOK. 0,^1 

Y term it) animation of laws. Upon which I insist the 
!, because I purpose (if God give me x)e pruden- 
re), having begun a work of this nature in tia Ugidat- 
lorisms, to propoimd it hereafter, noting ^nVi, sive, de 

he mean time for deficient fontibus juris. ^ 

;o. And for your Majesty's laws of England, I could 
much of their dignity, and somewhat of their defect ; 
they cannot but excel the civil laws in fitness for the 
ernment : for the civil law was non hos qucBsiium munus 
ustis ; it was not made for the countries which it 
emeth. Hereof I cease to speak, because I will not 
rmingle matter of action with matter of general 
ning. 

• 

[XIV. nPHUS have I concluded this portion of 

learning touching civil knowledge; and 

1 civil knowledge have concluded human philosophy; 

with human philosophy, philosophy in general. And 

ig now at some pause, looking back into that I have 

sed through, this writing seemeth to me (si nunquam 

it imago), as far as a man can judge of his own work, 

much better than that noise or sound which musicians 

:e while they are in tuning their instruments: which 

lothing pleasant to hear, but yet is a cause why the 

do is sweeter afterwards. So have I been content to 

I the instruments of the Muses, that they may play 

: have better hands. And surely, when I set before 

the condition of these times, in which learning hath 

de her third visitation or circuit in all the qualities 

reof ; as the excellency and vivacity of the wits of this 

i; the noble helps and lights which we have by the 

vails of ancient writers ; the art of printing, which com- 

inicateth books to men of all fortunes; the openness 



25^ OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXIV. 

of the world by navigation, which hath disclosed multi- 
tudes of experiments, and a mass of natural history ; the 
leisure wherewith these times abound, not employing men 
so generally in civil business, as the states of Grecia did. 
in respect of their popularity, and the state of Rome, in 
respect of the greatness of their monarchy; the present 
disposition of these times at this instant to peace; the 
consumption of all that ever can be said in controversies 
of religion, which have so much diverted men from other 
sciences ; the perfection of your Majesty's learning, which 
as a phoenix may call whole vollies of wits to follow you; 
and the inseparable propriety of time, which is ever more 
and more to disclose truth ; I cannot but be raised to this 
persuasion that this third period of time will far surpass 
that of the Grecian and Roman learning : only if men will 
know their own strength, and their own weakness both; 
and take, one from the other, light of invention, and not 
fire of contradiction ; and esteem of the inquisition of 
truth as of an enterprise, and not as of a quality or orna- 
ment; and employ vdt and magnificence to things of 
worth and excellency, and not to things vulgar and ol 
popular estimation. As for my labours, if any man shall 
please himself or others in the reprehension of them, the) 
shall make that ancient and patient request, Verdera, sn 
audi; let men reprehend them, so they observe an< 
weigh them. For the appeal is lawful (though it may b 
it shall not be needful) from the first cogitations of me' 
to their second, and from the nearer times to the time 
further off. Now let us come to that learmng, which bot 
the former times were not so blessed as to know, sacre 
and inspired divinity, the Sabbath and port of all men' 
laboun and peregrinations. 



XXV. I.] THE SECOND BOOK. (^53 

XXV. I. 'T^HE prerogative of God extendeth as well 
to the reason as to the will of man ; 
so that as we are to obey his law, though we find a re- y 
luctation in our will, so we are to believe his word, though*^ 
we find a reluctation in our reason. For if we believe 
only that which is agreeable to our sense, we give consent 
to the matter, and not to the author ; which is no more 
than we would do towards a suspected and discredited 
witness; but that faith which W2te accounted to Abraham 
for righteousness was of such a point as whereat Sarah 
laughed, who therein was an image of natural reason. 

2. Howbeit (if we will truly consider of it) more worthy 
it is to believe than to know as we now know. For in 
knowledge man's mind suffereth from sense ; but in belief 
it suffereth from spirit, such one as it holdeth for more 
authorised than itself, and so suffereth from the worthier 
agent. Otherwise it is of the state of man glorified ; for 
then faith shall cease, and we shall know as we are 
known. 

3. Wherefore we conclude that sacred theology (which 
in our idiom we call divinity) is grounded only upon the 
word and oracle of God, and not upon the light of nature: 
for it is written, Coeli enarrant glortam Dei; but it is not 
^tten, Coeli enarrant voluntatem Dei: but of that it is 
said, Ad legem et testimonium : si non fecerint secundum 
^rhum isiud &€. This holdeth not only in those points 
of faith which concern the great mysteries of the Deity, 
of the creation, of the redemption, but likewise those 

; concern the law moral truly interpreted : Love 

your enemies: do good to them that hate you : Be like to your 

tnly Fs^her, that suffereth his rain to fall upon the just 

i st. To this it ought to be applauded. Nee vox 

^ fi sonat: it is a voice beyond the light of nature. 



254 02^ ^^^ ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXV. }. 

So we see the heathen poets, when they fall upon a 
libertine passion, do still expostulate with laws and moral- 
ities, as if they were opposite and malignant to nature 
-£V guod natura remittit^ invida jura negant. So sale 
Dendamis the Indian unto Alexander's messengers, tha 
he had heard somewhat of Pythagoras, and some othc 
of the wise men of Grecia, and that he held them fo 
excellent men : but that they had a fault, which was I 
they had in too great re^rerence and veneration a 
they called law and manners. So it must be confi i 
that a great part of the law moral is of that ] :c 
tion, whereunto the light of nature cannot aspire : ho^ 
then is it that man is said to have, by the light and la^ 
of nature, some notions and conceits of virtue and vict 
justice and wrong, good and evil? Thus, because th 
light of nature is used in two several senses ; the one 
that which springeth from reason, sense, induction, argu 
ment, according to the laws of heaven and earth; th 
other, that which is imprinted upon the spirit of man b; 
an inward instinct, according to the law of conscience 
which is a sparkle of the purity of his first estate; i 
which latter sense only he is participant of some lig^J 
and discerning touching the perfection of the moral law 
but how ? sufficient to check the vice, but not to infom 
the duty. So then the doctrine of religion, as well mors 
as mystical, is not to be attained but by inspiration an 
revelation from God. 

4. The use notwithstanding of reason in spiritual thing 
and the latitude thereof, is very great and general : for 
is not for nothing that the apostle calleth reli m (n 
reasonable service of God ; insomuch as the** cer 
monies and figures of the old law were full of re n ai 
signification, much more than the ceremonies of id 



:XV. 4.] THE SECOND BOOK. 255 

id magic, that are full of non-significants and surd cha- 
fers. But most specially the Christian faith, as in all 
ings so in this, deserveth to be highly magnified; hold- 
g and preserving the golden mediocrity in this point 
itween the law of the heathen and the law of Mahumet, 
liich have embraced the two extremes. For the religion 
' the heathen had no constant belief or confession, but 
"t all to the liberty of argument ; and the religion of 
ahumet on the other side intferdicteth argument alto- 
ther: the one having the very face of error, and the 
her of imposture: whereas the Faith doth both admit 
d reject disputation with difference. 
5. The use of human reason in religion is of two sorts : 
2 former, in the conception and apprehension of the 
rsteries of God to us revealed; the other, in the in- 
TJng and deriving of doctrine and direction thereupon, 
le former extendeth to the mysteries themselves ; but 
w ? by way of illustration, and not by way of argument, 
le latter consisteth indeed of probation and argument. 

the former we see God vouchsafeth to descend to our 
pacity, in the expressing of his mysteries in sort as may 

sensible unto us; and doth grift his revelations and 
ly doctrine upon the notions of our reason, and applieth 
5 inspirations to open our understanding, as the form of 
2 key to the ward of the lock. For the latter, there is 
owed us an use of reason and argument, secondary and 
spective, although not original and absolute. For after 
e articles and principles of religion are placed and ex- 
npted from examination of reason, it is then permitted 
ito us to make derivations and inferences from and 
-cording to the analogy of them, for our better direction. 
^ nature this holdeth not ; for both the principles are 
xaminable by induction, though not by a medium or 



260 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXV 

So as this course of sums and commentaries is that wl 
doth infallibly make the body of sciences more immc 
in quantity, and more base in substance. 

12. And for strength, it is true that knowledges redu 
into exact methods have a show of strength, in that e 
part seemeth to support and sustain the other; but 
is more satisfactory than substantial : like imto buildi 
which stand by architecture and compaction, which 
more subject to ruin than those that are built 
strong in their several parts, though less compacted, 
it is plain that the more you recede from your gi 
the weaker do you conclude : and as in nature, the m 
you remove yourself from particulars, the greater peri 
error you do incur : so much more in divinity, the m 
you recede from the scriptures by inferences and coi 
quences, the more weak and dilute are your positions. 

13. And as for perfection or completeness in divin 
it is not to be sought ; which makes this course of a 
ficial divinity the more suspect For he that will re 
a knowledge into an art, will make it roimd and unifor 
but in divinity many things must be left abrupt, and a 
eluded with this: O altiiudo sapienitce et scientia L 
quam mcomprehenstbilia sunt judicia eftis, et non itto \ 
biles vice ejtis. So again the apostle saith. Ex pi u 
mus : and to have the form of a total, where there 
matter for a part, cannot be without supplies by si 
position and presumption. And therefore I conclude, 
the true use of these sums and methods hath place 
institutions or introductions preparatory imto knowl 
but in them, or by deducement from them, to bar I 
main body and substance of a knowledge, is in all ; t 
prejudicial, and in divinity dangerous. 

14. As to the interpretation of the scriptures : 



XXV. 14.] THE SECOND BOOK. 26t 

and at large, there have been divers kinds introduced 
and devised; some of them rather curious and unsafe 
than sober and warranted. Notwithstanding, thus much 
must be confessed, that the scriptures, being given by 
mspiration and not by human reason, do diflfer from all 
other books in the author: which by consequence doth 
draw on some difference to be used by the expositor. 
For the inditer of them did know four things which no 
man attains to know; which are, the mysteries of the 
kingdom of glory, the perfection of the laws of nature, 
the secrets of the heart of man, and the future succession 
of all ages. For as to the first it is said, He that presseth 
into the light, shall be oppressed of the glory. And again. 
No man shall see my face and live. To the second. When 
h prepared the heavens 1 was present, when by law and 
compass he inclosed the deep. To the third. Neither was it 
needful that any should bear witness to him of man, for he 
knew well what was in man. And to the last, From the 
he^inning are known to the Lord all his works. 

15. From the former two of these have been drawn 
certain senses and expositions of scriptures, which had 
need be contained within the bounds of sobriety; the 
one anagogical, and the other philosophical But as to 
the fcMmer, man is not to prevent his time: Videmus 
nunc per speculum in cBnigmate, tunc autem facie adfaciem: 
vrherein nevertheless there seemeth to be a liberty granted, 
as far forth as the polishing of this glass, or some moder- 
ate explication of this aenigma. But to press too far 
into it, cannot but cause a dissolution and overthrow 
of the spirit of man. For in the body there are three 
degrees of that we receive into it, aliment, medicine, 
and poison : whereof aliment is that which the nature of 
Joan can perfectly alter and overcome ; medicine is that 



258 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING, [XXV.g. 

suflSciency of the information belong two considerations; 
what points of religion are fundamental, and what perfec- 
tive, being matter of further building and perfection upon 
one and the same foundation ; and again, how the grada- 
tions of light according to the dispensation of times are 
material to the sufficiency of belief. ^ 

9. Here again I may rather give it in advice than note 
Degradibus it as deficient, that the points fundamental, 
unitatis in and the points of further perfection only, 
civitateDei. ought to be with piety and wisdom distin-. 
guished : a subject tending to much like end as that I 
noted before ; for as that other were likely to abate the 
number of controversies, so this is like to abate the 
heat of many of them. We see Moses when he saw the 
Israelite and the Egyptian fight, he did not say. Why strict 
you?, but drew his sword and slew the Egyptian: bnt 
when he saw the two Israelites fight, he said. You art 
brethren, why strive you? If the point of doctrine be an 
Egyptian, it must be slain by the sword of the spuit, and 
not reconciled ; but if it be an Israelite, though in tbc 
wrong, then, Why strive you ? We see of the fundamental 
points, our Saviour penneth the league thus, He that is 
not with us is against us ; but of points not fundamental, 
thus, He that is not against us is with us. So we see the 
coat of our Saviour was entire without seam, and so is 
the doctrine of the scriptures in itself; but the garment 
of the church was of divers colours and yet not divided. 
We see the chaff may and ought to be severed from the 
com in the ear, but the tares may not be pulled up from 
the com in the field. So as it is a thing of great use well 
to define what, and of what latitude those points are, which 
do make men merely aliens and disincorporate from the 
Church of God. 



rXV. 10.] THE SECOND BOOK. 259 

10. For the obtaining of the information, it resteth upon 

le true and sound interpretation of the scriptures, which 

the fountains of the water of life. The interpretations 

fthe scriptures are of two sorts; methodical, and solute 

• at large. For this divine water, which excelleth so 
uch that of Jacob's well, is drawn forth much in the 
me kind as natural water useth to be out of wells and 
untains ; either it is first forced up into a cistern, and 
)in thence fetched and derived for use; or else it is 
awn and received in buckets and vessels immediately 
lere it springeth. The former sort whereof, though 
seem to be the more ready, yet in my judgement is 
are subject to corrupt. This is that method which 
th exhibited unto us the scholastical divinity; where- 

• divinity hath been reduced into an art, as into a 
;tem, and the streams of doctrine or positions fetched 
d derived from thence. 

11. In this men have sought three things, a summary 
evity, a compacted strength, and a complete perfection ; 
lereof the two first they fail to find, and the last they 
ight not to seek. For as to brevity, we see in all sum- 
ary methods, while men purpose to abridge, they give 
use to dilate. For the sum or abridgement by con- 
iction becometh obscure; the obscurity requireth ex- 
)sition, and the exposition is deduced into large com- 
entaries, or into common places and titles, which grow 
be more vast than the original writings, whence the 
im was at first extracted. So we see the volumes of the 
ihoolmen are greater much than the first writings of the 
irs, whence the Master of the Sentences made his 
or collection. So in like manner the volumes of the 
Qodem doctors of the civil law exceed those of the an- 
ient jurisconsults, of which Tribonian compiled the digest. 

s 2 



260 OF TEE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXV.I 

So as this course of sums and commentaries is that whic 
doth infallibly make the body of sciences more imm 
in quantity, and more base in substance. 

12. And for strength, it is true that knowledges reduce 
into exact methods have a show of strength, in that eac 
part seemeth to support and sustain the other; but 1 
is more satisfactory than substantial : like tmto buil 
which stand by architecture and compaction, which ai 
more subject to ruin than those that are built moi 
strong in their several parts, though less compacted. Bi 
it is plain that the more you recede from your groundi 
the weaker do you conclude : and as in nature, the mor 
you remove yourself from particulars, the greater peril c 
error you do incur : so much more in divinity, the m 
you recede from the scriptures by inferences and cc 
quences, the more weak and dilute are your positions. 

13. And as for perfection or completeness in divinitj 
it is not to be sought ; which makes this course of arti 
ficial divinity the more suspect For he that will reduD 
a knowledge into an art, will make it roimd and uniform 
but in divinity many things must be left abrupt, and con 
eluded with this : O altitudo sapienh'ce et scientia Dd 
quam incomprehensihilia sunt judicia eftis, ei non esHga 
biles vicB efus. So again the apostle saith. Ex pa ci 
mus: and to have the form of a total, where there 
matter for a part, cannot be without supplies by ^ 
position and presumption. And therefore I conclude 
the true use of these sums and methods hath place ii 
institutions or introductions preparatory imto knoi 

but in them, or by deducement from them, to handle 
main body and substance of a knowledge, is in all sden 
prejudicial, and in divinity dangerous. 

14. As to the interpretation of the scriptures 



XXV. 14.] THE SECOND BOOK. 26t 

and at large, there have been divers kinds introduced 
and devised; some of them rather curious and unsafe 
than sober and warranted. Notwithstanding, thus much 
must be confessed, that the scriptures, being given by 
inspiration and not by human reason, do differ from all 
other books in the author: which by consequence doth 
draw on some difference to be used by the expositor. 
For the inditer of them did know four things which no 
man attains to know; which are, the mysteries of the 
kingdom of glory, the perfection of the laws of nature, 
the secrets of the heart of man, and the future succession 
of all ages. For as to the first it is said, He thatpreneth 
into the light, shall he oppressed of the glory. And again, 
^(? man shall see my face and live. To the second, When 
k prepared the heavens I was present, when by law and 
compass he inclosed the deep. To the third. Neither was it 
needful that any should hear witness to him of man, for he 
knew well what was in man. And to the last, From the 
ht^inning are known to the Lord all his works. 

15. From the former two of these have been drawn 
certain senses and expositions of scriptures, which had 
need be contained within the bounds of sobriety; the 
one anagogical, and the other philosophical. But as to 
the former, man is not to prevent his time: Videmus 
nunc per speculum in cBnigmate, tunc autem facie adfaciem: 
wherein nevertheless there seemeth to be a liberty granted, 
as far forth as the polishing of this glass, or some moder- 
ate explication of this aenigma. But to press too far 
into it, cannot but cause a dissolution and overthrow 
of the spirit of man. For in the body there are three 
degrees of that we receive into it, aliment, medicine, 
and poison : whereof aliment is that which the nature of 
oian can perfectly alter and overcome ; medicine is that 



a6a OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXV. 

which is partly converted by nature, and partly convc 
nature ; and poison is that which worketh wholly 
nature, without that, that nature can in any part w 
upon it So in the mind, whatsoever knowledge reas 
cannot at all work upon and convert is a mere intoxii 
tion, and endangereth a dissolution of the mind a 
understanding. 

1 6. But for the latter, it hath been extremely set 

foot of late time by the school of Paracelsus, and soi 

others, that have pretended to find the truth of all natu 

philosophy in the scriptures ; scandalizing and traduci 

all other philosophy as heathenish and profane. But the 

is no such enmity between God*s word and his work 

neither do they give honour to the scriptures, as th 

suppose, but much imbase them. For to seek heav( 

and earth in the word of God, whereof it is said, Heav 

and earth shall pass^ hut my word shall not pass ^ is to se< 

f temporary things amongst eternal : and as to seek di> 

■ nity in philosophy is to seek the living amongst the dea 

I so to seek philosophy in divinity is to seek the des 

amongst the living : neither are the pots or lavers, who! 

place was in the outward part of the temple, to be soug^ 

in the holiest place of all, where the ark of the testimd 

was seated. And again, the scope or purpose of the spu 

of God is not to express matters of nature in the scri; 

tures, otherwise than in passage, and for application 

man's capacity and to matters moral or divine. And 

is a true rule, Auctoris aliud agentis paroa auciortias, F 

it were a strange conclusion, if a man should use a simi 

iiament or illustration sake, borrowed he 

istory according to vulgar conceit, as of 

micom, a centaur, a Briarens, an hjrdra, 

lierefore he must needs be dioag^t to affii 



XXV. i6.] THE SECOND BOOK. 363 

the matter thereof positively to be true. To conclude 
therefore these two interpretations, the one by reduction 
or aenigmatical, the other philosophical or physical, which 
have been received and pursued in imitation of the rab- 
bins and cabalists, are to be confined with a noli altum 
sapere, sed time, 

^ 17. But the two latter points, known to God and im- 
known to man, touching the secrets of the heart and the 

\ successions of time, doth make a just and sound difference 
between the manner of the exposition of the scriptures 
and all other books. For it is an excellent observation 
which hath been made upon the answers of our Saviour 
Christ to many of the questions which were propounded 
to him, how that they are impertinent to the state of the 
question demanded; the reason whereof is, because not 
being like man, which knows man's thoughts by his words, 
but knowing man's thoughts immediately, he never an- 
swered their words, but their thoughts. Much in the like 
manner it is with the scriptures, which being written to 
the thoughts of men, and to the succession of all ages, 
with a foresight of all heresies, contradictions, differing 
estates of the church, yea and particularly of the elect, 
^ not to be interpreted only according to the latitude 
of the proper sense of the place, and respectively towards 
that present occasion whereupon the words were uttered, 

! or in precise congruity or contexture with the words 

j before or after, or in contemplation of the principal scope 
of the place ; but have in themselves, not only totally or 
collectively, but distributively in clauses and words, in- 
finite springs and streams of doctrine to water the church 
in every part. And therefore as the literal sense is, as it 
were, the main stream or river ; so the moral sense chiefly, 
*nd sometimes the allegorical or typical, are they whereof 



264 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXV. 17. 

the church hath most use : not that I wish men to be 
bold in allegories, or indulgent or light in allusions; 
but that I do much condemn that interpretation of the 
scripture which is only after the manner as, men use to 
interpret a profane book. 

18. In this part touching the exposition of the 
scriptures, I can report no deficience ; but by way of 
remembrance this I will add. In perusing books of 
divinity, I find many books of controversies, and many ol 
commonplaces and treatises, a mass of positive divinity, as 
it is made an art : a number of sermons and lectures, and 
many prolix commentaries upon the scriptures, with har- 
monies and concordances. But that form of writing in 
divinity which in my judgement is of all others most rich 
and precious, is positive divinity, collected upon particular 
texts of scriptures in brief observations ; not dilated into 
commonplaces, not chasing after controversies, not re- 
duced into method of art ; a thing abounding in sermonSj 
which will vanish, but defective in books which will re- 
main, and a thing wherein this age excelleth. For I 
persuaded, and I may speak it with an abstf tnvtdia verho 
and no ways in derogation of antiquity, but as in a gooc 
emulation between the vine and the olive, that if th< 
choice and best of those observations upon texts 
scriptures, which have been made dispersedly in serno 
within this your Majesty's island of Brittany by the s] 

„ . of these forty years and more (leaving out tb< 
scriptura- largeness of exhortations and application 
rum in doc thereupon) had been set down in a con 
trinas posit" tinuance, it had been the best work in di 
^<»- vinity which had been written since tb 

Apostles' times. 

19. The matter informed by divinity is of two kin 



XXV. 19.] THE SECOND BOOK. 26$ 

matter of belief and truth of opinion, and matter of ser- 
vice and adoration; which is also judged and directed by 
the former : the one being as the internal soul of religion, 
md the other as the external body thereof. And there- 
ore the heathen religion was not only a worship of idols, 
)ut the whole religion was an idol in itself; for it had no 
oul, that is, no certainty of belief or confession : as a 
nan may well think, considering the chief doctors of their 
:hurch were the poets : and the reason was, because the 
leathen gods were no jealous gods, but were glad to 
)e admitted into part, as they had reason. Neither did 
hey respect the pureness of heart, so they mought have 
ixternal honour and rites. 

20. But out of these two do result and issue four main 
Dranches of divinity; faith, manners, liturgy, and govern- 
ment. Faith containeth the doctrine of the nature of 
God, of the attributes of God, and of the works of God. 
The nature of God consisteth of three persons in unity of 
Godhead. The attributes of God are either common to 
the Deity, or respective to the persons. The works of 
God summary are two, that of the creation and that of 
the redemption; and both these works, as in total they 
appertain to the unity of the Godhead, so in their parts 
they refer to the three persons : that of the creation, in 
the mass of the matter, to the Father ; in the disposition 
of the form, to the Son ; and in the continuance and 
conservation of the being, to the Holy Spirit So that 
of the redemption, in the election and counsel, to the 
Father ; in the whole act and consummation, to the Son ; 
and in the application, to the Holy Spirit; for by the 
Holy Ghost was Christ conceived in flesh, and by the ' 
Holy Ghost are the elect regenerate in spirit. This work 
Hkewise we consider either effectually, in the elect; or 



266 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. [XXV.2. 

privately, in the reprobate; or according to appearano 
in the visible church. 

21. For manners, the doctnne thereof is contained i 
the law, which discloseth sin. The law itself is divide 
according to the edition thereof, into the law of natUT' 
the law moral, and the law positive ; and according to tl: 
style, into negative and affirmative, prohibitions and c 
mandments. Sin, in the matter and subject thereof, 
divided according to the commandments; in the fon 
thereof, it referreth to the three persons in Deity : sins < 
infirmity against the Father, whose more special attri 
is power ; sins of ignorance against the Son, whose atb 
bute is wisdom; and sins of malice against the He 
Ghost, whose attribute is grace or love. In the motio 
of it, it either moveth to the right hand or to the le 
either to blind devotion, or to profane and libertine traJ 
gression ; either in imposing restraint where God grants 
liberty, or in taking liberty where God imposeth restral 
In the degrees and progress of it, it divideth itself ir 
thought, word, or act. And in this part I conmiend mil 
the deducing of the law of God to cases of conscience ; I 
that I take indeed to be a breaking, and not exhibit! 
whole of the bread of life. But that which quickene 
both these doctrines of faith and manners, is the elevat 
and consent of the heart ; whereunto appertain books 
exhortation, holy meditation. Christian resolution, ai 
the like. 

2 2. For the liturgy or service, it consisteth of the r 
ciprocal acts between God and man ; which, on the pa 
of God, are the preaching of the word, and the sac 
ments, which are seals to the covenant, or as the visib 
word ; and on the part of man, invocation of the nan 
of God; and under the law, sacrifices; which were 2 



XXV. 22.] THE SECOND BOOK, 267 

visible prayers or confessions: but now the adoration 
being in spiritu et veriiate, there remaineth only vituli 
labiorum; although the use of holy vows of thankful- 
ness and retribution may be accounted also as sealed 
petitions. 

23. And for the government of the church, it con- 
sisteth of the patrimony of the church, the franchises of 
the church, and the offices and jurisdictions of the church, 
and the laws of the church directing the whole ; all which 
have two considerations, the one in themselves, the other 
how they stand compatible and agreeable to the civil 
estate. 

24. This matter of divinity is handled either in form 
of instruction of truth, or in form of confutation of false- 
hood. The declinations from religion, besides the priva- 
tive, which is atheism and the branches thereof, are three ; 
heresies, idolatry, and witchcraft : heresies, when we serve 
the true God with a false worship ; idolatry, when we wor- 
ship false gods, supposing them to be true ; and witch- 
craft, when we adore false gods, knowing them to be 
'wicked and false. For so your Majesty doth excellently 
well observe, that witchcraft is the height of idolatry. 
And yet we see though these be true degrees, Samuel 
teacheth us that they are all of a nature, when there is 
once a receding from the word of God; for so he saith. 
Quasi peccatum ariolandiesi repugnarey ei quasi scelus idolo- 
ktricB nolle acquiescere, 

25. These things I have passed over so briefly because 
lean report no deficience concerning them: for I can 
find no space or ground that lieth vacant and unsown in 
the matter of divinity : so diligent have men been, either 
in sowing of good seed, or in sowing of tares. 



268 OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING. 

T^HUS have I made as it were a small globe of 
intellectual world, as truly and faithfully as I cc 
discover; with a note and description of those p 
which seem to me not constantly occupate, or not 
converted by the labour of man. In which, if I hav< 
any point receded from that which is commonly recei 
it hath been with a purpose of proceeding tn meiitiSy 
not in altud; a mind of amendment and proficience, 
not of change and difference. For I could not be 
and constant to the argument I handle, if I were 
willing to go beyond others; but yet not more wi 
than to have others go beyond me again: which 
the better appear by this, that I have propounded 
opinions naked and unarmed, not seeking to preoccu 
the liberty of men's judgements by confutations. F« 
anything which is well set down, I am in good hope, 
if the first reading move an objection, the second rea 
will make an answer. And in those things when 
have erred, I am sure I have not prejudiced the rigl 
litigious arguments; which certainly have this con 
effect and operation, that they add authority to errorj 
destroy the authority of that which is well invented, 
question is an honour and preferment to falsehood, s 
the other side it is a repulse to truth. But the err 
claim and challenge to myself as mine own. The go* 
any be, is due tanquam adeps sacrificiiy to be incense 
the honour, first of the Divine Majesty, and next of 
Majesty, to whom on earth I am most bounden. 



"/J 

cd 



NOTES. 



BOOK I. 

P. I. [i] See Lev. xxii. i8 ; Num. xxviii. 2, 3. [3] upon ordinary 
'bservance : ex rituali cultu, [7, 8] according . . . employments : Omitted 
J Lat. [14-17] and ... admiration : Omitted in Lat [15] Prov. 

IV. 3- 
P. 3. [8] Plato, Phaedo, i. 72; Meno, ii. 81 ; Comp. Theaet. i. 166, 

191 ; Arist. de Memor. 2 ; Anal. Pr. ii. 21 ; Cicero, Tusa Disp. i. 24. 

)/. [10] notions: motions in ed. 1605, but corrected in the Errata 
^0 that edition. [17] i Kings iv. 29. [17, 18] For the construction 
»ee note on p. 20, 1. 26. [23] * should ' used for * would.* [26] Tac. 
^m. jan. 3. Augusto prompta ac profluens quceque deceret prit^cipem 
floquentia fuit. [32, 33] all this . . . subject : Lat. nescio quid servile 
o/tf, ««e sui Juris est. 

P* 3* [15] perfection : profection in ed. 1605 ; corrected in Errata. 
[20-37] Lat. Percurrat qui voluerit imperatorum et regum seriem, et juxta 
tnecum seruiei, omitting the particular dynasties. 

P. 4. [6] Hermes : Hermes Trismegistus, fabled to be an Egjrptian 
priest, philosopher, and king. The author of the works ascribed to 
him was probably a Neoplatonist of the second or third century. 
Fidnus (Argum. in Merc. Tris. Pimandr.) says, Trismegistum vera 
termaximum nuncuparuntf quoniam et philosophus maximus, et sacerdos 
maximuSf et rex maximus extitit, [19] the former : the Lat adds quce 
levior est, neque tatnen ullo modo pratermittenda. In his letter to Toby 
Matthew, Bacon speaks of the first part of the Advancement * but as 
a page to the latter.' [22] the latter: Lat. posterior vero pars {quod 
caput ret est), 

P* 5* [7] ignorance severally disguised : Lat. ignorantia non sub uno 
iehemate. [17] I Cor. viii. i. [18] Eccl. xii. 12. [20] Eccl. i. 18. 
[23] Col. ii. 8. [25] Among the causes of atheism Bacon enumerates, 
'lastly, learned timest specially with peace, and prosperity: for troubles 
and adversities doe more bow mens mindes to religion.* Ess. xvi. 
p. 66. [32] Mr. Ellis gives the following note on the corresponding 
passage in the De Augmentis: *This reference to the imposition of 
names in Paradise in illustration of natural knowledge, is common in the 
Stings of the schoolmen. Thus S. Thomas Aquinas in discussing 



■f- 



270 SOTES. 

the qoestion " ctrom prianis homo iabcexit «*•*»«»»•"* onmeaC ^ 
stating objecdons allied against the afiErmatiTe opixdon, thus 08 
mences his refctation of them. "Sed ctxitra est qaod ipst impos 
Domina animalibcs, nt didtnr Gen. 2. Nomina antem debent nati 
renim cor.gnxere ; Ergo Adam scivit catoras omnnmi ar^imalinm^ ci | 
ratione habcit omnimn alioram sdentiam.**' Comp. also the treii 
Of the Interpretation of Nature (Works, iiL 219, ed. Spedding 
Ellis) : * For behold it was not that pore light of natnral knowla 
whereby man in paradise was able to give onto every living cral 
a name according to his propriety, which gave occasion to the i 
bat it was an aspiring desire to attain to that part of moral knowle 
which defineth of good and evil, whereby to dispute God's conmia 
ments and not to depend npon the revelatioa of his will, whidi was 
original temptation.' [33] Gen. ii. 19, 20. 

P. 6. [11] EccL L 8. [13 &C.] Comp. Of the InterpretatioD 
Nature, p. 220. [18, 31] Ecd. iii. 11. 

P. 7. [6] he doth in another place rule over: Tat, satis dart € 
docet. [7] Prov. xx. 27. [12 &c.] Comp. Of the Interpretation 
Nature (Works, vol. iii. p. 222). [19] i Cor. viiL i. [ai] i Cor. zii 
[31I Col. ii. 8. 

P. 8. [12] Eccl. ii. 13, 14. [15] roundeth about: LaL oberrai, [ 
Comp. Plato, Theaet. i. p. 155 d; Arist. Metaph. L a. Hesiod (TTm 
780) makes Iris the daughter of Thanmas. [26] Heraditns the ] 
found: Lat. Heraclitus tile obscurus. [27] ovy^ (ijpil ^nrxfl aa^ttr 
tcard rhv 'Hp^xXfiroy ioucew, Plut De Esu Carnium, L 6. 4. Sd 
conjectured that a^^^ ^Iph ^X^ oo<p<uTdnj was a cormpticxi of 
iffvx^ ao(pwTdrrj: (rjp^ having been in the first instance a gloss ir 
aCrf and afterwards adopted into the text ; a change which necessita 
the further alteration of avrj to avyff to make sense. Stobaens, 
Gaisford, v. 1 20. The proverb is again quoted by Baom, Ess. zxvi 
112 : * Heraclitus saith well, in one of his senigmaes; Dry lighi n 1 
the best. And certaine it is, that the light, that a man recgivMli, 
counsell from another, is drier, and purer, then that which a 
meth from his owne understanding, and iudgement; which b < 
infused and drenched in his affections and customes.' Comp. Ape 
268 ; Adv. of Learning, p. 149, L 3. [31] — p. 9. [11] Compue 
corresponding passage Of the Interpretation of Nature, p. aiS. 

P. 9. [5, 6] broken knowledge: * contemplation brcJcen off^ or los 
itself.* Of the Interpretation of Nature, p. 218. [6] one of PU 
school: Philo Judjeus, De Somnii.s, p. 577 K (ed. Tumebns^ F 
1691^. [7] Comp. Apoph. 120. [14] A reference to the fabie 
Icarus. [15 &c.] Comp. Of the Interpretation of Nature, p. a 
[20I Job xiii. 7, 9. [26 &c.] Comp. Ess. xvi. p. 64: 'It is true, t 

little philosophy inclineth mans minde to AMsm»; hot depth 



BOOK I. 271 

tiilosophy, bringeth mens mindes about to Religion: for while the 

mmde of man, looketh upon second causes scattered, it may sometimes 

St in them, and goe no further: but when it beholdeth, the chaine 

, confederate and linked together, it must needs flie to providence^ 

Iaane* 
r. 10. [5] Hom, II. viH. 19. Comp. also p. 109, 1. 24. Plato, 
Tliext i. 153 c [25] too incompatible and differing: I^t. nimis 
mravagantia, [31] Plutarch, Cato, 22 ; Pliny, N. H. vii. 31. 

P. II. [15] Virgil, JEn. vi. 852. [16] Plato, Apol. Socr. i. 19, 

: 14 &c Xenophon, Mem. i. i. i. [28] Comp. Ess. Iviii. pp. 237, 

438: 'In the youth of a state, armes doe flourish: in the middle age 

of a state, learning ; and then both of them together for a time : 

in the declining age of a state, mechanicall arts and merchandize.* 

P. 12. [9] a greater: So ed. 1640; *a' is omitted in edd. 1605, 1629, 
1633. [14-20] Comp. Ess. Iviii. pp. 237, 238, quoted above. [16] 
about an age : i. e. about the same age. According to Aristotle (Rhet. 
il 14. § 4) the body is strongest from thirty to thirty-five, the mind 
at forty-nine. [25] a few pleasing receipts : Lat. pauca qucedam medica- 
9aua qiuB Hits videntur panchresta. [27] the complexions of patients: 
Lat. agrotorum habitus, [2,8] peril of accidents: Lat. symptomatum 
pericula. See p. 137, 1. 20. 

P. 13. [16] Suetonius, Nero, 7; Tac. An. xiii. [17] Gordianus III. 
(23^244) married the daughter of Misitheus, of whom Gibbon (c. vii.) 
says, • The life of Misitheus had been spent in the profession of letters. 
Dot of arms ; yet such was the versatile genius of that great man, that, 
when he was appointed Prsetorian prsefect, he discharged the military 
duties of his place with vigour and ability.' Capitolinus, Gordian. Tert. 
a 23. The name Misitheus is supposed to be corrupted from Temesitheus 
or Timesitheus. [20] Alexander Severus succeeded after the murder of 
liis cousin Elagabalus, March lo, 222. * But as Alexander was a modest 
and dutiful youth of only seventeen years of age, the reins of govem- 
ittent were in the hands of two women, of his mother Mamgea, and of 
Maesa his grandmother. After the death of the latter, who survived but 
a short time the elevation of Alexander, Mamaea remained the sole-regent 
of her son and of the empire.* Gibbon, c. vi. [24] Pius V. (Michele 
Ghislieri) was a Dominican and had been Grand Inquisitor. He was 
Pope from 1565 to 1572. The victory over the Turks off Lepanto was 
won in his time. See Bacon, Adv. touching an Holy War (vii. p. 19). 
Sixtus V. (Felice Peretti) was appointed by Pius V. vicar-general of the 
Franciscans, and afterwards promoted to the College of Cardinals as 
Cardinal Montalto. He succeeded Gregory XIII. in 1585, and reigned 
ill 1590. Gibbon (c. 70) says of him, *The genius of Sixtus the Fifth 
)urst from the gloom of a Franciscan cloister.* See Ranke, Hist, of 
he Popes, trans. Foster, Books iii. and iv. [26] pedantical : So all the 



2"]% NOTES^ 

copies of ed. 1605 which I have seen. Mr. Markby quotes prejudia 
the reading of others. [33] ragioni di stato : reasons of state, pol 
considerations. 

P. 14. [i] Catena, Vita di Pio V. p. 31 (ed. 1586), reports a sa 
the Pope, something to this effect, with reference to the maxim 01 1 
XI. of France, *Chi non sk simulare non sik regnare.' See 
Gabutius, Vita Pii V. lib. vi. c. 7 (Acta Sanctorum, 5 Maii, ed. il 
and lib. ii. c. 3. [9] Lat. ad regendos eventus viUe etiam in uno km 
Perhaps the reading of the English should be * for the events eve 
one man's life/ [27] positive and regular: Lat pertinaees et diffi 
[30] latitude : Lat. constantiam. 
\ P. 15. [5] Guicciardini, Hist. xvi. 5. [8] Cic. ad AtL xvL 7. 
Phocion: see his life by Plutarch, [ii] Pindar, Pyth. ii. ai 
Bacon interprets the fable of Ldon in the present work, p. 123. 
Cicero, Ep. ad Att. ii. i. 

P. 16. [2] according to nature: natures consentaneis. [4] and m 
the purchase : i. e. not in that which is acquired by it [10] Sei 
Ep. i. 3. Quidam adeo in latehras refugere, ut putent in iurbidn 
quicquid in luce est, from Pomponius. [24] Plutarch, Demosth. 
where the story is told of Pytheas, not i^schines. Comp. Apoph. 
[32] of both : The Latin adds et negotiorum et literarum, 

P. 17. [4] duty taught and imderstood: officium oculatum. [8] n 
able: Some copies of ed. 1605 read amiable, [10, ii] Lat qua 
historia clarissime patet, [14] Plutarch, Cato, ii. 6. Cic. Acad. Qi 
ii. 2. § 5 ; De Senect i. § 3. 

P. 18. [2] The Thirty Tyrants: After the battle of .^gospo 
(Sept. B.C. 405), which virtually terminated the Peloponnesian 
a committee of thirty was appointed for the government of At! 
with Critias and Theramenes among the chief. Their rule L 
only eight months (b.c. 404-403) and was put an end to by Th 
bulus. [9] for sovereign medicines: i.e. to be sovereign medi( 
[20] Hor. Od. i. 3. 2. [21] influence: A word derived from the 
astrology. See Eng. vers, of Job xxxviii. 31. 

P. 19. [8] Lat. Fratrihus mendicantibus (pace eorum dixerim), [ 
to some friar ... to whom : Compare for the construction, Boc 
§ 10. p. 80, 11. 4, 5. [10] Machiavelli, Disc, sopra Liv. iiL 1. Oi 
for a different purpose in the tract On the Controversies of the ( 
(Bacon's Life and Letters, ed. Spedding, L 80). [31] Epist i. a 
Csesarem, De Republica Ordinanda, ascribed to Sallnst 

10. [i] A saying attributed to Diogenes the Cynia See 1 
T. 54. [6] Prov. xxviii. 22. [7] Prov. xxiiL 23. [13] 
traction 'in comparison of* see Judg. viii a, 3. [la] 
"6 : Sed prafulgebant Cassius atqtu Brutus, §0 ipta qmod 
visebantur, [25] traduced to contempt: ie. oootempiw 



BOOK J. 273 

"graded. [26, 27] Whtck age, because it is the age of least authority, 

it is transferred &c. : Observe the looseness of construction in the 

imnecessary repetition of the pronoun ii : the words * which age * being 

placed foremost in the sentence without any government as a kind of 

mminoHvus pendens. Other examples occur in the course of this book, 

pp.' a, 11. 17, 18; 39, 11. 10, II, 32, 33; 48, 11. 20-24. Comp. the 

Authorized Version of John xiii. 3, 4 ; 'Jesus knowing . , .he riseth &c/ 

P. 21. [4] Joel. ii. 28. Comp. Ess. xlii. p. 175 : * A certaine rabbine, 

4 upon the text ; Four young men shall see visions, and your old men shall 

r ^me dreames ; inferreth, that young men are admitted nearer to God 

then old ; because vision is a clearer revelation, then a dreame.' The 

'rabbine' is Abrabanel. [6] they: Some copies of ed. 1605 read the. 

[8] condition . . . hath : In ed. 1605 the reading is conditions , . . hath'; 

in ed. 1633, conditions . . . have. [9] Comp. Florio's Montaigne, p. 60, 

ei 1603 : • I have in my youth oftentimes beene vexed, to see a Pedant 

brought in, in most of Italian Comedies, for a vice or sporte-maker.' 

[16-31] The whole clause is modified in the De Augmentis to avoid .JL^ 

giving offence to the Roman Catholics. It there stands as follows: 

quorum cum intueor industriam solertiamque tarn in doctrina excolenda 

piam in moribus informandis, illud occurrit Agesilai de Phamabazo &c. 

[17] A saying of Diogenes. See Diog. Laert. vi. 46. Comp. Apoph. 

i66. [21] Plutarch, Ages. xii. 5. [28] Ovid, EpisL xv. 83. Quoted 

again in Ess. 1. p. 205. [28-30] Lat. atque literas, nisi incidant in 

mgenia admodum depravata, conigere prorsus naturam et mutare in melius, 

[33] not inherent : The negative is superfluous, or something has been 

omitted. The Latin has nullum occurrit dedecus Uteris ex literatorum 

worihus, quatenus sunt literati, adhcerens, where 'inherent' is taken as 

referring to * disgrace,* and not to 'manners,' as Mr. Spedding explains 

it: 'not [I mean, from such manners as are] inherent &c.* 

P. 22. [11] Plutarch, Solpn, 15; Bacon, Apoph. 93. [14] Plato, 
Epist vii. p. 331. Mr. Ellis suggested that Bacon probably took it 
from Cicero, Epist. Fam. i. 9. 18. [17] Epist i. ad Cses. De Republica 
Ordinanda. [20] Cic. ad Att. ii. i. 8 : optima ammo utens et summajide^ 
noeet interdum reipuhlicce, Dicit enim tanquam in Platonis voXixc/^, non 
Uuquam in Romuli fcece, sententiam, [23] doth excuse and expound: 
Lat molli interpretatione excusat. [25] Cic. pro Mursena, 31: Etenim 
isti ipsi mihi videntur vestri prceceptores et virtutis magistri fines officiorum 
&c. [29] Ovid, Ars Amat. ii. 548. 

P. 23. [2] Demosthenes, De Cherson, p. 106. [8] quinquennium 
Neronis : See Aurelius Victor, De Caesar, v. 1. [10] The Latin adds, 
magno suo periculo, ac postremo prcecipiHo, [13^ the casualty of their 
fortunes: Lat. instahilitatis fortunce. [20] Matt. xxv. 20. [21 &c.] 
Compare with this Essay xxiii. ' Of wisdome for a man's selfe.' [23] 
nor never : Observe the double negative. [25] lines : Some copies of ed. 

T 



274 NOTES. 

1605 read tirms, [27] estates : Perhaps we should read ettaH; ltd. 
reipublica navi, [31] stand : i. e. stand firm, keep their positioD ; ', 
incolumes permaneant, 

P« 34. [3, 4] howsoever fortune may tax it : Lat uieunqu* t€t qum 
que afortuna mulctentur, [10] Lat. quod non facile se applieeni et oca 
modent. [16] Ascribed to Epicurus by Seneca, Ep. i. 7. § 11. Qnofee 
again in Ess. z. p. 36 : ' It is a poore saying of Epicurus ; Satis magam 
alter (Uteri theatrum sumus : as if man, made for the contemplation 1 
heaven, and all noble obiects, should doe nothing, but kn^e before 
little idoll, and make himself subiect, though not of the mouth (as be 
are) yet of the eye ; which was given him for higher purposes.* [10 
not: Omitted in some copies of ed. 1605. [[8] Lat aciem aninut turn 
oculi. [19] Lat. Secunda vero causa est probitas morum ei un^UeHa 
[27] Lat. ut ilium inflectas, verses, et ad libitum eircumagas, [31] tfe 
custom of the Levant : Lat. mos Orientis, Comp. Her. i. 99. 

?• 25. [3] Prov. XXV. 3. [14] Plutarch, Them. IL 4 ; Cimon, ix. : 
Quoted again in Ess. xxix. p. 118 : *The speech of Themistodes 
Athenian, which was haughtie and arrogant, in taking so much 1 
himselfe, had been a grave and wise observation and censure, applied 1 
large to others. Desired at a feast to touch a lute, he said ; He eo 
not fiddle, but yet he could make a small toume, a great dtty* [30] ! 
quibus tamen in communi vita et quotidianis reculis nihil imperious, [a: 
Comp. Apoph. 196; Plato, Symp. iiL p. 215; Xen. Symp. ▼. 
Socrates is compared not to * the gallipots of apothecaries' bat to tl 
images of Silenus, of which Rabelais (Gargantua, prol.) says, ' Silem 
estoyent jadiz petites boytes, telles que voyons de present es bonticqai 
des apothecaires ; painctes au dessus de figures joyeuses et frivold 
Mr. Spedding, with great probability, conjectures that Bacon may hi^ 
had this passage in his mind. [24] Lat. qwe exterius indueebeuUtar mhu 
ululis, satyrisque, 

P. 26. [3] solemn parasites : Lat. barbatos parasitos, [4] Ladan, I 
Mercede Conductis, 33, 34. [6] Lat catulum suttm MdiUatm. [la] '. 
Bartas, Second Jour de la Semaine : 

'Tous ces doctes esprits dont la voix flatteresse. 
Change H^ube en Hel^ne, et Faustine en LuGrcsfie. 
Qui d'un nain, d^un batard, d'un archerot sans yeox. 
Font, non un dieutelet, ains le maistre des dieux,* &c. 
See also Judith, bk. v. [14] modem: The ed. of 1605 has morall, whn 
is corrected in the Errata to modeme, the reading of edd. 1629, i6i 
[lb.] dedication: ed. 1605 has dedications. It is cnrious that 
translator in the De Augmentis followed the uncorrected copy : w? 
vero nimis laudo morem ilium receptum libros patroms Ht P u m p a m H. [a< 
Aristippus, not Diogenes. See Diog. Laert. Aristip. u. 69. Com 
Apoph. i6x. 



BOOK I. 275 

5] Diog. Laert. Aristip. ii. 79 ; Apoph. 86. [10] Spartianus 
iriani, § 15) tells this story of Favorinus. Apoph. 160. [24] 
ea quce impoUuta et in statu suo manserunt. [25] the state : the 
LS not unfrequently employed where we should now use a 
pronoun. See Glossary. 

6] The Latin adds, quando nimirum aut in rebus inanihus opera 
aut circa verborum delicias nimium insudatur. [10] Lat. 
tcata et mollis. [12-31] The whole of this passage is much 
in the I^tin, apparently to avoid offending the Roman 
See p. 21, 11. 16-21, note. In the De Augmentis the 
is substituted : Intemperies ista, in luxurie quadam orationis sita 
per vices in pretio habita fuerit\ circa Lutheri tempora miris tnodis 
In causa prcecipue fuit, quod fervor et efficacia concionum tune 
Ipopulum demulcendum et alliciendum ntaxime vigebat; ilia autem 
enus orationis poscebant. Accedebai odium et eontemptus illis 
ortus erga scholasticos, 8cc. 

[4-15] And again . . . flourish: Omitted in the Latin. [5] 
then in ed. 1605, corrected in Errata. [6] John vii. 49. [23] 
)ishop of Sylves in Algarve, died 1580; wrote De Rebus 
lanuelis, 1574. On his redundant style see Ascham, The 
iter, pp. 110, 1 29-1 31, ed. Mayor. [24] . Sturmius : Joannes 
bom at Sleida, October i, 1507, died March 3, 1589, was 
German Cicero. He was professor at Paris and Strasburg, 
In Partitiones Oratorias Ciceronis Dialogi Quatuor, Scholia 
genem, De Imitatione Oratoria Libri Tres, and De Periodis 
all of which Bacon refers, besides many other works. [27] \ 
ambridge: Nicholas Carr (1523-1568) succeeded Sir John" / 
Regius Professor of Greek in 1547. He obtained a great 
by his translations into Latin of the Olynthiacs and Philip- 
mosthenes, Plato's Dialogue on the Laws, and the Oration of 
against Ctesiphon. Besides these he wrote prefaces to the 
n and other dialogues of Plato, as well as to ^schines, 
», Sophocles, and some orations of Demosthenes. [28] Ascham; 
;ham (i 515-1568), in his Scholemaster, is constantly sounding 
> of Cicero, whom he calls his master. [32] Erasmus, Colloq. 
n annos cetatem trivi in Cicerone* Echo. * 6v€,* 
5] is: Omitted in ed. 1605. [8] secundum majus et minus: i. e. 
er or less degree. See p. 171, 1. 12. [13] Pygmalion : Ovid, 
• 243. [32] The Scholiast on Theocr. v. 21 attributes this "i 
ercules to Oleander h 8f t/r^py tcDv napoi/jioay. Bacon inserted 
romus, fol. 16 a. [33] minion: migmon, ed. 1605. 
5] In the De Augmentis another kind of style is mentioned as 
more healthy than the last-mentioned, though not altogether 
yanity. The whole object of this is that the words should bd 

T 2 



2y6 NOTES. 

pointed, the sentences concise, and the composition rather twisted 
flowing. Instances are found largely in Seneca, less in Tacitns i 
Plinius Secundus. [13] Lat. neque theologiam tatUum, sed etiam om 
scientias respicere videtur, [lb.] I Tim. vi. 20. Quoted again in Eo. 
p. II. [17] the strictness of positions : Lat. rigor dogmatum, [atH- 
32 [9] This kind . . . profit : The original of this passage is to be f 
in Bacon's Cogit. de Sci. Hum. Frag. i. cog. 10 (Works, iii. 187). 

P. 32. [7] cobwebs: ed. 1605, copwebs, the older form of spelling. 
Old Engli^, * atter cop ' (A. S. dttor coppa) is a spider. [20] 
^sop. Fab. 52. Vis unita fordor : Bacon, Colours of Good andLi 
p. 255, ed. W. A. Wright. [27] Quintil. x. i : Si rerum pom 
minudssimis sentendis non fregisset, consensu podus eruditarum qim 
puerorum amore comproharetur. Quoted again in Ess. xxvL p. 105. 

P. 33. [10] Virg. Ed. vi. 75. Bacon makes use of the same 6giin 
his book Of the Interpretation of Nature ("Works, iii. 23a, ed. Spedd 
[22] ol \6yoi aov ytpovriwai, Diog. Laert. Plato, iii. 18. Quoted a 
in Nov. Org. i. 71. [29] — p. 34. [4] but as they are . • . unto tl 
Omitted in the Latin, for the same reason as before. For the ori 
form see Of the Interp. of Nat. p. 224. [30] fierce with dark keep 
that is, as Mr. Ellis explains it, fierce with being kept in the dark 
animals. He quotes from Bacon's Cogitationes de Sdentia Hoi 
1st frag. cog. 10 (Works, iii. 187) : ferocitatem autem et confidendau 
qu<E illos qui pauca sequi solet (ut animalia in tenebris tdm 
acquisivissent, 

P. 34. [8] the essential form : Lat. ipsam naturam animamqtii, \ 
Hor. Epist. i. 18. 69. [24] Tac. Ann. v. 10 ; comp. Hist i 51. j 
* hath ' for * have ' : a loose construction, not uncommon in Bacon. 
p. 35, 1. 26 : ' Such whereupon observation and rule was to be t 
Also p. 109, 1. 33, and Ps. xiv. 7, Pr. Bk. 'Destruction and unhappi 
is in their ways.' [29] or, as : * or ' is omitted in ed. 1605, bat in 
in Errata and in edd. 1629, 1633. 

P* 35* [3-^0] which though . . . religion: Omitted in the Latin 
before, pp. 21, 28, 33. [3] had a passage for a time: The ed. ? 
reads, * had a passage for time.* Perhaps it should be, * had passagi 
a time/ that is, *were current for a time.' [13] Plinius: 'Pb 
secundus of Verona; a man of great Eloquence, and industry 
fatigable, as may appear by his writings, especially those now a 
and which are never like to perish, but even with learning it self; 
is, his natural History. He was the greatest Collector or Rha 
dist of the Latines, and as Suetonius observeth, he collected this pi 
out of two thousand Latine and Greek Authors. Now, what is tB 
strange, there is scarce a popular error passant in our dayes, wl 
is not either directly expressed, or diductively contained in tiiis w< 
Sir T. Brown, Vulgar Errors, book L chap. 8, p. 33 (ed. 1658). [JJ 



BOOK 1. 277 

lanus: *We had almost forgot jferommui Cardanui, that famous 
iician of Milan, a great enquirer of truth, but too greedy a receiver 
:. He hath left many excellent discourses, Medical, Natural, and 
ological ; the most suspicious are those two he wrote by admonition 
dream, that is, De suhtilitate et varietate rerum* Ibid. p. 36. [14] 
ertus: * Alberttts Bishop of Ratisbone; for his great learning and 
ude of knowledge simamed Magnus. Besides Divinity^ he hath 
ten many Tracts in Philosophy ; what we are chiefly to receive with 
3on, are his natural tractates, more especially those of Minerals, 
[etables and animals, which are indeed chiefly Collections out of 
Uotle, jSlian, and Pliny ^ and respectively contain many of our popular 
ors.* Ibid. p. 35. [23] side : The edd. of 1605, 1639, 1633, ^^^ 
ic' The book De Mirabilibus Auscultationibus, to which Bacon 

, is not Aristotle's. See p. 87. [36] * was ' for * were.* See p. 34, 
3, note. 

'. 36. [i] Lat. gucB plus iahent ex phantasia et fide quam ex ratione et 
murationibus, [12] the derivations and prosecutions to these ends: 
it is, the subsidiary channels leading to these ends and the modes in 
di they have been followed. The Latin has, via atque rationes quce 
w putantur ad hos fines. [19] .ffisop, Fab. 33 ; comp. Nov. Org. i. 

[32] consuls: counsels in ed. 1605, corrected to consulls in Errata. 
Spedding conjectured that Bacon probably wrote counsell''^, and his 
jecture is adopted by Mr. Kitchin. The Latin has, dictatoria quadam 
state munivit ut edicant, non senatoria ut consulant, which again loc^s 
f the translator had the uncorrected copy before him. 
'• 37- [2-30] For hence . . . Aristotle : The original form of this 
sage is seen in the book Of the Interpretation of Nature (Works, iii. 
, 227). [3] deviser: 'device* (Interpretation of Nature). [6] 
llery, sailing, printing : * painting, artillery, sailing* (Interpretation of 
ture). [16 -20] For as . . . Aristotle: * For knowledge is like a water 
t will never rise again higher than the level from which it fell ; and 
refore to go beyond Aristotle by the light of Aristotle is to think that 
orrowed light can increase the original light from which it is taken ' 
terpretation of Nature). [31] Aristot. Soph. El. i. 3. [38-30] Lat. 
authori authorum et veritatis parenti, Temporif non derogetur. [32] 

Jit humours : Lat. vitiosi humores. 
r. 38. [6] Alluding to the old fable of Kronos. [11] Jer. vi. 16; 
Dted agam in Ess. xxiv. p. 100. [16] Comp. Nov. Org. i. 84 : Mundi 
m senium et grandcevitas pro antiquitate vere habenda sunt; qu<2 
tforihus nostris tribui debent, non juniori cetati mundi, qualis apud 
tijttos fuit. Ilia enim <Btas, respectu nostri antiqua et major, respectu 
w4i ipsius nova et minor fuit. The observation is quoted by Fuller in 

chapter on The true Church Antiquary (Holy State, ii. 6). [25] 
01 Lucian but Senecar See Lactantius, De Falsa Religione^ i. 16, 



2yS NOTES, 

P. 39. [6] Liv. ix. 17 ; quoted again in Nov. Org. i. 97, and C 
True Greatness of Britain (Works, vii. 50). Comp. Of the Interp 
of Nature, p. 224, for the original of this passage. [10, 11] wiuc 
they be demonstrate, they seem &c. : Observe the loosenei 
construction and the unnecessary repetition of the pronoun. Con 
3a. 33. [16] hath still prevailed : Lat. semper obtinuisse, [23-26] C 
Nov. Org. i. 71 ; Of the Interpretation of Nature (Works, iiL 227) 
Essay liii. p. 213 Bacon uses the same figure in speaking of Fi 

* Certainly, Fame is like a river, that beareth up things light and sv 
and drownes things waighty and solide.* [32, 33] So knowledge, ' 

• it is in aphorisms and observations, it is in growth : Another instan 
the same construction as has been noticed before, p. 20, IL a6, 2[ 
39, 11. 10, II. See p. 48, 11. 20-24 J P- ^29. !• 32. 

P. 40. [2] illustrate : ed. 1633 has illustrated. [8] pkUosopkia pr 
See p. 105, 1. 29 ; p. 113, 1. 20. [22] Heraclitus: In Sextus Empii 
Adv. Logicos, i. § 133. [25-29] for they . , . deluded : The ori| 
form of this passage is to be found in the treatise Of the Interpietat» 
Nature, p. 224. 

P. 41. [3] See Nov. Org. i. 63, 96. [8] Gilbcrtus: William Gilbc 
Colchester (i 540-1 603), Fellow of St. John's CoU. Cambridge, 
physician to Elizabeth and James I., wrote ' De Magnete, magnetid 
corporibus, et de magno magnete tellure ; Physiologia nova &c. i 

* His work,* says Dr. Whewell (Hist, of Ind. Sc book xii. ch 
' contains all the fundamental facts of the science, so fully exaa 
indeed, that even at this day we have little to add to them.' Comp. 
the whole of this passage Nov. Org. i 54, 64. [12] Cicero, Tus& 1 
i. 10. 20, Hie ab artificio suo non recessit, speaking of Aristozenus. 
Aristot. De Gener. et Comip. i. 2, quoted again in the treatise Of 
Interpretation of Nature, p. 231. [18] The same comparison is i 
use of in the last-mentioned treatise, p. 250. [19] the two way 
action commonly spoken of by the ancients : Bacon probably refei 
Xenophon (Memorabilia, ii. i. 20), who quotes Hesiod, Works and I 
287-292, and introduces Prodicus*s fable of the choice of Hercules. 

P. 42. [i] Cicero, De Nat. Deor. i. 8. 18. Comp. Nov. Oig. i 
[2] Socrates: See p. 153, 1. 31. [8] devote: So ed. 1605. Ed. ] 
has devoute. [i 7] Comp. S. Bernard, Serm. 36 in Cant. [aS] ten 
ed. 1605 tarrasse. 

P- 43- [5» ^ Comp. Macrob. in Somn. Scip. i. la. [7-14] Comp 
the Interpretation of Nature, p. 222 : 'And- knowledge that tend 
profit or profession or glory is but as the golden ball thrown before * 
lanta, which while she goeth aside and stoopeth to take up she hinde 
the race.' [14] Ovid, Metam. x. 667. [16] Cicero, Tnsc. Disp. v. 4 
[23-26] Comp. Of the Interpretation of Nature p. saa. [a9] h 
hath in edd. 1605, 1629, 1633. [32] Prov. xxvii. 6. 



BOOK I. 279 

p. 44. [la] arch- type: Arch-tipe in ed. 1605 J* Arch-type edd. 1629, 
\l. » [lb.] first platform : exemplari. Comp. Ess. xlix. p. 194 : * So I 
rt made a platforme of a princely garden, partly by precept, partly by 
wing, not a modell, but some generall lines of it.' [18] Comp. Prov. 

"-31- [33] Gen. i. i. 
** 45. [4] Hooker, Eccl. Pol. i. 4. § i, 2. [5] Dionysius, De Cselesti 
archia, 6, 7, 8, 9. A work erroneously ascribed to Dionysius the 
.^'eopagite. The epithet * supposed' shows that Bacon believed it to be 
iparious. The Latin has merely qua Dionysii AreopagitcB nomine evul- 
fatttr. Thomas Heywood, in his Hierarchic of the Blessed Angels 
0^35)f divides them into Seraphim, Cherubim, Thrones, Dominations, 
Vcrtues, Powers, and Principats. See also Milton, Par. Lost, v. 601, 
771,840. [15] Gen. i. 3. [22] Gen. ii. 3. [32] Gen. ii. 19. 

P. 46. [i] Comp. pp. 5, 6. [7] In a note on the corresponding pas- 
rSage of the De Augmentis Mr. Ellis quotes from S. Thomas Aquinas, 
Sunm. Theol. Sec. Secund. q. 163. a. a: Primus homo peccavit prineip- 
uHtir appetendo &militudinem Dei quantum ad scientiam boni et mali, sicui 
vrpens ei suggessity ut scilicet per virtutem propria natura determinaret sibi 
fadesset honum et quid malum ad agendum. [13] Gen. iv. 2. [23] Gen. 
iv. 31, 22. [25] Gen. xi. [30] Acts vii. 22. Comp. Of the Interpreta- 
tion of Nature, p. 219, [32] Plato, Tim. iii. 22. Comp. Nov. Org. i. 
71; Apoph. 223. 

P. 47. [11] Lev. xiii. 12, 13. [14-18] Among the Regales Aphorismi 
or maxims of King James I. edited by W. Stratton, 1650, is the follow- 
ing, evidently borrowed from this passage: * As it is a principle of nature, 
that putrifaction is more contagious before maturity than after ; so it is 
« position of Moral Philosophic, that men abandoned to vice, do not so 
Brach corrupt manners, as those that are half good and half evill * (p. 165). 
In De Augm. iii. i, Bacon gives as a rule in physics, Putredo serpens 
^Mgis contagiosa est quam matura, [24] Job xxvi. 7. [28] Job xxvi. 13. 
[30] Job xxxviii. 31. 

P. 48. [i] Job ix. 9. [5] Job X. 10. [7] Job xxviii. 1,2. [i 2] i Kings 
iii. 5, &c. [17] verdure: verdor edd. 1605, 1629, 1633, which Mr. 
Spedding retains as another form of the word. It probably only repre- 
Knts the current pronunciation. The corresponding passage of the 
treatise Of the Interpretation of Nature, p. 2 20, has * all that is green.' 
[18] the moss upon the wall : The English version of i Kings iv. 33 
has hyssop. Bacon followed the rendering of Junius and Tremellius. 
[19] Nov. Org. ii. 30. [20-24] Nay, the same Salomon the king, 

(although he excelled ... yet A^ maketh &c. : The same loose construction 
as before, pp. 20. 1. 27; 39. 11. 11, 32, 33. [26] Prov. xxv. 2. Comp. 
the corresponding passage Of the Interpretation of Nature, p. 220. 

^- 49- [4] Luke ii. 46. [8] Acts ii. i. [r8] who was only learned: 
I e. the only learned man among the Apostles. Lat. qui inter Apostolus 



a8o NOTES. 

solus literaius fuit, [23] fathers: Father in ed. 1605. [24'] Amm. Mai 
xxii. 10. 7 ; XXV. 4. 19. Comp. Gibbon, ch. 23 ; Juliani Epist. xlik T 
Lat. adds c<Etera viri egregii. [30] Paulus Diaconus, iii. par. 33. Con 
Ess. Iviii. p. 232 ; Gibbon, ch. 45. 

^- 50* [4] Scythians : The Scythians or Tartars invaded the Grodi 
empire a.d. 375, See Gibbon, ch. 26. [5] Saracens: The Arabs nod 
Abubeker conquered Syria a.d. 633-639. See Gibbon, ch. 51. [g-r 
And we see . ..knowledges : Omitted in the Latin. [2a Sec"] With 
paragraph compare Of the Interpretation of Nature, p. 221. [27] rs 
xix. civ. 

P. 51. [3-8] Comp. Nov. Org. i. 89. [4] Matt. xxii. 29. This te 
is made the subject of the section De Hseresibus in Bacon's Medit 
tiones Sacrge. [25] See Herodian, Hist. iv. 2. [26] dives in son 
copies of ed. 1605. [32] honours heroical: honour heroUaU in edi 
1605, 1629, 1633. 

P. 52. [1-19] Comp. Of the Interpretation of Nature, p. 223: 'Tl 
dignity of this end (of endowment of man's life T^th new commoditiQ 
appeareth by the estimation that antiquity made of such as guided then 
unto. For whereas founders of states, lawgivers, extirpers of tyrant 
fathers of the people, were honoured but with the titles of Worthies ( 
Demigods, inventors were ever consecrated amongst the Gods then 
selves. And if the ordinary ambitions of men lead them to sedc tl 
amplification of their own power in their coimtries, and a better ai 
tion than that hath moved men to seek the amplification of the power < 
their own countries amongst other nations, better again and more worfl: 
must that aspiring be which seeketh the amplification of the power ai 
'kingdom of mankind over the world; the rather because the other t« 
prosecutions are ever culpable of much perturbation and injustice; b 
this is a work truly divine, which cometh in aura lent without noise ( 
observation.' [9] as was: So in edd. 1605, 1629, 1633. For constm 
tion compare Luke v. 10. [13, 14] for a latitude of ground: Lat/i 
amplitudine tractus terrcB. [18] coming in: In ed. 1605 this is print! 
com- in, the first syllable occurring at the end of a line. It was ahen 
to commonly in in edd. 1 629, 1 633, but the passage Of the Interpretatif 
of Nature above quoted, and the Lat veniuntque in aura leni^ show th 
* coming in' is the true reading. The Vulgate of i Kings xix. 12 is pi 
ignem sibilus aura tenuis. Bacon uses the expression again in a letter 
Sir Toby Matthew (Life and Letters, ed. Spedding, iii. 74). [24] Phil 
strati Junioris Imagines, vii. Comp. Discourse on the Plantation 
Ireland (Life and Letters, iv. 117), and De Sapientia Vetemm, ii. 

P. 53. [10] Plato, Repub. v. p. 473. A favourite saying of AntODiD 
Pius (Capitoiinus, Vit. Ant. P. c. 2 7). Rabelais, Gargant. 1 45. [31] J 
princes : six sciences in ed. 1605, corrected in Errata. [33] for temp 
respects ; We should say • in temporal respects.' 



BOOK I. !Z8l 

P. 54. [3] Suetonius, Dom. 23, quoted again in Ess. xxxv. p. 150, and 
in a letter from Bacon to King James on a Digest of the Laws of 
England, [7-13] of which . .. altogether : de quibus sigillatim sed brevis- 
shne verba faciam. The following paragraphs, as far as p. 58, 1. 32, are 
much condensed in the Latin. [11] Hor. Od. ii. 10. 19. [15] Tac. 
Agric. 3 : et quamquam primo statim beatissimi seculi ortu Nerva CcBsar res 
olim dissociabiles miscuerit principatum ac libertatem. [21] Horn. II. i. 42; 
riaiiav Aavaol €ficL Sdicpva acXai ^iXtffCiv. Dio Cass. (Xiphilinus) Ixviii. 
p. 771. [24] Matt. X. 41. 

P. 55. [2] This story is told of Gregory the Great in his life by Pauluj 
Diaconus, c. 27, and in that by Joannes Diaconus, lib. ii. c. 44; and 
referred to by Joannes Damascenus, De iis qui in Fide Dormierunt, c. 
16. See also Dante, Purgatorio, cant. x. 73 &c. Vision of Piers Plough- 
man, 6857-6907, ed. T. Wright. [10] Plin. Epist. x. 96. [12] Adrian: 
Dio Cass. bdx. 3, 11. [17J Philip of Macedon: Some copies of ed. 
1605 have * and Macedon.' The story is told by Plutarch, de Adul. et 
Amico, 27 ; Symp. ii. i. 12 ; and repeated by Bacon, Of the Interpreta- 
tion of Nature, p. 230, Apoph. 159. [26] It was not Hadrian, but Alex- 
ander Severus, who is said, in his life by Lampridius (c. 29), to have 
had, in the shrine where his lares were placed, figures of ApoUonius, 
Christ, Abraham, Orpheus, and others. And again (c. 43), Christo tem- 
flumfcuere voluit, eumque inter deos recipere. [32] Trajan's : Mr. Sped- 
ding conjectures Trajan^ which no doubt is more correct, though Trajan* s 
is probably what Bacon wrote. 

P. 56. [3] Aurelius Victor, Epit. xli. 13. Quoted again in a Letter 
from Bacon to King James, Of a Digest to be made of the Laws of 
England (Cabala, p. 75). [11] policing: the regulating and governing 
of a town. Edd. 1605, 1629 have pollicing^ ed. 1633 pollishing. * He 
gave also multitudes of charters and liberties for the comfort of corpora- 
tions and companies in decay.* Bacon, Offer of a Digest of the Laws of 
England. [16] Antoninus : the three old editions have Antonius. [19] 
Dio Cassius, Ixx. 3. Comp. Juliani Csesares. * If his wit be not apt to 
distinguish or find differences, let him study the schoole-men ; for they 
are cymini sectcres* Bacon, Ess. 1. p. 206. [31] Acts xxvi. 28. 

^' 57- [2] Lucius Ceionius Commodus, son of ^lius Caesar, and 
Marcus Annius Verus, were adopted by Antoninus Pius, and on his 
death in 161 succeeded him with the titles of L. Aurelius Verus and 
M. Aurelius Antoninus. [4] Spartianus, Vit. .^lii Veri, c. 5 : idem 
Martialem epigrammaticum poetam Virgilium suum dixisse. [6] Lucius 
Verus died of apoplexy a.d. 169: Marcus Aurelius survived till a.d. 180. 
[10] Juliani Csesares, xviii. [22] Lampridius, Vita Severi, 5-10. [31] 
tile world : * the ' omitted in ed. 1605. 

P. 58. [1-5] Compare Bacon's Letter to the Lord Chancellor, touching 
the history of Britain, where he speaks of Queen Elizabeth in nearly the 



tX" 



2^2 NOTES, 

same words. [3] Kves: lynes in ed. 1605. [6] rare: grace in 
copies of 1605 ; others read great. In the Errata it is corrected tc 
and this is the reading of edd. 1629 and 1633. [12] her: Sc 
copies of ed. 1605; others read the. [30] to the purpose: thai 
regards the purpose &c. 

P. 59. [n] Plutarch, Alex. 8. § i. [19] Achilles: Pint. Alex. I, 
[22] Pliny, H. N. vii. 30; Plutarch, Alex. 26. § i. [25] Plutarch, 

7. §4. 
P. 60. [i-io] And herein . . . praises : Omitted in the Latin. 

Plutarch, Alex. 14. § 2. [i 7] Seneca, De Benef. v. 4. § 4. [23] Plu 

De Adulatore et Amico, 25 ; Alex. 22. § 2. [27] The Latin addi 

tarn indigentia quam redundantia naturce, per ilia duo designata, 

sint tanquam arrhabones. [31] Seneca, Ep. Mor. vi. 7. § 12. Pin 

Alex. 28. § I. [32] Horn. II. v. 340; IxSlfp oUt wip re fiiu /um 

P. 61. [2] Plutarch, Alex. 74. § 2. [6, 7] that was the matter 
should say, that was the point. Lat. hoe ipsum animos eis dedit. 
Plutarch, Alex. 53. § a. Quoted again by Bacon in his Letter 1 
King on a Digest of the Laws of England (Cabala, p. 76). [a 
Lat. Callisthenes negotium in se recepit^ idque tarn acerhe tamque a 
prcestitit tfe. [29] translation : Bacon uses this word as the rend 
metaphor^ borrowing it from the Lat. translatio as employed by v 
[30] Plutarch, Apoph. Reg. et Imp. Alex. 17. Mr. ElUs has p 
out that Bacon, following Erasmus, misunderstood the story. H 
translates it : * "When some there were who much praised unto h 
plainenesse and homelie simplicitie of Antipater, saying that he li 
austere and hard life, without all superfluities and delidoas pic 
whatsoever: Well (quoth he) Antipater weares in outward sh( 
apparell with a plaine white welt or guard, but he is within all 
(I warrant you) and as red as scarlet ('AvWrnrpot kwicowAptHpSe I 
8* ivbov 6\oir6p<pvpo9).* 

P. 62. [3-9] Plutarch, Alex. 31. § 5. Quoted again in Ess 
p. 120. [13] Plutarch, Alex. 47. § 3. [19] according to the m( 
their own mind: Comp. Hor. Epist. i 7. 98, Metiri se quem^ 
modulo ac pede verum est, [21] Plutarch, Alex. 29. § 3. [25] Per 
according to Plutarch, was the only one of Alexander's frienc 
asked the question. Plutarch, Alex. 15. § 2. [30] Plutarch, C 
§ 1. Crassus became surety to Caesar's creditors for 880 talents, 
he was allowed to take the prgetorship in Spain. [32] This storj 
Duke of Guise had been heard by Bacon when he was in Fiance ii 
In his Apology concerning the Earl, of Essex, he says, in refen 
Essex's offer of a piece of land, * My answer, I remember, was, t 
my fortune it was no great matter ; but that his lordship's oflfe 
me to call to mind what was wont to be said, when I was in Fn 



BOOK /. 283 

of Guise, thaf he was the greatest ustirer in France, because he 
sd all his estate into obligations; meaning tlut he had left him- 
Ing, but only had bound numbers of persons to him.' 
[4-8] To conclude . .. prince : Omitted in the Latin. [14] his 
: that is, his companions, the company he kept The Latin 
miliarihus. [20] the real passages : This expression, which is 
in the translation, either means the actual occurrences or the 
descriptions of them, [ai] lively images: We should say 
:tures.' [25] Suetonius, Jul. Cses. 56; Quintil. i. 7. ( 34. This 
; Analogia, in two books, is again referred to by Bacon, De 
[. I, in which passage he is doubtful whether it treated of what 
d call philosophical Grammar, and not rather of degance and 
language. It is quoted by Cicero (Brutus, 7a) under the title 
itione Latine loquendi,' and in the first book Csesar is said to 
down as a maxim verborum deUetum onginem t$se eloquenti€B, 
villus (i. 10) quotes another precept from the same bodk that 
al word is to be avoided like a rock {ut tanquam seoptdum sie 
olens verbum). Again (ix. 14) he appeals to the Second Book 
i Analogia as an authority for the forms ht^us die and ki^ 
d to the work generally (xix. 8), without mentioning the book, 
tpinion that karena, e<Blum, triiicum could only be used in the 
and that quadriga could only occur in the pluraL Compare 
16. [28^30] This passage is slightly modified in the Latin 
>n, which is thus rendered into English by Wats: * that words, 
e the images of things, might accord with the things fhem- i 
id not stand to the arbitrement of the vulgar.' [3a] Suet JuiFif** 

[3] Anti-Cato: According to Suetonius (JuL Cses. 56) this 
TO books. It was written in answer to Cicero's panegyric on 
1 is quoted by Aulus Gellius (iv. 16). Compare Cicero ad Att 
^1, xiii. 50; Plutarch, JuL Cses. 54. ( 3. [4] victory of wit: 
op Trench in his Select Glossary has given an excellent quota- 
1 Bp. Reynolds, which illustrates the difference between the 
ud past usages of the wgrd * wit.* • For I take not wit in that 
acceptation, whereby men understand some sudden flashes of 
whether in stile or conference, which like rotten wood in the 
ve more shine then substance ; whose use and ornament are 
iselves, swift and vanishing; at once both admired and for« 
)ut I understand a setled, constant, and habituall sufficiency of 
-standing, whereby it is inabled in any kind of learning, theory, 
%, both to sharpnesse in search, subtilty in expression, and dis« 
execution.' Reynolds, The Passions and Faculties of the Soul, 
p. 514. [8] These Apophthegms (Cic ad Fam. is. x6), or 
eetanea as they are called by Suetonius (JuL Cses. gQ, were 



a84 NOTES. 

among the works which Augustus suppressed. [i6] EccL xii. 1 1, from 
the Vulgate, though not quite literally. [21] Suetonius, Jul. Caes. ya 
[25] cashiered: cassiered in ed. 1605, a form of spelling which points 
to the derivation of the word from Fr. casser. In Wats*s trans, of De 
Augm. the Latin is rendered, * and seditiously prayed to be cassid.' 
[26] by expostulation thereof: Lat. hoe postulato, 

P. 65. [6] Suetonius, Jul. Caes. 79. [15] Rex was a surname with the 
Romans: comp. Hor. Sat, i. 7. i; Bacon, Apoph. 186. [17] Plutarch, 
Jul. Caes. 35. § 4. 

P. 66. [i] Suet. Jul. Cses. 77. [15] Xen. Anab. ii. 5. 37. [16] the 
great king: of Persia. [25] The saying here ascribed to Xenophon is 
in Schneider's edition of the Anabasis (ii. I. § la) given to Theopompus. 
Xenophon, who is described as serving merely as a volunteer, and hold- 
ing no command in the army, could hardly have taken part in the parley 
with Phalinus. Diodorus (xiv. p. 409) attributes the speech to Proxenus. 
In Stephens's edition of 156 1, which Bacon may have used, the reading 
is B€vo<pwv. 

^' ^7- [7] Jsison the Thessalian (assassinated B.C. 370) was later than 
Agesilaus, though Bacon mentions him first. See Smith's Hist of 
Greece, p. 473. [8] Agesilaus : See Plut. Ages. 15 ; Smith's Hist of 
Greece, p. 439, iScc. The date g( the attempted invasion of Persia by 
Agesilaus was b.c. 396-394. Compare Bacon's treatise. Of the True 
Greatness of Britain (Works, vii. 50) : * And those that are conversant 
attentively in the histories of those times, shall find that this purchase 
which Alexander made and compassed was offered by fortune twice 
before to others, though by accident they wait not through with it; 
namely, to Agesilaus, and Jason of Thessaly. For Agesilaus, after he 
had made himself master of most of the low provinces of Asia, and had 
both design and commission to invade the higher countries, was diverted 
and called home upon a war excited against his coimtiy by the states of 
Athens and Thebes, being incensed by their orators and counsellon, 
which were bribed and corrupted from Persia, as Agesilaus himself 
avouched pleasantly, when he said That an hundred thousand archers 
of the kings of Persia had driven him home : understanding it, because 
an archer was the stamp upon the Persian coin of gold. And Jason of 
Thessaly, being a man bom to no greatness, but one that made a fortune 
of himself, and had obtained by his own vivacity of spirit, joined with 
the opportunities of time, a great army compounded of voluntaries and 
adventurers, to the terror of all Grsecia, that continually expected where 
that cloud would fall, disclosed himself in the end, that his design was 
for an expedition into Persia, (the same which Alexander not many 
years after achieved,) wherein he was interrupted by a private conspiracy 
against his life, which took effect.' [14, 15] Ovid, Ep. Pont ii 9. 47. 
Ovid has Adde quod for scUicft, Mr. Ellis has pointed out that the 



BOOK J. ij85 

f this sajring is to be found in a fragment of Theophrastus : 

^ irouScta, koI tovto ir6.vT€i dfwXoyovai, ijfjtepovv tcLs ifntxot*, 
a rb 0rjptSib€s koI dyvafiov (Stobaei Florilegium, ed. Gaisford, iv. 
55, ed. 1822). [23] examined and tried: observe the Latinized 
tion of the participles. [29] Eccl. i. 9 (* There is no new 
der the smi'), quoted from memory. [30, 31] The Latin 
pone aulcea caput inserens organa quibus moventur et filamenta 

[3] for a passage: that is, a pass or ford. The Latin has 
ontem aliquem, [4] Plutarch (Ages. 15. § 6) relates that Alex- 
lied the battle between Antipater and Agis a battle of mice. 
^s was brought to him soon after the battle of Arbela. [9] 

1 Seneca, Nat. Qusest. i. prol. § 10: Formicarum iste discursus est 
o laborantium. [20] See Epictetus, Enchir. 33, and Simplicii in 
!omm. c. 33. The dramatic form of the story is apparently 
own. [24] Virg. Georg. ii. 490. [33] rationem totius : appa- 
ferring to Eccl. xii. 13. 

. [5] Plato, Alcib. Prim. ii. 133. [6] Mr. Spedding quotes 
form of this sentence as Bacon had entered it in the Promus, 
ma vita indies meliorem fieri.* It appears to be derived from 
)n, Memor. i. 6. § 8. The same sentiment occurs in Dante, 
nii. 58, quoted by Mr. Ellis. Comp. also Adv. to the E. of 
(Works, ix. p. 7). . 

[6] Virg. Georg. iv. 561J [9] over the will : The Latin adds 
am et non astrictam. [23] Rev. ii. 24. [24] force : face in ed, 
rrected in Errata. [31] A saying of Hiero's, recorded by Plu- 
eg. et Imp. Apoph.), is perhaps what Bacon was thinking of. 
mes complained that his poverty did not allow him to keep two 
* How is that?* said Hiero : • Homer, whom you worry with 
;ad as he is, supports more than ten thousand.* 
[lo] exceed the pleasure of the sense : So in the Errata to ed. 
The original editions have 'exceed the senses.* The Lat. is 
nta sensuum excedent^ The true reading is probably 'exceed 
iures of the senses.' [15] satiety: sacietie, ed. 1605. [16] ver- 
edd. 1605, 1629, 1633, it is verdourj which perhaps shows what 
pronunciation was. In Cotgrave's French Diet, and Florio*s 
t. of 161 1, the spelling of the word is as we have it. See note 
I, 1. 17. [17] deceits of pleasure: that is, deceptive, unreal 
». The Lat. has umbras tantum et fallacias voluptatum. [20] 
s princes : Bacon was perhaps thinking of the Emperor Charles 
resigned the crown of Spain in favour of his son in 1556, and 
3 the monastei-y of San Yuste. See Ess. xix. p. 76. [2 2] * it,* 
* knowledge,' is omitted as the subject of * appeareth.* The 
ntence stands thus in the Lat. : ut necesse sit hujus delectationis 



a86 NOTES. 

honum simplex esse, non ex aceidente, ui eum fraud*, [27] Lticr. ii. I'lO^ 
quoted again in Ess. i. p. 3. 

P. 72. [11] to this tend : tend is omitted in ed. 1605, but added in tbe 
Errata. [19] infinite: used loosely for 'innumerable.' The Lat has 
innumera. It occurs once in the same sense in Shakespeare, Tim. of 
Ath. V. I. 37 : * a satire against the softness of prosperity, with a dis- 
covery of the infinite flatteries that follow youth and opulency.' [lb.] 
have been decayed: that is, have been brought to decay, fallen into 
decay. [21] statuaes: so in ed. 1605. 'Statua' was the old form of 
the word while still unnaturalized which Bacon adopted. See Glosstiy 
to his Essays. [23, 24] cannot but leese o/the life and truth: thatiSk 
cannot but lose some of the life and truth. 

P- 73- [4] Bacon here refers to Aristotle and his followers. [11] 
affection: The true reading is probably affections, as in 1. 14. [35] 
Fhaedr. iii. 12. Quoted again in Ess. xiii. p. 48. It was a fiivourite 
fable with Bacon. Comp. Of the True Greatness of Britain (Woiks, 
vii. 57): *In which people (i.e. the Swiss) it well appeared what ta 
authority iron hath over gold at the battle of Granson, at what time one 
of the principal jewels of Burgundy was sold for twelve pence by a poor 
Swiss, that knew no more a precious stone than did .£sop*s cock.' 
See Commines, B. v. c. 2. [26] Midas : Ovid, Metam. xi. 153, &c 
[29] Paris: Eurip. Tread. 924, &c. [30] Tac. Ann. xiv. 9, OeeidM 
dum imperet. [31] any : Omitted in ed. 1605, but added in the Errati. 
[32] Horn. Od. V. 218 ; Plutarch, Gryll. i ; Cic. de Orat. L 44. Quoted 
again in Ess. viii. p. 27. 

^' 74- [2] must : Omitted in ed. 1605, but added in the Enata. [4] 
Matt. xi. 19, quoted from the Vulgate. - 

BOOK n. 

p. 75. [1-7] Comp. Ess. viii. p. 26: *Yet it were great reason, thit 
those that have children, should have greatest care of future times; unto 
which, they know, they must transmit their dearest pledges.* [9-12] 
and yet so . . . sur\'ive her: Omitted in the Lat., apparently for the reasoo 
mentioned in note on p. 21, 11. 16-21. [19] affection: Lat studium 
meum erga literas. 

P. 76. [3] Hercules* columns : The two rocks Calpe {Gihrtdtar) and 
Abyla {Ximiera, or Jehel el Mina) on either side of the Straits of Gibraltar 
were so called by the ancients, as being supposed to mark the end of 
the western wanderings of Hercules, and so the limits of early geogra- 
phical knowledge in that direction (comp. Pindar, Nem. iii. 35 ; Herod. 
iv. 42, 181, 185). Pliny says of the Straits of Gibraltar (Hist. Nat iii 
proem, trans. Holland, ed. 1601): 'Of both sides of this gullet, necie 
unto it, are two mountaines set as frontiers and rampieis tokeepemllin: 
namely, Abila for Africke, Calpe for Europe, the utmost end of HercnW 



BOOK II. 287 

*$. For which cause, the inhabitants of those parts call them, 
^o pillars of that God ; and doe verily beleeve, that by certaine 

and ditches digged within the Continent, the maine Ocean, before 
id, made way and was let in, to make the Mediteranean seas, 
before was firme land : and so by that meanes the very face of 
ole earth is cleane altered.* The origin of the legend is probably 
ought in the fact that the Phoenicians were the great navigators 
ancient world, and that Melkarth, the Greek Hercules, was their 
y deity. In any case * the pillars of Hercules,* which, like the 
Thule of a later period, once denoted the extreme limit of geo- 
cal discovery in one direction, are used metaphorically by Bacon 
ote the limit of any investigation whatever. [10] Lat. sermone 
1 activo et masculo. [12] ground : the foundation or basis of an 
ent. [16] supplieth: Lat. wccwrri/. [17] direction: Perhaps we 

read * soundness of direction,* as before. Lat eonsilU prudetUia et 
. [lb.] S. Augustine, Serm. clxix. (vol. v. p. 569, ed. Ant. 1 700) : 

it claudus in via, quam cursor prcBter viam. See Nov. Org. i. 61. 

Promus (vii. p. 200) it stands, Melior claudus in via quam cursor 
viam. Ben Jonson, in his Sylva, quotes it in a different form, 
lius cursu superat — A cripple in the way out-travels a footman, or 
: out of the way:' St. Giles being the patron saint of cripples. 
Iccl. X. 10. Quoted again in a modified form in the treatise Of 
terpretation of Nature (iii. p. 223): *for as Salomon saith excel- 

Thefool putteth to more strength, hut the wise man considereth which 
[gnifying the election of the mean to be more material than the 
►Ucation of endeavour.' 
77' [7] accomplishments: Lat. omamentis, [20] discharge of 

Lat. vacationem a curis. [23] Virg. Georg. iv. 8. [27] and that 
it delusion or imposture : Omitted in the translation. See note to 
1. 16. 

8. [9] Cic. Orat. post reditum in Senatu, xii. 30 : Nam difficile est 
'iquem, nefas quemquam praterire, [il] Phil. iii. 13. [14] I find 
e: Lat. demiror. [18] the ancient fable: The fable of the belly 
le members told by Menenius Agrippa, Livy, ii. 32. See Shake- 
:, Cor. i. I. 99, &c. [24] universality: the study of general princi- 

Lat. contemplationibus universalibus. 

jg. [i] professory learning: the teaching which has for its object 
pecial branch of study. [2] malign aspect and influence: This 
hor is derived from the old astrology, in which the planets were 
sed to exercise control over human destinies. See Trench, English 
ind Present, Lect. iv. p. 180, ed. 4. [15] The Lat. adds prasertim 
nos. [17] Readers: i.e. lecturers. [22, 23] to appropriate his 
: labour, and to continue his whole age in that function and at- 
Qce : i. e. to devote his whole energy and to spend his whole life in 



288 NOTES. 

discharging and attending to the duties of his office. [33-25] % 
therefore . . . profession : Omitted in the Lat. [28] i Sam. xxx. 2a. 

P; 80. [3] Virg. Georg. iii. 138. [4, 5] some alchemist . .. who oA: I 
For another example of this loose construction see p. 19, 11. 8, 9, *s 
friar ... to whom,' &c. [10] Physic : Lat. medicma, [17] Lat met 
mortuorum corporum ad observationes anatomicas desHhd, [28] Flfflf, 
Hist. Nat. viii. 17. [gi] travail: In edd. 1605, i^^Pt 1633, trawaUu 
[31, 32] much better . ..nature : Lat. eerte majus quiddam debeitar Us, fd 
non in saltibus naiura pererrant^ sed in labyrinthis artium viam sibi apenm 
Mr. Spedding explains ' arts of nature ' as ' working upon and alterii{ 
nature by art.' In p. 86 • history of arts' is equivalent to • histoiy ol 
nature altered or wrought.' But from the expressions in the LatiA 
translation it would rather seem tha( ' by arts of nature' Bacon intended 
those recondite and intricate operations which are the subjects of infCl' ] 
tigation by the experimental philosopher, as the chemist for example^ 
and which are contrasted with the more external manifestations wilfc , 
which the naturalist deals, as the windings of a labyrinth with the opok 
glades of a forest. See Nov. Org. praef. 

P. 81. [27] Cic. De Orator, iii. 26. [28] Cic. Orator. 24. 

P. 82. [22] Cic. Ep. ad Att. ix. 7. 

P. 83. [2] Lat. adeo ut habeant prafecios (alios Provineiales, alios GMf- 
rales) quibus omnes parent, [9] James i. 17. [23] Aaron, not Mosefc 
See Exod. vii. 12. [26] opera basilica, works for a king: Peifaapi 
Bacon was thinking of the basilica facinora of Plautus (Trin. iv. 3. 23). 
[29] the inducing part: the introductory part Lat speculaiita W* 
pars, 

P. 84. [16] Amare et sapere vix Deo eoneeditur, Publ. Syr. Sent 15. 
Quoted again in Ess. x. p. 37. Comp. Ovid, Met ii. 846: Non hm 
conveniunt nee in una sede morantur Majestas et amor, [20] Quoted from 
Ennius by Cicero, De Off. i. i6. 

P- 85. [3] Prov. xxii. 13. [4] Virg. Mn, v. 231. [9-21] Tlus 
paragraph is much enlarged in the De Augmentis, ii. i. [22] De 
Aug. ii. 4. In the De Augmentis Bacon makes only two divisioBf 
of History, natural and civil; including in the latter history ecclesi- 
astical and literary. 

P. 86. [5] a just story of learning ; i. e. an accnrate history. [21] 
In De Augm. ii. 2 the same division is made but at greater length. 
[32] the strange events of time and chance: Lat eamum (iff aii iOe) 
ingenia, 

P. 87. [11] it is never called down: Lat. 111017110111 potita mitth 
minantur aut retractantur. [13] The treatise De mills anscoltatiooihH 
attributed to Aristotle is now believed not to be by him. BaooB 
again refers to it in p. 35, 1. 24. [lb.] is nothing Vas than: i.e.if 
by no means intended. [16] axioms: &Ir. Kitcfain, in his editioa 



BOOK II. 289 

t Novum Organum, App. A., has shown that Bacon uses 'axiom' 

denote any general principle of the lowest degree of generality. 
id in this he is followed by Sir Isaac Newton, who gives the title 
* Axiom* to all * general experimental truths,' to the • laws of motion,* 
lich are purely inductive and not at all 'self-evident' truths, to the 
inciples of optics, &c. 

P. 88. [4] In the treatise * Daemonologie, in forme of a Dialogue,* 
three books, printed among the works of James I., p. 93, ed. 1616. 
] Comp. Nov. Org. i. 1 20, sol enim aque palatia et cloacas ingreditur, 
jue tamen poUuitur. And Chaucer's Parson's Tale, quoted by Mr. 
itchin: *Certes holy writ may not be defouled, no more than the 
one that schyneth on a dongehul' (vol. iii. p. 168, Percy Soc. ed.). 
-9] I hold fit, that these narrations ,., be sorted by themselves, 
d not to be mingled &c. : For other instances of this mixed con- 
nction, see Ps. Ixxviii. 4, 8 (Pr. Bk.) : * That we should not hide . . . 
it to shew &c.* * That they might put their trust in God, and not 
forget &c.* [23] Plato, Hippias Major, iii. 291. 
P. 89. [3] the philosopher: Thales. See Plato, Theaet. i. 174; Diog. 
lert i. 34. [9] Arist. Polit. 1. 3. § I ; Phys. i. 

P. 90. [i] Proteus : Virg. Georg. iv. 386, &c. [5] De Augm. ii. 6. 
2] of the world: i.e. in the world. [27] as was said: See above, 
13. In this paragraph Bacon perhaps had in his mind Camden's 
:maines concerning Britaine (1605). 

P. 91. [2] In the discourse on the Union of the Kingdoms (Life and 
:tters, iii. p. 94) Bacon gives instances in nature of. those bodies 
lich were imperfecte mista, and concludes, *So as such imperfect 
nglings continue not longer than they are forced, and still in the 
i the worthiest gets above.* He probably had this in his mind 
len he called such histories the salvage of the deluge of time. [5] 
tomes: Bacon elsewhere (p. 175) condemns Ramus for * introducing 
J canker of epitomes* Here he refers probably to the Epitomes of 
Drus, Aurelius Victor, and others. [10] De Augm. ii. 7. [26] the 
e and inward resorts : Lat. verosfomites et texturas subtiliore*. Perhaps 

should TGa.d fontes. [27] The Latin adds neque enim de elogiis et 
usmodi commemorationibus jejunis loquimur. [32] Referring to 
ucydides, Xenophon, and Sallust. 

P. 92. [4, 5] specially of any length : This refers to the length of the 
iod contemplated by the history, not to the history itself. The 
tin has a different idea, prcBsertim qua (state scriptoris multo antiquior 

where the true reading would be quod . , , antiquius. [5] — ^p. 93. 

Omitted in the Latin. [22] Virg. Mn. iv. 177. [29] Justinianus: 
m A.D. 483; reigned from 527 to 565. [lb.] Ultimus Romanorum: 
ed of Cassius by Tacitus (Ann. iv. 34) and of Brutus and Cassius 

Suetonius (Tib. 61). [33] to be kept: *are* is omitted in the 

V 



290 NOTES. 

construction. Comp. p. 94, 1. 8, 'and yet her government so masa 
line/ where the copula is omitted. 

P- 93- [S] Cicero, De Off. i. 34. Comp. Tac Hist i. i. [10] it 
the main continuance thereof: Lat. quatenus ad corpus ejus inttgnm, 
[12] George Buchanan, who wrote Rerum Scoticarum Historia. To 
this James I. evidently refers in the second book of his Basilicon Donit 
where he reckons among unpardonable crimes ' the £a.lse and vnrevendt 
writing or speaking of malicious men against your parents and pI^ 
decessors' (Works, p. 158). [ai] Bacon himself ^deavoured to ouiy 
out the plan which he here suggested ; but the only part of the woA 
which was completed was the History of Henry VH., published in i6if« 
during his retirement. Besides this he left a fragment of the history of 
the reign of Henry VIII. In his letter to the Lord Chancellor totu^Jng 
the history of Britain, to which reference has been made before (p. fit 
note), he speaks in nearly the same words of the defects of previoM 
histories. [24] hath been : Observe the construction, and see p. 59, l^ 
[27] By Henry VII. Compare Bacon, Henry VTI. p. 3: 'There yiat 
fallen to his lot, and concurrent in his Person, three seuerall TiAa to 
the Imperiall Crowne. The first, the Title of the Lady EUzMk, 
with whom, by precedent Pact with the Partie that brought him ifl, 
he was to marry. The second, the ancient and long disputed Tide I 
(both by Plea^ and Armes) of the House of Lancaster, to which he WM ' 
Inheritour in his owne Person. The third, the Title of the Sword or 
Conquest, for that he came in by victorie of Battaile, and that the King 
in possession was slaine in the Field.* [33] Henry VIIL 

P* 94- [5] Edward VI. and the attempt of the Duke of Nortfaumbo^ 
land to place Lady Jane Grey on the thronej [6] Comp. Ess. zm. 
p. 127 : * A civill warre, indeed, is like the heat of a fcaver.' [7] Muyi 
married to Philip of Spain. [lb.] Elizabeth. [8] and yet her gcmn^ 
ment so masculme: The copula is omitted as in p. 92, 1. 33. [8-11] 
and yet . . . thence : Omitted in the Latin. [12] divided from all the 
world : Comp. Virg. Ed. i. 67, Et penitus toto divisos orbe BritaimoL 
[14] Virg. ^n. iii. 96. [18] Comp. p. 134, L 35, and Ess. xL p. 43. 
*And as in nature, things move violently to their place, and calmelj 
in their place.' [23] it : redundant. [32] Ariosto, Orlando Fnrioso,at 
the end of the 34th book and the beginning of the 35th. Mr. Siogei; 
in Notes and Queries, v. 232, was the first to point out the source of 
this reference. [33] the ancient fiction : The feible of the three fates. 
Clotho, Lachesis, and Atropos. The allusion is more distinctly given 
in the Latin translation. 

P. 95. [14] Virg. ^n. V. 751. [15] Plin. Ep. in. ai : Nam posigmm 
desiimus facere laudcinda, laudari quoque ineptum puttuma. [17J Prof. 
X. 7. [24] Cicero. Phil. ix. 5. § 10: Vita enitn m oriuo r um m mem orit 
vivorum est posita. The sentiment appears to have been borrowed from the 



^OOK 11. 291 

)loii quoted by Demosthenes adv. Lept. p. 488, /i^ Xiyuir ttaie&t 

[7] De Aug. ii. 9. [lb.] partition : portion in ed. 1605, cor- 
Errata. [ra] giving but a touch of certain magnificent build- 
it is, but slightly alluding to them. [15] Tac. Ann. xiii. 31. 
ind of contemplative heraldry: that is, as is explained in the 
heraldry by which the rank of books as well as of persons 
distinguished. [22] time: Mr. Spedding reads times, [24] 
5sed day by day: For the construction compare Hamlet, i. 
What we two nights have seen.' [25] Esth. vL i. [28] Plut. 
6. I ; Alex. 23. § 2, 76, &c. 

[i] De Aug. ii. 10. [4] Mr. Ellis, in his note on the corres- 
passage of the De Augmentis, remarks that 'the most cele- 
ork of this kind is one with which Bacon was fiamiliar, — 
Drsi of Macchiavelli, of which the narrative part is derived 
y* See what Bacon himself says, p. 225. [22] Comp. Of the 
ition of Nature (Works, iii. 235) : *For at that time the world 
^ether home-bred, every nation looked little beyond their own 
or territories, and the world had no through lights then, as it 
I since by commerce and navigation, whereby there could 
•e that contribution of wits one to help another, nor that 
f particulars for the correcting of customary conceits.' See 
. Org. i. 84. [27] Virg. Georg. i. 250. 

[i] in their word : Lat. in symbolo suo. [2] plus ultra: Charles 
's motto. [3] imitabile fulmen : referring to the invention of 
£r. [5] Virg. JEn. vi. 590. [7] Fernando de Magalhaens (or 
) was the first navigator who sailed round the world, 15 19- 
)rake's voyage was in 1577-1579. [14] Dan. xii. 4. The 
in the text, which is firom the Vulgate, is altered in the Latin 
'^ur scienUa, [21] De Aug. ii. II. [22] in the propriety 
Lat. propria vero nomine. 

[11] Ps. xc. 4; 2 Pet. iii. 8. [23] i Cor. it 14. [26] Eph. 
28] Hab. ii. 2. This very common fonn of misquotation of 
ige appears to have had its origin in Coverdale*s Version; 

so commeth by, may rede it.' The correct rendering is 

1 in the English Bible ; ' that he may run that readeth it' 

[4] De Aug. ii. 12. [26] it is a great loss of that book of 
A loose construction equivalent to ' it is a great loss, viz. the 
it book of Caesar's.' 

. [4-6] one of the cells . . . which is that of the memory: 
iirton, Anat. of Mel. Parti. Sec. I. Mem. 2. Subs. 4. 'The 
iekt behind the head, is common to the eerehel or little brain, 
Dw of the back-bone, the least and most solid of all the rest, 
eives the animal spirits from the other ventrides, and conveys 

U 2 



29^ ^OTES. 

them to the marrow in the back, and is the place where they j 
memory is seated.* Vigo defines the brain as *a substance ; 
marrowe diuided into three ventricles, of which there is one 
fore part which is greater then the other three. The second 
the middest. The third hath his residence in the hinder part, 
therefore after Galens iudgement, it is the foundation of imagi] 
and of deuising, and of remembrance * (Works, foL 6 6, Lond. 
Compare Chaucer, Knight's Tale, 1378: 

* Engendrud of humour malencolyk, 
Byfome in his selle fantastyk* 

[7] Differently arranged in De Augm. ii. 13, where much new i 
is introduced. [13 J Hor. De Art. Poet. 9. [19] may be styled 
is, may have this title of * feigned history,' whether written in pr 
verse. 

P. 102. [16] After this paragraph there is added in the De 
mentis one on Dramatic Poetry. [32] The seven wise men were I 
Thales, Pittacus, Bias, Chilon, Cleobulus, and Periander of C< 
Instead of the last, Plato (Protag. i. 343) enumerates Myso. 
maxims have been collected in Orelli's Opuscula Graecorum vc 
sententiosa et moralia. As other instances of parabolical wisdo 
Latin mentions tessercB PythagorcB^ and cBnigmata sphingis. The i 
of these are asFociated with Egyptian hieroglyphics by Plutarc 
Isid. et Osir. 10) in a passage which Bacon probably had : 
mind. 

P. 103. [15] Both these fables are quoted by Bacon in his fii 
Essay, * Of Seditions and Troubles,' with substantially the same 
ments. In the De Augm. is substituted a lengthened discussion 
fables of Pan, Perseus, and Dionysus. See also Wisdom ol the An 
c. 9. [21] Virg. ^n. iv. 178. [30] Thetis, not Pallas. See 
II. i. 398, &c. 

P. 104. [2] Achilles : Hom. II. xi. 832 ; Plutarch (De Musica, 
[4] Machiavel: The Prince, c. 18. Mr. Ellis, in his note o; 
passage, suggested that 'As two of the animals are the sam( 
possible that Macchiavelli was thinking of what was said of Be 
VIII. by the predecessor whom he forced to abdicate, — that he 
in like a fox, would reign like a lion, and die like a dog.' [i i] 
sippus : a Stoic philosopher, bom b.c. 280. Bacon here ref 
what Cicero says of him, De Nat. Deor. i. 15, §§ 38-41. [i 
fictions : * the * is omitted in some copies of ed. 1605. [16-ao] 
. . . meaning : The construction of this sentence is imperfect, thou, 
sense is clear. [16] Homer : The same remark is made by Rabelais 
gantua, prol.) of the allegorical interpretations of Homer by ] 
Eustathius, Heraclides Ponticus and Comutus. [17] *Tb the ^ 



BOOK il. 293 

Homer was in fact a Bible, and guarded with all the care and all the 
piety that belong to such a book.' Prof. Blackie, Art. on Homer, 
Encyc. Brit, eighth ed. This is true generally, and not only of *the 
later schools of the Grecians.' 'But what really conveys a more 
vivid impression of the influence of Homer in Greek education, than 
any anecdotes about schools and schoolmasters, is the very apt and 
easy way in which all Greek men are everywhere found quoting Homer 
from memory, and applying it for the need of the moment, by a sort 
of habitual " accommodation," just as we see many a devout father of 
the Christian Church, and the ancient Jews, constantly quoting the 
Old Testament, without any curious inquiry as to the exact critical 
propriety of the text so applied.* Blackie, Homer and the Iliad, i. 
308. [24] this third part of learning: It should be *this second,* 
[27-32] But . . . harangues : Omitted in De Augm. 

P- 105. [3] The third book of the De Augm. begins here. [29] philo' 
wphia prima : See p. 40, 1. 8. 

P. 106. [l] a certain rhapsody : IsX. farraginem quandam et massam 
inconditam. [27] The instances of these * participles in nature' given by 
Bacon in the De Augm. are, moss, which is intermediate between putre- 
faction and a plant ; fish that adhere and do not change their place and 
are between a plant and an animal ; mice and other animals which are 
between those propagated by putrefaction and those propagated by 
impregnation; bats, which are between birds and quadrupeds; flying 
fish, between birds and fish ; seals, between fish and quadrupeds, and so 
on. See Nov. Org. ii. 30. 

P. 107. [8] Euclid, Elem. Book 1. Axiom 4. [9, 10] an axiom . . 
mathematics : In some copies of ed. 1605, and in the edd. of 1629 and 
1633, this clause is inserted by mistake after the following sentence. 
The error is noted in the Errata at the end of a copy of ed. 1605 in the 
Bodleian Library, and the true reading is given, preceded by the follow- 
ing remark: -/In some few Bookes, in Ff : fol. 21, and the beginning of 
the second pa|;e thereof, there is somewhat misplaced, and to be read 
thus/ The catchword of the previous page is * And.* [10] This ana- 
logy between commutative (or corrective) and distributive justice is 
derived from Aristotle (Eth. v. 3, 4). Of distributive justice Sir Alex- 
ander Grant in his notes on the passage gives the following summary : 
'Justice implies equality, and not only that two things are equal, but 
also two jiersons between whom there may be justice. Thus it is a 
geometrical proportion in four terms ; if A and B be persons, C and D 
lots to be divided, then as A is to B, so must C be to D. And a just 
bution will produce the result that A + C will" be to B + D in the 
le ratio as A was to B originally. In other words, distributive 
usdce consists in the distribution of property, honours, &c., in the state, 
iccording to the merits of each citizen.' And of corrective, or as Bacon 



294 NOTES. 

calls it commutative^ justice, he says: ' Corrective justice goes on a pra 

ciple, not of geometrical, but of arithmetical proportion ; in other wc 

it takes no account of persons, but treats the cases with which it is ooo 

cemed as cases of unjust loss and gain, which have to be reduced to the 

middle point of equality between the parties/ (Grant's Aristotle, ed.i» 

ii. pp. io8, 112.) [13] £ucl. £lem. £k. i. Axiom i. Whatdy, Logic, 

ii. 3. § 2 ; Nov. Org. ii. 27. [16] Ovid, Met xv. 165. [18] Compi 

Bacon, Sylva Sylvanmi, cent. i. § 100 (Works, ii. 383, ed. Spedding): 

* There is nothing more certain in nature than that it is impossible for 

any body to be utterly annihilated ; but that as it was the work of tlie 

omnipotency of God to make somewhat of nothing, so it requiieth the 

like omnipotency to turn somewhat into nothing.* [21] EccL iii. L4, 

quoted from the Vulgate. [23] Machiavelli, Disc, sopra Llvio, iil l« 

[?7] the Persian magic : ' Plato commends this Magia, and calls it 

Machagistia, and 0(Sh/ Oepavcia the worship of the Gods ; and saith, tint 

the Kings of Persia learned it, as a knowledge of diuine mysterioy 

wherein by the worlds Common-wealth they were instructed to gouenie 

their owne.' Purchas his Pilgrimage, p. 366, ed. 1614. The passage 

of Plato referred to is Alcib. Prim. ii. 121, but the remark of Porcbil 

is apparently derived from the Apologia of Johannes Picus Mirandnla 

(p. 121, ed. 1557). That Plato called Magia by the mystic name of 

Machagistia is stated by Ammianus Marcellinus (xxiii. 6. § 3a). [30] 

Comp. Bacon, Sylva Sylvarum, cent. ii. 113 : * There be in music certsin 

figures or tropes ; almost agreeing with the figures of rhetoric, and with 

the affections of the mind, and other senses. First, the division and 

quavering, which please so much in music, have an agreement with the 

glittering of light ; as the moon-beams playing upon a wave. Agaiiii 

the falling from a discord to a concord, which maJceth great sweetoeti 

in music, hath an agreement with the affections, which are reintegrated 

to the better after some dislikes ; it agreeth also with the taste, which is 

soon glutted with that which is sweet alone. The sliding from the dose 

or cadence, hath an agreement with the figure in rhetoric which they 

call prater expectatum ; for there is a pleasure even in being deodved' 

(Works, ed. Spedding, ii. 388, 389). Comp. also Nov. Org. iL 37, and 

Of the Interp. of Nat. (vol. iii. p. 230). 

P. 108. [i] See Quint. Inst. Or. vi. 3 ; Cic. de Orat ii. 63, § 255. [a] 
with: Some copies of the ed. 1605, according to Mr. Spedding, rod 
'which.' [4] Virg. Mn. vii. 9. [5] Comp. Nov. Org. iL 27, where the 
same illustrations are given of what Bacon calls * conformable instances' 
or ' physical similitudes.' From these he deduces the principle, orgai^ 
sensuum et corpora^ qua pariunt rejlexiones €td sensus, tsst timi!i$ naiurM* 
[6] the eye with a glass : i. e. a looking-glass. Lat oeulmi emim umSk 
specula. [20] De Augm. iii. 2. [22] Virg. Ma. vi. 788. [28] LaL 
scientia, seu potius scientia scintilla, [32] Comp. Ess. xvi. p. 64: 'And 



BOOK n. 295 

re, God never wrought miracle, to convince Atheisme, because 
inary works convince it.' 

39. [10] Comp. Macrobius, in Somn. Scip. ii. 12: Ideo physici 
1 magnum hominem^ et hominem brevem mundum esse dixerunt, 
en. i; Ps. viii. 3, 6. Comp. Bereshith Rabba, § 8: * Rabbi 
, in the name of R. Acha (says), the superior beings were created 
mage and likeness (of God), and do not increase and multiply ; 
nor increase and multiply, but were not created in the image and 
; (of God).' [24] See p. 10, 1. 5. [33] hath: Observe the con- 
n as in p. 34, 1. 25, * so great an affinity hath fiction and belief.* 
10. [4] Otherwise .. spirits : i. e. with respect to the nature of 
md spirits the case is different. Comp. p. 158, 1. 2. Lat. Secus 
I ad angelorum et spirituum naturam attinet. [7] Col. ii. 4, 18. 

1 Lat. ccEterum sohria circa illos inquisition quce vel per rerum cor- 
m scalam ad eorum naturam pernoscendam ascendat, vel in anima 

veluti in speculo earn intueatur neutiquam prohibetur, [23] 2 Cor. 

[27] many : * The theory of angels and that of fallen spirits form 

and not very profitable chapter in every Summa Theologiae.' 

See Reginald Scot's Discourse concerning Devils and Spirits. 

2 Augm. iii. 3. 

1. [2] Diog. Laert. ix. 72: kv 0vd^ yoip 5} dXiidtta. Cic. Acad. 
12. [3] Paracelsus, Lib. Meteor, cap. 4. [9] pioneers : * Pion- 

i ed. 1605. [17-23] And here .. superstition : Omitted in the 
33] De Augm. iii. 4. 

2. [8] from mistaking: i.e. from being misunderstood. Comp. 
5, Journal of the House of Commons, p. 560 : * Mr. Winch, one 
Committee in the Bill to keep horses /rom stealing, &c* [12] 
what Bacon says of Aristotle, p. 127. [23] John v. 43. [31] 
Dlar : Alexander the Great. 

3. [4] Adapted from Lucan, x. 20 &c. Mr. Ellis has pointed 
t Bacon has changed not only the order of words but the con- 
►n. The whole passage stands thus : 

* Illic Pellsei proles vesana Philippi, 
Felix prsedo, jacet, terranim vindice fate 
Raptus; sacratis totum spargenda per orbem 
Membra viri posuere adytis. Fortima pepercit 
Manibus, et regni duravit ad ultima fatum. 
Nam sibi libertas unquam si redderet orbem 
Ludibrio servatus erat, non utile mundo 
Editus exemplum, &c.' 

que ad aras : i. e. so far as is consistent with religious obligations. 

h (De Vitioso Pud©re, vi.) relates that Pericles, when asked to 
himself for his friend, replied, fjttxp^ tov $o)ixov <piKo9 clfjii. See 

ut. Prgecepta Ger. Reipubl. xiii. 17 ; Aul. Gellius, Noct. Att i. 3. 



2,^6 



NOTES. 



Bacon introduces it again in a characteristic passage of lus Ap 
concerning the Earl of Essex (Life and Letters, iii. 14a): 'For 
honest man, that hath his heart well planted, will forsake his 
rather than forsake God, and forsake his friend rather than forsal 
king; and yet will forsake any earthly commodity, yea anfl his 
life in some cases, rather than forsake his frioid. I hope the world 
not forgotten these degrees, else the heathen saying. Amicus usq 
aras, shall judge them.' [15] Tac. Ann. i. 3. [20] philosophia p 
See p. 105. [32] Lat. id solummodo cavendo ut physice, non logia 
terUur, 

P. 1 14. [10] a being and moving : The Lat. adds, ei naiuralem n 
tatem. [12] platform; Lat. /rfcam. [15] productions: probably J 
print for 'production.* See p. 11 1, 1. 14. The Lat has produa 
effectuum. [1 7] The division here referred to is Aristotle's, as gi^ 
the First Book of the Metaphysics : * The efi&cient cause is that ^ 
acts — the material cause that which is acted on ; as when the fire 
wax, the former is the efficient, the latter the material cause of the 
produced. The formal cause is that which in the case of any « 
determines it to be that which it is, and is thus the cause of its y\ 
properties ; it is thus the " ratio essentise," the \6yo9 rrj^ ovaUu. 
final cause is that for the sake of which any effect takes place, wl 
the agent is or is not intelligent.* Ellis's note on the correspo 
passage of the De Augmentis. [27] Virg. Eel. viii. 80. 

P. 115. [20] Mr. Elhs (Gen. Preface, p. 29) says that Bacon *has n 
edly denied the truth of the scholastic doctrine that Forms are inc 
scible because supra-sensible.* See Nov. Org. i. 75 ; it a. [23] Sec 
Org. ii. I : Data autem nainraformam, sive differentiam veram, sive na 
naturantem, sivefontem emanationis . . inveniret opus et intentio est kt 
scienticB, Mr. Ellis, in his General Preface to the Philosophical 
(pp. 28-31), after pointing out that in Bacon's system * substance i 
ceived of as the causa inmianens of its attributes, or in other words it 
formal cause of the qualities which are referred to it,* divides these 
ties into primary and secondary ; the former being those which bdc 
bubstance as its essential attributes, the latter those which are com 
with it by the relation of cause and effect. He thai shows that Bj 
* conception of the nature of Forms relates merely to the primary 
ties of bodies. For instance, the Form of heat is a kind of local n 
of the particles of which bodies are composed, and that of whita 
mode of arrangement among those particles. This peculiar moti 
arrangement corresponds to and engenders heat or whiteness, and t 
every case in which those qualities exist. The statement of the < 
guishing character of the motion or arrangj^ment, or of whateve 
may be the Form of a given phenomenon, takes the shape of a 
is the law in fulfilling which any substance determioes the e c 



BOOK II. ^97 

he quality in question.* Bacon himself, in the Novum Organum, speaks 
Tti forma ret as ipsissima rM(ii. 13), oiform<B as ver<B rerum differ entice 
ind leges (ictus puri (i. 75), and asserts that res and forma differ only as 
ipparens et existens, aut exterius et interius^ cut in ordine ad hominem et in 
trdine ad universum (ii. 13). [29] Plato, Repub. x. I. [33] See pp. 41, 
119; Nov. Org. i. 96. 

P. ]i6. [7] Gen, ii. 7. [9] Gen. i. 20, 24. [9, 10] the forms of 
substances, I say : Lat. species inquam creaturarum, [15] Comp. 
Plato, Philebus, ii. 17. [31] Nov. Org. ii. 23; Of the Inter, of Nat. p. 
tZ6, 

P. 117. [2] See Nov. Org, ii. 23: Efficiens vero semper ponitur nil aliud 
me quam: vehiculum sive deferens formce. [16] Hippocrates, Aph. i. i. 
[22] Eccles. iii. 11. [25] to them that are depraved: Lat. apud homines 
propter scientia inflatos et theomackos, [26] the giants' hills : Perhaps we 
jhould read 'three* for *the.* The Lat. has tres moles gigante<B, [27] 
Virg. Georg. i. 281, 282. [31] Rev. iv. 8. 

P. 118. [i] law: Some copies of ed. 1605 read *loue.* [2] Plato, 
Pannen. 165, i66. This view of the Parmenides is probably derived 
from the Argumentum of Ficinus. Parmenides of Elea travelled with 
Zeno to Athens, circ. b.c. 460. [15] Comp. Of the Inter, of Nature, 
?• 235 : ' for the poet saith well Sapientibus undique latce sunt vice* [17] 
^ic. de Off. i. 43; Tusc. Disp. iv. 26; De Fin. ii. 12. § 37. [24] sense: 
)ome copies of ed. 1605 have * sort,' but one at least has * sens,' which is 
ividently the true reading, as appears from the Lat. sensu magis divino. 
25] Prov. iv, 12. [30] misplaced : The Lat, adds, solent enim inquiri 
nter physica non inter metaphysica. 

P. 119. [2] On the injury to philosophy by the investigation of final 
auses see Nov. Org. i. 48, 65 ; ii. 2. [5] satisfactory and specious 
anses : Lat. speciosis et umbratilibus causis, [7] Plato, Timaeus, iii. 44 
tc. anchoreth: *ancreth* in cd. 1605. [8] Ajistotle, Phys. ii. 8. 2; 
Jalen, De Usu Partium ; Xenophon, Memor. i. 4. See on this subject 
*rof. Sedgwick's Disc, on the Studies of the Univ. of Cambridge, 5th ed. 
Ipp. p. 150. [14] frames: * frame' in ed. 1605. The Lat. has fabriea, 
nd perhaps the true correction of the sentence would be to read * is' for 
are' in the next line. [24] Democritus : Cic. Tusc. i. ii; Diog. Laert. 

^ 44. 45- 
P. 120. [11] Virg. Eel. vii. 45. [32] De Augm. iii. 6. 

P. 121. [6] as hath been said: See p. 106. [10] Democritus and 
Pythagoras : See Arist. De Anima, i. 2 ; Met. i. 4, 5 ; lamblichus, Vit. 
*ythag. xii. 59, [21] champain: * champion* in ed. 1605. [30] merely 
e?ered : Lat. penitus abstractam. 

P. 122. [7] intervening: * interueyning * in ed. 1605. [8] enginery: 
Inginarie ' in ed. 1605. Lat. Machinaria. [12] See p. 183, and comp. 
Lss. 1. p. 205. [24] De Augm. iii. 5. 



298 NOTES. 

P. 123. [3] Lat. qu(B magis ingeniosa quidem res est tt sagax, y 
philosophica. [7] Hor. Od. ii. 10. 3. [16] in books : Among others 
Magia Naturalis of Baptista Porta, published in 1589. [23] Bacon 
the same comparison in his treatise Of the Interpretation of Na 
(Works, iii. 234). The story of King Arthur of Britain was comj 
from the French legends by Sir Thomas Malory about the year i 
and was first printed by Caxton in 1485. Sir John Bourchier, I 
Bemers, the translator of Froissart, also translated from the Frcncl 
the request of the Earl of Huntingdon, -the romance of Sir Hug] 
Bourdeaux, a knight of the age of Charlemagne (Warton, Hist of ] 
Poetry, iii. 342, ed. 1824). This was printed by William Cop! 
about 1540. In Burton's time these romances were the favourite re 
of the country squires. * If they read a book at any time . . *ti8 
English chronicle, Sr Huon of Bordeaux, Amadis de Gaul, &c., a p 
book, or some pamphlet of news.* (Anat. of Mel. i. p. 305, ed. 18 
The romance of Hugh of Bourdeaux supplied the incidents of Wcla 
Oberon. For a summary of it see Dunlop's History of Fiction, i : 
419 (ed. 1816). Montaigne (i. 25, trans. Florio, p. 85, ed. 1603) 
* of King Arthur, of Lancelot du-Lake, of Amadis, of Huon of Burae 
and such idle time-consuming, and wit-besotting trash of bookes whc 
youth doth commonly ammuse it-selfe, I was not so much as acquai 
with their names.* [27] the fable of Ixion : Pindar, Pyth. ii. 21. 

P. 124. [19] medicines, motions: Lat. medUinas proprias, aeeommo 
etiam exercitia. [21] Lat. quam quod hoc fieri possit per guitat paue 
aut scrupulos alicujus pretiosi liquoris aut quintessentice. [33] This in 
tory was intended to occupy the tenth chapter of the treatise 01 
Interpretation of Nature. 

P. 125. [9] deducing: *diducing' in ed. 1605. [15] In the De i 
mentis Bacon omits the exam]5le of the mariner^s compass and 
stitutes the experiments made by Drebbd on the artificial conge 
of water by means of ice and saltpetre. To this he again alluai 
the fifth book of the De Augmentis. See Mr, Ellis's note (Works, 
628, note I). [24] Virg. Eel. x. 8. [26] See Nov. Org. i. 35. i 
ander (properly Roderigo) Borgia was Pope Alexander VL, and 
expedition of the French was that under Charles VIII. in 1494. B 
quotes the story again in his Redargutio Philosophiarum (Works 
558), and in his Hist, of Hen. VII. (Works, vi. 158). 

P. 126. [i] De Augm. iii. 4. [5] Non liquet was a Roman 
formula, by which the judge declared his inability to decide 
the guilt or innocence of the accused : like the Scotch noi proven, 
15] the entry of doubts are: An instance of a loose constractic 
frequent occurrence, in which the verb agrees in number with 
substantive interposed between it and its subject Comp. Shakes^ 
Hamlet, i. 2. 36-38 : 



BOOK II, 299 

* Giving to you no further personal power 

To business with the king, more than the scope 
Of these delated articles allow* 

are also Sanderson, Serm. iv. Ad Magistratum (Works, vol. ii. p. 
xi. Jacobson, 1854): 'The result of these particulars amount in 
lole to this.' An example in which the intervening substantive is 
singular is in Mid. Night's Dr. iii. 2. 97 : — 

* With sighs of love that costs the fresh blood dear.* 
gain, Com. of Err. v. i. 69, 70: — 

* The venom clamours of a jealous woman 
Poisons more deadly than a mad dog's tooth.' 

use,' in the sense of interest or increase : Lat. incrementa, 
37. [14] The Lat. omits Empedocles and adds Philolaus, Xeno- 
s, Anaxagoras, and Leucippus. [16] In 1574 Amurath III. on 
ding to the throne caused his five brothers to be strangled, and 
5 Mahomet III. removed all his brothers in the same way aiyi 
[ ten of his father's wives and concubines to be drowned (Knolles, 
of the Turks, pp. 919, 1056, ed. 1603). See Nov. Org. i. 67. 
lat. tamen iis, qui non regnum aut magisterium sed veritatis inqui- 
71 atque illustrationem sibi proponunt. [34] the received astronomy: 
s, the Ptolemaic system, in which the earth was the centre of the 
se. See p. 97, 1. 32, Ess. xxiii. p. 96, and Shakespeare, Troilus 
ressida, i. 3. 85 : • The heavens themselves, the planets, and this 
On the slowness with which the Copemican theory was diffused, 
pecially Bacon's opposition to it, see Whewell's Hist, of ths Ind. 
es, i. 404-412, ed. 1847. Copernicus died in 1543, and his 
ns were introduced into England mainly through Giordano Bruno, 
ime over about 1583. [31] Arist. Phys. i. i. 
28. [7-1 1] In the Latin the sources of information are indicated; 
e lives of the philosophers, Plutarch's collection of their opinions, 
otations of Plato, the refutation of Aristotle, and the scattered 
i in Lactantius, Philo, Philostratus, and the rest [12] severedly: 
iitions of 1605, 1633 all read 'severely,* but 'severedly' is the 
I in ed. 1629 and in the Errata to ed. 1605. Mr. Markby reads 
illy ' in the same sense. [23, 24] The Latin more clearly, Neque 
is est ratio philosophicB, quando proponitur integra, et quando in 
concisa et dissecta. [26] Theophrastus of Hohenheim, called 
Isus, was bom at Einsiedlen near Zurich in 1493; died at 
rg in the 47th year of his age, 24 Sept. 1541. His works on 
,try and medicine were collected in ten volumes and printed at 
fort in 1603. [28] Severinus: Petrus Severinus, a Danish phy- 
bom at Ripen in 1542, died in 1602. The work in which he 
d into harmony the philosophy of Paracelsus was Idea Medicinse 



300 NOTES. 

Philosophicae, 4to. Basil. 1571. [lb.] Tilesius: a misprint for Teiesiu 
as it stands in the De Augmentis, though the editions of 1605, 1619 
1633 o^ ^^ Advancement read *Tylesius.*- Bernardino Telesio 01 
Cosenza (i 508-1588), according to the Latin, revived the philosophy 
of Parmenides, and turned the weapons of the Peripatetics againt 
themselves. He wrote De Rerum Natura in nine books (Napoli, 1586), 
De Colorum Generatione (1570), and De Mari (1570). Sei Mauiioc 
Mod. Philosophy, p. 162. [29] Donius ; Augustino Doni, a physidsi 
of Cosenza, wrote two books De Natura Hominis, 4to. Basil, if 
[lb.] as a pastoral philosophy : i. e. as Bacon explains it in the txeam 
De Principiis atque Originibus, a philosophy which contemplates th« 
world placidly and at its ease. See also p. 46, 1. 14. [30] Fncts 
torius : Hieronymus Fracastorius, poet and physician, bom at Vcioni 
1483. Paul III. appointed him physician in ordinary to the Council 
of Trent, with a salary of ninety thalers a month. He died of apoplexy, 
Aug. 6, 1553, on his estate near Verona. Neither Donius nor Fn 
storius is mentioned in the Latin, but there is substituted * Patridiu 
Venecian, who hath sublimated the fumes of the Platonists* (^vau 
trans, ed. 1640). [33] Gilbertus : See p. 41, 1. 8. 

P. 129. [2] For Xenophanes the Latin has Philolaus. [10] De 
Augm. iv. I. [11] Plato, Alcib. Pr. ii. 124; Protag. i. 343; Cic. de 
Legg. i. 22. §§ 58, 59. TvSjOi aavr6y is one of the sentences which are 
said to have been written over the entrance to the temple of ApoOo 
at Delphi. [17] Comp. Seneca, Ep. Mor. xiv. i. 2 : Faciam ergo, quod 
exigis, et philosophiam in partes non in frusta dividam. Dividi enim iUam, 
non concidiy utile est. [24] Cicero, De Orat iii. 16, 19, Comp. Of the 
Interpretation of Nature (Works, iii. 228). [27] Comp. Of Ac Inter- 
pretation of Nature (Works, iii. 229): 'And therefore the opinion of 
Copernicus in astronomy, which astronomy itself cannot correct, because 
it is not repugnant to any of the appearances, yet natural philosophy 
doth correct.' Observe the change in the text of 'appearances* to 
phainomena and of * doth correct ' to * may correct.' [28] The Latin 
adds quce nunc quoque invaluif. [31, 32] the science of medicine;, if 
it be destituted . . . // is not much better &c. : For examples <rf a 
similar redundancy of the pronoun see p. 39, 11. ii, 33. 

P. 130. [26] Aristotle: in his Physiognomica. [27] Hippocrates: 
in his Prrenotiones. [31] physiognomy: used in a wider sense than 
at present. 

P. 131. [4] the factures of the body: Lat. corporis fabrieam dam 
quiescit. [12]* For as the tongue speaketh to the eares, so doeth the 
gesture speake to the eyes of the auditour.' Basilicon Doron, book iii. 
(Works of King James I. p. 183). [24] affects of the body: Lat urn- 
peramentum corporis. 

P. 132. [2] the P}'thagoreans : Referring to the precepts against ett- 



BOOK IT. 301 

ng beans (Cic. de Div. i. xxx. 62) and the fish ntelanurus, to which 
Plutarch gives a mystical signification (De Educ. Pueror. 17). [3] 
Itfanichees : ed. 1605 has Manicheas. For the rules of life which Manes 
laid down for his followers see Mosheim, Eccl. Hist. cent. 3. part. ii. ch. 
5. § 10. [4] Mahomet : * During the month of Ramadan, from the 
rising to the setting of the sun, the Musulman abstains from eating, 
and drinking, and women, and baths, and perfumes ; from all nourish- 
ment that can restore his strength, from all pleasure that can gratify 
his senses.* Gibbon, Decline and Fall, c. 50. [lb.] do exceed : Lat. 
(tmnem modum superatU, [5] See Lev. iii. 17; xi. [7] the faith: Lat. 
Christiana Jides. [12] the ceremony: the Lat. adds et excercitium ohedi- 
entue, [16] question == call in question: Latin dubium revocare, [19] 
Lat. qui simul cum mairis affectibus compatitur, et tamen e corpore matris 
ISO tempore excluditur. 

P. 133. [3] Apoph. 236. Said by Socrates of a treatise of Heraclitus 
which had been lent him by Euripides (Diog. Laert. ii. 22). The same 
is told of Crates (Diog. Laert. ix. 12). [11] Plato, Timseus, iii. 69, 70, 
referred to by Montaigne, Ess. ii. 12. See Cic. Tusc. Disp. i. 10. 
[13] Lat. cum tumori et superbice sit propior. [15] In the Latin is 
added a reference to the classification of the intellectual faculties, 
fancy, reason, and memory, according to the ventricles of the brain. 
[19] De Augm. iv. 2. [25] Tac. Ann. xvi. 18. [26] Lat. Subjectum 
istud mediciruE {corpus nimirum humanum). The word * other' is super- 
fluous. Compare Ess. ix. p. 35: 'We will adde this, in generall, 
touching the Affection of Envy ; that of all other Affections, it is the 
most importune, and continuall.* 

P. 134. [i] See Plato, Timseus, iii. 43 &c. [2] Severinus (see above 
p. 128) in his Idea Medicinse Philosophicae, pp. 36, 37, after describing 
the researches of the physician as ranging through the whole economy 
}f nature^ proceeds : Hisce perceptis ad humanam rempublicam descendit. 
It diuina quidem analogia, maioris mundi dispositionem tanquam parentis, 
nicrocosmo accommodat, elementa constituit humance natures consentanea: 
n his seminafoueri, et astra, ccelestia, area, aquatica, terrestria demonstrat : 
kc See also CroUii Basilica Chymica, p. 80 (ed. 1643), and Bacon, 
l^'isd. of the Ancients, ch. 26. [22] Virg. JEn. vi. 747. [25] See Ess. 
i p. 43 : • And as in nature, things move violently to their place, and 
almely in their place : so vertue in ambition is violent, in authoritie 
«tled and calme.' In his Promus or Common-place Book, fol. 8 b, 
Jacon entered, * Augustus rapide ad lociun leniter in loco.' [29] Ovid, 
tfet. i. 518, 521. 

P. 135. [2] are: Added in Errata to ed. 1605. M ^Y ^c^s and 
nasterpieces : *Lat. virtute sua et functione, [14] the: Omitted in 
he early editions. [16] mountebank: *MontabaiJce' ed. 1605. [20] 
Virg. ^n. vil 772, [23] Virg. iEn. vii. ii, [28] Eccl. iL 15. 



302 NOTES. 

P. 136. [11, 12] Lat. quantum obtineat imperii inteUeetus sttbtiliias d 
acumen, [19, 20] yet men can likewise discern them personally: Lit 
kujus tamen discrimina in singulis persohis facile internoscimus, [16] 
incomprehensions: Lat. acatalepsias. See p. 154, 1. 4. [32] avenixs: 
printed in italics in ed. 1605 as if it were a foreign word. . 

P* J 3 7- [i] Altered from Ovid, Rem. Am. 525, the true reading bdag I 
Nam quoniam variant animi, variamus et artes. Some editions htfS ). 
variabimus artes, [3-13] This paragraph is inserted in the De Aug* 
mentis near the beginning of the chapter, after eruditus luxus (p. 1331 
1- 25). [5] the sun: *the* is omitted in ed. 1605. -ffiscukpiiis it 
said to have been the son of Apollo and Coronis. [11] Matt iviL 
27. The miracle was not wrought for the payment of the Room 
tribute but for the tax which was due to the Temple. [20] acddenls: 
Used here in the sense of • symptoms,' as in p. 12. [26] Hippocntei: 
in his work De Epidemiis. [29] how they were judged : L e. how tbe ., 
cases were decided. ^ 

P- 138. [5] and if men will intend to observe: Lat qui auttm ai ^ 
observandum adjiciet animum. [17] being comparative and casual: '. 
quae comparativa est et casum recipit. [21] cause continent: Mr. luu 
quotes the following passage from Celsus from which this phrase k 
taken : Igitur hi qui rationalem medicinam prcfitentur Juec tucetsaria tm 
proponunt: Abditarum et morbos continentium causarum notitiam, demA 
evidentium, &c. Celsus, Prgefatio. [31] Celsus, De Re Medic&, pneC j 
Incidere autem vivorum corpora et crudele et supervacuum est, [32] the j 
great use : Some copies of ed. 1605 omit * the.* j 

P. 139. [26] passed: So in edd. 1605, 1629, 1633. Sec ] 
Fletcher's verses in Sorrowes loy, 1603 (Poems, ed. Grosart, iii. 200;: 

* Wearie of passed woe, and glad of present ioy.* 

[27] Sylla: Plutarch, Sylla, c. 31. 

P. 140. [9] Suetonius: Aug. 99. [10] Antoninus Pius: See his Life : 
by Capitolinus (c. 1 2) in Hist. Aug. Script. : Atque ita eomfenta quad 
dormirety spiritum efflavit apud Lorium, [12] Diog. Laert. x. 15. [16] 
From the Latin translation by Sambucus (Antw. 1566) of a Grade 
epigram quoted by Diogenes Laertius, x. 15. [24] the receipts 
propriety, respecting the particular cures of diseases, Le. medidnci 
appropriate to particular diseases: Lat. particulares tamtn nuditum 
qucB ad curationes morborum singulorum propriettUe quadam ^mtOKi, 
[31] treacle : Lat. Theriaca. [32] The Latin adds ti emrfeetioiu Alkerwm, 
The following is Mr. Ellis's note on the corresponding passage d 
De Augm. : * Theriaca, from which treacle is a corruption, is tbe muc 
of a nostrum invented by Andromachus, who was physician to "Sao, 
For an account of the history and composition of mithridatum, Me 
Celsus, V. 23. The invention of what was called diasoordinxn > 



BOOK IT. 303 

iscribed to Fracastorras, who speaks of it as ** Diascordium nostrum ** 
n his De Cortt. Morh. Cur. iii. 7. The confection of Alkermes in its 
)riginal form seems to have been invented by Mesu6, an Arabian 
physician. About Bacon's time what was called mineral kermes, 
which was a preparation of antimony, was a popular medicine, but it 
is probable that he here refers either to the confection of Mesu6 or 
to some modification of it.* 

P. 141. [i] the confections of sale which are in the shops: Lat. medi- 
eameiUa ilia qtue in officinis prostarU venalia. [2] for readiness and not 
for propriety : i. e. they are compounded for immediate use and not with 
reference to the particular disease. [10] probations : In old MS. books 
of receipts it is common to find prohatum est written against such as have 
been tried and found effectual. [21] T do find strange : Lat. mirari subit. 
[23] extolled : i.e. by the school of Paracelsus. [33] more commanded: 
i.e. more under control. Some copies of ed. 1605 read * commended.* 
The Lat. has pro arbitrio regere, 

P. 142. [23] no more: Observe the repetition of the negative. "We 
should now say *any more.* See p. 208, 1. 19. [^9] artificial decora- 
tion : i. e. painting the face. Lat. adulterina ilia decoratio, quce fucos et 
pigmenta adhibet. [31] Mr. Spedding conjectures * wholesome to use, 
Hor handsome to please.' [33] I take the subject of it largely : Lat. 
tarn sensu intelligimus paulo largiori quam accipi consuevit, 

P. 143, [3] patience; i. e. endurance: Lat. toUrantia. [7] The Latin 
adds *in the prodigious strength of madmen.* [16] which though it be 
not true, &c. : Compare, for this construction, p. 81, 1. 11, and Shake- 
speare, Merch, of Ven. i. 3. 137 : 

• Who if he breaks thou may*st with better face 
Exact the penalty.' 

[23] Comp. Bacon, Ess. Iviii. p. 237 ; quoted in note to p. 11, 1. 28. 

P. 144. [i] De Augm. iv. 3. [17, 18] by the benediction of a pro- 
ducat: as in the fifth day of creation. See Gen. i. 20, 24: Producant 
oqtue ,.producat terra. See p. 116, 11. 5-9. 

P. 145. [6, 7] Lat. Etiam Chaldceorum Astrologia solermior, non mvlto 
tneUor. [13] Sallust, Bell. Jug. 39. [16] referred over : i.e. to the * par- 
ticular knowledges* among which the various kinds of artificial divina- 
tion are distributed ; as astronomy, medicine, politics, and the like. [24'! 
near death : As an illustration of this belief in the possession of the 
prophetic power by persons at the point of death, compare Shakespeare, 
Rich. II. 11. I. 31, 32 : 

* Methinks I am a prophet new inspired 
And thus expiring do foretell of him.' 

[28] Plato, Timseus, iii. 71 : ofoi' h Karoirrpq) Scxoft^v^ nJirow*. 
P. 146. [i] fury : Comp. Ovid, Met. 11. 640 ; vaticinos concepit mente 



304 NOTES» 

furores. [6] See Paracelsus, De Vennibus, c. x. (p. J43, ed. i 
Quanquam admitto imaginationem et fidim ess$ tarn potentes, ut per c 
ipsos reddere sanos aut cegros valeamus : imo quod mains est, possui 
<slemum servari^ vel perdi, secundum usum in quem assumiafuerint, 
also Crollii Basilica Chymica, Prsef. Admon. pp. 70-77 (ed. 1643] 
miracle-working faith : Comp. Matt. xvii. 20, [10] the secret pai 
of things, &c. : Lat. occuUas rerum energias et impressiones, sensuum 
diaiiones, coniagionum de corpore in corpus transmissiones. [16] 
almost made civil : Lot. facta quasi populares, [26] The reference 1 
Roman church is omitted in the Latin. [32] opposing to : L e. in • 
sition to, repugnant to. [33] Gen. iii. 19. 

P. 147. [3-6] For this sentence are substituted in the Latin twc 
derata on Voluntary Motion, and on Sense and the Sensible, with 
cussion of the Form of light [7] De Augm. v. i. [13-16] Lat 
sensus idola omnigena phantasice tradit, de quibus postea ratio Judici 
ratio vicissim idola electa et probata phantasi€e transmiitit, priusguat 
executio decreti. [ai] Ovid, Met. ii. 14, [35] Arist PoL i. 3. 

P. 148. [i] impressions : 'impression' in ed. 1605. The plural i 
necessary here from what follows, although * other ' is used as an 1 
tive with singular nouns. See Shakespeare, Cymbeline, iiL 4. 144. 
In the Latin this is expressed more clearly ; that where the minds ol 
are in any way wrought upon by rhetorical artifices, the imaginati 
roused till it triumphs over the reason, and as it were does it viol 
partly by blinding and partly by exciting it. On the office of rh< 
see p. 177. [6] the former division : i. e. the division which b giv 
p. 85. [8-15] And if it be . . his true place: Omitted in the Latin. 
in the doctrine De Anima: See p. 146. [21] the former division; 
p. 144. [27] pabulum animi: Cicero, Acad. Qusest iL 41. Est 
animorum ingeniorumque naturale quoddam quasi pabulum ewuidiraHo 
templatioque natura, Comp. also De Senect 14. [30] ad ollat earn 
to the flesh-pots (of Egypt), Num. xi. 4-6. 

P. 149. [3] lumen siccum: See p. 8, 1. 26. [6] Aristotle, De Ai 
iii. 8. [11] to shoot a nearer shoot: Lat. ut melius quis eottimei. 
' These divisions are adopted from Peter Ramus ; the artes logic 
eluding what Ramus calls Dialectic and Rhetoric, of whidi the fo 
is divided into Inventio and Judicium, and the latter into Elocatic 
Pronunciatio.' Ellis's note on De Augm. v. i. [22] De Angm. v 

P. 150. [6] Arist. Prior. Anal. i. 30; Eth. Mag. i. I. 17. [9] 
Celsus, De Re Medica, i. 1, where he gives it as the opinion of the 
pirics. [12] The reference to the Thesetetus is a mistake. It is com 
in the Latin to the more general assertion Plato non s§md immuii. £ 
was perhaps thinking of the Philebus, p. 17. [21] Viig. JEn. ziL 
[28] Virg. iEn. viii. 698. 

P. 151. [1-4I Omitted in the De Augm. but retatned in nbstan 



BOOK II. 305 

the Cogitata et Visa (Works, iii. 614). Acosta, in his Natural Hist, of 
the Indies, describes the mode of obtaining fire by rubbing two sticks 
U^ther (Bk. iii. ch. 2). In the English translation of this book (p. 119, 
ed. 1604) there is 'a misprint of 'stones' for * sticks/ *the manner to 
strike fixe in rubbing two stones one against another,' where the Spanish 
has * pales.' [5] to a wild goat for surgery : See the passage quoted on 
the previous page from Virgil. [6] the ibis : * The like device to this, 
namely of clystres, we learned first of a foule in the same ^gypt, which 
is called H)is (or the blacke Storke).' Holland's Pliny, viii. 27 (ed. 1601). 
This and the previous illustration are both mentioned by Montaigne, 
Ess. ii. 12. [7] the pot-lid that flew open for artillery : Of the discovery 
of guns we read, in the English translation of Pancirolli Rerum Mira- 
bilium libri Duo (Lond. 1785, p. 384), * All Histories do agree in this, 
that a German was Author of this Invention, but whether his Name be 
known, or whether he was a Monk of Friburg, Constcmtine Ancklitzen, 
or Beriholdus Swartz (as some call him) a Monastick too, is not so very 
certain. *Tis said he was a Chymist, who sometimes for Medicines kept 
Powder of Sulphur in a Mortar, which he covered with a Stone. But it 
happened one Day as he was striking Fire, that a Spark accidentally 
falling into it, brake out into a Flame, and heav'd up the Stone. The 
Man being instructed 'by this Contingency, and having made an Iron 
Pipe or Tube together with Powder, is said to have invented this 
Engine.* The story is found in Polydore Vergil (De Inventoribus 
Rerum, ii. ii). [8] Comp. Agatho, quoted by Arist. Eth. Nic. vi. 4: 
t^XYl t^XV^ t(ntp^€ KaH i^xv "^^X^V^- [11] Virg. Georg. i. 133. [14] 
do put in ure: i. e. do use. [17] Cic. Pro Balbo, 20 : Assiduus usus uni 
Ttt deditus et ingenium et artem scepe vincit, [20] Virg. Georg. i. 145 ; 
wci^ in the original. [22] Persius, Prol. 8: Quis expedivit Psittaco suum 
X«p€. [23] See Holland's Pliny, x. 43. [24] pebbles: *pibbles' in 
ed. 1605 ; as in Shakespeare, Coriolanus, v. 3. 56, the first folio has, 

•Then let the Pibbles on the hungry beach 
Fillop the Starres.' 

[a8] • Looke what seeds or graines they do lay up for provision, sure 
they will be to gnaw it first* for feare they should sprout and take root 
again and so grow out of the earth.* Holland's] Pliny, xi. 30. * The 
supposed grams of com are no doubt the nymphse. Huber repeatedly 
observed ants in the act of tearing the integument in which the young 
ant was enclosed, in order to facilitate its exit.' Ellis's note on De 
Augm. v. 2, p. 619. This again is mentioned by Montaigne, Ess. ii. 12. 
P. 152. [i] See p. 150, 1. 26. [5] Nothing is said of Plato in the 
ranslation. [14] Virg. Georg. iv. i. [21] for who can assure: Lat. 
itU enim m se recipiet, [23] not other: *any other* in some copies of 
d. 1605. [24] I Sam. xvi. [25] Issay: So in the edd. of 1605, 1629, 

X 



306 NOTES. 

1633. '^*^* JS the form of the word in the Bishops* Bible. [32] TTm 
lictores and viatores were both attendants upon a Roman magistrate, tbi 
business of the former being to clear the way and of the latter to sank' 
mon persons before him. So that lictores corresponds to 'whifflen, 
and viatores to ' sergeants.' 

P. 153. [5] Referring to Matt, xviii. 3. Compare Of the Interpieii 
tion of Nature (iii. p. 224) ; ' It is no less true in this kingdom of know 
ledge than in God's kingdom of heaven, that no man shall enter into \ 
except he become first as a little child.* [10] in subject of nature : Lat 
rebus naturalibus qua participant ex materia. [17] In this sentence Baca 
appears to have had in his mind what he afterwards said of the investig 
ation of final causes : nam causarumfinalium inquisiiio sterilis est^ettOM- 
quam virgo Deo consecrata nihil parit (De Augm. iii. 5). In speaking ol 
these (p. 119, 1. 5) he calls them 'satisfactory and specious causes;' 
while in the present passage he characterizes them as producing assoit 
but barren of result. [20] the current tokens or marks of popular* 
notions of things: See again pp. 166, 167, and Arist. Interp. i. 1. 2. 
[21] notions: Lat. notiones ipsce {quce verborum anima sunt), Foi 
construction, see p. 143, 1. 16. [32] Cic Acad. Quaest iL 5. § 15: 
Socrates autem, de se ipso detrahens in disputations, plus tribuAat n 
quos volebat refellere. Ita cum aliud diceret atque sentiret, libenltr idk' 
solitus est ea dissimulatione quam Greed elpo^tiap vacant. See also BmtoSi 
c. 85. 

P. 154. [i] Tiberius: Tac. Ann. i. 7. ti. [4] acaialepsia: incompifr' 
hensibility, the doctrine of the impossiLility of attaining absolute truth. 
Cic. Acad. Quoest. ii. 6. 18. See Nov. Org. i. 37. [9] in both acad^ 
mies : The Lat adds, multo magis inter Scepticos, [10] in subtilty and 
integrity : Lat. simpliciter et integre, as if the reading had beoi, as it pwh 
bably should be, * in simplicity and integrity.' [14] by help of instn- 
ment : Lat. ope instrumentorum. Perhaps we should r«id ' instmrnCDts.* 
^Vith this whole passage compare what Bacon says in his treatise Of the 
Interp. of Nat. (Works, iii. 244) : * That the information of the senses is 
sufficient, not because they err not, but because the use of the sense in 
discovering knowledge is for the most part not immediate. So that it is 
the work, effect, or instance, that trieth the Axiom, and the sense doth 
but try the work done or not done, being or not being/ [29] e^^tritiiba 
literata : In the De Augmentis this is explained at some length as treat- 
ing of the methods of making experiments. [30] interpretatio mature: 
The Lat. adds, sive Novum Organum. Of these two divisions Bacon 
says, in the De Augmentis, the former proceeds from one experiment to 
another ; the latter from experiments to axioms, which in their tun 
lead to new experiments. 

P. 155. [i] De Augm. v. 3. [23] Aristotle, Soph. £L iL 9. [30] 
Matt. xiii. 52. 



BOOK II. 307 

P. 156. [5] being broken unto it by great experience : Lat. longa doctu^ 
txperientia, [6] Cic Orat. xiv. 45, 46. [8] in thesi: *in these,* ed. 1605, 
corrected in Errata. [33] See p. 181. 

P. 157. [1] Plato, Menon, ii. p. 80. [12] See Aristotle, Rhet. ii. 23. 
16, 17. [22] See Nov. Org. i. 130. [23] in going of a way: i.e. in 
going on or along a road. [29] In the De Augm. is here inserted an 
example of a special topic, de gravi et levi, [30] De Augm. v. 4. 
t3ii 32] which .. .which: There is a little confusion of construction 
here, the first * which' referring to *arts,' and the second to * judgement.* 

P. 158. [2] otherwise it is : i. e. it is otherwise. Comp. p. 1 10, 1. 4. 
[14] Aristotle, De Motu Anim. 2, 3. [16] Atlas: See Horn. Od. i. 
52-54. [31] principle: Some copies of ed. 1605 read 'principles.* [lb.] 
probation ostensive: or *ostensive reduction^ because you prove, in the 
first figure, either the very same conclusion as before, or .one which implies 
it.* Whately, Logic, ii. 3. § 5. 

P. 159. [i] * Reductio ad impossihile. By which we prove (in the first 
figure) not directly that the original conclusion is true, but that it cannot 
he false; i.e. that an absurdity would follow from the supposition of its 
being false.' Whately, Logic, ii. 3, § 6. [2] the number of middle 
terms to be; i.e. greater or less. [29] Seneca, Ep. Mor. 45. § 8; sic 
ista ^ne noxa decipiunt, quomodo prcestigiatorum acetabula et calculi, in 
^us me fallacia ipsa delectat. [23] doth not only put a man besides 
his answer : Lat. non solum id prcestant ut non habeat quis quod respondeat, 
[27] the Sophists: The Lat. specifies Gorg^as, Hippias, Protagoras, 
Euthydemus, and the rest. [28] See the beginning of the Thesetetus. 

P. 160. [23] categories or predicaments: Of Aristotle's enumeration 
of Existences, as the basis of Logic, Mr. Mill says, * The categories, or 
predicaments — the former a Greek word, the latter its literal interpreta- 
tion in the Latin language — were intended by him and his followers as 
an enumeration of all thingsxapable of being named ; an enumeration 
by the summa genera, i. e. the most extensive classes into which things 
could be distributed.' Logic, i. p. 60. They were ten in number : sub- 
stance, quantity, quality, relation, action, passion, time, place, position, 
and habit. [31] This section is expanded in the Latin into a discussion 
of the • idols * or fallacies of the human mind ; the idols of the tribe, the 
cave, the marketplace, and the theatre. See Nov, Org. i. 39-68. 

P. 161. [10] false appearances : Lat. idola. [16] See Essay xxxv. 
p. 152. These are what Bacon elsewhere calls the • idols of the tribe.' 
[18] This story is told of Diagoras by Cicero, De Nat. Deor. iii. 37, 
and of Diogenes the Cynic by Diogenes Laertius, vi. 59. See Bacon, 
Nov. Org. i. 46. [23] Nov. Org. i. 45. [32] monodica, sui juris: as 
if from fji6vo$ and di/crj. The word Bacon intended to use was mono- 
iica, unique, which he then might have rendered sui generis instead of 
«w jvrtx, 

X 2 



308 NOTES. 

P. 1 6a. [i] is : Compare Macbeth, i. 3. 141 : 

* And nothing U 
But what is not.* 

[lb.] an element of fire : Empedocles recognised the existence of ion 
elements, earth, air, fire, and water, and among these gave the mosi 
important place to fire. Heraclitus assumed the elemental prindpie tc 
be fire, as the most subtle and active of the elements. See Tennemaim 
Manual of the Hist, of Phil. §§ 103, 106, trans. Johnson. [5] Proti* 
goras affirmed that man is the measure of all things. Arist. Met x. (. 
[7] The Anthropomorphites, who were a branch of the Monophyates, 
held that God was of human shape, and interpreted literally all the 
passages in the Scriptures in which mention is made of his eye, ear, ann, 
or hand. See Gibbon, Decline and Fall, c. 47 ; Nicephonis, Hist Ecd 
xiii. 10. The monastic sect of Audaeans, founded by Audaeus, or Audios^ 
in Mesopotamia in the fourth century, maintained that the expresaoo, 
' God created man in his own image,' is to be understood in its most 
literal sense. A sect of Anthropomorphites was in existence in Italy ii 
the tenth century. [8] Epicurus : Cic. De Nat. Deor. ii. 1 7, &c. Comp^ 
Of the Interp. of Nat. p. 341, for the original form of much in this pan- 
graph. [11] Cic. De Nat. Deor. i. 9, § 22 : Quid autem erat quodeonoh 
pisceret Deus, mundum signis et luminibus, tanquam <sdilis, omare f [lb.] 
Epicurean • In the ed. of 1605 this is spelt Epicurian, but in p. 191 tbc 
spelling is the same in the old as in the modem editions. The word in 
Bacon's time was pronounced with the accent on the third syllable, ai 
in Shakespeare, Ant. and CI. ii. i. 24 : 

* Epicurean cooks 
Sharpen with cloyless sauce his appetite/ 

[13] The curule aediles were at first appointed to take charge of Ae 
ludi Romani, but the ludi scenici, or dramatic representations, and the 
ludi megalesii also came under their control. * The decoration of Ae 
ArgentaricBt with the gilded shields of the Samnites, at the triumph of 
Papirius, in b. c. 309, is said to have first suggested to the Aediles Ae 
idea of ornamenting the Forum and its vicinity vrith statues, pictures, 
embroidery, and other works of art, during solemn processions and the 
celebration of the public games.' (Ramsay, Rom. Ant. p. 159.) [19] 
number : * numbers * in some copies of ed. 1605. [22] Let ns consider 
again : i. e. Again, let us consider, &c. These false appearances are the 
Idols of the Cave. See Nov. Org. i. 42. [24] Plato. Repub. viL sub init 
P. 163. [i] in our first book : See p. 40. [3] These are the Idols of 
the Marketplace : See Nov. Org. i. 43. [7] This is quoted as a saying 
of Aristotle by Roger Bacon, Opus Majus, i. 4 : Quare Pkilosophu dicitiu 
secundo Topicorum^ quod sentiendum est ut pauci, licet loqumdum tii Mtfiwm, 
He was perhaps thinking of Aristotle, Top. ii. 2. 5. 'He that wyll wiyte 
well in any tongue, must folowe thys councel of Aristotle, to speake ai 



BOOK U. 309 

the common people do, to thinke as wise men do.* Ascham's Toxophilus, 
ed. Arber, p. 18. [9] The Tartars, says Dr Giles Fletcher, in his Russe 
Commonwealth, c. 19. p. 67 (ed. 1591), 'are very expert horsemen, 
& vse to shoot as readily backward, as forward.' And Maundevile 
(Voyage, &c., p. 304, ed. 1727): 'And jee schulle undirstonde, that it is 
gret drede for to pursue the Tartarines, jif thei fleen in Bataylle. For in 
fleynge, thei schooten behynden hem, and sleen bothe men and Hors.* 
Comp. Speech on the Subsidy Bill (Life and Letters, ii. 89) : * Sure I am 
it was like a Tartar's or Parthian's bow, which shooteth backward.* 
[30] so slightly touched : The Lat. has siquidem Aristoteles rem notavit, 
mdum ret nullibi persecutus est, 

P. 164. [3] syllogism : * sophisme * in ed. 1605, corrected in Errat^. 
[3] Arist. Prior. Anal. ii. 5 ; Post. Anal. ii. 13. [4-7] The construction 
here is loose. We ought correctly to read, * every of these hath certain 
sabjects ... in which respectively // hath chiefest use ; and certain others, 
from which it ought* &c. But Bacon regarded * every of these* as 
equivalent to *all these,* and finished the sentence accordingly. A 
similiar construction is found in Shakespeare, Mid. N.'s Dr. ii. i. 90-92 : 
* Contagious fogs, which falling in the land 
Have every pelting river made so proud, 
That they have overborne their continents.* 
[16] De Augm. v. 5. [18, 20] for : i. e. as for. [28] a matter of great 
use and essence: Lat. magni prorsus rem esse usus et Jirmitudinis, [31] 
and contracteth judgement to a strength : Lat. et aciem judicii in unum 
contrabat. 

P. 165. [6] An art there is extant of it : Cornelius Agrippa, in his 
Vanitie of the Sciences, has a chapter *0f the Arte of Memorie; ' 
'Among these Artes, the Arte of Memorie is also accoumpted, whiche 
(as Cicero saithe) is nothing els, but a certaine induction and order of 
teaching, consisting of places and Images, as it were in a paper, deuised, 
firste in Caracters by Simonides MelitOt afterwarde broughte to perfection 
by Metrodorus Scepticus. . . . Cicero hath written thereof in his newe 
Rhetorike, Quintilian in his Institutions, Seneca, and of the fresher sorte, 
Franeiscus Petrarcha, Mareolus of Verona, Petrus of Ravenna, and 
Eermannus Buschius, and others, but vnworthie of rehersal, men little 
knowen ' (Eng. trans, cap. 10, ed. 1575). Giordano Bruno also wrote an 
Ars Memorise. [27] dischargeth : i.e. dismisses, relieves us of. 

P. 166. [3] distinguish : i. e. assert distinctly, decide. Bacon refers to 
what he said on p. 84 : * my purpose is, at this time, to note only 
omissions and deficiencies, and not to make any redargution of errors, or 
incomplete prosecutions.' [5] De Augm. vi. i. [12] the organ of 
tradition : The Latin adds qua et grammatica dicitur. [13] Arist. De 
loterp. i. I. [15] it: Omitted in editions of 160^, 1629, 1633. [24] 
China, and the kingdoms of the High Levant : In Acosto's Naturall and 



3IO NOTES. 

Morall Historic of the East and West Indies, lib. vi. chap. t. (Eng. Ir. 
1604), is an account *0f the fashion of Letters, and Bookes, the Chinois 
vsed.* * They have no Alphabet, neither write they any letters, but all 
their writing is nothing else but painting and ciphering : and their letten 
signifie no partes of distinctions, as ours do, but are figures and 
representations of things, as of the Sunne, of fire, of a man, of the sea, 
and of other things. The which appears plainely, for that their wihiiigf 
and Chapas, are vnderstood of them all, although the languages the 
Chinois speake, are many and very different ... So as things being ol 
themselves innumerable, the letters likewise or figures which the CkMi 
vse to signifie them by, are in a maner infinite.' Of the Japanese, to 
whom probably Bacon refers as the people of the High Levant or ht 
East, Acosta says in the same chapter, 'I have had some of thdr 
writings shewed me, whereby it seemes that they should have some 
kinde of letters, although the greatest part of their writings, be by tiie 
characters and figures, as hath bin saide of the Chinois,' Acosta is in all 
probability the source of Bacon's information, for, from the exp re ssion 
'And we understand further/ which in the Latin is rendered 'Qninetiam 
notissimum fieri jam coepit/ it was clearly but recently acquired, and 
there is other evidence that he had read his book. 

P. 167. [11] The story of Thrasybulus sending to consult Perianderit 
told by Aristotle (Polit. iii. 13). In Herodotus (v. 92) it is Periander 
who sends to Thrasybulus. Compare with this Livy*s version (i 54), 
where it is applied to Tarquinius Superbus. The form of the tale as it 
appears in Herodotus is adopted by Plutarch (Sept. Sap. Conv. 2). [16] 
grandees: In ed. 1605 grandes, which probably represents the early 
pronunciation of the word, with the accent on the first syllable. In 
Burton's Anat. of Mel. (Democritus to the Reader, p. 34, ed. 1628), it is 
found in the form grandy : * For in a great person, right worshipfbll Sir, 
a right honourable Grandy, 'tis not a veniall sinne.* In the first edition 
of the Advancement the word is printed in italics, an indication that it 
was not yet naturalised, but had been adopted from the Spanish or 
Italian. [28] words are the tokens current and accepted for conceits: 
See p. 153; 'words are but the current tokens or marks of popolar 
notions of things.' [31] Perhaps Bacon had in his mind the paper money 
of the Chinese, of which an account had been given by Rubruquis and 
confirmed by Marco Polo (Travels, Bk. ii. c. 18, trans. Marsden: u. 24* 
ed. Yule). Colonel Yule in his edition of Marco Polo (L pp. 380-385) 
says it was in use as early as the 9th cent. 

P. 168. [4] the first general curse: Gen. iii. 16-19. M ^® second 
general curse: Gen. xi. 6-8. [7, 8] in a mother tongue: 'in another 
tongue' ed. 1605, corrected to * in mother tongue* in the Eirata and in 
edd. 1629, 1633. The Latin has Unguis quibusque vemaadit, [33] Bfart 
ix. 83. 



BOOK II. 311 

P. 169. [11] decipher: 'discypher' in ed. 1605. [13] Of this kind of 
apher Bacon gives an example in the De Augm., which he says was 
invented by him at Paris. [30] words: some copies of ed. 1605 read 
'markes.' 

P. 170. [4] labours and studies : some copies of ed. 1605 read 'labours 
studies,' and Mr. Spedding, considering that one of these words is a 
correction of the other, reads * studies ' alone. [5] De Augm. vi. 2. 
'Besides Ramus himself and Carpentier, one of the principal persons in 
this controversy was the Cardinal D'Ossat, of whom some account will 
be found in De Thou's memoirs.' (Ellis.) [14] The first book of the 
Dialectica of Ramus is De Inventione, the second De Judicio, and of the 
latter the last four chapters are on Method. [19] invention: 'inventions ' 
m ed. 1 605, corrected in Errata. [29] Cicero, Pro Caelio xviii. 42 : Ergo hcBC 
deserta via et inculta atque interclusa jam frondibus et virgultis relinqiiatur. 

P. 171. [i] be: Omitted in ed. 1605. [7] to be spun on: i. e. to be 
spun continuously, without break. [lb.] intimated : Mr. Spedding 
conjectures * insinuated.* The Latin has insinuanda. But in distinguish- 
ing in the De Augmentis the two kinds of Methods, Magistralis and 
liddativa, Bacon says 'Magistralis siquidem docet; Initiativa intimat* 
and therefore, as in this passage he is speaking of the latter of these, 
'intimated ' is probably the true reading. [9] knowledge induced: that 
is, derived by induction. Lat. scientia per inductionem acquisita. [12] 
secundum majus et minus : to a gi^ater or less extent. See p. 30, 1. 8. 

P. 172. [i] enigmatical and disclosed: In the De Augm. he dis- 
tinguishes them as Acroamatica and Exoterica. In this passage Bacon's 
remarks apply to the enigmatical method. [16] except they should be 
ridiculous : We should now say * unless they would be ridiculous.' [26] 
Hor. Ars Poet. 242. [31] demonstration in orb or circle : See p. 164. 

P. 1 73. [8] The scholastical method which is condemned previously. 
See pp. 32, 33. [13] indeed : Mr. Spedding interprets this as equivalent 
to ' although indeed.* Rather, perhaps, * would ' is used for * should.* 
The difficulty is evaded in the Latin translation, which is as follows : 
lUud tamen inficias non ierim urbem aliquam magnam et munitam a tergo 
rdinquere kaudquaquam semper tutum esse. The use of the words ' piece 
enemy ' seems to shew that Bacon was thinking of chess. He gives this 
as an example of what he means by keeping the field and pursuing * the 
sum of the enterprise.' A general will not waste his strength in attack- 
ing some small fort when an important position is held by the enemy in 
his rear, and the teacher of a science will only employ confutation * to 
remove strong preoccupations and prejudgements' from the minds of 
his pupils, and not to refute their minor cavils and doubts. Modem 
editions read 'some important piece with an enemy.* [29] shells: 
• shales ' in ed. 1605, [31] particular topics for invention : See pp. 156, 

157. 



312 1^0 TES. 

P. 174. [i] judgement : The Latin has here Seqvkur aliudMriko 
erimeftt in tradendis scientiis cum judicio adhihendum, Mediod ] 
described (p. 170) as a part of judgement, and here the oae 
seems to have been substituted for the other. [5] agreeable: i 
received opinions. Lat. opinionihus jampridem imbibitis et reeeptU 
[7] Arist. Eth. Nic. vi. 3. The opinion alluded to in this passt 
generally supposed to be that of Plato (Theaet. p. 197) anc 
Democritus. Mr. Ellis conjectured that Bacon might inadvertently 
substituted one name for the other. [10] need only but: One of 
words is redundant. We should say * need only * or * need but' 
Mr. Ellis quotes Plato, Politic, ii. 377 : x^^*"'^''* M irapcJhlyfuxffi 
Htvov^ licavuM (vBtlKyvaBal rt rojv /jCfi^Svoov. [27] The Latin ad 
these diversities of methods Dicereticam and Homericam. 

P. 175. [8] Ramus (Dialect, lib. ii. c. 3) divides the axioms 01 
principles of sciences (axiomata artium) as follows : Axioms are • 
true or false. Of true axioms, some are true contingently, < 
necessarily. A necessary axiom must be true in all cases, an 
predication is then said to be KarcL vavrSM. It must be homogei 
that is, its parts must be essentially connected together, as form n 
thing formed, the subject with its proper adjunct, genus with specK 
this case it is said to be koB* avrS. Thirdly, it must be cathol 
universal, that is, the converse of the proposition must be true as w 
the proposition itself, when it is icaB6\ov vpSnav, To these tibiree 
Ramus gives the fanciful names of the law of truth (jcard. varr^), t\ 
of justice {xaB* airr<5), and the law of wisdom {Ka06Xov vpStroif), It i 
last law which is referred to in the concluding sentence of this pora^ 
[11] the canker of epitomes: In p. 91 Bacon calls epitomes 
corruptions and moths of history.' [13] Referring probably t 
dragons which kept the garden of the Hesperides and the golden 1 
Compare also Shakespeare, As You Like It, ii. i. 12-14 • 

'Sweet are the uses of adversity, 
"Which like the toad, ugly and venomous^ 
Wears yet a precious jewel in his head.' 



[26-28] and the longitude . . . precept : Lat. longitudo 

summa propositione ad imam in eadem scientia, [30] which is the mlc 

call Kadavrd : Omitted in the Latin. See note on p. 175, L 8. 

P. 1 76. [5] Ortelius : Abraham Ortel, or Ortelius, bom June 9, 
at Antwerp, and called the Ptolemy of his time. He was appc 
geographer to the King of Spain, and died June 26, 1598. Prefix 
his Theatrum Orbis Terrarum is a map of the world called Tjrpns ' 
Terrarum, to which Bacon probably alludes. [20] Raymimdiis Lo 
bom at Palma in Majorca in 1235. He was at first steward to 
James of Majorca and High Chamberlain ; or, as others say, a men 



BOOK II. 313 

lis ancestors. His early life was licentious, but he afterwards con- 
ed a disgust for the world, and when forty years of age studied 
dn and Arabic at Paris. While preaching Christianity in Africa he 
s stoned by the natives, and carried off by a Genoese vessel, on board 
vhich he died off the coast of Majorca, March 26, 1315. For an 
of his art, which he said was revealed to him on a mountain, see 
uice's Mediaeval Philosophy, pp. 244 &c. Cornelius Agrippa says 
:, ' herein I wil admonishe you, that this Arte auaileth more to the 
twarde shewe of the witte, and to the ostentation of Learning, than to 
te knowledge: and hath much more presumptuousnesse, than effi- 
;ie.* Of the Vanitie and Uncertaintie of Artes and Sciences, cap. 9 
ugl. trans, ed. 1575). [27] De Augm. vi. 3. [lb.] which concemeth 
illustration of tradition : Lat. de illustraHone sermoms. [33] Adapted 
Q Ex. iv. 16. See Ex. vii. i. 

i'. 177. [2] Prov. xvi. 21, quoted from the Vulgate from memory. 

I hath made : Observe the loose construction, the singular being used 

the plural. [18] The Latin adds, Rhetorica certe Phantasies quemad- 

mdvm Dialectica Intellectui subservit: Rhetoric is to the imagination 

what logic is to the imderstanding. [23] morality: Lat. Ethicam, ethics 

or moral philosophy. [26] Lat. aut argumentorum fallaciis obruimur. 

P. 1 78. [ 2] to fill the imagination : Lat. phantasiam implere observa- 
Hwiibus et simulachris, [4] Plato, Gorg. i. p. 462, &c. [13] Thuc. iii. 
42. [18] Plato, Phaedr. iii. 250; see also Cic. De Off. i. 5. 14; de Fini- 
bns, ii. 16. 52 ; Rabelais, Pantag. ii. 18. For the opposite sentiment 
compare IJope, Essay on Man, Ep. ii. 217 : 

• Vice is a monster of so frightful mien. 
As, to be hated, needs but to be seen.* 

'23] The Latin adds, a Cicerone. See Cicero, De Fin. iv. 18, 19 ; Tusc. 
Disp. ii. 18. 42. [26] with the will: Lat. cum phantasia et voluntate. 
32] Ovid, Metam. vii. 20. 

P. 179. [16] See Aristotle, Rhet. i. i. 14. [18] The comparison is 
ttributed to Zeno; Cicero, Orat. xxxii. 113; De Finibus, ii. 6. 17; 
iextus Empiricus, Adv. Mathem. ii. 7. Bacon uses it again, though in 

different context, in his letter to Toby Matthew, upon sending him 
art of Instauratio Magna (Life and Letters, iv. 137): * And to speak 
"uth, it is to the other but as palma to pugnus, part of the same thing 
lore large.* [19] palm : • pawme * in ed. 1605. [23] Arist. Rhet. i. 2. 
. [29] Virg. Eel. viii. 56. [32] respectively; i.e. in terms adapted 
) the persons addressed. 

P. 180. [9] attendances: See p. 177, 'and therefore the deficiences 
hich I shall note will rather be in some collections, which may as 
andmaids attend the art, than in the rules or use of the art itself.* The 
atin has qua (jut ante diximus) ejus sunt generis, ut pro appendicibus potius 



314 NOTES. 

censeri deheantt quam pro portionibus artis ipsius, et pertinent omni 
Promptuariam. [11] Aristotle, Rhet. i. 6, 7; Top. i. 12, &c. [14] B 
refers to the Colours of Good and Evil which he published with the 
edition of his Essays in 1597. In the Latin twelve examples are { 
of these sophisms. [19] Hor. Ep. ii. 2. 11. [20] Prov. xx. 14. 
Arist Rhet. i. 6. [32] Virg. Mn. ii. 104. 

P. 181. [2] See pp. 155, 156. [9] Of these Antitheta forty-s 
examples are given in the De Augmentis, of which the instance on 
page is the last but one. [22] For examples of these /ormtt/<8, so 
* Promus of Formularies and Elegancies * printed by Mr. Speddin 
the seventli volume of his edition of Bacon. Three others are { 
from Cicero m the De Augmentis. [33] De Augm. vi. 4. 

P. 182. [i] the other pedantical : Lat. altera pcedagogica, [4, 5] 
cemeth chiefly writing of books : The editions of 1605, 1629, and 
read * concemeth chiefly in writing of books.* The true reading is 
bably * consisteth chiefly in writing &c.* In the Latin it is in scrij 
librorum consistit. [11] In the De Augm. the story of the pric 
omitted and another substituted of a proposed emendation of a pa< 
in Tacitus, Hist. i. 66. [lb.] As the priest : I am afraid that i 
must share the fate of many other good stories, when their genuini 
is put to the test. The Vulgate rendering of the passage in questi 
in sporta and not per sportam, a reading which leaves no room foi 
point of the story as Bacon tells it. Nor, so far as I can ascerta 
per sportam to be found in any Latin version. [12] Acts ix. 25. 
as it hath been wisely noted : Lat. quod nonnemo prudenter notavit, 
Lat. Ad Pcedagogicam quod attinet, brevissimum foret dietu, consule se 
Jesuitarum : nihil eniiUf quod in usum venit, his melius. Bacon has ah 
(p. 21) expressed his appreciation of the services rendered by the J< 
to education. 

P. 183. [6] courses : Mr. Spedding conjectures * cases.' [7] See 1 
xxxviii. p. 159: * Hee that seeketh victory over his nature, let hin 
set himselfe too great, nor too small tasks : for the first will make 
delected by often faylings ; and the second vnll make him a small 
ceeder, though by often prevailings. And at the first, let him pn 
with helps, as swimmers doe with bladders, or rushes : but after a 
let him practise with disadvantages, as dancers doe with thick sh 
For it breeds great perfection, if the practise be harder then the 
[1 3] See Essay 1. p. 205 : * So if a mans wit be wandring, let him s 
the mathematicks ; for in demonstrations, if his wit be called : 
never so little, he must begin again.' [25] Cicero, de Orat. i. 33. C 
Essay xxxviii. p. 160 : * Let not a man force a habit upon himselfe, 
a perpetuall continuance, but with some intermission. For botl 
pause reinforceth the new onset ; and if a man, that is not perfec 
ever in practise, he shall as well practise his erronrs, as his abtl 



BOOK II. 



3^5 



induce one habite of both: and there is no meanes to helpe this, but 
«asonable intermissions.* [33] and as it was noted : by Machiavelli, 
:. sopra Livio, i. 19. 

-. 184. [33 was : Observe the construction, the whole of the previous 

ise being the nominative. Or else we have here another instance of 

ommon error, by which the verb is made to agree in number with 

last substantive which precedes. [loj Tac. Ann. i. 16-22, quoted 

n memory. In the Latin Bacon strongly recommends acting as a 

nch of education, for though of ill repute as a profession yet as a 

t of training it is one of the best. In this he fortifies himself by the 

irtice of the Jesuit schools. [15] mutiners, i.e. mutineers, the old 

I of spelling in Bacon's time. Compare planners for pioneers (p. 1 1 1) 

d. 1605. In Shakespeare's Temp. iii. 2. 41 the word is spelt muti- 

re in the first folio, but in Coriol. i. i. 254 it is mutiners as here. 

P. 185. [13] that he were like to use: i. e. that he might be likely to 

t. [16] had been to handle ; We should now use the verb * to have * 

i of the verb • to be' in this idiom. But the latter was formerly 

mon. See Shakespeare, Mer. of Ven. i. i, 5 : 

* But how I caught it, found it, or came by it, 
What stuff *tis made of, whereof it is bom, 
/ am to learn* 

37] De Augm. vii. I. [29] Prov. iv. 23. 

P. 186. [10] they pass it over altogether : Another instance of the 
edundance of the pronoim, as in p. 20, 1. 27. [12] by habit and not by 
ature: See Aristotle, Eth. Nic. ii. i. [13] Arist. Eth. Nic. x. 10. [27] 
eneca, Ep. ad Lucil. 52. § 14. [33] Demosthenes, Olyn. ii. 8. 
P. 187. [10] Virg. Georg. iii. 289. [29] were as the heathen divinity: 
jit qtuB ethnicis insiar theologies erant, [30] Aristotle, Eth. Nic. i. 10 ; 
ihsL ii. 12. 

P. 188. [3] than was: Lat. quam cujus ilia esset capax. [4] Seneca, 
Ep. ad Lucil. 53. § 12, quoted again in Essay v. p. 16: *It is true 
greatnesse, to have in one, the frailty of a man, and the security of a 
god.* [18] their triplicity of good: the threefold division of good as it 
relates to mind, body, and estate. Aristotle, Eth. Nic. i. 8. 2. The 
comparison between a contemplative and an active life : See Arist. Eth. 
Nic. X. 6-8. [21] honesty and profit: Arist. Rhet. i. 6. [lb.] balanc- 
ing of virtue with virtue : Arist. Eth. Nic. iii. iv. 

P. 189. [12] rather than to suffer : We should say * rather than suffer.' 
[21] being in commission of purveyance for a famine; i.e. being com- 
missioned to make provision for a famine. [25] Plutarch, Pomp. c. 50. 
[33] St. Paul in Rom. ix. 3, and Moses in Exod. xxxii. 32. Comp. Ess. 
riii. p. 50 : * But above all, if he have St. Pauls perfection, that he would 
wish to be an anathema from Christ, for the salvation of his brethren. 



3l6 NOTES. 

it shewes much of a divine nature, and a kinde of conformity wil 
himselfe.' 

P. 190. [i] anathematized: • anathemized * in ed. 1605, con 
Errata. [15] The story is told by Cicero (Tusc. Disp. v. 3) froi 
elides Ponticus of Leo tyrant of Phlius, not of Hiero. See I 
Vita Pythag. xii. 58. [21] this theatre of man's life, &c.: 1 i 
is to Gen. i. where after each of the six days* work • God sav 
was good/ Compare Essay xi. p. 40: • For if a man, can be pai 
Gods theater, he shall likewise be partaker of Gods rest* 
cxvi. 15. [27] simple: So ed. 1605; the editions of 1639, it 
* simply.* [30] or taking : Some copies of ed. 1605 have * or in 
others 'and in taking:' in the Errata to ed. 1605 ^c readin 
taking,* and this is adopted in edd. 1629, 1633. [31] Ex. xxiii. 

P. 191. [i] Gen. V. 24. [2] Jude 14. The apocryphal Book c 
was brought from Abyssinia by Bruce, and translated into En 
Abp. Laurence. [4] knoweth it not: Some copies of ed. i( 
' knoweth it, decideth it not.* The Latin has nescit earn eerte T 
The compositor's eye had been caught by the following line. [ 
the Stoic, who diedB.c. 263. [10] the Cyrenaics: founded by 
pus of Cyrene, who flourished b.o. 366. Their doctrines termi 
Epicureanism. [15] Lat. nee minus illam alteram Epicuri schoU 
reformatam, [19] Comp. Ovid, Met i. 107: 

• Ver erat setemum, placidique tepentibus anris 
Mulcebant zephyri natos sine semine flores.' 

[20] and Herillus: Lat. denique et illam explosam Pyrrhoms « 
scholam, Herillus of Carthage flourished about b.c. 364, Cic 
iv. 14. [24] revived: Some copies of ed. 1605 read 'receuet 
Epictetus, Enchir. 1-7. 

P. 192. [2] Consalvo: Fernandez Consalvo, or Gonsalvo, of < 
the Great Captain. This story is told by Guicciardini, Hi 
[3, 4] he had rather die .. than to have: Observe the loosene 
construction. See p. 189, 1. 12. [5] leader: So edd. 1629 a 
and some copies of ed. 1605 ; others have * reader.' Lat dux e 
tor, [6] hath signed : * to sign to * a document is to attest it b; 
one's signature, and hence to attest generally. [lb.] Prov. xv. ] 
Aristotle, Rhet. i. 5. § 10. [24] Mr. Ellis has shown that this 
opinion of Aristippus and not of Diogenes. Diog. Laert. ArisI 
TO KpanTv Koi /i^ ^TTcLaOai i^Sovuv dpiffrbv^ ov t6 fi^ XPV^^' 
xov Koi dirixov was the maxim of Epictetus. [26] refrain: t 
rein in, as it were ; a figure from horsemanship. [29] want ol 
tion : Lat. ineptitudinem ad morigerandum. Mr. Spedding rightly 
it as • want of compliance or accommodation.' 

P. 193. [i] This saying of Cons^vo is quoted again in £ 



BOOK II. 317 

I Apoph. 180; and in the Speech against Duels (pp. 28, 29. 
See note on the Essay. [4] De Augm. vii. 2. [8] Plautus, 
2. 14, Condus promus sum procurator pent. Baret (Alvearie) 
[e that hath the keeping of a storehouse, or drie larder : also a 
romus.' And *A Steward, or he that keepeth the store of 

Condus/ Bacon in this passage evidently regards condus as 

who collected the stores, and promus the one who dispensed 
called quia promit quod conditum est, [ii, 12] whereof the 
neth to be the worthier : In the Latin this is expanded ; Atque 
or, qui Activus est et veluti Promus ^ potentior videtur et dignior; 

prior, qui Passivus est et veluti Condus, inferior censeri potest. 

30C. 35. [17] but esteemeth, i. e. but he esteemeth. [23] the 
Lt. securitas et mora, [24] Seneca, Nat. Qusest. ii. 59. § 7. 
. xxvii. I. [28] Rev. xiv. 13. [32] Sen. Ep. x. i. § 6, quoted 
isay ii. with slight variations from the original, 'eadem feceris,' 
1 idem facias,' and * fortis aut miser aut prudens * for * prudens 
ut miser.' 
. [6] By Seneca, Ep. 95. § 46: Vita sine proposito vaga est, 

*and' ed. 1605; *any' is the reading of 1629, 1633. [8] 
1 some case it hath an incidence into it : Lat. quamquam 
im ambo coincidant, [13] gigantine : i.e. seditious, rebel- 

the giants who warred against the gods. See p. 103, and 

[16] Sylla's epitaph, written by himself, was this, — *That no 
euer passe him, neither in doing good to his friends, nor in 
schiefe to his enemies.* North's Plutarch, p. 488 (ed. 163 1). 
p. 240, 1. 30. [19] active good; Lat. bonum activum indivi- 
em apparens. [20] See p. 189. [23] For let us take., and 
Emitted in the Latin. [33] multiplying and extending their 
n other things : The ed. of 1605 has * multipljdng their fourm 
ding upon other things.* 

[6] in state : Lat. in suo statu. [9] Virg. ^n. vi. 730. [30] 
y : * by the equality,' ed. 1605, corrected in the Errata. [31] 
ils * in some copies of ed. 1605. 

[4] See Plato, Gorgias, i. 462, 494. [19-20] Compare what 
rs in Essay xix. p. 76 ; * That the minde of man is more cheared, 
hed, by profiting in small things, then by standing at a stay in 

27] Plutarch, Solon. 7. Again quoted by Bacon in Cogit. de 

frag. 3 (Works iii. 197). [31] Comp. Essay ii. p. 6: * Certainly, 
is bestowed too much cost upon death, and by their great pre- 
made it appeare more fearefull.* 

[4] Juv. Sat. X. 358 ; quoted again in Ess. ii. p. 7. The true 

spatium {or Jinem. [10-16] For as . . . life : Omitted in th^ 

[22] Comp. Ess. xlviii. p. 200; 'For lookers on, many times, 



JlS NOTES. 

see more then gamesters : and the vale best discovereth the hill' 
of active marter : i. e. concerning subjects of active life. [29] The I 
is told bv Cicero. De Orat. ii. iS. 7:;. 

P. 199. [4] The Basilicon Doron, written by King James for tin 
struction of his eldest son, Prince Henry, and published in 1603. 
in three books : the first, * Of a kings Christian dutie towards G 
the second. 'Of a kings dutie in his office;* and the third, *Ofak 
behaviour in indifferent things.* [9] not sick of dizziness: Lat 
verfigitte cdiqtiando corrifitur. The edition of 1605 has 'Dosine 
which is corrupted to *£usinesse* in the editions of 1629 and i 
[ill nor of convulsions . . impertinent : Lat. non digresstonilms distrak 
tU ilia ju<£ nihil c.d rhomhum sunt exfatiatione alijua fitxuosa cotnpUeta 
[23"' a great cause of judicature: Mr. Spedding says, 'Probably ii 
case of Sir Frar.cis Goodwin, in 1604, when the question was whethe 
belonged to the House of Commons or the Court of Chancery toji 
of the valicity of an election.' [2S] The title of this work of king Jii 
is • The True Lawe of Free Monarchies, or the i-eciprock and mnt 
dutie bet'Aixt a free king, and his naturall subiects/ It was 1 
published anor.\-mously in 1603, and was afterwards included in 
collected ecirion of the king's works published in 16 16. 1 

P. 3CO. "lo" In the De Augm, Bacon quotes the example of Pliny ttl 
vounger in his panegjTic on Trajan. [14^ part: *partie* in ed. i( 
corrected in Errata, ^^rl Prov. xiv. 6. [30] Comp Shakespeare, C) 
beline, iL 4. lo; : 

*It is a hasCisk unto mine eye, 
Kills me to look on't.* 

'x2^ which ..they leese: Ar.other example of the redundance of t 

oroaoun. See note 0.1 p. 21. 1. 26, 
?. 2CI. \--^' Ccn:p. F.iccn. Meditationes Sacnc, 3. [16] Pro 

v^. i. quotevl frcr.1 the Vulgate. TiS] for construction, sec p. 52, 1. 9. 
-•:" Lucius Brutus: See Livy, bk. ii. 5. ^35" Virg. -In. vL S23: /acit 
. . .„ - is -ie tn:e reaiL-.g, but the latter is also found in the De Aup 

- .-; ":' Tr.is difciiss:?? is re'rited by Plutarch, Bmtiis, xil 2. [il] 
,^issp<^.'*'t\ Mer. of Yen. iv. i. 216: 

^ great right, do a little wrong/ 

ite Pr.Tcerta. 24: Prxcepta Genmd. Reip. 24: 
Oj De Augm. vli. 3. '26] Aristotle, MagiL 

Mnrsena, 3c. § 62. 76] Seneca, £p. 71. i >• 

n. ii. 6. '13. T 4] Lat. aHamen pkilosopkmm 

p.c rtiipi insfar ancilla fntdaUu tipidiutftB 



BOOK 11, 319 

fts, qu€B ad otnnes ejus nutus prcBsto sit et ministret, quid prohibeatf [15] 
cxxiii. 2. [20] as it may yield of herself: Observe that the neuter 
xive pronoun * itself* had not come generally into use. [24] — 204. 
the rather . . extant : Instead of this the Latin has only, Earn igitur, 
more nostra, cum inter desiderata coUocemus, aliqua ex parte adum- 

inmus. 

?. 204. [7] the husbandman canno/ command, neither ^ &c. : Observe 
double negative, as in Shakespeare, Mer. of Ven. iii. 4. 11: 

• I never did repent for doing good, 
Nor shall not now.* 

] without our command: i.e. beyond our control. [12-26] For to 

basis ..apply: Altered in the Latin. [16] Virg. ^n. v. 710, 

peranda omnis fortuna ferendo est.' [23] properly : * property ' in 

1605, corrected to * properly' in the Errata and in ed. 1629, 

r*. 205. [2-31] wherein .. malignity: Omitted in the Latin. [6] Aris- 

le, Eth. Nic. iv. 7. [10] to few : Mr. Spedding conjectures that we 

old read * to intend few.* [18] Virg. ^n. i. 22. [20] See Ex. xxxiv. 

[21] Aristotle, Eth. Nic. iv. 6. [30] properly: This is the reading 

edd. 1605, 1629, 1633, but Mr. Spedding alters it to * property,* as in 

204, 1. 23. 

P. 206. [2] Lat. cum utrique scientia clarissimum luminisjuhar affundere 

sit. [6] These different dispositions are arranged according to the 

anets which are supposed to predominate over them : Saturn, Jupiter, 

lars, the Sun, Venus, Mercury, and the Moon. Comp. p. 43: 'Saturn, 

le planet of rest and contemplation, and Jupiter, the planet of civil 

adety and action.' [6] Compare Bacon's Letter to Lord Burghley 

[ife and Letters, i. 108) : * not as a man bom under Sol, that loveth 

onour ; nor under Jupiter, that loveth business (for the contemplative 

lanet carrieth me away wholly).' [8-23] A man shall find ..use of 

: This is entirely omitted in the Latin, and another paragraph sub- 

iiuted which is partly made up of a sentence previously omitted (p. 203, 

. 24-28), and of a passage of some length in which Bacon points to 

ne wiser historians as the source from which to gather materials for 

his treatise on the several characters of natures and dispositions. [9] ' 

."or some of these * relations * see Ranke's History of the Popes, App. 

\h 5. 6 (trans. Foster). [16] is: *as' in edd. 1605, 1629, 1633. [21] 

posies : * poesies ' is the spelling of ed. 1605. [26] by the region : Lat. 

potria. [32] Plautus, Miles Gloriosus, iii. i. 40. 

P. 207. [4] Tit. i. 12, 13, quoting from Epimenides. [6] Sallust, 
Bell, Jug. 113. This is quoted again in Essay xix. p. 77, and there 
attributed to Tacitus : * For it is common with princes, (saith Tacitus) 
to will contradictories. Sunt plerumque regum voluntates vehementes, 
If inter se contraria. For it is the solsecisme of power, to thinke to 



3i8 



NOTBi 



>< 



see more then gamesters : and the vale 1 
of active matter : i. e. concerning subject 
is told by Cicero, De Orat. ii. i8. 75. 

P. 199. [4] The Basilicon Doron, wri 
struction of his eldest son, Prince Henr 
in three books : the first, * Of a kings 
the second, • Of a kings dutie in his o) 
behaviour in indifferent things/ [9] 
vertigine aliquando eorripitur. The ed 
which is corrupted to *Businesse* in 1 
[11] nor of convulsions . . impertinent : ] 
ut ilia qucB nihil ad rhombum sunt expattai 
[23] a great cause of judicature : Mr. 
case of Sir Francis Goodwin, in 1604, w 
belonged to the House of Commons or 
of the validity of an election.* [28] The 
is * The True Lawe of Free Monarchic 
dutie betwixt a free king, and his n 
published anonymously in 1603, and 
collected edition of the king's works pu" 

P. 200. [10] In the De Augm. Bacor 
younger in his panegyric on Trajan, 
corrected in Errata. [25] Prov. xiv. 6. 
beline, ii. 4. 107 : 

*It is a basilisk ur 
Kills me to lool' 

[32] which., they leese: Another ( 
pronoim. See note on p. 21, 1. 26. 

P. 201. [2-17] Comp. Bacon, J 
xviii. 2, quoted from the Vulgate. 
[30] Lucius Brutus : See Livy, bk. 
for fai^J^jjft true reading, but th( 
mea t 

P.^H * ^•tjdiscussion is n 
ComlVy. <A|fer. of Yen 




[T2] Plut^ 
Bacon, ApH 
Mor. L I. 

P. ao3. [3]V m 

[9] Hippocran. ^ 

moraUm in/ti^ 



320 NOTES. 

command the end, and yet not to endure the meane.* [9] Tadtia^ 
Hist. i. 50; quoted again in Essay xi. p. 42. [11] Pindar, 01)m:i, L 55. 
of Tantalus : Karaviif/ai fiiyav okfiov ovk kSwdaOij, [14] Ps. bdi. Vk 
[17] Arist. Rhet. ii. 13-17. [28] it is in order: i.e. the order is. 

P. 208. [i] politiques: *in politiques/ ed. 1605, corrected in Emlfti 
and in edd. 1629, 1633. [2] Solon, Fr. i. 8 (ed. Craisford), referring 
Pisistratus. See Bacon's Apoph. 232, and Cicero, Pro Cluentio, , 
Solon's lines are : 

*E£ iySfuuv Si Q&Kaaaa Tapd<r<T€Taif ^ ti rit avMj^ 

M^ icivy ir6yTajv ktrrl biKaiorcLTij, 
*Ay5pSjv 8' €ic fji€yd\(uv irSXis oWvtcu «. r. X. ! 

[12] affections, which /s, &c. ; for * which are, &c.* in modem usage, 
is not necessary to suppose that this is a mistake of Bacon's. The soi 
stantive verb is frequently found to agree with the subject which folloi 
it, as in Chaucer (Cant. Tales, 1. 14625), * Peter! it am I* See ab 
p. 226, 1. 22, and Shakespeare, Rich. II. v. 5. 55, 56: 

* Now sir, the sound that tells what hour it is 
Are clamorous groans.* 

[13] Aristotle, Rhet. ii. i-ii. Comp. Eth. Nic. ii 4. I. [19] Fort 
repetition of the negative see note on p. 142, 1. 23. [29] Plutarch a 
Seneca wrote on Anger, and Plutarch has treatises of comfort npn 
adverse accidents (addressed to his wife and to ApoUonius), and 
tenderness of coimtenance (ircpl bvtTomicLi) or bashfulness. Seneca to 
has a dialogue de ConsolaHone, [30] of comfort upon adverse acdde 
Omitted in Lat 

P. 209. [2] and how again contained from act and forfher desfree 
i.e. how restrained from leading to actions and reaching a g 
height. [4] how they gather and fortify: Omitted in the Latin, n* 
prcemium and pcena : The doctrine of rewards and punishments is fiux 
to the readers of Butler's Analogy. [25] these as they have determiii 
use in moralities : Lat. Jubc enim sunt ilia qua regnant in mora&mf. 
From which Mr. Spedding conjectures we should read ' these art tficy 
&c.' [37] described: Perhaps we should read * prescribed.* [38] senre: 
•seeme' in ed. 1605, corrected in Errata. [30] insist: 'visit' in ci 
1605, corrected in Errata and in edd. 1629, 1633. 

P. 210. [i] Aristotle, Eth. Nic. ii. i. a. [22] as there is: We should 
now say, 'as there are,* but Bacon uses * there is* like the Fr. UyA 
[26] diffident: * different' in ed. 1605, corrected in Errata and in edi 
1629, 1633. [29] ^ ^^ ^^^* *^^ ^^ ^^^* ^ ^ 1605, coixected ia 
Errata. 

P. 211. [3] the knots and stonds of the mind: Lat nodo§ utoii f i* 
animi. [4] the more easy : * the more easily * in ed. 1605, corrected is 
Errata and edd. of 1629, 1633. ^^- Spedding says, 'Possibly BaooB 



BOOK //. 321 

wrote run more easily. The translation has facile et placide delabentur' 
[5] Aristotle, Eth. Nic. ii. 9. 5. [9] bending: So ed. 1633; *bynding* 
ed. 1605 ; * binding* ed. 1629. [24] St. Augustine (Confess, i. 16) calls 
Doetry vinum erroris ab ebriis doctoribus propinatum^ and Jerome, in one 
if his letters to Damasus (£p. 146), says, DcBmonum cibus est carmina 
'oetarum. Both these quotations are combined in one passage by Cor- 
lelius Agrippa, De Incert. &c. c. 4, and hence Bacon may have com- 
pounded the phrase vinum dcBmonum^ which he uses again in Essay i. 
p. 2 : * One of the fathers, in great severity, called poesie vinum dcemo- 
turn; because it filleth the imagination, and yet it is, but with the 
hadow of a lie.* [28] Aristotle, Eth. Nic. i. 3. 5. Mr. Ellis, in his 
lote on the corresponding passage of the De Augmentis, points out 
hat • Aristotle, however, speaks not of moral but of political philosophy, 
t is interesting to observe that the error of the text, which occurs also 
Q the Advancement of Learning, has been followed by Shakespeare in 
froilus and Cressida : 

" Not much 
Unlike young men, whom Aristotle thought 
Unfit to hear moral philosophy.** 

Sec Hector's speech in the second scene of the second act.* Mr. Sped- 
ding has shown that the same error is committed by Virgilio Malvezzi 
in his Discorsi sopra Comelio Tacito. 

P. 212. [12] Seneca, Here. Furens, 251. [13] Juvenal, Sat. xiii. 105. 
[16] Machiavelli, Disc. i. 10. [24] incompatible: Lat. insociabiles, 
[lb.] Cicero, Pro Mursena, xxix. 61. [31] See p. 209,1. 22-25. 

P. 213. [15] as was said : See p. 203. 

P. 214. [8] Which state of mind: i.e. With regard to, or concerning 
which state of mind. [10] Aristotle, Eth. Nic. vii. i. i. [17] Pliny, 
Paneg. c 74. Pro nobis ipsis guidem hcBc fuit summa votorum, ut not sie 
amarent dii quomodo tu. This panegyric was not a funeral oration, as 
Bacon describes it, but was delivered at the beginning of the reign of 
Trajan, who survived Pliny. [25] Col. iii. 14. [26] as : Omitted in ed. 
1605, but inserted in the Errata and edd. 1629, 1633. [27] Menander: 
'Not Menander, but Anaxandrides.* (Ellis.) See Meineke Graec. Com. 
Frag. iii. 199 : 

ipoae aotpiffTOv yiyvtrai biddff/cakos 

CKOiov ttoKh KpfiTTajv irpbi rbv dtyOfninrojv filov. 

Compare Dryden*s Cymon and Iphigenia. 

P- 315' [5] Xenophon, Symp. i. 10. [11] See Nov. Org. praef. [12] 
transgressed: Ijai. prcsvaricati sunt, [13] Is. xiv. 14. [14] Gren. iii. 5. 
[18] Matt. v. 44; Luke vi. 27, 28. [24] Ps. cxlv. 9. [27] concerning 
the culture and regiment of the mind : Lat. de Georgicis animi. [3 3 J 
Demosthenes, De Falsa Legatione, p. 355. This story is omitted in the 

Y 



^22 NOTES, 

Latin, and is made use of by Bacon (Nov. Org. i. 123) for illustratin| 
the difference between his own philosophy, which he compares to wine 
and the philosophy which was current in his time. 

P. 216. [4] Virg. ^n. vi. 894. [18] See p. 133, 1. 21. [19] inquired 
in rational and moral knowledges : i. e. investigated with reference tc 
what is known in reason and morals. Lat. sijuxta moralis doctriiuB loM 
illud contemplemttr, [22] agile: 'agill' in edd. 1605, 1629, 1633. Tin 
same spelling is found in the early quartos of Shakespeare, Romeo and 
Juliet, iii. i. 162. [24] easy: * easilye * in ed. 1605 ; •easie,' edd. 1629, 
1633* [28, 29] which have neither strength of honesty, nor sabstaooc 
of sufficiency : Lat. illis tamen non suppetit out prohitas anhni ttt ffdiiU mA 
vires ut possint recte agere, * Sufficiency ' is here used in the sense o( 
* capacity,' * ability,' as in 2 Cor. iii. 5, ix. 8, and in Bacon, Essay Iv. 
p. 221 ; ' such as have great places under princes, and execute their j^aoes 
with sufficiency* [30] that can neither become themselves: i.e. who 
can neither act gracefully. Lat. qui tamen nee sibi ipsis omamenio ataii, 
[31] And those in whom this conjunction is found, he adds in the Latin, 
are men endued with a kind of stoic gloom and insensibility, who do the 
deeds of virtue but enjoy none of its pleasures. [33] reduced to stupid: 
i. e. rendered stupid. Compare ' leaveth it for suspect,* p. 81, L 12. Mr. 
Kitchin suggests stupidity or stupor, 

P. 217. [3] De Augm. viii. i. [6] Plutarch, Cato, 8. [7] a man 
were better : i. e. might better, which is the reading of some modein 
editions. [8, 9] if you could get but some few go right : i. e. to go 
right. See Abbott's Shakespeare Grammar, § 349. [i6] 2 Chron. xx. 33, 
of the kingdom of Judah under Jehoshaphat. The early editions have 
dixerat for direxerat, but the latter is the correct reading of the De Aug* 
mentis. [20] Gen. xl. [23, 24] These respects . . . knowledge: Insteid 
of this sentence the Latin has, Hoe denique Etkicam gravat, Polidca otf- 
currit. [28] comfort, use, and protection : The Latin explains these as 
comfort against solitude, assistance in business, and protection against 
injuries. 

P. 218. [2] In the Latin, the value of conversation is compared to 
that of action in oratory. [3] Ovid, De Arte Amat ii. 312. [fi] 
Quintus Cicero, in his book De Petitione Consulatus (xL 44), says: 
Curaque ut aditus ad te diumi noctumique paieant; neque solum Jar^ 
cedium tuarum sed etiam vultu ac fronte qucB est animi jamta; qutt » 
signijicat voluntatem abditam esse ac retrusam, parvi refert patere os/lw* 
[10] Cicero, Ep. ad Att. ix. 12. [11] the war depending: Lat Wfe 
adhuc fervente. [17] Livy, xxiii. 12: Si reticeam aut superbus aMttk- 
noxius videar, &c. [23] affectation: * affection* in edL 1605; oonccted 
in Errata and edd. 1629, 1633. [lb.] Quid deformus, &c See An- 
titheta, xxxiv. [31] form: *howr* in ed. 1605, corrected to'fonnne* 
in Errata: 'forme' is the reading of ed. 1629, •hour' of ed. 1633. 



BOOK II. 323 

*. Spedding reads 'honor.* If any conjecture were necessary, 
amour' might he suggested. [Ih.] in it: *in name' ed. 1605, 
rrected in Errata and ed. 1629. Mr. Spedding conjectures that 
; true reading may be *in the same,' though he prints 'in name' 
ubtfully. 

P. 219. [6] Ecd. xi. 4, quoted again in Essay lii., 'Of Ceremonies 
d Respects* (p. 212): 'Salomon saith; He that considereth the wind, 
all not soWf and he that looketh to the clouds, shall not reape, A wise 
an will make more opportunities then he findes. Mens behaviour 

aid be like their apparell, not too strait, or point device, but free 
r exercise or motion.* The whole Essay should be read in connection 
ith this passage. [15] hath been elegantly handled: A MS. note in 
e margin of a copy of the Advancement of Learning (ed. 1605) in the 
ambridge Univ. Library is * per il Guazzo,' that is, Stefano Guazzo, 
ho wrote La Civil Conversatione in four books. The first three 
>oks were translated into English by George Pettie in 1581. Another 
lition, including a translation of the fourth book by B. Young, ap- 
ared in 1586. [20, 21] Comp. Advice to the Earl of Rutland on his 
avels: 'An authority of an English proverb, made in despite of 
aming, that the greatest clerks are not the wisest men/ (Spedding's 
etters and Life of Bacon, ii. 12.) See Montaigne, Ess. i. 24, and 
saying of Heraclitus of Ephesus, rtoKvixaQiri v6ov oh diSda/efi (Diog. 
aert. ix. i). [24] for wisdom of behaviour: i.e. with regard to 
isdom of behaviour. [30] except some few scattered advertisements : 
at. prater pauca qucedam monita civilia in fascictdum unum vel alterum 
Uecta. [33] as the other : i. e. as of the others. Lat. sicut de eateris, 
b.] with mean (i.e. moderate) experience: Lat. aliquo experientia 
uttpulo instructi, 

P. 220. [2] and outshoot them in their own bow: Lat. et proprio 
TTum {quod dicitur) arcu usi magis e longinquo ferirent. Bacon uses 
e same expression in Essay Iv. p. 220. [9] Cicero, De Orat. iii. 33. 

133, 134. [lb.] it was then in use: i.e. in the times of which he 
IS writing, a little before his own. Lat. paulo ante sua seeula. [1 2] 

the Place: Lat. in for o. [20] cases: So in ed. 1605; 'causes' in 
, 1629, 1633. Lat. in casibus particularibus. [21] ca^es: * causes* 

edd. 1605, 1629, 1633. Lat. casuum eonsimilium. Perhaps we 
ould read 'cases' in both mstances. [22] Q. Cicero: 'Q.* is omitted 

ed. 1605, but added in the Errata, and in edd. 1629, 1633. [24] 
Ellis adds Frontinus*s tract De Aquaductibus. [31] i Kings 
. 29. 

P. 221. [3] The number of examples in the De Augmentis is in- 
■eased to thirty-four, which are arranged in a different order and 
iscussed at much greater length. The 14th and 21st in the Advance- 
ment are omitted altogether in the De Augmentis. The quotations, 

Y 2 



324 • NOTES. 

except that on p. 234, 1. i, are from the Vulgate, which will be fonnd 
in many cases to differ materially from the English Version. [4] 
Eccl. vii. 21. [6] commended: 'concluded* in ed. 1605, corrected 
in Errata. [8] Plutarch, Pomp. 20; Sert. 27. [10] Prov. ttjt. 9. 
[17] Prov. xxix. 21. [21] Prov. xxii. 29. [26] Eccl. iv. 15. [iS] 
Plirtarch, Pomp. xiv. 2; Tacitus, Ann. vi. 46. Quoted again in Essay 
xxvii. p. 108: 'For when he had carried the consulship for a frend 
of his, against the pursuit of Sylla, and that Sylla did a little resent 
thereat, and began to speake great, Pompey turned upon him againe, 
and in effect bad him be quiet; For that more men adored thi suuu 
rising f then ike sunne setting.* [31] Eccl. x. 4. 

P. 222. [4] Eccl. ix. 14, 15. [lb.] et pauci: *et* is omitted in cd. 
i6o5' [5] vallavit: the true reading, but vadavit is in the old editions 
and in the De Augmentis. [9] corruption: So in edd. 1629, 1633: 
* corruptions* in ed. 1605. [ii] Prov. xv. i. [14] Prov. xv. 19. 
[16] deferred: *dififerred* in ed. 1605. [19] Ecd. vii. 8. [20] about 
prefaces and inducements: Lat. de sermonum suorum aditu atqut m- 
gressu. [23] Prov. xxviii. 21. [25] Compare Essay xi. p. 42: 'As 
for facilitie; it is worse then bribery. For bribes come but now 
and then ; but if importimitie, or idle respects lead a man, he shall 
never be without. As Salomon saith ; To respect persons, is not good; 
for such a man will transgresse for a peece of breads [26] lightly: so 
in ed. 1605; 'highly* in edd. 1629, 1633. [28] Prov. xxviii. 3. [3>] 
Prov. XXV. 26. Comp. Essay Ivi. p. 222: *One foule sentence doA 
more hurt, then many foule examples. For these doe but cornipt 
the streame ; the other corrupteth the foimtaine.' 

P. 223. [4] Prov. xxviii. 24. Omitted in the Latin. [10] Prof, 
xxii. 24. [15] Prov. xi. 29. [20] Prov. x. i ; quoted again in Essay 
vii. p. 24. [25] Prov. xvii. 9. [30] Prov. xiv. 23. [32] abomideth: 
So in ed. 1605. Compare Shakespeare, Rich. II. ii. i. 258 : 

'Reproach and dissolution hangeth over him.' 

P. 224. [i] Prov. xviii. 17. [3] in sort: So in ed. 1605; 'in such 
sort,' edd. 1629, 1633. [6] Prov. xviii. 8. Omitted in the Latin. [7] 
Here: 'there* in edd. 1605, 1629, 1633. [11] Prov. ix. 7. [lb-] 
sibi: *tibi* in some copies of ed. 1605. [12] general: 'gerit* in ed. 
1605, corrected in Errata. [16] Prov. ix. 9. [21] Prov. xxvii ip" 
[26] Ovid, De Art. Am. i. 760. [29] — p. 225. [7] led with a desire..* 
examples : The Latin has only, dignitate et ret ipsius et authoris Umpn* 
provecti. • 

P. 225. [3] more of the eagle : In Mr. Ellis's copy of Montagu's eA 
of Bacon I find the following MS. note : * More of the eagle — that isi 
more of a mystical and recondite character. The allusion is to the 
eagle as the symbol of S. John, and to the character of his goq)d* 



BOOK II. 35^5 

vn, the four beasts in Ezechiel are taken by S. Jerome to 
{. evangelists.' [6] deducements : 'diducements' in ed. 1605. 
ables: Lat. quod ad Jahulas, [17] of negotiation and 

Lat. de negotiis et oceasionibus sparsis, [18] See p. 97. 

*manye' in ed. 1605, corrected to 'may' in the Errata. 

2s of ed. 1605 have 'maye.' [30] action: 'gaine' in ed. 

tcted in Errata and edd. 1629, 1633. Mr. Spedding con- 

te, 

3] histories: So all the old editions. We should probably 

'■y-* [5] because it is : The edd. of 1605, 1629, 1633 have 

The reading of the text is from the Errata to ed. 1605. 

y mends the passage thus : ' so history of lives is the most 

discourse of business, /or discourse of business is more con- 
private actions.' Mr. Spedding prints, ' so histories of Lives 
t proper for discourse of business, as more conversant in 
ions.' In the text of ed. 1605 the passage stands thus: 
ies of Liues is the moste proper for (Uscourse of businesse 
^nversante in priuate actions.' [9] great: Mr. Spedding 

'nearer.* Perhaps 'greater' may be the true reading, ed. 
ig *greate.* The Latin is, epistola magis in proximo et ad 
tia sclent reprcBsentare, [12] of this part of civil knowledge, 
gotiation : Lat. portionis prinuB doctrina de negotiis, qwe tractat 
parsas. [14, &c.] Read with this passage Essay zziii., * Of 
for a Mans Selfe.' [22] like ants, which is &c. : For the 
1 compare 1. 4 above, and p. 208, 1. 12. Perhaps we should 
an ant, which is &c.' Comp. Ess. xxiii. p. 96: 'An ant 
eature for it selfe ; but it is a shrewd thing, in an orchard, 
[24] Plautus, Trinummus, ii. 2. 82. [a6] This proverb 
iscribed to Appius Claudius. See the treatise De RepubL 

formerly attributed to Sallust. Both this and the following 
re repeated in Essay xl. * Of Fortune.' [27] Livy y^gi-g. 40. 
^ith this paragraph Essay xl. 

3] Plutarch, Sylla, vi. 5. [7] Ezdc. xxix. 3. [8] Hab. i. 
The Latin adds de contemptore Deum Mezentio, [11] Virg. 
5. [lb.] missile: * inutile^ in ed. 1605, but corrected in 
2] The Latin adds another story of Julius Caesar from 
Juetonius, c. 77. [16] Plutarch, Sylla, vi. 5. [18] Plutarch, 
8. [19] positions: L&t sententi<E, [20] Sapiens dommabitur 
. Ellis says, *This sentence is ascribed to Ptolemy by 

Compare Albumazar, i. 7 : 
, th' Egyptian Ptolomy the wise 
inc'd it as an oracle of truth, sapiens dommabitur astris' 

virtuti &c. : Ovid, Met. ziv. 113. [29] SuetoniuB, Octay. 



326 



NOTES. 



P. 228. [13] because pragmatical men, &c. : i.e. in order that, 
[20] the globe of crystal : See p. 249, 1. 9. [32] Lucian, Hermo 
20. The story is again alluded to in Essay xlv. p. 180. 

P. 229. [9] Virg. iEn. iv. 423. [20, 21] For an explanation of 
terms major and minor propositions in a syllogism, see Fow 
Deductive Logic, ch. iii. p. 81. [25] Prov. xx. 5. [31] Na<^€ 
/lifivaff* dmffTetVf ^pa ravra tSjv <pp€vSiv, a saying of Epichar 
quoted by Cicero, Epist. ad Att. i. 19. 8, and again by Q. Cic 
De Petit. Cons. x. 39 : * quamobrem *Emxapf*fiov illud teneto, nei 
atque artus esse sapientise, non temere credere.* [32] Comp. Ess 
p. 20 : * For the discovery, of a mans selfe, by the tracts of his count 
ance, is a great weaknesse, and betra3dng: by how much, it is m 
times, more marked and beleeved, then a mans words.* 

P. 230. [3] Juv. ii. 8. [6] Q. Cicero, De Petit. Consul, xi. 44. 
Tacitus, Ann. i. 12. [13] Tacitus, Ann. i. 52. [18] Tacitus, Ann 
31. [26] This paragraph and the following (* As for words . . . iint 
are transposed in the Latin. [28] Livy, xxviii. 4a. [29] Mr. I 
quotes the Italian proverb : 

' Chi mi fa piii caresse che non suole 
O m'a ingannato, o ingannar mi vuole.' 

[32] For small favours, &c.: i. e. As for small favours, &c. 

P. 231. [i] Demosthenes, Olynth. iii. 33, Wolfs Latin translat 
See Ellis's note on De Augm. vi. 3 (vol. i. p. 681). Compare ' 
Colours of Good and Evil, 10. p. 265 (ed. W. A. Wright): *As w 
Demosthenes reprehended the people for harkning to the conditi 
offered by King Phillip, bemg not honorable nor equall, he saith t 
were but aliments of their sloth and weakenes, which if they y 
taken away, necessitie woulde teach them stronger resolutions.* 
are: See note on p. 126, 1. 14. [6] Tacitus, Hist iv. 39. [10] ] 
sunt quidem ilia (ut de urinis loquuntur medict) meretricia, [16] Tad 
Ann. iv. 52. See Suetonius, Tib. 53. [21] Hor. Ep. i. 18. 38. | 
This proverb is again quoted in Essay vi. 'Of Simulation and '. 
simulation,* p. 21. [29] As for the knowing of men, &c. ' 
paragraph and the following are transposed in tihe Latin. [30] w< 
nesses: The reading of ed. 1633; edd. 1605 and 1629 have 'w* 
nesse.* 

P. 232. f2] or equals: Omitted in the translation. [3] Q. Cic 
De Petit. Consul, v. 17, quoted again in Essay Iv. p. 220. [10] 
ubi tanquam ordinarius resederai, [29] Prov. xxv. 3. 

P- 233. [3] Tacitus, Ann. xiv. 57. [4] rimatur: *rmaeur* in 
1605, corrected in Errata. [23] Epictetus, Enchir. c. 9, [25] In 
Latin this is more fully expressed : Et hoc volo, atqu$ etiam aiipad j 
infuturum usui esse posstt addiscere. 



BOOK II. 327 

P. 234. [i] but only: i.e. but, or only. We have an instance of 

lie same reduplication in p. 174, I. 10: *For those whose conceits 

xe seated in popular opinions, need only but to prove or dispute.* [7] 

[ 5 i 23, 24. [14] these . . . those : The ffrst referring to the nearer, 

second to the more distant antecedent. [26] Tacitus, Ann. i. 54. 

ine Latin quotes the instance of Pericles. [31] by Duke Valentine: 

Lat. a Valentino Borgia, Csesar Borgia, son of Pope Alexander VI., 

who was made Duke of the Valentinois. Guicciardini, vi. 3. If 

Bacon had lived now he might have quoted the instance of Talleyrand, 

who b^an life as an ecclesiastic, and was an Abb6 and Bishop of 

Aulun before he became the French Minister of Foreign Affairs and 

the first diplomatist in Europe. 

P. 235. [6] Plutarch, Csesar, c. 3. [12] transferred: 'transgressed* 

a edd. 1605, 1629, 1633. The Latin has, transtulit se ad artes militares 

iimperatorias ; ex quibus sumtnum rerum fastigium eonscendit. [16] all 

fhose friends and followers : The Latin adds, Antonius, Hirtius^ Pansa, 

"yppius, Balbus, Dolabella, PoUio, reliqui, [24] Cicero, Epist. ad Att. 

X. 10. [27] and pressing the fact: Lat. quique factum in omnibus 

trgeret. 

P. 236. [i i] Tacitus, Hist. ii. 80 ; quoted again in Essay liv., • Of 

Vaine-Glory,* which may be read in connection with this paragraph. 

16] Mr. Ellis suggests that * this precept seems taken from the advice 

;iven by Medius to Alexander's sycophants.* See Plutarch, De Adulat. 

it Amico, c. 24. [lb.] calumniare : * calumniari^ in ed. 1605, corrected 

in Errata. It is attributed to Machiavelli in a letter from the Earl 

>f Derby to his son (Peck's Desiderata Curiosa, lib. xi. p. 38, ed. 

'735)* Fortiter calumniare , aliquid adhcerebit. See also Bacon, Works, 

nii, 148. [25] as in military persons: Comp. Ess. liv. p. 217: 'In 

militar commanders and soldiers, vaine glory is an essentiall point; 

for as iron sharpens iron, so by glory one courage sharpneth another.* 

[28] taxing, i. e. censuring. [29] gracing, i. e. praising, complimenting. 

[31] Comp. Ess. liv. p. 217: * And those that are of solide and sober 

natures, have more of the ballast, then of the saile.* 

P. 237. [8] satiety: Spelt *saciety' in ed. 1605. [11] Rhetor, ad 
Heren. iv. 4, quoted by Mr. Ellis: Videte tie insueti rerum majorum 
videaminiy si vos parva res sicuti magna delectat, [21] their wants, 
i e. their defects. [26] Ovid, Ars Amand. ii. 662. 

P. 338. [7] that passeth this other, i. e. in impudence. [23] rescus- 
sing: So edd. 1605 and 1629 ; ed. 1633 ^^^is the modern form * rescuing.' 
See Glossary. [25] by somewhat in their person or fortune: 'Die 
Latin illustrates this by instances of deformed persons, bastards, and 
men branded with some mark of disgrace. Comp. Essay xliv., *0f 
Deformity,* p. 178: * Whosoever hath anything fixed in his person, 
Lhat doth enduce contempt, hath also a perpetuall spurre in hunselfe, 



328 NOTES. 

to rescue and deliver himself from scome: therefore all def< 
persons are extreme bold.* [27] Paragraphs 32-38 are arrang 
the Latin in the following order; 35, 32, 36, 37, 33, 34, 38. 
Cicero, Brut. 95 ; of the *- fluent and luxuriant speech * of Hortc 
See Essay xUi. p. 175. [33] livy xxxix. 40; quoted aga 
Essay xl. 

P. 239. [8] Machiavelli, Disc, sopra Livio, iii. 9. [14] Demostl 
I Phil. § 46. [21] See Aulus Gellius, i. 19; Bacon, Essay xxi. j 
Colours of Good and Evil, p. 264. [30] Lucan, viii. 485. 

P. 240. [2] from foil: i.e. from being foiled or repulsed. I 
repulsa. [3] please the most: i.e. the majority of people. L 
pauciores offendemus. [10] Demosthenes, I Phil. § 45. [18] unpe 
*vnperfite' in ed. 1605. [22] Prov. xxx. 19. [27] Comp. Essj 
p. 19: * Certainly the ablest men, that ever were, have had a 
opennesse, and francknesse of dealing ; and a name of certainty 
veracity; but then they were like horses, well mannaged; for 
could tell passing well, when to stop, or tume.* Sir H. L. B 
(Historical Characters, i. 400) says of Tallejrand: * What struc 
vulgar, and many, indeed, above the vulgar, who did not remc 
that the really crafty man disguises his craft, was the plain, 
and straightforward way in which he spoke of and dealt wit 
public matters, without any of those mysterious devices which 
tinguish the simpleton who is in the diplomacy from the state 
who is a diplomatist.* [30] Plutarch, Sylla, 38. See p. 194. 
Plutarch, Cses. xi. 2. 

P. 241. [2] Cicero, Ep. ad Att. x. 4. § 2. [6] darling: Spelt * 
ling' in ed. 1605. [7] Cicero, Ep. ad Att. xvi. 15. § 3. [10] Cae 
See p. 55, 1. 32. [lb.] and men laughed: So in ed. 1605; cdd. 
1633 ^*ve * whereat many men laughed.* [12] the like: So ed. : 
•the like to this* edd. 1629, 1633. [lb.] thought: So cdd. 1629, : 
♦though' ed. 1605. [16] Tacitus, Hist. ii. 38. [17] Sallust 
Sueton. De Claris Gram. c. 15. [27] casual: Lat. castbus obi 
[30] Compare Essay vi. p. 18: 'Dissimulation is but a faint 
of policy, or wisdome ; for it asketh a strong wit, and a strong 1 
to know when to tell truth, and to doe it. Therfore it is 
weaker sort of politicks, that are the great dissemblers.' [32] Ta 
Ann. V. I. 

P. 242. [10] but not of proportions and comparison, i. e. 
relative values of things. Lat. de pretiis vera imperitisUme. [22] C 
Bell. Civ. i. 30. Compare Essay xxvi. p. 104: *So certainly, 
are in point of wisdome, and sufficiency, that doe nothing or 
very solemnly; Magno conatu nugas* [31] In the second place: 
is omitted in edd. 1605, 1629, 1633. 

P. 243. [2] Compare Essay xxix. p. 121, where Machiavelli is ) 



BOOK II. 329 

iired to (Disc, sopra Li v. ii. 10). Nervos belli pecumam tnfinitam; 
;ero, Phil. v. 2. 5. In Diog. Laert. iv. 48, rbv irXovrov vevpa irpayfid- 
f is quoted as a saying of Bion's. See also Plutarch, Cleom. 27. 
I Lucian, Charon, 10-12. [13] In the third place: *the* is omitted 

edd. 1605, 1629. [14, 15] Compare Shakespeare, Julius Caesar, 

3. 218-221. [16] it being extreme hard to play an after game 

reputation : Lat. Ardua enim res, famam prcBcipitantem retrovertere. 
6] Virgil, Eel. ix. 66. [29] Virgil, Georg. iii. 284. 
P. 244. [i] fortune: So in ed. 1605; * fortunes' in edd. 1629, 1633. 
] Comp. pp. 211, 213. [6, 7] and bend not . . . intendeth : Omitted 

the Latin. [17-19] So that he should exact ... and not to stand 
c: This mixed construction is of very common occurrence.' It 
lould be, of course, either • So that he should exact . . . and not stand 
c' or * So that he ought to exact . . . and not to stand &c.* See note 
>. 88, 11. 7-9. [18] an account: So in ed. 1605 ; *an* is omitted in 
la. 1629, 1633. [26] Matt, xxiii. 23; Luke xi. 42. [30] — p. 245. 
j] Omitted in the Latin. The story is told again in the Colours 
f Good and Evil, 4. 

^' 245. [5] Aristotle, Rhet. ii. 13. §4; Cicero, De Amic. 16. 
lacon, Apoph. 182. [8] troublesome spleens: "LaX. molestis et turbidis 
diis, [26] *The allusion is probably to Macchiavelli's Principe, and 
3 the Cortigiano of Castiglione.* (Ellis.) 

P. 246. [4] Machiavelli, II Principe, 17, 18. [12] Cic. Pro Rege 
)eiot. ix. 25: Pereant amici^ &c. [16] *Pope Alexander ... was 
esirous to trouble the waters in Italy, that he might fish the better.' 
list, of Hen. VII. (Works, vi. 113). [17] Cic. Pro Mur. xxv. 51. 
19] Plutarch, Lys. 8. [25] Bacon had entered this maxim in his 
'romus or Commonplace book, *In actions as in wayes the neerest 
^fowlest' (Works, vii. 209). [31] Eccl. ii. ii. 

P- 247. [5] Virg. JEn. ix. 252. [8] The Latin quotes Cic. Ep. ad 
^tt. ix. 12, Atque eum ulciscentur mores sui, [ii] Job xv. 35. [20] 
ior. Sat. ii. 2. 79. [23] Aurelius Victor, Epit. i. 28. [24] Spartianus, 
i^it. Sept. Sev. c. 18; Bacon, Apoph. 98. [33] Charles V., after 
msing the siege of Metz, is reported to have said, * Fortune, I now 
Dcrceive, resembles other females, and chooses to confer her favours 
Dn young men, while she turns her back on those who are advanced 
in years.* Robertson, Charles V. ch. ix. 

P. 248. [6] Matt. vi. 33. [10] sands: *sarae* in ed. 1605, corrected 
b Errata and edd. 1629, 1633. Mr. Spedding reads * sand.' The 
reference of course is to Matt. vii. 24, 27. [11] The dying exclamation 
of Brutus, according to Dio Cassius, xlvii. 49. The Latin is a trans- 
ton of part of two Greek iambics : 

5 t\^ijlov ap€T^ k6yos dp* ^aB\ ky^ Zi cc 
ojs (^pyov ijaKovVf aif 5' dp' ISoi^Xcvct n^xV* 



330 NOTES. 

See Plut. De Superstitione, i, where part is quoted. [i6] In De Angi 
viii. 3 the subject is treated quite differently. The remarks on tl 
secret part of government are entirely omitted, and the apology 
the king for passing over the subject in silence is transferred to 
beginning of the book. The remainder of the chapter is taken 
with two dissertations, the one, De Proferendis Finibus Imperii, wh 
corresponds with Essay xxix. * Of the True Greatnesse of KingdcMn 
and Estates ; * the other, De Justitia Universali. The former of the 
is said to have been translated into Latin by Hobbes of Mai ' 

[22] Virg. JEn, vi. 726. [33] fiitiUty: 'facilitie' in ed. 1605, come 
to • futilitie' in Errata. The correction is adopted in edd. 1629, 163 
[lb.] Sisyphus and Tantalus: See Hom. Od. xi. 582-600; Cic. Ti 
Disp. i. 5. 10; iv. 16. 35. Sisyphus was punished because he h 
betrayed the designs of the gods (Scnnus on Virg. JEn. vL 61 
Tantalus divulged the secrets of Zeus. 

P. 249. [9] Rev. iv. 6. [18-25] Transferred in the De Angm. 
the beginning of the book. [24] The story is told of Zeno ; Pint 
Gamilitate ; Diog. Laert. vii. 24. 

P. 250. [16] Comp. Ess. Ivi. p. 227: 'For many times, the thj 
deduced to judgement, may bee tnettm and tuum, when the reason 1 
consequence thereof may trench to point of estate: I call matter 
estate, not onely the parts of soveraigntie, but whatsoever introdna 
any great alteration, or dangerous president ; or concemeth manii 
any great portion of people.' 

P' 251. [3, 4] The same in all probability as the dissertation in 
De Augm., *De justitia universali.* [9] Virg. ^n. iv. 647. [14] ' 
paragraph is omitted in the Latin. [19] Virg. Ed. ii. 27. 

P. 252. [15] only if: i.e. if only. [24] Made by Themistodes tl 
Eurybiades: Plut. Reg. et Imper. Apoph. [25] so they observe: l& 
provided that they observe. [31] Sabbath: 'Sabaoth' in ed. 16051 
corrected in edd. 1629, 1633. This confusion between Sabaoth ('hoiti') 
and Sabbath ('rest') is by no means uncommon, though in p. ixo^ 
1. 32, 'Sabbath* is printed correctly in ed. 1605. Even as late as die 
middle of the last century Dr. Johnson, in the first edition of ha 
Dictionary, treated the two words as synonymous. Other esunpia 
are found in Spenser (F. Q. viii. 2) : 

* But thenceforth all shall rest eternally 
With him that is the God of Sabaoih hight: 
O I that great Sabaoth God, grant me that Sabaoth't s^t' 

And the second quarto of Shakespeare's Mer. of Yen. iv. I. 36, b* 
' Sabaoth* for ' Sabbath,* which is the reading of the first qnvto and <^ 
the folios. 
P. 253. [i] De Augm. ix. i. [9] Rom. iv. aa. [lo] Gen. xvifi. !«• 



BOOK II. 331 

I of: So in ed. 1605; omitted in edd. 1629, 1633. . [^8] i Cor. xiii. 

[23] Ps. xix. I. [35] Isa. viii. 20. [29] Matt. v. 44, 45. [33] it 
ht to be applauded: i. e. this applause ought to be given. [lb.] 
g. JEn. i. 328. 

*. 254. [4] Ovid, Met. x. 330. [5] Plutarch (Alex. 65) calls him 
ndamis, Strabo (xv. 64) Mandanis. [28] Comp. with this paragraph 
oker, £ccl. Pol. i. 8, 9 ; iii. 8. 9. [31] Rom. xii. i. 
?. 355. [i] non-significants and surd characters : See p. 169, in the 
ragraph on ciphers. [33] grift: 'grifte' in edd. 1605, 1629; * graft' 
ed. 1633. 

P. 356. [20] This and the three following paragraphs are consider- 
ly modified in the Latin. [31] John iii. 4. 

P. 257. [i] John xvi. 17. [5, 6] an opiate to stay and bridle, &c.: 
le metaphor is better preserved in the Latin : utpote qua futura sit 
tar opiatcB eujusdam medicince^ qua non modo speculationum quibus 
tola interdum laborat inania consopiat, verum etiam controversiarum 
rores quce in ecclesia tumullus cient nonnihil midget. [13] if men: *of 
en' in ed. 1605, corrected in Errata. [14] i Cor. vii. 13. [15] i Cor. 
L40. [17] I Cor. vii. 10. [21] Prov. xxvi. 3. 
^' 25^- [3] further : Some copies of ed. 1605 have * sounder,* others 
mder.' [7] With this paragraph compare Ess. iii. *Of Unity in 
eligion,' and the notes upon it. [15] Ex. ii. 11, 12. [17] Ex. ii. 13; 
cts vii. 36. [23] Matt. xii. 30. [24] I,uke ix. 50. [25] John 
X. 23. [26] garment: Some copies of ed. 1605 have *garmente,' 
hers •gouemment.* [27] Ps. xlv. 10 (Prayer Book version). [29] 
[att. xiiL 39. 

P. 259. [3] In the Latin Bacon explains that he treats here only of 
le method^ not of the authority, of interpretation, which is founded 
?on the consent of the church. [6] John iv. 13, 14. [11-13] The 
inner ... corrupt : Omitted in the Latin. [18] Paragraphs 11 -13 
X omitted in the Latin. [30] the Master of the Sentences : Peter 
ombard, bishop of Paris; so called from his Sum of Theology, 
I four books, entitled *The Sentences.' [33] * Tribonianus, was 
accessively quaestor, consul, and master of the offices to Justinian . . . 
n A.D. 530 Tribonianus, then quaestor, was commissioned with sixteen 
thers to compile the Digest or Pandect.' (Smith's Diet, of Biog.) 

P. 260. [12] the weaker do you conclude: i. e. the weaker are your 
inclusions. [22] Rom. xi. 33. [24] i Cor. xiii. 9. [33] in the Latin 
he substance of paragraphs 14 and 15 is much condensed. 

P. 261. [2] curious: So some copies of ed. 1605; others have 
'niinous.* [14] Ex. xxxiii. 20. [lb.] Prov. viii. 27. [16] John ii. 25. 
[18] Acts XV. 18. [20] two of these: So ed. 1605; 'of these two' 
in edd. 1629, 1633. [24] i Cor. xiii. 12. 

P. 262. [8] the latter; .i.e. the philosophical exposition. [9] The 



33^ ^OTES, 

Latin adds that it had its beginning with the Rabbins and Cabbal 
See p. 263. [16] Mark xiii. 31. [19] Comp. Luke xxiv. 5. [38] ' 
authority of one who is treating of a different subject is of si 
weight, i.e. in regard to those things which he only mentions 
ddentally. 

P- 263. [5] Matt. xxiv. 35. Noli altum sapere was the motto of 
printer Robert Stephens. [12] See, for an example of answers of 
kind, Luke ix. 47, 48. 

P. 264. [20-32] For... times: Omitted in the Latin. In its pi 
is substituted an application to theology of the illustration he ma 
use of in Ess. Ivi. p. 223, in reference to the administration of just 

* And where the wine-presse is hard wrought, it yeelds a harsh w 
that tastes of the grape- stone.' The following is Mr. Spedding's tn 
lation of the passage in the De Augm. : * Certainly as we find it 
wines, that those which flow freely from the first treading of 
grape are sweeter than those which are squeezed out by the w 
press, because the latter taste somewhat of the stone and the ri 
so are those doctrines most wholesome and sweet which ooze oul 
the Scriptures when gently crushed, and are not forced into controvci 
and common places.' [21] Livy ix. 19. [26] island: So edd. i( 
1633; * islands' in ed. 1605. [lb.] Brittany: * Brittanie' in ed. i( 
[33] Paragraphs 19-25 (The matter . . . sowing of tares) arc omittec 
the Latin. 

P. 265. [8] Comp. Ess. iii. p. 8 : • For you may imagine, what Id 
of faith theirs was, when the chiefe doctors, and fathers of their chu 
were the poets. But the true God hath this attribute, that he i 
jealous God; and therefore, his worship and religion will endure 
mixture, nor partner.' 

P. 266. [i] privately: So edd. 1605, 1629, 1633. Mr. Spedding, "i 
great probability, rtads 'privatively.' [20] thought, word, or act: Ca 
Plato, Protag. i. 348 D. [32] man: So edd. 1629, 1633; * mans' in 
1605. 

P. 267. [2] John iv. 23, 24. [lb.] Hosea xiv. 2, [15] priv 

* primitive' in ed. 1605, corrected in Errata and edd. 1629, 1633. i 
witchcraft is the height of idolatry: See King James's treatise 
Dsemonology, iii. 6: 'it is the highest point of Idolatry.* [26] I Si 
XV. 23. 

P. 268. [23] question: i.e. the raising of doubts, which he descri 
just before as • litigious arguments.' [26] See Lev. i. 8, la, &c 



GLOSSARY. 



dant. ' In a readiness :' p. 155, I. 25. 

V. /. To beat down, lower, depress : p. 12, 1. 5. Compare Shake- 

it Coriolanus, iii. 3. 132 : 

• Till at length 

Your ignorance 

deliver you as most 

A bated captives to some nation 

That won you without blows.* 
xsted, adj. Abstract : p. 1 14, 1. 8. 

, V. /. To deceive: p. 159, 1. 24; p. 242, 1. 23. Compare Shake- 
e, Tempest, v. i. 1 1 2 : 

* Whether thou be*st he or no. 
Or some enchanted trifle to abuse me. 
As late I have been, I not know.* 
, sb. Deception: p. 224, 1. 5. 
d, p. p. Deceived : p. 66, 1. 31 ; p. 235, 1. 25. ' 
b, sb. Emphasis : p. 67, 1. 1 7. Compare Shakespeare, Hamlet, ii. a» 
* Well spoken, witfi good accent and good discretion.* 
ted of. Accepted: p. 5, 1. 12. 
b of, V. /. To accept, admit : p. 67, 1. 23. 
bion, sb. Acceptation, meaning: p. iii, 1. 23; p. I13, 1. 17. 
mts, sb. The accidents of a disease are its symptoms : p. 12, 1. 28; 
;7, 1. 20; p. 145, 1. 12; p. 204, 1. 10. See Cotgrave (Fr. Diet, ed, 
): *Symptome: m. A S3miptome; an affect, passion, or accident 
npanying a disease.' Bacon, in a letter to his mother, says : * In truth 
ird Sir John Scidmore often complain, after his quartain left him, that 
rand such a heaviness and swelling, specially under his ribs, that he 
ght he was buried under earth half from the waist, and therefore that 
lent is but incident.' (Works, viii. 300.) 

imod&te, p. p. Accommodated: p. 138, L 25. See consecrate. 
aplishments, sb. Ornaments: p. 77, 1. 7. 

dingly, adv. In accordance therewith: p. 126, I. 24; p. 234, 
I. Compare the phrase in the Litany : * that both by their preaching 
living they may set it forth, and shew it accordingly.* The word is 
means obsolete, but the force of it is often missed, 
•ding to. Corresponding to, in harmony with : p. 16, 1. 2. 
'ds, s6. Harmonies: p. 52, 1. 28. 
int, V. I. To count, reckon: p. 232, I. 22. 
iple, V. t. To couple : p. 96, 1. 9. 



334 GLOSS A Rr, 

Aocuxnulate, p, p. Accumulated ; the old form of participles derivei 

the Latin: p. 1 8, 1. 6; p. 65, 1. 20. Comp. Accommodate. 
Accurate, adj. Worked out with care: p. 213, 1. i. 
Accustom, V. t. To use, be accustomed : p. 58, 1. 9 ; p. 77, 1. 7. 
Acquaint, v. /. To accustom, famiharize: p. 67, 1. 21. Compare! 

speare. Tempest, ii. 2. 41 : * Misery acquaints a man with strangi 

fellows.* 
Addition, 56. Title : p. 95, 1. 20. According to Cowel (Law Diet 

it signifies *a title given to a man besides his Christian and sor 

shewing his estate, degree, mystery, trade, place of dwelling, &c.' 

pare Shakespeare, Coriolanus, i. 9. 66 : 

' Caius Marcius Coriolanus I Bear 
The addition nobly ever I* 

And Macbeth, i. 3. 106 : 

' He bade me, from him, call thee thane of Cawdor: 
In which addition, hail, most worthy thane I' 

See also Lear, ii. 2. 26. 
Adoption, sb. An obtaining, acquisition: p. 93, 1. 27. 
Adjacence, sb. Contiguity: p. 120, 1. 15. 
Adoptive, adj. Adopted: p. 57, 1. 2. 'Adoptive brethren '^b broth 

adoption. 
Advance, v.t. To promote: p. 231, 1. 5. 
Adventive, adj. Coming from without, adventitious: p. 113, 1 

p. 144, 1. 6. 
Advertised, p. p. Informed : p. 68, 1. 4 ; p. 80, 1. 27. 
Advertisement, sb. Information: p. 100, 1. 16. Notice: p. 219,1 
Advise, v.i. To consider: p. 67, 1. 31 ; p. 161, 1. 21. 
Advised, p.p. Deliberate, well considered : p. loO, 1. 22. Compare S 

speare, Merchant of Venice, i. I. 142 : 

* I shot his fellow of the selfsame flight 

The selfsame way with more advised watch.* 
A£Pect, sb. Affection, disposition: p. 131, 1. 24. Compare Shakes] 
Love's Labour *s Lost, i. i. 152 : 

• For every man with his affects is bom.' 
Affectionate, adj. Zealous, devoted, attached: p. 29, L 14. Ei 

desirous, studious: p. 112, 1. 10. Compare Bacon, Hist, of Hen. 

p. 17 (ed. 1622) : * So he being truly informed, that the Northeme 

were not onely affectionate to the House ' of Yorke, but particolaxi 

been denoted to King Richard the third.* 
After, adv. Afterwards : p. 18, 1. 9 ; p. 67, 1. 7» 
Afterward, adv. Afterwards: p. 27, 1. 2 ; p. 127, L 33. 
Agreed, p.p. Agreed to, admitted: p. 158, 1. 27. 
All, used where now we should use *any*: p. 17, IL 2, 7* P* 5^» 

Comp. * without all contradiction * (Heb. vii. 7)» 
Allege, v.t. To quote: p. 88, I. 30; p. 199, 1. JI. 
All one. The same: p. 30, 1. 17; p. 158, L I. 
Allow, v.t. To approve: p. 20, 1. 18; p. HI. L II. Compare Lak 

48 : ' Truly ye bear witness that ye allow the deeds of your fiithen.' 
Allowance, 56. Approval : p. 24, 1. 6. So Shakespeare, Hen. VUL i 

322 : 'Without the King's will or the state's attowanct.' 



GLOSSARF. 335 

iisivey adj. Figurative: p. 102, 1. 22, 28. Todd quotes from South 
>enn. ii. 276), * The foundation of all parables, is some analogy or simili- 
ide between the tropical or allusive part of the parable, and the thing 
ouched under it and intended by it.' 

nost, adv. Apparently in the sense of 'most of all/ or 'generally': 
. 163, 1. II. Bacon uses it in the same way in Essay xliii. p. 176; 
Neither is it almost seene, that very beautifuU persons, are otherwise of 

at vertue.* 
i/xt, adv. Upwards : p. 89, 1. 6. 

abages, sb. Circuitous ways or methods: p. 11 1, 1. 6; p. 124, 1. 18. 
Compare Bale, Image of both Churches (p. 260, Parker Soc.) ; * Evident 
will these secret mysteries be unto him, which are privily hid imto other 
ooder dark ambages and parables.' 

nplification, sb. Exaggeration: p. 3, 1. 17. Shakespeare uses 'ampli- 
fied ' in the sense of * exaggerated' in Coriolanus, v. 2. 16 : 

*His fame imparallel'd, haply, amplified* 
latoxny, sh. A body used for dissection : p. 80, 1. 18 ; p. 1 38, 11. 16, 28 ; 
p. 139, 1. 17. 

aimosity, sb. Courage: p. 133, 1. 12. Cotgrave (Fr. Diet.) gives, 
* Animosity : f. Animositie, stoutnesse, courage, metall, boldnesse, resolution, 
hardinesse.' 

Qointxnent, sb. Anointing : p. 83, 1. 5. 

Qflwerable, adj. Corresponding: p. 93, 1. 29; p. 162, 1. 9. Compare 
Shakespeare, Taming of the Shrew, ii. i. 361 : 

* Six score fat oxen standing in my stalls. 
And all things answerable to this portion.' 

nt (p. 151, 1. 28), a feminine noun, as in Prov. vi. 6. 
ntistrophe, sb. Literally, that part of a song sung by a chorus of 
dancers when they retraced their steps in the dance. It corresponds to a 
previous * strophe.' Bacon uses it of 'correspondence* generally: p. 131, 
1. 22. 

Jitiques, sb. Grotesque figures : p. 25, 1. 24. Compare Shakespeare, 
Much Ado, iii. i. 63 : 

* If black, why. Nature, drawing of an antique. 
Made a foul blot.* 

36, adv. Swiftly: p. 15, 1. 8. 
•vvasrently, adv. Openly, manifestly: p. 127, 1. 7. Compare Shake- 
speare, Comedy of Errors, iv. I. 78 : 

*I would not spare my brother in this case, 
If he should scorn me so apparently.* 
Application, sb. Appliance: p. 21, 1. 3. Accommodation, adaptation: 
p. 192, 1. 30; p. 204, 11. 6, 15, 24. Comp. p. 204, 1. 23, * which is 
that properly which we call accommodating or applying.* See also p. 26, 
I 25. 

'PPlyi v.i. To accommodate, adapt oneself: p. 204, 1. 26. Used re- 
flexively, p. 24, 1. lo. * To apply ones selfe to others, is good : so it 
be with demonstrations that a man doth it upon regard, and not upon 
facilitie.* Essay Iii. p. 211. Used transitively in the sense of, to devote 
oneself to: p. 41, 1. I. 
Ppiompt, V. t. To prompt : p. 156, 1. 32. 



33^ 



OLOSSARF. 



Apt, adj. Fit, suitable: p. i8i, 1. 22. Compare Shakespeare, Jii 

ii. 2. 97 : * A mock Apt to be rendered.* 
Aref action, sb. Drying, the act or state of growing dry: p. 124, L 
Arrogancy, sb. Arrogance: p. 5, I. 9; p. 88, 1. 22. Compare > 

speare, Hen. VIII. ii. 4. no: 

* But your heart 

Is cramm*d with arrogancy, spleen, and pride.' 
Artificial, adj. Constructed with art, ingenious, skilfully contriyed : ] 
1. 5. So in Shakespeare, Timon of Athens, i. I. 37 : 

* Artificial strife 
Lives in these touches, livelier than life.* 

Artsman, sb. One skilled in the liberal arts: p. 150, 1. 15. 

As = that, in the phrases * so as*: p. 4, 1. 4; p. 16, 1. 28, &c. 'ins( 

as*: p. 56, 1. 2. *Such . ..as*: p. 91, 1. 23. 
As. As that: p. 23, 1. 5. As for instance: p. 26, 1. 15. 
Ask, V. t. To require : p. 85, 1. 6. Comp. Essay vi. p. 18 ;' It as 

strong wit, and a strong heart, to know, when to tell truth, and to < 
Aspect, 56. The appearance of a planet, which varied with its pt 

among the stars : p. 145, I. 10. Used metaphorically, p. 79, 1. 2, \ 

reference tathe old astrological belief in the power exercised by the| 

upon the fate of man. So Shakespeare, Tr. and Cr. i. 3. 92 : 

'Whose medicinable eye 
Corrects the ill aspects of planets evil.* 

So also Essay ix. p. 29. 
Aspersion, sb. Sprinkling ; and so, intermixture : p. 47, 1. 20 ; p. 19 
Assure, v.i. To ensure, guarantee: p. 152,1. 21. Used transitive 

Shakespeare, 3 Hen. VI. iii. 3. 240 : 

* This shall assure my constant loyalty.* 
Assured, p.p. Safe, secure : p. 171, 1. 18. 
As touching. With respect to : p. 8, 1. 10. See Matt xviii. 19. 
Astrolabe, sb. An ancient astronomical instrument for taking the 1 

of the stars &c. Chaucer wrote a treatise upon it for the use of 

Lewis ' his son : p. 80, 1. 1 3. 
Athletic, sb. The art of activity : p. 133, L 24. We now use *ath 

in the same sense. 
Attend, used as a transitive verb, p. 153, 1. 6. 
Attended, p.p. Accompanied : p. 224, 1. 32. 
Attend upon. To accompany : p. 225, 11. 23, 24. 
Authorised, adj. Gifted with authority : p. 253, 1. 16. 
AwakCi v./. To awaken, rouse : p. 203, 1. il. 

*We must awake endeavour for defence.* 

Shakespeare, K. John, ii. i. 

B. 

Backward, adv. Backwards: p. 38, 1. 19. 

Baladine, sb. A ballet dancer : p. 165, 1. 22. Cotgrave (Fr. Diet ed. 

gives, * Baladin : m. A common dauncer of galUards, and odier tt 

or liuely Ayres.* 
re = Bore; past tense of 'bear' : p. 59, L 19. 



GLOSSARF. 337 

silisk, sb. A fabnlous creature described by Pliny (viii. 33, xxix. 19) as a 

-^rneiit, of which many marvels are told : p. 200, 1. 30, note ; p. 262, 1. 32. 

9f sb. A body of troops : p. 71. !• 30« * They were more ignorant 

•'X ranging and arraying their hattailes* Essay Iviii. p. 237. 

, 3 plu. Are: p. 10, 1. 17; p. 23, 1. 5 ; p. 50, 1. 23. In the phrase 

had been to handle '; p. 185, 1. 16. 

sause, conj. In order that : p. 228, 1. 13. See Matt. xx. 31. 
BOixie» used reflexively, p. 216, 1. 30. * Can neither become themselves* 
s can neither act in a graceful or becoming manner.' 
Seholding, part. Beholden, indebted : p. 104, 1. 30. ' The stage is more 
^holding to love, then the life of man.' Essay x. p. 36. 
at, adj. Crooked, twisted ; and so, sinister : p. 25, 1. 2. 
ddes, prep. Beside : p. 12, 1. 32 ; p. 159, 1. 23. 
tl-witted, adj. Incapable of fixed attention, volatile : p. 183, 1. 14. 
aich, v.t. To flinch from, avoid: p. 182, 1. 21. 'Some are never 
without a difiference, and commonly by amusing men with a subtilty, 
^'lanch the matter.' Essay xxvi. p. 105, 1. 12. 

sphemy, sb. In its literal sense of defamation or slander : p. 17* !• I5* 
\X)mpare the use of * blaspheme ' in Shakespeare, Macbeth, iv. 3. 108 : 
• Since that the truest issue of thy throne 
By his own interdiction stands accursed. 
And does blaspheme his breed.' 
llATnish, v.t. To stigmatize: p. 27^ 1. 28. 

w up, V. t. To inflate : p. 7, 1. 20. 
Diown up, p.p. Inflated : p. 39, 1. 25. 
Bond-woniaii, sb. A female slave : p. 43, 1. 25. 
Borne out, p.p. Compensated for : p. 19, 1. 12. 
inden, p. p. Bound, indebted : p. 268, 1. 28. 
kver, adj. Finer, more beautiful: p. 216, 1. 10. 

' • The Duke of Milan 
And his more braver daughter could control thee.' 

Shakespeare, Tempest, i. 3. 439. 
, v.t. To train: p. 197, 1. 13. Still used of horses. 

•Why, then thou canst not break her to the lute?' 

Shakespeare, Taming of the Shrew, ii. I. 148. 
Briber, sb. A taker of bribes : p. 222, 1. 35. 

Brittany, sb. Britain : p. 93, 1. 14; p. 94, 11. 12, 17; p. 264, 1. 26. In 
the first and last of these passages the word is spelt ' Brittanie ' in ed. 
1605. On the other hand, what we call * Brittany ' is uniformly, I believe, 
called * Britaine ' in Bacon's Hist, of Hen. VII. 
Broken, p.p. Trained : p. 156, 1. 5. 
Buckle, V. t. To bend : p. 102, 1. 10. 
Buffon, s6. The old spelling of 'buffoon': p. 136,1. 20. Florio (Ital. 

Diet. 161 1) has *BufFonare, to ieast or play the buffon.^ 
But only. This expression is found where we should now use one or 
other of the words: p. 234, 1. I. So 'only hut' is used for *but* or 
'only': p. 174, 1. 10. Compare Shakespeare, Meas. for Meas. iii. I. 3 : 
'The miserable have no other medicine 
But only hope.' 
' muoh. In the same proportion as : p. I3, 1. 8 ; p. 129, 1. 13. 

Z 



338 GLOSSARY. 



O. 

Called down, p.p. Cried down, decried ; p. 87, 1. 11. .J 

Capable, adj. In the construction ' capable to lodge ' instead (tf * c 

of lodging*: p. 125, 1. 31. 
Capable of. Able or apt to receive : p. 6, 1. 23. In a passive senn 

'Abhorred slave, 
Which any print of goodness will not take. 
Being capable of all ill/ Shakespeare, Tempest, L I 
Caption, 56. Deception, fallacy, in argument: p. 159,133. V 

Lat. captio as used by Cicero, De Fato, xiii. 30, &c. 
Card, sb, A chart : p. 246, 1. 33. Comp. Essay xviii. p. 73 : ' Letl 

with him also some card or booke describing the country, where he I 
Carefulness, sb. Anxiety : p. 8, 1. 24. Comp. Ezek. xiL 18, ly 
Camosity, sb. A fleshy excrescence : p. 139, 1. 14. 
Carriage, sb. Baggage : p. 79, 1. 29. See Judg. xviii. ai. 
Case, sb. ' In some case ' ^ in some cases, sometimes : p. 194, L & 
Cast, V. /. To consider, plan : p. 181, 1. 26. Comp. Luke i. 29, nv 

Essay xlv. p. 1 83 : * Cast it also, that you may have roomei, ' 

sununer, and winter.' 
Casual, adj. Uncertain, subject to accident : p. 241, 1. 37. Co 

of Good and Evil, p. 248 : * Sometimes because some things iu«i 

very casually which if they escape, prove excellent.' Haviag 

to special cases : p. 138, 1. 17. 
Casualty, sb. Uncertainty, instability : p. 23, 1. 13. See Baooa'f 

of Good and Evil, p. 256 (ed. W. A. Wright), « this coloiir v 

reprehended or incountred by imputing to all excellencies in caacp^ 

a kind of povertie or at least a casualty or ieopardy.' 
Cautel, sb. Deceit : p. 200, 1. 16. 

* And now no soil nor cautel doth besourdi 

The virtue of his will.' Shakespeare, Hamlet, i. } 

* Cautelle : f. A wile, cautell, sleight ; a craftie reach, or jfetcb, t> 

deuise or endeuor; also, craft, subtiltie, trumperie, deceit^ 00 

Cotgrave, Fr. Diet. 
Cautionary, adj. Full of cautions : p. 196, L 30. 
Caveat, sb. A caution, warning : p. 22, 11. 9, 17 » p* 55, L 7* 
Cavillation, s6. A cavil, objection: p. 33, 1. 3; p. 154,]. !«• *Ci 

lation. A cauill; a wrangling proposition, oueithwart season; ■!■ 

cauilling.' Cotgrave, Fr. Diet. 
Cease, v. t. To cause to cease : p. 40, 1. 8 ; p. 56, 1. 33. 
Celsitude, sb. Loftiness, height : p. 214, 1. 15. ' Celsitnde: f, 

highnesse, excellencie; (tearmes conferred on Princes).' CofgfifV 

Diet. 
Censure, v. /. To judge, give an opinion : p. 84, L 23 ; pu SjO^ L pm 

* That I, unworthy body as I am. 
Should censure thus on lovely gentlemen.' 

Shakespeare, Two GenL of Vo; L > 



GLOSSARF. 339 

Attre, sb. An opinion, judgement: p. 5, 1. 18; p. 7, 1. 38; p. 49, 
3a. * The speech of Themistocles the Athenian, which was haughtie 
id arrogant, in taking so much to himselfe, had been a grave and 
ise observation and censurCf applied at large to others.' Essay xxiz. 
118. 
dxnoiiies, 56. Superstitious rites : p. 146, 1. 33. 

• For he is superstitious grown of late, 
Quite from the main opinion he held once 
Of fantasy, of dreams and ceremonies* 

Shakespeare, Julius Cssar, ii. I. 197. 
tify, V, L To give information of: p. 154, 1. 13. 
Uenge, v. /. To claim : p. 11, 1. 13. Comp. Ex. xxii. 9. 
Ilenge, sh. Claim: p. 198, 1. ai. 

' And not of any challenge of desert.* 

Shakespeare, i Hen. VI, v. 4. 153. 
mpain, adj. Level, like a plain: p. 121, 1. 3 1. 
jrity, 56. Used in the same sense as in i Cor. ziii. I, &c., for the 
reck drf&'mj. p. 214, 1. 34. 
hering, sb. Writing in cipher: p. 169, L 16. 

mit of speech. Circumlocution : p. 29, 1. 3. Compare Cotgrave 
•"r. Diet.) : * Circuition de paroles. A circumlocution, paraphrase, great 
rcumstance of words ; a going about the bush.' 
mmf erred, p.p. Carried round : p. 105, 1. 15. 
il, adj. Public, popular: p. 146, 1. 16. The Latin has quasi poptdares, 
ility, sb. Civilization, refinement: p. 19, 1. 17. *And a man shall 
er see, that when ages grow to civility and elegancie, men come to build 
ately, sooner then to garden finely.* Essay xlvi. p. 186. 
IT, v.t. To make clear or manifest: p. I7f 1. n. This is the sense 
which it is understood in the Latin of the De Augmentis^ but it appears 
• be used in the present passage in the legal sense * to justify.* 
ive, V. i. To adhere : p. 18, 1. 26. 

nate, sb. Region : p. 48, 1. 4. ' Climat : m. A clyme, or Clymate ; a 
uision in the Skie, or Portion of the world, betweene South and North.* 
Dtgrave, Fr. Diet. 

The ancient geographers * divided the space comprehended between the 
uator and the pole into thirty parts, which they denominated Climates 
Inclinations, viz. twenty-four between the equator and polar circle, and 
c between the polar circle and the pole.* Diet, of Science and Art, ed. 
ande and Cox. 
16, sb. A cadence in music : p. 107, 1. 33. 

* The setting sun, and music at the close. 
As the last taste of sweets, is sweetest last.' 

Shakespeare, Richard II, ii. I. 13. 
le, adj. Secret : p. 230, 1, 7. 

'The close contriver of all harms.* 

Shakespeare, Macbeth, iii. 5, 7. 
\e, adv. Closely, secretly: p. 334, 1. 22. 

* Stand you thus close, to steal the bishop's deer ? * 

Shakespeare, 3 Hen. VI, iv. 5. 17. 
tation, sb. Restriction : p. 8, 1. 3. 

Z 2 



340 GLOSSARY 

Cockboat, sb. A small boat: p. 23, 1. 28. Called a *cock' by S 'I 

speare, Lear iv. 6. 19 : 

*Yond tall anchoring bark 
Diminish'd to her cock* 
Cogitations, sb. Thoughts : p. 4, 1. 28 ; p. 70, 1. 14, See. Comp. Dao 

vii. 28. 
Colliquation, s6. Melting, liquefaction: p. 114, 1. 30. 'Colliquatioa:: 

A colliquaiion ; a consumtion of the radical! humor, or substance 

the bodie ; also, a melting, resoluing, dissoluing.' Cotgrave, Fr. Diet. 
Colour, sb. Pretext : p. 24, 1. 26. * To give colour,' p. 238, 1. 2. 
Columbine, adj. Dove-like : p. 201, 1. 4. ' Colombain: m. ine: £Dooe 

like ; of the nature of Doues ; of, or belonging to, Doues.' Cotgnre 

Fr. Diet. 
Combustion, sb. Heat, feverish excitement : p. 184, 1. 13. 
Comen, p.^ Come: p. 37, i. 3 ; p. 60, 1. 25; p. 188, 1. 24. So '1)6 

comen ' for * become.* • Sir Robert Clifford (who was now beeomm the 

state informer).* Hist, of Hen. VII. (Works, vi. p. 152). Sec 

Overcommen. 
Comfort, V. t. To strengthen : p. 77, 1. 4. 'Not contented thus to hiw 

comforted and assisted Her Majesty's rebels in England, he procucdt 

rebellion in Ireland.' Bacon, Observ. on a Libel (Works, viii. 194). 
Comfortable, adj. Strengthening: p. 148, 1. 32. 
Comforting, sb. Strengthening, a verbal noun : p. 77, L 14. 
Comical, adj. Comic: p. 226, 1. 25. 
Oonunanded, p. p. Controlled : p. 141, 1. 33. See p. 140b IL 29. 30: 

p. 230, 1. 20. 
Commandment, sb. Command : p. 48, 1. 32 ; p. 69, II. 20, 23, 34, ftc 
Commenter, sb. Commentator : p. 42, 1. 12. 
Commixed, ^.^ Mixed: p. no, 1. i. 

*The smile mocking the sigh, that it would flj 
From so divine a temple, to commix 
With winds that sailors rail at.' 

Shakespeare, Cymb. iv. a. 55. 
Commodity, sb. Convenience, advantage : p. 80, 1. 16. 
* Commodity, the bias of the world.* 

Shakespeare, K. John, n. I. 574* 
Commonalty, sb. A corporation: p. 56, 1. 11. Spelt also eommmdtf. 

P* 83, 1. 5. *Communaut^: f. The comminaltie, or common peopk; 

.... also, a societie, brotherhood, corporation, or companie incoiponte. 

Cotgrave, Fr. Diet. 
Common place, sb. The subject of a thesis or discussion : p. 19, !• ^ 

* Some have certaine common places^ and theames, wherein they are goo^ 

and want variety.* Essay xxxii. p. 136. 
Commutative, adj. Relating to exchange: p. 107, 1. II. See note. 

Johnson defines * commutative justice' as *that honesty which is atxom^ 

in traffick ; and which is contrary to fraud in bargains.' 
Compacted, p. p. Compact, consolidated : p. 359, 1. 19 ; p. S^ L I^ 

See Eph. iv. 16. 
Compaction, sb. The being fastened together or consolidated: p. a6a^L^ 
Compass, sb. A pair of compasses: p. 154, I. 25. 'CoaapU: n A 



GLOSSARY. 



341 



compasse; a circle, a round; also, a paire of compasses.' Cotgrave, 
Fr. Diet, 
^mpass, adj. Circuitous: p. 232, 1. 17. 

Compatible, adj. Sympathetic: p. 132, 1. 19. 'Compatible: com. Com- 
patible, concurrable; which can abide or agree together; or indure, or 
beare with, one another.' Cotgrave, Fr. Diet. 

'omplexion, sb. The constitution both of mind and body ; p. 12, 1. 27; 
p. 162, 1. 30. Hence it denotes a natural tendency or inclination. 
Comp. Shakespeare, Meas. for Meas. iii. i. 24 : 

* Thou art not certain ; 
For thy complexion shifts to strange effects, 
After the moon.* 
ompoTinded, /». />. Compound: p. 134, 1. 19. 
onceit, sh. Conception: p. 20, 1. 17 ; p. 102, 1. 29; p. 174, 1. 9. 
* Hear me without thine ears, and make reply 
Without a tongue, using conceit alone.' 

Shakespeare, K. John, iii. 3. 50. 
onclude, v. t. To lay down as a conclusion : p. 206, 1. 1 7. 
oncordance, sb. Agreement, harmony: p. 89, 1. 16; p. 130, 1. 16. 
ioncupiscence, sb. Eager desire, lust : p. 133, 1. 14. See Rom. vii. 8. 
loncurrent, sb. A rival: p. 235, 1. 4. 'Concurrent; m, h concurrent, 
corriuail, competitor.* Cotgrave, Fr. Diet. 

'onfectionary, sb. One who makes confections or conserves: p. 206, 
1. 22. See I Sam. viii. 13. 

•But myself, 
Who had the world as my confectionary' 

Shakespeare, Timon of Athens, iv. 3. 260. 
Confer, v. i. To consult: p. 66, 1. 24. See Gal. i. 16. To contribute: 
p. 102, 1. 6. 

^confidences, sb. Unusual in the plural: p. 227, 1. 13. See Jer. ii. 37. 
Congregate, adj. Collected : p. 130, 1. 3. 
Conjugate, adj. United: p. 130, 1. 4. 

Conjugates, sb. Things related to, and so resembling each other : p. 161, 
^' .^3' Johnson defines a conjugate as * Agreeing in derivation with 
another word, and therefore generally resembling in signification.' Bacon 
uses it in a wider sense. 

Conjugation, sb. Relation, connexion, combination : p. 89, 1. 12; p. 164, 
1. 19; p. 198, 1. 10. 

'onscient, adj. Conscious: p. 227, 1. 30. 
'onaecrate, />./>. Consecrated: p. 95, 1. 10. 

'The impenal seat, to virtue consecrate* 

Shakespeare, Tit. And. 1. I. 14. 
Compare accommodate, accumulate, alienate, copulate, corroborate, dedic- 
ate, excommunicate, degenerate, demonstrate, devote, dilute, enumerate, 
illuminate, illustrate, incorporate, palliate, premeditate, &c. 
Consequent, sb. * By consequent* =^m consequence, consequently: p. 134, 

,••33. 

conserve, v. t. To preserve : p. 195, 1. 4. 

'Them art too noble to conserve a life 
In base appliances.' Shakespeare, Meas. for Meas. iii. i. 88. 



34^ GLOSSARr. 

Considerative, adj. Requiring consideration or reflection : p. 12 

1. 4. Compare Demonstrative. 
Consist, V. i. To stand firm, subsist, remain settled : p. 145, I. 2 

p. 209, 1. 13; p. 210, 1. 3. Comp. Col. i. 17. 'Consister. To etmsi 

be; rest, reside, abide; to settle, stand still, or at a stay.' Cotgnv 

Fr. Diet. 
Consociate, v. /. To associate, unite : p. 72, 1. 32. 
Consort, sh. Fellowship: p. 102, i. 14. 
Constitute, v. i. To establish : p. 130, 1. 9. 
Construe, v. f . To interpret : p. 50, 1. 33 ,* p. 245, 1. 4. 
' Construe the times to their necessities.' 

Shakespeare, 2 Hen. IV, W, I. 104. 
Contain, v. t. To hold in, as the breath : p. 143, 1. 10. 
Contained, p.p. Restrained : p. 209, 1. 2 ; p. 261, 1. 22. 
Contemplative, sh. One devoted to contemplation: p. 191, L I* 
Contend, v.i. To strive, endeavour : p. 22, 1. 6. 
Content, sb. The thing contained : p. 6, 1. 13. 
Contentation, sb. Contentment: p. 13,1. 18. 
Contention, sb. Effort, exertion: p. 104, 1. 12 ; p. 184, 1. 6. 
Contestation, sb. Strife, debate: p. 22, 1. 16. 'Contestation: f. Aeo» 

testation ; a protestation, taking, or calling to witnesse ; also, a contesting 

striving, debating, reasoning, brabling about a matter.' Cotgrav^ 

Fr. Diet. 

•Your wife and brother 
Made wars upon me; and then: contestation 
Was theme for you.' Shakespeare, Ant. and CI. iL 3. 43< 
Continent, adj. Containing; 'the cause con/men/ 'b the containiiDg 

cause: p. 138, 1. 21. 
Continent, sb. The thing containing: p. 6, 1. 13. 

'Heart, once be stronger than thy continent. 
Crack thy frail case I' Shakespeare, Ant. and CU vr. 14. 40* 
Continue, V. /. 'To continue his whole age* = to devote his whole Hfe 

continuously: p. 79» 1' 23. 
Continued, p.p. Kept, caused to remain: p. 163, 1. 25. 
Contract, sb. Convention, agreement : p. i67> 1. 2. 
Contrariwise, adv. On the contrary: p. I3t 1* 3; p* IS* 1* Z9* ^ 

2 Cor. ii. 7. 
Contristation, sh. Sadness: p. 5, 1. 21. 
Convenient, adj. Suitable: p. 58, 1. 31. 
Conversant, adj. 'Are conversant about 'shave to do with, are coo- 

cerned with: p. 76, 1. 32. 
Converse, v. i. To dwell or abide ; and so, to associate : p. 43, L l^* 

* I have, since I was three year old, conversed with a magician, mo^ 

profound in his art.' Shakespeare, As You Like It, y. 2. 66. 
Conversion, sb. A tuming round, revolving : p. 158, L 19. 
Convince, v. t. To convict, refute : p. 108, 1. 31. See John viiL 46. 
Copie, sh. Copiousness : p. 29, 1. 14 ; p. 30, L 4; p. 154, L 5. 
Copy. * To cAan^« co/y'= to change, shift about: p. 22i, L15. 'The! 

Callisthenes changing copy^ spake boldly many things against tlw Ma€e 

donians.* North's Plutarch, Alex. p. 701 (ed. l63l)I 



OLOSSARV, 343 

orroborate, v. t. To strengthen: p. 131, 1. 33. 

oproborate, p.p. Confirmed in strength, grown strong: p. 21, 1. i. 
' There is no trusting to the force of nature, nor to the bravery of words ; 
except it be corroborate by custome.* Essay xxxix. p. 162. 

lomipt, V. i. To become corrupt: p. 259, 1. 13. * Likewise glorious 
gifts and foundations, are like sacrifices without salt ; and but the painted 
sepulchres of almes, which soone will putrifie, and corrupt inwardly.* Essay 
xxxiv. p. 148, 

Josmetic, sb. The art of decoration : p. 133, 1. 24. 

iountenance, sb. Appearance, semblance: p. 11, 1. 26. 'A counte- 
nance of gravity ' = an appearance of in^portance. 

Countervail, v.i. To counterbalance, outweigh: p. 14, 1. 15 ; p. 161, 
1.17. 

* But come what sorrow can. 
It cannot countervail the exchange of joy.* 

Shakespeare, Rom. and Jul. ii. 6. 4. 
'ourse, • In cottrse*s=in its due order: p. 86, 1. 2a. 
Sramp in, v.t. To force, press in: p. 199, 1. II. The modem cram. 
Sreature, sb. Anything created: p. no, 1. 13. See Rom. i. 25; viii. 19. 

' The first creature of God, in the workes of the dayes, was the light of 

the sense.* Essay, i. p. 2. 
!!ros8iiess, sb. Intricacy : p. 250, 1. 24. 
)ryptic, sb. Concealment: p. 174. 1. 27. 
i>umber, sb. Encumbrance : p. 246, 1. 6. 
Curiosity, sb. Nicety: p. 32, 1. 10. 

* Wherefore should I 

Stand in the plague of custom, and permit 
The curiosity of nations to deprive me.* 

Shakespeare, Lear, i. 2. 4. 
Curious, adj. Careful to excess, scrupulous, careful, nice : p. 10, 1. 2 1 ; 
p. 20, 1. 32 ; p. 180, 1. 6. Wrought with care: p. 134, 1. 30. 
* His body couched in a curious bed.' 

Shakespeare, 3 Hen. VI, ii. 5. 53. 
Customed, ^./>. Frequented by customers : p. 155, L 29. 



D. 

Decarded, p.p. Discarded: p. 126, 1. 33. 

IJecayed, />./>. Brought to decay: p. 72, 1. 19. 'Decay* is used transi- 
tively in Shakespeare, Twelfth Night, i. 5. 82 : 

• Infirmity, that decays the wise.* 

Decencsy, sb. Comeliness, propriety: p. 216, 11. 21, 26 ; p. 219, 11. 4, 5. 
' Decence : f. Decencie, seemelinesse, comelinesse, handsomenesse.* Cot- 
grave, Fr. Diet. 

Decent, adj. Becoming, appropriate : p. 6, 1. 19 ; p. 181, 1. 22. • In beauty, 
tbt of favour, is more then that of colour, and that of decent and gracious 
motion more then that of favour.* Essay xliii. p. 176, 



344 GLOSSARY, 

Declination, sh. Decline : p. 143, 1. 35. * And the one of them said, Tfait 

to be a secretary, in the declination of a monarchy, was a ticklish tibii^ 

and that he did not affect it/ Essay xxii. p. 94. 
Deducement, sh. Deduction : p. 225, 1. 6 ; p. 260, 1. 30. 
Defeat, v. /. To ruin, undo : p. 207, 1. 11. ' Desfaire. To vndoe; breaks 

defecUy discomfit, ouercome ; mine, destroy, ouerthrow.' Cotgrave, Fi; 

Diet. 
Deficience, sh. Deficiency: p. 84, 11. 6, 22 ; p. 1 1 8, 1. 33. 
Define of. To define : p. 116, 1. 28; p. 257, L 5. 
Defunct, sh. A dead man : p. 149, 1. 26. 
Degenerate, ^.^. Degenerated: p. 81, 1. 32. * Reduce thmgs, to the 

first institution, and obserre, wherein, and how, they have dtgminU$! 

Essay xi. p. 41. 
Degrees, sh. Ranks in society : p. 96, L I7« 
Delectable, adj. Delightful: p. 64, 1. 17; p. 89, 1. 24. 

* Making the hard way sweet and delectable.* 

Shakespeare, Rich. 11. U. 3. 7 
Delectation, sh. Delight : p. 102, I. 7. * DelecUtioa : f. DdtetaAm, • 

delight, pleasure, oblectation.' Cotgrave, Fr. Diet. 
Delicacy, s6. Effeminacy: p. 19,1. 14. * Delicatesse : f. De/Mooe, daioti 

nesse, tendemesse, nicenesse, wantonnesse, efifeminacie; sensoalite.' Cot 

grave, Fr. Diet. 
Delicate, adj. Affected, efifeminate : p. 28, 1. 10. 
Deliver, v. t. To pronounce, communicate, as a message : p. 7f 1< ^^ 

* The former delivers the precepts of the art ; and the latter the perfectioB. 

Essay xlv. p. 181. 
Demand, v. t. To ask, simply ; not as now, to ask with authority or ai 

a right : p. 85, 1. 7. See 2 Sam. xi. 7. 
Demonstrate, />.^. Demonstrated: p. 39, II. lo, II. 
Demonstrative, adj. Capable of demonstration, demonstrable: p. M* 

1. 29. 

* He sends you this most memorable line. 
In every branch truly demonstrative* 

Shakespeare, Hen. V, ii. 4. 89. 
Dependences, sh. Dependents: p. 229, 1. 7; p. 231, 1. 9; p. 235* 

1. 14. 
Depending, />. ^. Impending: p. 218, 1. II. 
Deplored, p.p. Despaired of: p. 140, 1. 20. 

* Your love, sir, like strong water 

To a deplored sick man, quicks your feeble limbs 
For a poor moment.' 

Albumazar, i. 2. (Dodsley's Old Plays, vii. II5, ed. 1825.) 
Depravation, sh. Depreciation, defamation, slander: p. 17, L a. 

*Apt, without a theme, 
For depravation* Shakespeare, Tr. and Cr. v. a. 13a. 

Deprave, v. t. To defame, depreciate, disparage: p. 27, 1. 25 ; p. 37,L 15 
' If affection lead a man, to favour the lesse worthy in deiot, )A hioi 
doe it without depraving or disabling the better desenrer.' Eisay xlix 
p. 202. 
Depredation, sh. A robbing, plundering : p. 106, L 6. 



GLOSSARF. 345 

ion, sb. Originally, the turning of a stream into another channel: 
I. 12. See note. 

, p.p. Drawn off, as in channels: p. 259, 11. 9, 17. 
V. /. To observe, discern : p. 71, 1. 33 ; p. 115, L 29. 

* Moreover, to descry 
The strength o' the enemy.' Shakespeare, Lear, iv. 5. 13. 
tion, sb. Appointment : p. 78, 11. I, 3 ; p. 83, L 12 ; p. 84, 1. 4. 
aent, sb. Design: p. 16, 1. i. 

'Served his designments 
In mine own person.' Shakespeare, Coriolanns, y. 6. 35. 
3, v.e. To render desolate: p. 231, 1. 8. 'Desoler. To desolate; 
lonelie, solitary, deavelie, or desart ; to deuast, waste extreamely, 
tterly.* Cotgrave, Fr. Diet. 
, s6. Spite: p. 61, 1. 27. 

* Full of dispitCt bloody as the hunter.' 

Shakespeare, Twelfth Night, iii. 4. 243. 
jedfp.p. Left destitute, abandoned: p. 129, 1. 31. Bacon uses 
ate ' as a verb in Essay xxxiii. p. 143 : 'It is the sinfiiUest thing in 
rid, to forsake or destitute a plantation, once in forwardnesse.' 
inate, adj. Definite : p. 209, 1. 25. 

ination, sb. The solution or decision of a question : p. 173, 1. 7. 
Dw used rather in the sense of * resolution ' which itself once was 
lent to • solution.* 

adj. Devoted : p. 42, 1. 8. 

3usl7, adv. Dexterously: p. 214, 1. 32. This is the form of the 
n the editions of 1605, 1629, 1633, and in Shakespeare, Twelfth 

i. 5. 66 : * Dexteriously, good madonna.' In p. 240, 1. 15, the word 

as usual. 

iium, sb. P. 140, 1. 32. See note, 
re, sb. Office of dfctator, dictatorship : p. 65, 1. 33. 
ce, sb. A distinguishing mark, a badge : p. 4, L 14 ; p. 47, 1. 4, 
ildry a difference is * a figure added to a coat of arms to distinguish 
rsons or families who bear the same arms, and to indicate their 
is to the original bearer.' (Webster, Diet.) Hence, in Shakespeare, 
iv. 5. 183; *0 you must wear your rue with a difference*; and, 
^do, i. I, 69; 'Let him bear it for a difference between himself 

horse. 

g, adj. Different : p. 10, 1. 25 ; p. 28, 1. 33, &c. 
, adj. Difficult: p. 217, 1. lo. 'Difficile: com. Difficile, difficult; 
neasie, troublesome, intricate, painefull, almost impossible.' Cot- 
Fr. Diet. 

1, p.p. Arranged: p. 154, 1. 28. *We have cause to be glad 
alters are so well digested.* Shakespeare, Ant. and CI. ii. 2. 179. 
ition, sb. Literally, a combat widi swords ; hence, a quarrel or 
irersy: p. 33, 1. 20. 

on, sb. Dilation, expanded description: p. 1 1 7*1- 32. 
adj. Diluted ; and so, feeble : p. 260, 1. 16. 
, V. /. Literally, to disqualify ; then, to pronounce disqualified, to 
ge: p. 13, 1. 7; p. 153, 1. 32; p. 176, 1. 32. Comp. Shakespeare, 
a Like It, v. 4. 80 ; ' He disabled my judgement' 



346 OLOSSARF. 

Disallowed, ^. ^. Disapproved: p. 27, 1. 13; p. 41, 1. 31. See I P< 

ii. 4» 7- 
Discern, V. /. To distinguish between, recognize: p. 136, I. 20. *1 

discern of* : p. 203, 1. 18. Comp. * accept of/ * define of.* 
Discliarge, sb. The phrase ' discharge of cares ' signifies delivery from tl 

charge or burden of cares: p. 77, 1. 20. 
Discliarged, p.p. Dismissed, got rid of: p. 187, 1. 30. 
Disclaim in. To disclaim all share in, renounce: p. 73* 1* 15* '^^ 
cowardly rascal, nature disclaims in thee : a tailor made thee/ Shake 
speare, Lear, ii. 2. 59. 
Discontents, sb. Causes of disaffection : p. 58, 1. 23. 
*His disconteiUs are unremoveably 
Coupled to nature/ Shakespeare, Tim. of Adi. y. 9. 327. 
Discontinuation, sb. A solution of continuity : p. 139, 1. 11. 
Discourse of reason. The power of inferring one thing from ano^ 
the reasoning faculty, as distinguished from reason : p. a 8, L 1 3. Com 
pare Shakespeare, Haml. i. 2. 150: 

* A beast, that wants discourse of reason. 
Would have moum*d longer.* 
And Troilus and Cressida, ii. 2. 116 : 

* Or is your blood 
So madly hot that no discourse of reason 
Nor fear of bad success in a bad cause, 
Can qualify the same?* 
Shakespeare uses ' discourse ' alone in the same sense, HamL £▼. 4. 36 : 
* Sure, he that made us with such large discourse. 
Looking before and after, gave us not 
That capability and godlike reason 
To fiist in us unused.' 
Discoursing, adj. Discursive, shifting: p. 1 19, 1. 9. The figure ; 

evidently taken from a sandbank. See p. 120, 11. 1-5. 
Discover, v. t. To uncover, lay bare : p. 9, 1. 10. Comp. Ps. zzix. 9. 
Disesteem, v. t. To depreciate, undervalue : p. 20, 1. 28. * Disestimer. T 
disesteeme, neglect, contemne, set luught by, make no reckoning of 
Cotgrave, Fr. Diet. 
Disguisement, sb. A disguising, disguise: p. 123, 1. 19. 
Disincorporate, adj. Disincorporated, dissevered : p. 258, 1. 32. 
Dismantled, p. p. Unmasked, stripped of disguise : p. 238, L 19. Coo 
pare Shakespeare, Lear, i. i. 220: 

'That she 

. . . . should in this trice of time 
Commit a thing so monstrous, to dismantU 
So many folds of favour/ 
Dispose, V. t. To arrange: p. 44, 1. 23; p. 81, 1. 25. 
Disposition, sb. Arrangement: p. 44, 1. 27. Of studies, sajrs Baco 
their chief use ' for ability, is in the iudgement and dispoatiom of bos 
nesse/ Essay 1. p. 204. 
Distaste, sb. Disgust : p. 8, 1. 8. * Prosperity is not without many fear 

and distastes* Essay v. p. 17. 
Distemper, v.t. To derange, disorder : p. 134, 1. 28. * The mtHgnanc 



GLOSSARY, 347 

ly fate might perhaps distemper yours.* Shakespeare, Twelfth Night, 

• 5- . ^ 

nguish., V, i. To assert distinctly, decide : p. 1 66, 1. 3. 

ilued, p,p. Depreciated: p. 237, 1. 3. 

• But in chief 

For that her reputation was disvalued 

In levity.' Shakespeare, Meas. for Meas. v. I. 221. 

rs, adj. Different; and so, several: p. 25, 1. 32 ; p. 85, 1. 31. * For 

eed, every sect of them, hath a divers posture, or cringe by themselves.* 

ay iii. p. 9. 

rse, adj. Different: p. 39, 1. 27 ; p. 85, 1. 15. 

nation, sh. Foretelling of future events : p. 87, 1. 25. * Diuination, 

Southsa3ring, & teUing things by coniecture, Mantice.' Baret, 
irearie, 

ilsion, sh. A tearing asunder: p. 189, 1. 13. 'Divulsion: f. Adivul- 
n, or pulling vp; also, a cutting, section, or division.* Cotgrave, 
.Diet. 

xnatical, sh. Dogmatical statement, dogma : p. 1 5 2, 1. 30. 
)r, sb. Grief, suffering : p. 140, 1. 5. * A minde fixt, and bent upon 
mewhat, that is good, doth avert the dolors of death,* Essay ii. p. 7. 
lestical, adj. Domestic: p. 223, 1. 16. *D6mestique: com. DomeS" 
all, housall, of our household.* Cotgrave, Fr. Diet, 

tive, sb, A gift, largess: p. 48, 1. 14; p. 71, 1. I. * For their men 

nrarre ; it is a dangerous state, where they live and remaine in a body, 
id are used to donatives* Essay xix, p. 8 1, 
ation, sb. Endowment: p. 79, 1. I. 
ibt, V. i. To hesitate through fear, and then, to fear : p. 16, 1. 28 ; 

26, 1. 8. 

'I doubt some danger does approach you nearly.* 

Shakespeare, Macb. iv. 2. 67. 
>umy, adj. Turbid : p. 246, 1. 16. Halliwell (Arch, and Prov. Diet.) 
ives the word as a Devonshire provincialism. Chaucer uses * drovy.' 
)wn, V. I. To be drowned : p. 92, 1. 27. 

)wth, sb. Drought: p. 151, 1. 23. Compare Pericles, iii. Gower, 8. 
Iceness, sb. Sweetness, p. 238, 1. a I. 



E. 

iiliest, adv. Most easily : p, 41, 1. 29, 

itasy, sb, A trance : p. 145, 1. 24. A state in which the functions of 
le senses are temporarily suspended. Such was the * trance ' {HxaTaais) 
ito which the Apostle Peter fell (Acts x. 10). See Shakespeare, 0th. 
M. 80 : 

* I shifted him away. 
And laid good *scuse upon your ecstasy.* 
sentries, sb. According to the Ptolemaic system of astronomy, the 
apposed circular orbits described by the planets about the earth, which 
ras not in the centre: p. 161, 1. 30. 



348 



GLOSSARF. 



Edition, sb. Promulgation, publication: p. 266, 1. 5. 

Effectual, adj. Energetic, effective, practical: p. 235, I. 1 7. 'Neitk 

can they (i. e. vain persons) be secret, and therefore not effwiuaU,' Et 

liv. p. 216. 
Elected, p.p. Chosen : p. 158, 1. 28. 

' Why hast thou gone so £ir. 
To be unbent when thou hast ta*en thy stand. 
The elected deer before thee ? ' Shakespeare, Cymb. iiL 4. 112. 
Election, sh. Choice : p. 46, 1. 18 ; p. 49, 1. 9. * But contrariwise ii 

favour, to use men with much difference and election, is good.* Eatf 

xlviii. p. 199. See also Haml. iii. 2. 69. 
Elegancy, sb. Elegance : p. 47, 1. 33 ; p. 64, L 18. ' But yet, sina 

princes will have such things (i. e. masques), it is better, they shoold be 

graced with elegancy , then daubed with cost. Essay xzxviu p. 1 56. 
Elenclie, sb. From the Greek IXc7xo«, a term in logic, whidi is definel 

as ' a syllogism by which the adversary is forced to contradict hiouetf *: 

p. 159, U. 18, 25; p. 160, 1. 14. 
Elogry, sb. A paneg}Tic, eulogy: p. 94, 1. 31. 
Emancipate, p.p. Emancipated, set free: p. 130, 1. II. 
Embased, ^.^ Debased, deteriorated: p. 127, 1. 9. 'And thatmiiW 

of falshood, is like allay in coyne of gold and silver ; which they mafa 

the metall worke the better, but it embasetk it.' Essay i. p. 3. 
Embassage, sb. An embassy. * To come in embassage * ^ to come oa 11 

embassy : p. ii, 1. I. * I will ... do you zny embassage to the Pigmiei. 

Shakespeare, Much Ado, ii. 1. 277. 
Emulate with. To emulate, vie with: p. 112, 1. 3a. The constXQCtioi 

is an imitation of the Latin * aemulari cum aliquo.' 
Emulation, sb. Envy, rivalry in a bad sense : p. 49, 1. 29. 
•Whilst emulation in the army crept.' 

Shakespeare, Tr. and Cr. iL 9. ai^ 

It is now used exclusively in a good sense, as in p. 50, 1. 18. 
Enable, v. t. To make able, to qualify : p. 1 2, 1. 23 ; p. 4a, ]. 23. Coop. 

1 Tim. i. 12. 
Enablement, sb. A qualifying or making able, qualificatioo : p> 59* 

1. 3 ; p. 79, 1. 9. 
End. 'To the end*=in order: p. 17, 1. 19; p. 46, 1. 6 ; p. 48, L 20^ 

• Nay, some undertake sutes, with a full purpose, to let them bM\ mtm 

end, to gratifie the adverse partie, or competitour.* Essay zliz. p. aoi. 
Endeavour, v. t. To strive after, aim at, attempt : p. 10, 1. 10. Obsofcte 

construction. 

• But I'll endeavour deeds to match these words.* 

Shakespeare, Tr. and Cr. vr. 5. a59. 
Engaged, p. p. Literally, bound by a gage or pledge ; and so, pledged c< 

committed to a certain course of conduct : p. 234, 1. 29. 
Engine, sb. A contrivance, device, requiring ingenium or skill : p. 24I1 

1. 18. 
Enginery* ^b. Engineering: p. 122, 1. 8. 
Enterprised, p.p. Attempted, undertaken : p. 97, 1. 33. •And thcrefoK 

is not by any to be enterprised, nor taken in hand, unadvisedly.' Marriage 

Service. 



GLOSSARY. 349 

title, V. L To give a title to, designate : p. 26, 1. 19. 

ucleate, v. t. To extract as a kernel : p. 256, 1. 27. 

iimerate, p.p. Enumerated : p. 83, 1. 24. 

ivious, adj. Malicious ; used in a much stronger sense than at present : 

■>. 18, 1. 3. 

*But none can drive him from the envious plea 
Of forfeiture, of justice, and his bond.' 

Shakespeare, Mer. of Ven. iii. 3. 285. 
avy, sb. Ill-will: p. 55, 1. 3. 
nvy, V. i. To bear ill-will, to grudge : p. 38, 1. 8. 
5\ire, sh. An Epicurean : p. 196, 1. 13. 
>diice, sh. Essential importance : p. 164, 1. 30. 
ouate, sb. State : p. 13, 11. 28, 30 ; p. 23, 1. 27 ; p. 70, 1. 13. Condition : 

". 43. 1- I- 
.eein of. To esteem, reckon, estimate: p. 178, 1. 6; p. 228, 1. 24. 

Whosoever esteemetb too much q/* amorous affection, quitteth both riches, 

"ud wisedome.' Essay x. p. 37. Comp. * define of,' * discern of.* 

iuation, sb. Fermentation, agitation of mind: p. 195, 1. 20. 

ly ery, pron. Each: p. 14, 1. 21 ; p. 136, 1. i. * Every of them is carried 

swiftly, by the highest motion, and softly in their owne motion.* Essay 

»v. p. 56. 

ilnable, adj. Capable of being examined : p. 255, 1. 33 ; p. 256, 

1. xO. 

3xceed, v. i. To be excessive : p. 132, 1. 4. 

' Marg. I saw the Duchess of Milan's gown that they praise so. 

Hero. O, that exceeds^ they say.' Shakespeare, Much Ado, iii. 4. 17. 
Sxcellency, sh. Excellence : p. 55, 1. 3. * As if nature, were rather busie, 

not to erre, then in labour, to produce excellency* Essay xliii. p. 176. 
ilxcept, p.p. Excepted : p. 68, 1. 8 ; p. 116, 1. 6. * Christ in the truth of 

our nature was made like unto us in all things, sin only except.* Art. XV, 
Sxcusation, sb. Excuse: p. 24, 1. 6; p. 181, 1. 25. 'Prefaces, and 

passages, and excusationSf and other speeches of reference to the person, 

are great wasts of time.' Essay xxv. p. 102. 
Sxemplar, adj. Pattern, used as an adjective; conspicuous: p. 92, 11. 10, 

24; p. 222,1. 33. 
Sxhibit, v.t. To administer as a remedy; a medical term: p. 131, 

132- 
Sxpeot, v./. To await: p. 16, 1. 18. 

* Let's in, and there expect their coming.* 

Shakespeare, Mer. of Ven. v. I. 49. 
Bxpedite, adj. Unencumbered, expeditious, speedy : p. 159, 1. 16. 
Bzpostulation, sh. Demand : p. 64, 1. 26. 
Expulse, v.t. To drive out, expel : p. 16, 1. 29 ; p. 173, 1. 30. 
*For ever should they be expulsed from France.* 

Shakespeare, I Hen. VI. iii. 3. 25. 
Exquisite, adj. Elaborate, minute: p. 24, 1. 14; p. 28, 1. 23; p. 35, 

1. 20. 
Extemporal, adj. Extemporary: p. 8a, 1. 8. *Sir Nathaniel, will you 
hear an extemporal epitaph on the death of the deer?' Shakespeare, 
Loye's Labour's Lost, iv. 2. 50. 



^^O GLOSSARY. 

Extensive, adj. Capable of being extended: p. 31, L 23. Compan 

denvtnstrative, 
Extenuate, V. /. To lessen, depreciate: p. 13, 1. 6. * ExiemiaAig vol 
blasting of your merit/ Bacon, Letter of Advice to Essex (Works, ix. 41). 
' Speak of me as I am ; nothing extenuate^ 
Nor set aught down in malice.' 

Shakespeare, 0th. ▼. 3. 34a. 
Extern, adj. Extemal : p. 106, 1. 16; p. 199, 1. 20. 

'When my outward action doth demonstrate 
The native act and figure of my heart 
In compliment eoctem* Shakespeare, Oth. i. 1. 65. 

Extinguish, v. i. To be extinguished : p. 9 a, 1. 27. 
Extinguishment, sh. Extinction; p. 191, L 21. 
Extirper, sh. An extirpator: p. 52, 1. 2. 
Extreme, adv. Extremely: p. 243, 1. 16. 'Acting in song, espedaBr 
in dialogues, hath an extreme good grace/ Essay zxxviL p. 15^ 
1. 10. 
Extremely, adv. 'Most extremely compounded '^ compounded m Ai 

most extreme degree : p. 134, 1. 8. 
Exulceration, sb. An ulcer : p. 68, 1. 32. 



F. 

Face out, v. /. To confront boldly, brazen out : p. 938, 1. 8. 

Facile, adj. Easily swayed, fickle, pliant: p. 222, 1. 27. 'If t^^ 

(i. e. judges) be facile, and corrupt, you shall have a servant, five t 

worse than a wife/ Essay viii. p. 27. 
Facility, sb. Pliancy : p. 238, 1. 21. See quotation under Apply. 
Facture, sb. Shape, form: p. 131, 1. 4; p. 138, 1. 19. 'Factoe: 

f. The facture^ workemanship, framing, making of a thing/ CotgitT^ 

Ft. Diet. 
Faculty, sb. Power, influence: p. 136, 1. 12. 

'Besides, this Duncan 
Hath borne Ins faculties so meek.' 

Shakespeare, Macb. i. 7* I?* 
Fair, adj. Handsome: p. 32, 1. 30. 'It is a reverend thing, to sec t 

ancient castle, or building not in decay ; or to see a fnrt tunber tn> 

sound and perfect/ Essay xiv. p. 52. 
Faith, sb. The Christian faith or religion : p. 49, L lO ; p. 132, L 7 

p. 255, 1. II. 
False, adv. Falsely: p. 182, 1. 11. 
Fallace, sb. Fallacy : p. 159, 1. 30. 
Fallacy, sb. Deception: p. 71, 1. 22. 'Fallace: f. A foBaeit; goJJCj 

deceit, wile, tromperie, a craftie tricke, cheating, sleight, oonsening denioe> 

Cotgrave, Fr. Diet. 
Fall out, v. i. To happen : p. 28, 1. 7 ; p. 103, 1. 16. 
Fame, s6. Report, rumour: p. 34, 1. 21. See Gen. xlv. 16. 'Seditio* 

tumults, and seditious fames, differ no more, bat as brotlier and sisHf 

masculine and feminine.' Essay xv. p. 55. 



GLOSSARK 351 

'astest, adv. Most closely: p. 18, 1. 26. 

'elicity, sb. Luck, good fortune : p. 227, 1. 15. * The pencil! of the 
holy Ghost, hath laboured more, in describing the afflictions of lob, 
then the felicities of Salomon.' Essay v. p. 17, 
i'ind strange. To wonder; p. 78, .'. 14; p. 94, 1. 25; p. 141, I. 21. 

* It cannot be found strange* it cannot be wondered at: p. 149, 1. 33. 

Lat. non est cur miretur quispiam. 
Fitteth, is befitting: p. 82, 1. 3. 
Fixing, sb. Fixed position: p. 47, 1. 32. Compare *fixure* in Troilus 

and Cressida, i. 3. loi. 
Flexuous, adj. Winding, intricate : p. 1 18, 1. 15. 
Fluctuant, adj. Floating : p. 98, 1. 26. 
Fly, V. t. To chase flying, as with a hawk : p. 209, 1. lo. ' But now, 

if a man can tame this monster, and bring her to feed at the hand, 

and govern her, and with her fly other ravening fowle, and kill them, 

it is somewhat worth.* Essay of Fame, p. 240. 
For = as for : p. 71, 1. 8. 

Force. * Of force '=of necessity, necessarily : p. 106, 1. I7« 
Forth, redundant in the phrases * how far forth,* * as far forth * : 

p. 176, 1. 12; p. 257, 1. 30. •Forth of* = out of: p. 231, 1. 14. See 

Gen. viii. 16. 
Fortify, v. i. To become strong : p. 209, 1. 4. 
Forwards. In the phrase • so forwards *=: so forth, so on: p. 48, 1. 9. 
Frame. *Out of frame * = out of order: p. 217, 1. 19. *And therfore, 

when great ones, in their owne particular motion, move violently. . . . 

it is a signe, the orbs are out of frame,* Essay xv. p. 56. 
Fret, V. t. To eat away : p. 91, 1. 7. See Lev. xiii. 55. 
Frets, sb. p. 162, 1. 17. Figures in architecture, used in ornamenting 

the roofs of houses, * formed by small fillets intersecting each other 

at right angles.' Parker's Glossary of Architecture. The Egyptian key 

pattern is a familiar example. * Fringotteries : f. Frets ; cranklings, wrigled 

flourishing, in caruings, &c.' Cotgrave, Fr. Diet. A. S.frcetu^ an ornament. 
Pripper, sb, A dealer in old clothes: p. 176, 1. 25. *Fripier: m. A 

Fripier; or broker; a mender, or trimmer vp of old garments, and 

a seller of them so mended.' Cotgrave, Fr. Diet. Shakespeare (Temp. 

iv. I. 225) uses ' a frippery' for an old-clothes shop. 
Pro, prep. From : p. 68, 1. 10. 

Pimie, sb. Vapour, smoke ; used metaphorically : p. 89, 1. 25. 
Funambalo, sb. A rope-dancer : p. 165, 1. 23. * We see the industry 

and practice of tumblers and funambulos, what eflfects of great wonder 

it bringeth the body of man unto.* Bacon, Disc, touchmg Helps for 

the Intcll. Powers (Works, vii. p. 99). 
Futility, sb. Idle talkativeness, blabbing of secrets : p. 248, 1. 33. 

Bacon (Essay vi. p. 20) uses the adjective 'futile.* *As for talkers 

and futile persons, they are commonly vaine, and credulous withall.' 

And again in Essay xx. p. 84. 



H 



35:2 GLOSSARY. 



a. 

Gtomester, s5. A player at any game ; not necessarily a gambler : p. 198, 

1. 33. 
Generosity, sh. Nobility : p. 69, 1. 30. 
Gigantine, adj. Giantlike : p. 194, 1. 13. Referring to the war of the 

giants against Jupiter. 
Glance, sh. An allusion, hint: p. 57, 1. 17. 
Glass, sb, A mirror : p. 108, 1. 6 ; p. 161, 1. 6 ; p. 176, 1. 7. In the New 

Atlantis Bacon uses 'glass ' for * lens' (Works, iii. 162). 
Glory, sb. Ostentation: p. 7, 1. 37; p. 112, 1. 19; p. 171, 1. 4. See 

Essay Ivi. p. 224, 1. 31 : * Whatsoever is above these, is too much; and 

proceedeth either ofglofy and willingnesse to speake ; or of impatience to 

hear, &c. 
Go, v. /. Used in a transitive sense : p. 83, 1. 29. 
Go about. To endeavour: p. 173, 1. 10. See Rom. x. 3. 
Grace, v. /. To compliment, praise : p. 236, 1. 29. Comp. Essay Ivi. 

p. 225 : * There is due from the iudge, to the advocate, some commend- 
ation and gracing^ where causes are well handled, and faire pleaded.' 
Gravelled, p.p. Puzzled. To be gravelled »= to hesitate: p. 57, L 15. 

' Nay, you were better speak first, and when you were gravdltd for 

lack of matter, you might take occasion to kiss.' Shakespeare, As Yoo 

Like It, iv. i. 74. 
Greoia, sh. Greece : p. •«, 1. 25 ; p. 13, 1. 10. See Dan. viii. 21. 
Grecians, sh. Greeks: p. 11, L 15. Comp. Joel iii. 6. 
Grift, v,t. To graft: p. 255, 1. 22. The ed. of 1605 has grifU, which 

in ed. 1629 became grift, and in ed. id^^ graft, Baret (Alvearie, s. r.) 

gives * To griffe. Inserere arbori.* 
Grossly, adv. Clumsily, unskilfully : p. 37, L 7; p. 153, 1. 23. 
Grot, sh. A grotto or cave : p. 162, 1. 26. 
Ground, sh. The plain-song of a tune, on which the variations or desaots 

are made : p. 197, 1. ii. 
Ground, sh. Foundation : p. 76, 1. 12. 
Ground, v.t. To lay the foundation of: p. 113, 1. 9. 
Grounded, p.p. Well founded: p. no, 1. 15. 'Well grounded *= with 

good foundations: p. 217, 1. 21. | 

Grounds, sb. Soils : p. 207, 1. 20. Among the disadvantages in the 

site of a house. Bacon enumerates ' want of fruitfolnesse, and mixtuic 

of grounds of severall natures.' Essay xlv. p. 180. 



H. 

Hand. To be in hand with = to have in hand, to treat of: p. 18, 1. 30; 

p. 98, 1. 32. 
Hap, V. f. To happen: p. 61,1.4. 'The remnant of people, which hap^ 

to be reserved, are commonly ignorant and mountancus people* 

Eiszy Iviii. p. 232. 



El 



b 

lb 
CI 
k] 
Lc 
U 

« 
1 

El 



3 



I 



GLOSSARY. 353 

Sardlier, adv. With more difficulty: p. 245, 1. 15. 

Sardliest, adv. With most difficulty: p. 217, 1. 5. 

hardness, sh. Hardiness : p. 143, 1. 4. 

Sarmonical, adj. Harmonious: p. 197, 1. 7* 

Seat, sb. Anger: p. 221, 1. 15. 

Senooh, sb. Enoch: p. 190, 1. 33. This form is adopted in the oldef 

English versions of the Old Testament, and in the Authorized Version 

of I Chr. i. 3, while in the New Testament the Greek form Enoch is 

followed. 
Serdman, sb, A herdsman: p. 69, 1. 25. See Gen. xiii. 7* 
IHeroical, adj. Heroic: p. 18, 1. 6; p. 51, 1. 32, &c: 

* But 'gainst your privacy 
The reasons are more potent and heroical* 

Shakespeare, Tr. and Cr. iii. 3. 192. 
Seteroclite, sb, A word irregularly declined : p. 87, 1. 4. 
His. Its: p. 89, 1. 10; p. 120, 1. 31 ; p. 148, 1. 15. 
ISiBs used as the sign of the genitive. 'Socrates his ironical doubting:* 

p. 42, 1. 2. 
Sistoriographer, sb. Historian: p. 17, 1. 30. 

IHold, V. /. To keep to : p. 141, 1. 7. Xo restrain, withhold : p. I5> I. IX. 
Siold of. To pertain to, have to do with; p. 2, L 32; p. 124, 1. I; 

p. 228, 1. 16. 
Solden, ^.^. Held: p. 69, 1. 31. 

Solpen,^./. Helped: p. 92, 1. 22. See Ps. Ixxxiii. 8; Dan. xi. 34. 
Sonesty, sb. Used to denote high and honourable character, and hence 

transferred to moral beauty and grace : p. 22, 1. 8. 
Humanisty sb, A student of the humanities {liiera humaniores): p. 135, 

1. 33. The term is still used in the Scotch universities. 
Humanity, sb. The knowledge of man; human philosophy, as distin- 
guished from natural theology and natural philosophy: p. 105, 1. 19; 

p. 130, 1. I. It is contradistinguished from divinity in p. 28, 1. 20; 

p. 58, 1. 8. 
Humorous, adj^ Fanciful, capricious: p. 18, I. 12; p. 245, 1. 9. 'As 

humorous as winter.' Shakespeare, 2 Hen. IV, iv. 4. 34. 
HumouTj s6. Caprice: p. 49, 1. 32. 

' In humours like the people of this world.* 

Shakespeare, Rich. II, y. 5. 10. 

I. 

loe, sh, A flaw in a jewel: p. 197, 1. 17. Compare the Fr. gla^ons, 

which Cotgrave explains * Isicles, or flakes of yce ; also, flawes in stones 

resembling flakes of yce.' 
Ill, adj, B^d : p. 69, 1. 1 1. * Neither is it ill aire onely, that maketh an ill 

seat, but ill wayes, ill markets.' Essay xlv. p. 180. 
ULaqueation, s6. An entangling in argument, a sophism: p. 159, 1. 17; 

p. 177.1. 21. 
Illuminate, ^.^. Illuminated, enlightened: p. 53, 1. 16. 
Illustrate, v.t. To render illustrious: p. 37, 1. 16. 
Illustrate, p.p. Illustrated : p. 40, 1. 2. 

A a 



352 GLOSSARY. 



a. 

Gamester, th, A player at any game ; not necessarily a gambler : p. 19 

1. 23. 
Generosity, sh. Nobility : p. 69, 1. 30. 
Gigantine, adj. Giantlike : p. 194, 1. 13. Referring to the war of tl 

giants against Jupiter. 
Glance, sb. An allusion, hint: p. 57, 1. 17. 
Glass, sb. A mirror : p. 108, 1. 6 ; p. 161, L 6 ; p. 176, 1. 7. In theNc 

Atlantis Bacon uses * glass ' for * lens' (Works, iii. 162). 
Glory, sb. Ostentation: p. 7, I. 27; p. 112, 1. 19; p. 171, L 4. S 

Essay Ivi. p. 224, 1. 31 : * Whatsoever is above these, is too mudi; ai 

proceedeth either oi glory and willingnesse to speake ; or of impatienoe ' 

hear, &c. 
Go, V. t. Used in a transitive sense : p. 83, 1. 29. 
Go about. To endeavour: p. 173, 1. 10. See Rom. x. 3. 
Grace, v, t. To compliment, praise : p. 236, 1. 29. Comp. Eiay H 

p. 225 : * There is due from the iudge, to the advocate, some comineo 

ation and gracing^ where causes are well handled, and faire pleaded.' 
Gravelled, p.p. Puzzled. To be gravelled » to hesitate: p. 57* L I 

' Nay, you were better speak first, and when you were grtaidUd i 

lack of matter, you might take occasion to kiss.' Shakespeare, As Y( 

Like It, iv. i. 74. 
Grecia, sb. Greece : p. ^^ I. 25 ; p. 13, 1. 10. See Dan. viii. 21. 
Grecians, sb. Greeks: p. 11, 1. 15. Comp. Joel iii. 6. 
Grift, V. t. To graft : p. 255, 1. 22. The ed. of 1605 has gnftt, whi 

in ed. 1629 became grift^ and in ed. id^Z graft, Baret (iUvearie, s. 1 

gives ' To griffe. Inserere arbori.* 
Grossly, adv. Clumsily, unskilfully : p. 37, L 7; p. 153, 1. 23. 
Grot, sb. A grotto or cave : p. 163, 1. 26. 
Ground, sb. The plain-song of a tune, on which the variations or descai 

are made : p. 197* 1< il. 
Ground, sb. Foundation : p. 76, 1. I3. 
Ground, v.t. To lay the foundation of: p. 113, L 9. 
Grounded, p.p. Well founded: p. no, 1. 15. *Well grounded'ewi 

good foundations: p. 217, 1. 21. 
Grounds, sb. Soils : p. 207, I. 20. Among the disadvantages in t 

site of a house. Bacon enumerates * want of fraitfnlnesse, and mizt( 

of grounds of severall natures.' Essay xlv. p. 180. 



H. 

Hand. To be in hand with = to have in hand, to treit of : p. 18, L • 

p. 98. 1. 32. 
Hap, V. i. To happen : p. 61, 1. 4. * The remnant of people, which i 

to be reserved, are commonly ignorant and moanfaiiaQt peof 

Essay Iviii. p. 232. 



GLOSSARF. 353 

3r, adv. With more difficulty : p. 245, 1. 15. 

3st, adv. With most difficulty: p. 217, 1. 5. 

)ss, sb. Hardiness : p. 143, 1. 4. 

nical, adj, Hannonious: p. 197, 1. 7* 

b. Anger: p. 221, 1. 15. 

1, sb. Enoch : p. 190, I. 33. This form is adopted in the older 

h versions of the Old Testament, and in the Authorized Version 

3hr. i. 3, while in the New Testament the Greek form Enoch is 

ed. 

an, sb. A herdsman: p. 69, 1. 25. See Gen. xiii. 7* 

al, adj. Heroic: p. 18, 1. 6; p. 51, 1. 32, &c: 

• But 'gainst your privacy 
The reasons are more potent and heroieal* 

Shakespeare, Tr. and Cr. iii. 3. I92. 
elite, sb, A word irregularly declined : p. 87, 1. 4. 
ts : p. 89, 1. 10 ; p. 120, 1. 31 ; p. 148, 1. 15. 
ed as the sign of the genitive. 'Socrates his ironical doubting:* 
1. 2. 

ograplier, sb. Historian: p. 17, 1. 30. 

'./. To keep to : p. 141, 1. 7. To restrain, withhold: p. 15, 1. IX. 
»f. To pertain to, have to do with: p. a, L 32; p. 124, 1. I ; 
\ 1. 16. 

iyp.p. Held: p. 69, 1. 31. 

lyp.p. Helped: p. 92, 1. 22. See Ps. Ixxxiii. 8; Dan. ». 34. 
}y, sb. Used to denote high and honourable character, and hence 
erred to moral beauty and grace : p. 22, 1. 8. 
list, sb. A student of the humanities {liiera humamores): p. I35> 

The term is still used in the Scotch universities, 
lity, sb. The knowledge of man; human philosophy, as d|stin-< 
:d from natural theology and natural philosophy: p. 105, 1. 19; 
o, 1. I. It is contradistinguished from divinity in p. 28, 1. ao; 
. 1. 8. 

reus, adj. Fanciful, capricious: p. 18, 1. 12; p. 245, 1. 9. *As 
rous as winter.' Shakespeare, 2 Hen. IV, iv. 4. 34. 
, sb. Caprice : p. 49, 1. 32. 

* In humours like the people of this world.* 

Shakespeare, Rich. II, ▼. 5. 10. 

I. 

. A flaw in a jewel : p. 197, I. 1 7. Compare the Fr. gla^ons, 

1 Cotgrave explains * Isicles, or flakes of yce ; also, flawes in stones 

ibling flakes of yce.' 

'. Bad : p. 69, 1. 1 1. * Neither is it ill aire onely, that maketh an til 

but ill wayes, ill markets.' Essay xlv. p. 180. 

sation, sb. An entangling in argument, a sophism: p* I59» L 17; 

7,1. 21. 

iia.te,p.p. Illuminated, enlightened: p. 53, 1. 1$. 

•ate, v.t. To render illustrious: p. 37» 1. 16. 

ate, p.p. Illustrated: p. 40, 1. 2. 

A a 



354 GLOSSART. 

Tmnginninty tb. One who imagines : p. 133, L 39 ; p. 146, L 4. 

Imbsxred, p.p. Inteimpted, diecked : p. 46, L 37. 

Imbase, v.i. To debase, degrade : p. 37, L ii ; p. g/6, 1. 18. *N 

love maketh mankinde ; firiendlj love perfecteth it; bat wanton 

comipteth, and imbaseth it.' Essay x. p. 38. 
lininediate, adj. Closely connected, proximate : p. 14, L 14. ' Imm 

times' are those which are not separated t^ any interval ban 

present. 
Immediatelyy euh. Directly, without the intervention of anjrthing 

p. 154, L 14. Now generally used of time only. 
Import, V. /. To have a bearing upon, affect : p. 163, L 34. 
Impostmnation, sb. An abscess : p. 139, L ii. 
Imprese, sb. A device with a motto : p. 167, L 6. ' An Imprest (s 

Italians call it) is a devise in picture with his Motte, <x Word, bon 

noble and learned personages, to notifie some particular conceit of 

owne.' Camden, Remaines, p. 158 (ed. 1605). 
Impressioiiy sb. Stamp, lasting character ; used in a moral sense : ] 

1. 5. Comp. p. 314, L 34; *by imprindng upon their souls cha; 

and p. 69, 1. 17; * for truth prints goodness.' 
Iniprofioienoe» A. Want of progress or proficiency: p. 119, L I. 
Impulsion^ sb. Impulse, impelling cause : p. 137, L 19. 
lUtprep. Into: p. 72, 1. 28. 'Conversant m ' s: conversant widi: ] 

1. 16. With present partidples in is used like the Latin gerund: ' 

they are in tuning their instruments,' p. 251, 1. 32. Comp. *in d< 

ing,' Gen. xxxv. 18; *in seething,' I Sam. iL 13; *m bail 

I Kings vi. 7, 
Incensed, ^.j^. Burnt: p. 368, 1. 36. 
Incensing, adj. Exasperating: p. 331, L 14. 
Inception, sb. Beginning: p. 194, 1. 4; p. 313, L 13. 
Incertainty, 56. Uncertain^ : p. 250, 1. 13. 
Inci(Xence, sb. Coincidence: p. 123, L 30. 'It hath an inddenet 

it's it coincides with it: p. 194, 1. 9. 
Incidently, adv. Incidentally : p. 183, 1. 6; p. 198, 1. 9. 
Included, p.p. Shut up, inclosed; p. 162, 1. 39. 
Incompatible, adj. Incongruous : p. 10, 1. 35. Used here in an ob 

construction. See also p. 212, 1. 24. 
Incomprehension, sb. Want of comprehension : p. 136, L 36. A 1 

lation of the Greek acatalepsia, p. 154, 1. 4. 
Inconvenient, adj. Unsuitable : p. 81, 1. 8. 
Incorporal, adj. Incorporeal: p. 45, 1. 17: 

* Alas, how is't with you. 
That yOu do bend your eye on vacancy. 
And with the incorporal air do hold discourse?* 

Shakespeare, HamL liL 4. I 
te,^. p. Incorporated : p. 36, 1. li ; p. 97, L 5. 
'No, it is Casca; one incorporatt 
To our attempts.' Shakespeare, JnL CflBi. L 3. i; 

.p. Running: p. I75» !• '8. 

4j. Impartial : p. 21, L 31. See Eccliis. zlu. 5. Bdo 
ommoii : p. 113, L 37. 






GLossARr. 355 

Indifferently, adv. Impartially: p. 84, 1. 19. Comp. Prayer for the 
Church Militant : * That they may truly and indifferently minister justice.' 
Inditer, sb. A composer: p. 261, 1. 8. 
Induced, />. />. Derived by induction: p. 1 7 1, 1. 9. 
Inducement, sb. An introduiction : p. 83, 1. 16; p. 144, 1. 32; p. 222, 

1. 21. 
Inducing, adj. Introductory, preliminary : p. 83, 1. 29. 
Indulgent, adj. Apt to indulge : as * indtdgent in allusions/ p. 264, 1. 2. 
Induration, sb. Hardening: p. 114, 1. 29. 
Infinite, adj. Innumerable: p. 72, U 19; p. I94> 1. 15. See note on 

p. 72. 
Infinn, v.t. To weaken, invalidate: p. 159, 1. 29. 
Influzion, sb. Inflowing, influence, intromission: p. 145, 11. 20, 27, 32. 
Infolded, ^.^. Involved: p. 54,1. 10. 

Inform, v.t. To instruct, teach: p. 108, 1. 31; p. 254, 1. 24. 'To in- 
form ourselves m'a=to inform or instruct ourselves with regard to: 
p. 232, 1. 30. 
Informed, ^.^. Taught: p. 257, 1. 22 ; p. 264, 1. 33. Animated : p. 105, 
1. 5. Comp. Shakespeare, Coriol. v. 3. 71 : 

* Inform 
Thy thoughts with nobleness.* 
Ingenious, adj. Ingenuous : p. 236, 1. 23. 
Ingurgitation, sb. An immoderate draught: p. 140, 1. 14. 
Inherent to. Inherent in: p. 21, 1. 33. 

Injury, sb. Insolence, contumely: p. 236, 1. 30; p. 238, 1. 20. 
Inquire, v.t. To investigate: p. 89, 1. 11; p. no, U. 14, 25, &c. 
Inquisition, sb. Inquiry, investigation: p. 6, 1. 10; p. 48, 1. 25; p. 88, 

1. 1, &c. See Dent. xix. 18 ; Ps. ix. 12. 
Inquisitor, sb. Searcher : p. 88, I. 24. 
Insatisfaction, sb. Dissatisfaction: p. 210, 1. 29. 
Insinuate, v.t. To introduce indirectly, by winding courses: p. 14, 1. 19. 
Insinuation, sb. Intertwining, intimate connexion: p. 102, 1. 12. Indi- 
rect argument: p. 178, 1. 29. 
Insinuative, adj. Winding itself in, insinuating: p. 148, 1. 19. 
Insolency, sb. Insolence : p. 67, 1. 20 ; p. 227, 1. 22. * To give moderate 
liberty, for griefes, and discontentments to evaporate, (so it be without too 
great insolency or bravery) is a safe way.* Essay xv. p. 61. 
Instance, sb. Urgency: p. 189, 1. 23; p. 243, 1. 25. 
Instrumental, sb. An instrument: p. 80, 1. 11. 

Intelligence, sb. * To have intelligence* — to have an understanding, to 
conespond: p. 36, 1. I. *The arch-flatterer, with whom all the petty 
flatterers have intelligence^ is a mans selfe.' Essay x. p. 37. See Dan. xi. 
30. Information : p. 80, 1. 25. 
Intelligenced, />.^. Informed: p. 233, 1. 13. 
Intelligencer, sb. An informer : p. 80, 1. 26. 

* Richard yet jives, hell's black intelligencer. 
Only reserved their factor, to buy souls 
And send them thither.' Shakespeare, Rich. Ill, iv. 4. *jl. 
Intend, v./. To aim at, direct the attention to: p. 135, 1. 31; p. 138, 
1.6; p. 192, 1. 19; p. 205, 1. 9; p. 218, 1. 22. 'The intending of 

A a 2 



35^ 



GLOSSARY. 



the discretion of behaviour *= attention to, &c. : p. 218, 1. 39. * Romnlns, 

after his death (as they report, or faigne) sent a present to the Romans; 

that, above all, they should intend arms/ Essay zxix. p. 1 25. Ibid. p. 126. 
Intendment, s6. Intention: p. 167,1. 19. 
Intensive, adj. * Intensive upon ' = directed to : p. [46, 1. 4. 
Intent, sh. Intention, purpose : p. 6, 1. 3. See John xiii. 38. 
.Interlace, v.t. To mix: p. 244, 1. 6. 'Interlact not businesse, bat 

of necessities Essay xi. p. 41. 
Intervenient, adj. Incidental: p. 122, I. 18. 'When there is matter 

of law, intervenient in businesse of state.' Essay Ivi. p. 227. 
Into, prep. * Hath an influence m/o'=hath an influence upon : p. 218, L 2. 

Comp. p. 250, II. 16, 17. 'Immersed m/o ' = ' immersed in,' p. 121, 1. 18. 
Intrinsic, adj. Internal; and so, hidden: p. 37, 1. 33. Compare the use 

of * inward.* 
Invent, v.t. To find out, discover: p. 149, 1. 15. 
Invention, sb. Finding, discovery: p. 1 11, 1. 30; p. 149, 1. 2a. 
Inveterate, adj. Long established: p. 115, 1. 20. 
Invooate, v.t. To invoke: p. 40, 1. 27; p. 161, 1. 21. 
Inward, adj. Hidden, secret : p. 248, 1. 28. 

Inwardness, sb. Hidden sense : p. 104, 1. 20. Intimacy : p. 233, U. 8, x8. 
Irony, sb. An ironical speech : p. 88, 1. 33. 
Issay. The old form of spelling * Jesse ' : p. 152, 1. 25. 
Iteration, sb. Repetition: p. 137, 1. 18; p. 202, 1. 33. •Troth tired 

with iteration* Shakespeare, Tr. and Cr. iii. 2. 183. 

J. 

Jocnlary, adj. Belonging to jest or juggling : p. 143, L 28. 

Joy, V. f. To rejoice : p. 6, I. 25. ' There is no man, that imparteth hii 

ioyes to his frend, but he ioyeth the more.' Essay xxviL p. IIO. 
Jud^e, V. i. To give judgement, decide : p. 73f 1* ^8. 
Judged, ^.^. Decided: p. 137, 1. 29. 
Jurisconsult, sb. A lawyer: p. 85, L 32 ; p. 259, L 33. 
Just, adj. Exact : p. 85, 1. 4. 

' If thou cut'st more 
Or less than a just pound.' 

Shakespeare, Mer. of Yen. ir. X. 337. 



Kindly, adj. Natural : p. 140, L 1 2. So in the Litany, ' the kindly finits 

of the earth.* 
Enit, v.t. To become compact: p. 39. t 31. 
Knowledge, sb» A branch of knowledge, a science: p. 5a, L 15; 

p. 50, 1. 16. *To take knowledge of'»'to recognize': p. 48, La; 

p. 226, 1. 24. 

Ii. 

Iiaboured, p.p. Elaborated : p. 78, L 4; p. aao, L & 
Iiarge, adj. Diffuse: p. 181, 1. 10. 



OLOS 

Extent: p. £3, 1. 14 



ivti and monuTneiiti for thole thai died in the wars 

J. 129. 

IKS, sb. Bratiches of ktiowledge ; p. 49,1. 17. 

'Pols to him all tJie learnings that hit time 
Could make bini the receiver or.' 

Shakespeare, Cymb. i. 
dee. ' At iias( Bn'M ' = at least : p, 147,1. IJ. 
».(. To lose; p. 37.]- 5: p. 7^. 1- 'H ?■ 77.1- »; P- ^ 
hil that he Hianes in the handled, he Uaelk in the shire 



.A. The East: p. 34,1. 3a. 

A. Lighloesi, ia 1(1 liieial sense; p. tlG, 1. 13. 

A. A resident ambaiEadoi: p. 15], 1. 11. Spelt aho higir. 
'Lord Angelo, having affairs 10 beivca. 
Intends fou for his swift ambassador, 
Where yon shall be an everlasting leiger' 

Shakespeare, Mias. far Meas. Vxl I. 59. 
kB much ai: p. 113. 1, 9. See Rom. xu. 16. 
ij. Likely: p. 39, l.l3 J p. 185, 1.10. 
idj. More likely : p. 60, 1. 35, 
jodj. More foolish, oi less grave ; p.911,1.13. 
■,adv. Easily; p. 111, 1. 16. ' The traitor in faction lighlty grxX'k 
with it.' Essay, U. p. ao8. 
I, p. p. Drawn, illuslraled with drawings, illumiiialed : p. 30, 1, u. 

adv. Vividly: p.ij.l.s; p. 53, I. 33; p. 55, 1. I. ' Livily 
ling Christian resolution.' Essay v. p. 17. 
.1. To belong: p. 114, 1. lo. 
imitir, sb. Patience, loiigsuffering : p, log, 1. 19. 
roe. Long: p. 18, 1, ai, 
tn, A. Unwillingneis, dislike: p. 1J9, 1. iB, 
if, lb. St^^ierineit : p. lOi, 1. 6. 'Lubricili: f. Lubridtie, 
ineiM. Yncertalntie.' Colgrave, Fr. Diet. 

A. Gain; p. 19, L 7 ; p. 42, 1. 34. ' The stratagems ot prelates 
31 owne ambition and lucre.' Essay ivii. p. 69. 



raey, sb. The holding the office of magistrate : p. »o6, 1. 30. 
?al, adj. Dogmaiic : p. 41, 1. 27 : p. 141, 1. 14; p. 170, I. »7 
rality, sb. Dogmatism ; p. IJ7, 1. 19 ; p. I40, 1. 17. 
J,v.i. To make much of, to extol: p.Ij.l.IE; p. 73, I 



, A. Evil disposition : 



358 GLOssARr. 

Malign, adj. Malignant, injurious : p. 79, 1. 2, 

Maniable, adj. Manageable, tractable: p. 17, 1.8. 'Maniable 

Tractable, wieldable, handleable,' &c. Cotgrave, Fr. Diet. 
Mansion, sb, A dwelling-place: p. 119, 1. 18; p. 134, 1. 17. S 

xiv. 2. 
Manuranoe, sb. Manuring, fertilizing : p. 184, L 4« 
Manured, p.p. Cultivated: p. 84, 1. 10. 
Mar, V. t. To injure : p. lo, 1. 20. 
Marvel, v. i. To wonder : p. 112, 1. 13. 
Materially, adv. Solidly, soundly : p. 198, 1. 26. 
Mathematic, sb. Mathematics: p. 121, 1. 2. Comp. athletic, c( 

metaphysic, physic. 
Matter, sb. The point or essential part of a subject : p. 61, 1. 7. 

Albumazar, ii. 4 : 

*Then vouch a statute, and a Latin sentence, 
Wide from the matter* 
May «= can: p. 14 1, 1. 31. Comp. Shakespeare, Mer. of Ven. i. 3. 7 

you stead me.' And Ps. cxxv. I, Pr. Bk. * Mount Zion, which ma^ 

removed.' 
Mean, sb. Means, medium: p. 76, 1. 21; p. 195, 1. 19. 'For ii 

solcecisme of power, to thinke to command the end, and yet 

endure the meane* Essay xix. p. 77. 
Mean, adj. Moderate: p. 219, 1. 33. 

Means, sb. Wealth : p. 20, 11. 8, 9. Used as a singular noun : p. 24 
Mechanicals, sb. Mechanics : p. 198, 1. 5. The wwd occurs in a < 

sense in Shakespeare, Mid. N's. Dr. iii. 2. 9. 

* A crew of patches, rude mechanicals,* 
Mechanique, sb. Mechanism: p. 124, 1. 10; p. 138, 1. 24. 
Medicinable, adj. Medicinal: p. 1 41, 1. 26. In Shakespeare O' 

351, where the Quartos read, 

* Drop tears as fast as the Arabian trees 
Their medicinal gum,' 

the Folios have medicinable. See also Much Ado, ii. a. 5 ; Troi 

Cressida, iii. 3. 45* 
Medicine, v. t. To administer medicine to: p. 207, !• 27. 
Mercnrius, apparently not yet Anglicised: p. 52, 1. 10. Comp. i 

12. 
Mere, adj. Absolute : p. ro6, 1. 29. 

* I have engaged myself to a dear friend. 
Engaged my friend to his mere enemy.* 

Shakespeare, Mer. of Ven. iii. 2. 
Merely, adv. Absolutely, simply: p. 88, 1. 10; p. 121, 1. 30; 

I. 32. . ^ 

* We are merely cheated of our lives by drunkards.' 

Shakespeare, Temp, u I 

Meriting, adj. Meritorious : p. 7, 1. 27. 

Message, * Came in message ' = ame as a messenger: p. 66, 1. i( 

Metaphysic, sb. Metaphysics: p. 112, 11. i, 2 ; p. I13, L 18. 

'definition is given on p. 114. 

Qion, sb, A darling : p. 30, 1. 33. In ed. 1605 it is printed 



I 



GLOSSARY. 359 

i" »nistake for nugnon. *Mignon: m. A minion, fauorite, wanton, 
' g, darling.' Cotgrave, Fr. Diet. 
.LXBber, v.t. To supply, furnish: p. 14, 1. 21 ; p. 51, 1. 2. 
listry, sb. Service : p. 206, 1. 2. 
rabilaries, sb. Collections of marvels : p. 87, 1. 15. 
FHRIDATUM, sb. See note on p. 140, 1. 31. "Methridat: m. 
Methridate; a strong Treacle, or Preseruatiue deuised at first by the 
Pontian King, Mithridates/ Cotgrave, Fr. Diet. *The first he (i.e. 
Mithridates) was also who devised sundrie kinds of antidots or countre- 
poisons, whereof one reteineth his name to this day.' Holland's Pliny, 
XXV. 2. 
Model, sb. A small plan ; and so, a compendium : p. 54, 1. 2. The Lat. 
^as * totius orbis tunc epitome.* Measure, scale: p. 62, 1. 19 ; p. 194, 1. 15. 
5, adj. More : p. 22, 1. 3; p. 166, 1. I. 
aasticaJ, adj. Monastic: p. 190, 1. 27. 
aeys, s6. Coins, pieces of money: p. 167: IL 29, 31. 
raUty, sb. Moral philosophy: p. 177, 1. 23. 
rigeration, sb. Obsequiousness : p. 26, 1. 24. 
ALortalest, adj. Most deadly: p. 184, i. 25. 
Most, adv. Mostly : p. 94, 1. 29. 
*'f'*Uoiis, sb. Exercises: p. 124, 1. 19. 

ight. Might : p. 79, 1. 7 ; p. 80, 1. 30. • The part of Epimetheus, 
mought well become Prometheus, in the case of discontentments.' 
Essay xv. p. 61. 
Mountebank, sb. A quack doctor : p. 135, 1. 16. Cotgrave (Fr. Diet.) 
gives : * Charlatan : m. A Mountebanke, a cousening drug-seller, a 
pratling quack-saluer.' See Essay xii. p. 45 : 'As there are moun- 
tehanques for the natural! body: so are there mountebanques for the 
politique body.* 
Move, v.t. To excite: p. 125, 1. 21. To propose: p. 244, 1. 32. 
Moyses. The old spelling of * Moses,* from the Vulgate Moyses ; p. 46, 
1. 28, &c. Bacon is not uniform in adopting this spelling. See p. 83, 
1-23. 
Mutiner, s6. A mutineer: p. 184,!. 15. See note. 
Mystery, sb. A craft or trade : p. 89, 1. 29. * Mestier : m. A Trade, 
Occupation, Misterie, Handicraft.' Cotgrave, Fr, Diet. Comp. Chaucer, 
Cant. Tales, Prol. 615 : 

* In youthe he lemed hadde a good mester; 
He was a wel good wright, a carpenter.' 



IT. 

H"atiire, sb. Used in the phrase * it is nature * for • it is natural ;* as ' it is 

reason' for * it is reasonable:* p. 239, 1. 3. 
Nature, sb. Kind: p. 7, 1. 15 ; p. 168, 1. 11. * Fiower-de-lices^ and lillies 

of all natures* Essay xlvi. p. 187. 
Navigation, sb. A sea voyage : p. 96, 1. 31* 
Near hand, adv. Near : p. 53, 1. 25. 



^6% GLOSSARY. 

Over, redundant in 'command over/ p. I40, U. 29, 30. 
Overcommen, p.p. Overcome, achieved, accomplished: p. 76, 1. 

Compare Essay xxxiv, p. 146. See Coxnen. 
Over usiiaL Too customary: p. 182, 1. 21. 



P. 

Painful, ad]. Laborious: p. 243, 1. 32. 'I think we liave some 
painful magistrates as ever was in England.' Latimer, Sermons, p. ; 
(Parker Soc). 
Painted forth, p,p. Depicted : p. 57, 1. 31 ; p. 2069 1. IX ; p. ao8, L 
Painted out, p.p. Depicted: p. 15, 1. 7. 
Palliate, p.p. Palliated: p. 138, 1. 25. 

Pantomimus, sh. A mimic: p. 136, 1. 21. * Pantomime: m. An A( 
of many parts in one Play ; one that can represent the gesture, i 
counterfeit the speech, of any man.' Cotgrave, Fr. Diet. 
Parcel, sb, A part. 'Nothing parcel *= no part : p. 7, 1. 5. 

* Many a thousand. 
Which now mistrust no parcel of my fear.' 

Shakespeare, 3 Hen. VI. n 6. 3& 
Participant, adj. Partaking : p. 254, 1. 22. 
Particular, adj. Private: p. 185, 1. 12. 

*But value dwells not in parHeular will.' 

Shakespeare, Tr. and Cr. iL 2. 53 
Particular, 56. A private a£Biir ; used of an individual case : p. 8, L 2 

p. 156. 1. 9. 

* Though no man lesser fears the Greeks than I, 
As far as toucheth my particular,* 

Shakespeare, Tr. and Cr. ii. 2. 9 
Pasqnil, sb, A satire : p. 57f !• 10. * Sometimes contrived into pleas 
pasquils and satires, to move sport.' Bacon, Obs. on a Libel (Works, \ 
148). *Pasquille: f. A Pasquill; a Libell clapt on a Poste, or Ima| 
* Pasquin : m. The name of an Image, or Poste in Rome, whereon J ^ 
and defamatorie Rimes are fastened, and fathered; also, as Pasq 
Cotgrave, Fr. Diet. The statue still stands at the comer of the Paw 
Braschi, near the Piazza Navona. 
Passage, sb. A ford, or pass : p. 56, I. II ; p. 68, 1. 3. Comp. Jod 
xii. 6 ; I Sam. xiii. 23.' Metaphorically, a proceeding, process, traosacti 
course: p. 25, 1. 19 ; p. 91, 1. 21 ; p. lOO, 1. 18 ; p. 146, L 11. * 
give passage ' = to give way : p. 39, 1. 2 1 . * In passage ' — in passing, < 
sorily : p. 78, 1. 28 ; p. 205, 1. 3 ; p. 207, 1. 17 ; p. 262, L 26, 
Passed, adj. Past : p. 93, 1. 16 ; p. 139, 1. 20 ; p. 239, 1. 18. See n 
on p. 139, and compare Drayton, Polyolbion, i. 383 : 

* And by his present losse, his passed error found,* 
Pastor, sb. A shepherd: p. 199, 1. 21. See Jer. xziiL I, a. 
Patience, sb. In its literal sense of endurance of suffering: p. 143, IL 3 
Peccant, adj. Morbid, unhealthy : p. 37, 1. 32 ; p. 43, L 28. 'L'hnm 

peccante. The corrupt, or corrupting humor in the bodie.' Cotgn 
Fr. Diet. 



GLOSSARY. 363 

}i, sh, A pedant: p. 13, II. 16, 19. Plur. pedantes : p. 13, U. 7, 14; 
, I. 8. From the It. pedantes which appears not to have been quite 
ilised in 1605. *Pedante* occurs in Florio's Worlde of Wordes, 
; and in Shakespeare's Love's Labour's Lost, iii. i. 179, * A domi- 
ig pedant o'er the boy/ it must have been pronounced as a dis- 
le. The first ed. of this play was published in 1598. 
bical, adj. Pedantic: p. 13, 1. 26; p. 165, 1. 3« 
)ness, 56. Suspended condition : p. 47, L 26. 
e, adv. Perhaps : p. 209, 1. 1 1, 
ptory, adj. Destructive : p. 53, 1. 1 8, 

tive, adj. Capable of being perfected or improved: p. 258, 1. 2. 
>are Demonstrative, 

)> V, t. To review : p. 3, 1. 21. See Shakespeare, Rich. II, iii. 3. 53. 
*That from this castle's tatterM battlements 
Our fair appointments may be well perused' 
)xaeiia, p. 129, 1. 30. This mode of spelling shows that the word 
con's time had not become fully naturalised, though in p. 127, 1. 23 
pears in its usual form. Later still in the Reliquias Wottonianae 
31, ed. 1655) I &nd phainomenon, 

!, sb. Physics, or physical science: p. Ill, 1. 33 ; p. 1 14, 1. 21. 
y, sb. Hairiness : p. 120, 1. 10. 

sb. A passage of an author or book : p. 7> I* 3^ > p. 8, 1. 12 ; p. 
1. 25. A topic or subject of discourse : p. 155, 1. 33. A piazza, or 
: square ; here, the Forum: p. 220, 1. 12 ; p. 249, L 10. * To give 
' = to yield: p. 98, 1. 19. 
sb, A shallow pool, a puddle : p. 244, 1. 32. 
rm, sb. Plan : p. 44, 1. 12 ; p. 114, 1. 12. Pattern : p. 187, L 19. 
ote on p. 44. 

), Bend, bias: p. 239, I. 19. 'For it is true, that late learners, 
)t so well take the plie* Essay xxxix. p. 164. 
, sb, A poem : p. 35, 1. 6. Poetry : p. 60, 1. 28 ; p. 211, 1. 25. 
sb. In the phrase * was of such a point as whereat Sarah laughed ' : 
3, 1. 10; where the Latin has de hujusmodi re extitii quam irrisui 
tat Sarah, 

, V, t. To regulate : p. 56, 1. II. 'Spain,' says Bacon, in his Obsenra- 
on a Libel (Works, viii. 169) *is not in brief an enemy to be feared 
nation seated, manned, furnished, and potticied as in England ; ' where 
MSS. read polliced. 

lue, sb. A politician : p. 5, 1. 9 ; p. lo, 1. 17 ; p. 18, 1. 12, &c. In 
,, 1. 6, it is used as an adjective ; * politique men'— politicians. 
Eir estate. A democracy : p. 53, 1. 8; p. 208, I, i. • Therefore, we 
t (i. e. boldness) hath done wonders, in popular states,' Essay zii. 

• 

Eirity, sb. Democratic character: p. 252, 1. 5. 

Dus, adj. Numerous : p. 243, 1. 5. See Deut. xxvi. 5* 

1, adj. Portuguese: p. 29, 1. 23. 
^u, sb. The laying down of a law : p. 147, 1. II. A maxim, senti- 
: p. 221, 1. 1 ; p. 227, 1. 19 ; p. 246, 1. 20. 
IS, V. i. To prepossess : p. 224, 1. 3. 
aue, sb. Practice : p. 165, 1. 33. 



364 GLOSSARF. 

Practise, v. 1. To plot : p. 1 79, 1. 2, ' He will practise against thee bf i 

poison.* Shakespeare, As You Like It, i. i. 156. 
Fray in aid. To call in to one's assistance: p. 174, 1. 23. 

* A conqueror that will pray in aid for kindness, 

Where he for grace is kneel'd to.* i 

Shakespeare, Ant. and CL r. 2. 27. 
Sir T. Hanmer in his note on this passage says : * Praying in aid is a tent 
used for a petition made in a court of justice for the calling in of 1^ 
from another that hath an interest in the cause in question.' 
Precedent, adj. Preceding, previous: p. 82, 1. 26; p. 214, L 7. 

* Our own precedent passions do instruct us 
What levity's in youth.' 

Shakespeare, Tim. of Ath, L I. 133. 
Preception, sb. Precept : p. 214, 1. 31. 

Prefer, v.t. To promote: p. 3, 1. 31. See Esth. ii. 9; Dan. Ti, 3. 
Preferred, p. p. Recommended : p. 203, 1. 14. 

* Large gifts have I bestow'd on learned clerks. 
Because my gift preferred me to the king.' 

Shakespeare, 2 Hen. VI, iT. 7. 77* 
Preferred before. Preferred to : p. 48, 1. 13. See John i. 15. 
Prelusive, adj. Preliminary, introductory : p. 94, 1. 23. 
Premeditate, p.p. Premeditated : p. 82, 1.6; p. 156, 1. 8. 
Prenotion, sb. Foreknowledge : p. 130, 1. 25 ; p. 145, U 23. 
Preoceupate, v. t. To preoccupy : p. 268, 1. 14. 
Preposterous, adj. Inverted in order; literally, having the last fiist 

p. 243,1. 21. 
Prescript, sb, A prescription : p. 22, 1. 25 ; p. 132, 1. 11 ; p. 142, L 5. 
Present, v.t. To represent: p. 100, 1. 2. 

'Ay, my commander: when I presented Ceres, 
I thought to have told thee of it.' 

Shakespeare, Temp. iv. Z. 167. 
Present, adj. Immediate: p. 222, 1. 13. * Present speeches '»speedM 

made on the spur of the moment, impromptu speeches : p. 1 00, L n 

* In present '= Lat. in prcesenti, at present : p. 202, 1. 16. 
Presention, sb. Presentiment: p. 144, 1. 31. 
Press, v.t. To pursue eagerly: p. 226, 1. 19. 'Pressing the fact* « 

to mean • urgently pursuing the business in hand ' : p. 235, 1. 27. 
Pretence, sb. The thing pretended or aimed at : p. 1 24, 1. 5. 
Pretend, v. i. To aim at, propose as an end or object : p. 36, 11. 5, 7t '^i 

p. 211, 1. 13. 
Pretermit, v.t. To pass by : p. 208, 1. 17 ; p. 215, 1. 30. 
Prevent, v.i. To anticipate :' p. 200, 1. 33; p. 261, L 24. CoiDp.Fi 

cxix. 148. 
Prevented, />. ^. Anticipated: p. i7i»i. lO- 
Price, sb. Value : p. 26, 1. 13 ; p. 29, 1. 8, &c. See Matt xiil 46. •!€ 

be in price ' = to be valued : p. 29, 1. 24. 
Prime, adj. Chief, excellent : p. 199, 1. 32. 
Prince, used of Queen Elizabeth : p. 58, 1. 2. 
Print, sb. Impression, of a seal : p. 69, 1. 16. 
Privateness, sb. Privacy : p. 10, 1. 29 ; p. 15, 1. 16, A^c Comp. Em^ 



GLOSSARY. ^6^ 

19 : * Nay, retire men cannot, when they would ; neither will they, 
t were reason : but are impatient of privateneste, even in age, and 
se, which require the shadow.' 

.7, adv. With probability, in a probable manner : p. 156, 1. 29. 
on, sh. Trial ; and hence, proof from experience : p. 141, 1. 10 * 

, I. 3i« 

., V. /. * It proceedeth * —the result is : p. 79, 1. 3. 

ing, sh. Progress: p. 170, 1. 9; p. 173, U. 9, 10; p. 193, 1. 30. 

ling upon. Resulting from : p. i, 1. 2. 

.on, sh. Means of living, livelihood : p. 42, 1. 25 ; p. 43, 1. 9. 

jry, adj. Professional : p. 79, 1. i. See p. 43, L 7, &c. 

nee, s6. Progress, advancement : p. 43, 1. 30; p. 76, 1. 27. 

g, sh. Profit, advantage : p. 1 83, 1. 19. 

sion, sh. Progress: p. 76, 1. 27; p. 78, 1. 27. 

$uous, adj. Mixed indiscriminately: p. 113, 1. 27. 

h. Experiment: p. 119, 1. 27. * Good or ill proof is the proving 

ling out good or ill : p. 223, 11. 22, 23. 

adj. One's own : p. 182, 1. 3. 

by, sh. Peculiarity : p. i, 1, 10 ; p. 4, 1. 9 ; p. 6, 1. I. Property : 
, 1. 18; p. 212, 1. 28; p. 252, 1. 12. * Receipts oi propriety* ^e. 
■ receipts, proper or peculiar to certain diseases: p. 140, 1. 24. 
for propriety* = not appropriate to particular diseases, as Bacon 
s afterwards: p. 141, 1. 2. 
.tion, sh. Investigation : p. 84, 1. 7* 
ktion, sh. Incitement : p. 50, 1. 18. 
il, adj. Minute: p. 25, 1. 21. 

sh. Minute observances, punctilios : p. 219, L 3. 
se, sh. Acquisition, that which is acquired : p. 16, L 4. Value : 

. 1. 14- 

ss, sh. Purity : p. 29, 1. 3, 

Lent, sh. An excretion : p. 139, 1. 6. 

ice, sh. A prosecuting or fdlowing out, sequence : p. 142, 1. 19. 

i, p, p. Followed out : p. 106, 1. 14. 

, 56. Consecutiveness, sequence : p. 142, 1. 13; p. 182, 1. 29. 

limity, sh. Littleness of mind : p. 49, L 33 ; p. 205, 1. 13. 

th, V, refl. To endeavour : p. 70, L 2. 

v.t. To apply: p. 156, 1. 10. 

des, sh. p. 117, 1. 18. The old form of the word before it was 

iised. Compare Shakespeare, Antony and Cleopatra, t. 2. 61 : 

' Rather make 

My country's high pyramids my gibbet/ 

isheu's Spanish Dictionary (1599), s.t. Piramide, the singular is 

as 'pyramis.' But Cotgrave (Fr. Diet,) and Florio (ItaU Diet.) 

se ' piramides ' as singular. 

n, v,t. To call in question: p. 132, L 16. 

?Ie, adj. Fivefold: p. 169, 1. 14. 

reft. To get quit of, relieve oneself: p. 221, 1. xd» 



366 GLOSSARY. 



B. 

Baven, used as a feminine noun, p. 151, 1. 23' In the Authorized Vcnio 

it is masculine. 
Beach, &h. A contrivance: p. 232, 1. 17* 
Beader, 56. A lecturer: p. 78, 1. 1 ; p. 79, 1. 17. Still retained in tbt 

'Universities and the Inns of Court. 
Beason. *By reason ' s= because : p. 19, 1. 6; p. 167, 1. ao. *Itwa 

reason 'sit was reasonable : p. 27, 1. 10. ' It is reason ': p. 64, 1. 19. 
Beceipt, sb. Power of receiving, capacity: p. 7, L 9. Re(^f>tioa: pi 

1. 14 ; p. 100, 1. 10. 
Beoeive, v.t. To admit: p. 157, 1. 18. 
Becess, sh. A withdrawal, retirement : p. 117, 1. lo. 
Becoxnpeiise, v. t. To compensate for : p. 14, 1. 3. 
Beconcilexnent, &h. Reconciliation: p. 223, 1. 27 ; p. 331, 1. 4. 
Bedargiition, sh. Reply, refutation : p. 18, 1. 14 ; p. 84, 1. ; p. I59» 

1. 18. *Redargution : f. A redargution, checking, reprouing, reprdieni- 
ing, controwling.' Cotgrave, Fr. Diet. 

Beduced. ' Reduced to stupid ' = rendered stupid : p. 3 16, L 33. 

Be-edify, v. /. To rebuild : p. 56, 1. 9. 

Beflect, V, i. To be reflected : p. 161, L 7. 

Befrain, v. t. To restrain, hold in check as with a bridle : p. 53^ 1* I 

p. 183, 1. 3 ; P- 192. 1. 26. 
Begiment, sh. Regimen, training : p. 3, 1. 6 ; p. 97, 1. 19. Rule, 90 

ment: p. 58, 1. 15. 
Begion, sh. Climate, atmosphere : p. 206, 1. 26. See note on Hamld 

2. 472. 

Begular, adj. Rigid in adhering to rule, methodical : p. 14, 1. a8. B 
had previously (p. 10, 1. 22) spoken of one of the charges brongbt agki 
learned men that they were * too peremptory or positive by itiictnea 
rules and axioms.' For the word see Essay xzz. p. 133. 

Beintegrate, v.t. To restore : p. iii, 1. 19. I 

Belation, sh, p. 39, 1. 12. ' Relation is, where, in consideratiao of k 
two times, or other things are considered so as if they were all one; • 
by this the thing subsequent is said to take his effect by relation ft 1 
time preceding.' Cowel's Law Dictionary, ed. 1727. Namtrre^ stM. 
p. 52,1. 24; p. 86,1. 3. 

Beluctation, sh. Struggle, violent effort, reluctance : p. 45, L 37 ; p* 
1. 20; p. 253, 1. 3. 

Bemembered, p.p. Mentioned : p. 102, 1. 33; p. 174, 1. 30. 

Bexnora, sh. A fabulous fish, which was supposed to dday Uie progr e » dt 
a vessel by adhering to its bottom ; and so generally, a hindrance : p. I 
1. 20. * Many holde opinion, that in that last and famous set-fight, wk 
Antonie lost against Augustus, his Admirall-gallie was in her ooane tt 
by that little fish, the Latines call Remora^ and the EngUdi a Socke-» 
whose propertie is, to stay any ship he can fasten hlEoselfe Ynto.' 
taigne's Essaies, transl. Florio, p. 270, ed. 1 603. 

Bemove, sh. Removal : p. 98, 1. 29 ; p. 242, 1. a8» 

Beposed, p.p. Laid up as in store : p. 77, 1. 38. 



GLOSSARY. 367 

ensions, sh. Reproofs : p. 100, 1. 14. 

e, v,t. To refute : p. 112, 1. 19. 

ianc7» sb. Repugnance : p. 120, 1. 7; p. 240, L 8. 

sing, sh. Rescuing : p. 238, 1. 23. Rescous and Resetisser are the 

V terms for rescue and rescuer, and although I have not been able to 

ly other instance of the occurrence of reseussing, I hare not hesi- 

to retain it, as it is found in the editions of 1605 ^^^ 1629. Chaucer 

. Tales, 2645) uses rescous : 

' And in the rescous of this Palamon 
The stronge kyng Ligurgius is bom adoim.' 
3le, V. /. To compare : p. 1 78, 1. 6. 

sb. Spring, source: p. 91, 1. 26. Comp. Essay zzii. p. 95 : *the 
> and falls of businesse.* 

fcive, adj. Having respect or reference to: p. 31,1. 12. Appro- 
: p. 1, 1. 9. Special, relative: p. 114, U. 25, 29, 30; p. 198, L 14. 
ar : p. 265, 1. 20. 
bively, adv. Appropriately: p. 179, 1. 32. Relatively: p. 263, 

b, sb. Consideration: p. 53, 1. 33; p. 194, 1. 10; p. 217, 1. 23; 
, 1. 28. ' For bribes come but now and then ; but if importunitie, 
: respects lead a man, he shall never be without/ Essay xi. p. 42. 
amlet, iii. I. 68. 

i. To remain :.p. 129, 1. 8. * Since therefore they must be used, 
ti cases, there resieth to speake, how they are to be brideled.' Essay 

p. 154- 

v.e. To withdraw: p. 103, 1. 12. 

nt, adj. Reverend, venerable : p. 19, 1. 1 8. 

3d, p.p. Turned back : p. 105, I. 16. 

e, v.t. To reflect upon: p. 3, 1. 21 ; p. 157, L 9. 

ed,p.p. Considered, reflected upon : p. 28, L 22 ; p. aia, 1. 4. 

)dy, sb. A patchwork, confused mixture: p. 106, 1. i. 'This 

neth not those mingle-mangles of many kindes of stuife, or as the 

ins call them Rapsodies.' Florio's Montaigne, p. 68, ed. 1 603. 

ics, sb. Rhetoric: p. 177, 1, 9. 

about, V. I. To roam about : p. 8, 1. 15. ' For a man may wander 

way, by rounding up and down.' Bacon, Of the Interp. of Nature 

cs, iii. 232). 

3iit, sb. An elementary form : p. 48, 1. 19. 

rer, v, /. To decide, as a judge decides a point of law : p. 7, L 6. 



S. 

Iiless, adj. Restless : p. 247, 1. 14. 

ental, adj. Bound by an oath or solemn obligation : p. 146, 1. 24. 

b, adj. Most serious, most important : p. 220, 1. 8. 

For .... sake : As in the phrases * for entertainment sake ' : p. 61, 
* for demonstration sake *: p. 185, 1. 21; *for example sake,' p. 8t, 
'assurance sake/ p. 159, 1. 16. Compare Hooker, Ecd. Pol. i. 

• (ed. Keble) : * for that work sake which we covet to perform.' 



368 



GLOSS ARr. 



Sale, sb. 'Confections of so/^'^ confections which are offered for sale: 
p. 141, 1. I. 

SsJomon, sb. Solomon: p. 20, 1. 5. The old form of the name in tbe 
Geneva Bible. 

Sapience, sb. Wisdom : p. 44, 1. 18 ; p. 118, 1. 16. 

Satisfactory, adj. Bacon uses this word on three occasions in a senie 
which, so far as I am aware, has not been noticed in the dicticMiariei. 
'These satisfactory and specious causes' (p. 119, 1. 5); *by way of 
argument or satisfactory reason' (p. 153, 1. 16); 'more satisfactory lim 
substantial ' (p. 260, 1. 7). See also p. 30, 1. 26. From these instances it 
appears that an explanation is satisfactory which merely stops the month 
of the inquirer, and, as Bacon says of Mirabilaries, gives ' contentment to 
the appetite of curious and vain wits' (p. 87). Again, in the same tpaiSL 
he speaks of the methods of tradition of knowledge in his time ; ' he tint 
receiveth knowledge desireth rather present satisfaction^ than ei pect ant 
inquiry : and so rather not to doubt, than not to err' (p. 1 71). CompOD 
the use of • satisfy,* p. 172, 1. 33. 

Scale. * By scale ' = by degrees, step by step : p. 118, L 4. 

Scape, v.t. To escape : p. 161, 1. 20. 

Science, sb. Knowledge, erudition : p. 59, 1. 3a. 

Scope, sb. Mark to aim at ; and so, aim, object ; p. 42, 1. 6m 

Seducement, sb. Seduction: p. 14, 1. 17; p. 153, 1. 3. 

Seeing, used as an adjective, p. 76, 1. 6. 

Seek, to. * To be to seek*=:to be at a loss: p. 13, 1. 31 ; p. 35, L 30. 
' For if you reduce usury, to one low rate, it will ease the common bor- 
rower, but the merchant will be to seeke for money.' Essay xlL p. 1 71, 

Seen, p.p. Versed, skilled: p. 25, 1. 19 ; p. 46, 1. 30; p. 136, 1. I. 

Seem much, to. To appear a great thing : p. 3, 1. 28. So * to tfaiiil 
much ' is to reckon highly as an act of importance. 

Segregate, adj. Separate: p. 130, 1. 2; p. 216, 1. 13. 

Septuagenary, adj. Seventy years old : p. 38, 1. 28. 

Service, sb. Used especially of military service ; a campsugn or engage' 
ment : p. 68, 1. 2. We speak of a soldier having.* seen service.' 

Set forward, v. t. To further, promote: p. 83, 1. 30. See i Chr. ziiiL4 

Set into, v. t. To set to, apply oneself to : p. 82, 1. 18. 

Seven. The seven wise men of Greece : p. 102, 1. 32. See note. 

Sever, v. i. To be separated : p. 216, 1. 24 ; p. 217, 1. 39 ; p. 22% I 

Several, adj. Separate : p. 185, 1. 14. See Matt, xzf. 15. 

Severally, adv. In several wajrs : p. 5, 1. 7. 

Severe, adj. Rigidly accurate: p. 87, 1. 4. 

Severedly, adv. Separately: p. 128, 1. 12. 

Shall, used for * will ': p. 80, 1. 27. 

Shape, V. i. To acquire shape or form : p. 39, 1. 3Z« 

Shoot, sb. A shot : p. 149, 1. 11. 

Shoot over, v. i. To overshoot the mark : p. 232, L. 16. 

Should, used for * would ': p. 2, 1. 23 ; p. 66, L 5 ; p. ia6» L 172 P^ 
I. 28. 

Show, sb. Semblance, appearance : p. 3, 1. 30 ; p. loa, L 9. See Ii. 

Side. ' On the other side* = on the other hand: p. 35, U as. So 
the other side': p. 210, 1. 3a 



GLOSSARF. 369 

Lgn unto, V. t. To attest : p. 192, 1. 6. 

Lgnify, V. t. To indicate : p. 65, 1. 9. 

ixnilitude, sb. Likeness: p. 70, 1. 26; p. 215, 1. 16. Comparison: 

p. 87, I. 10; p. 147, 1. 32. 

imples, &h. Herbs : p. 80, 1. 1 7. 

inoereness, 56. Sincerity : p. 195, 1. 29. 

kill, v.i. To understand, know: p. 66, 1. I. Comp. I Kings v. 6; 

2 Chr. ii. 7, 8, xxxiv. 12. 

\xxt^9 v.t. To delay, hinder: p. 119, 1. 21. 

obriety, sb. Temperance in its widest sense, sobeimindedness : p. lo, 

1. 7; p. 44, 1. 14; p. 216, 1. 8. 

oftest, adj. Most effeminate : p. 195, 1. 25. 

oftness, sb. Effeminacy : p. 16, 1. 9. 

olemn, adj. Grave, decorous : p. 235, 11. 18, 27. 

olidness, s6. Solidity: p. 119, 1. 17. 

n Ions time. So long : p. 38, 1. 23. 
lute, adj. Free, unfettered : p. 259, 1. 4 ; p. 260, 1. 33. 

>uine, used with a singular, p. 194, 1. 8. 

lometime, adv. Sometimes : p. 20, 1. 2 ; p. 122, 1. 29. * As it is seene 
sometime in friars.' Essay x. p. 38. 

Soothe, v.t. To flatter: p. 205, 1. 23. 

* Thou art perjured too, 
And soothest up greatness.' 

Shakespeare, K. John, iii. i. 121. 

Sophister, 56. A sophist : p. 160, 1. 3. 

'A subtle traitor needs no sopkUter.* 

Shakespeare, 2 Hen. VI. 7. I. 191. 

Sorcery, sb. Fortune-telling by casting lots : p. 87, 1. 24. 

Bert, sb. A class of persons : p. 29, 1. 10; p. 163, 1. 6. 

* The shallowest thick-skin of that barren sort.* 

Shakespeare, Mid. N.'s Dr. iii. 2, 13. 
*In sor/' = in such a manner: p. 224, 1. 3 ; p. 255, 1. 21. 

Bort, v.i. To agree : p. 14, 1. 12; p. 234, 1. 18. * A frend may speak, 
as the case requires, and not as it sorUth with the person.' Essay xxvii. 
p. 115. 

Bortable, adj. Agreeable, suitable : p. 58, 1. 20. 

Boimding, adj. That which merely gives forth a sound ; and so, meta- 
phorically, hollow, unsubstantial : p. 7, 1. 27. 

Spacious, adj. Widely extended: p. 67, L 33. Not used now of coun- 
tries. 

Spake. Spoke; past tense of 'speak': p. 64, 1. 23. 

Sparkle, sb. A spark : p. 238, 1. 22 ; p. 254, 1. 21. 

Speak to. To speak of or upon, as a topic : p. 157, 1. 13. 

Speak unto. To speak of, or with reference to : p. 27, 1. 33. 

Specially, adv. Especially: p. 51, 1. 27. 

Speculation, sb. Inquiry, investigation : p. 87, 1. 30 ; p. 125, 1. lo. 

Bneculative, adj. Inquisitive : p. 24, 1. 26 ; p. iii, 1. 14. 

U, sb. A spy : p. 80, 11. 24, 26. * But yet their trust towards them, 
Lidih rather beene as to good spialls, and good whisperers; then good 
magistrates, and officers.' Essay xliv. p. 179. 

Bb 



370 GLOSSARF. 

Spinosity, sb. Thorniness : p. 148, 1. 26. 

Spleen, sb. Ill humour, anger ; of which the spleen was belie?ed to be 

the seat : p. 245, 1. 8. 

* If she must teem, 
Create her child of spleen ; that it may liye, 
And be a thwart disnatured torment to her.' 

Shakespeare, K. Lear, i. 4. 304. 

See also the quotation under Arrogancy. 
Stand, V. i. To stand firm, keep one's position : p. 23, L 31 ; p. 36, 1. 31. 

See Eph. vi. 13. To stop : p. 210, 1. 8. 
Stand with. To be consistent with : p. 112, 1. 1 1. *It is true, speedie 

profit is not to be neglected, as farre as may stand, with the good of 

the plantation, but no further.' Essay xxxiii. p. 139. 
State, sb. Original condition : p. 27, 1. 36 ; p. 195, 1. 6. Estate: p I4& 

1. 26. * Certainly who hath a ^ate to repaire, may not despise nul \ 

things.' Essay xxviii. p. 117. Stability : p. 193, 1. 23. • In the favoms i 

of others or ^e good windes of fortune we have no state or certainty.' 

Colours of Good and Evil, p. 262. 
Station, s&. A standing-place : p. 119, 1. 17. j 

Statua, sb. Statue : p. 72, 1. 21 ; p. 85, 1. 29 ; p. 202, 1. 24; p. 24I, L 9 
'Even at the base of Pompey's statua* 

Shakespeare, Jul. Csbs. UL 2. 192. 
Stay, sb. A standstill: p. 37, 1. 2. 'He that standeth at a stay, whs 

others rise, can hardly avoid motions of envy.' Essay xiy. p. 5a. 
Stay, V. i. To stand still, rest: p. 119, 1. 5. To dwdl : p. 233, L a6. 
Still, adv. Constantly : p. 39, 1. 16 ; p. 69, 1. ll ; p. 72, L 38. 
' Thou caU'dst me up at midnight to fetch dew 
From the s/i//-vez*d Bermoothes.' 

Shakespeare, Tempest, L 4. 329. 
Stond, sb. An impediment, hindrance: p. 211, 1. 3. *The remoTing 

the stands and impediments of the mind doth often dear the passage a 

current of a man's fortune.' Bacon, Disc, touching Hdps for the Inl 

Powers (Works, vii. 99). See also Essay xl. p. 165. 
Stood upon. Insisted upon: p. 8, 1. 30; p. 174, 1. 38. 'Bat it if 

plaine, that every man profiteth in that hee most intendeth, that it needta. 

not be stood upon* Essay xxix. p. 126. 
Story, sb. History : p. 86, 1. 4; p. 90, 1. 32. See 2 Chr. xiii. aa. 
Strait, adj. Tight: p. 210, 1. 10; p. 219, 1. 13. 
Straitly, adv. Strictly : p. 43, 1. 3. See Gen. xliii. 7. 
Stroke. Struck ; the preterite of * strike' : p. 150, 11. 3a, 33, 
Stupid. ' Reduced to stupid ' = rendered stupid: p. 216, 1. 33. Coo^. 

'leaveth it for suspect,' p. 81, 1. 12. I 

Style, sb. Title or formula, designation : p. 44, !• 33 ; p. 57, L 17. 
Style, sb. The pen of the ancient Greeks and Romans, one end tf 

which was pointed for the purpose of writing on the wax tablelf 

the other broad and flat to erase what had been written. Hence tl 

Latin phrase vertere stylum, to turn the style, b to erase^ and this 

imitated by Bacon, p. 61, 1. 23. 
Styled. See note on p. 101, 1. 19. Perhaps we shonU read 'may be ■ 

styled.' 



GLOSSARF. 37X 

;, adj. Liable : p. 259, 1. 13. 

'A widow, husbandless, subject to fears.* 

Shakespeare, K. John, iii. I. 14. 
i, sb. Used as a collective noun for the people : p. 55, 1. 33, as in 
t, i. I. 72. 

, V. t. Like the Lat. subomare, to furnish, equip : p. 187, 1. 14. 
ence, sb. Substance: p. 44, 1. 22. 
itive, adj. Substantial : p. 106, 1. 8. 

;y, sb. Subtilty; the old form of spelling, which Bacon most 
titjy adopts ; from Lat. subtilitas : p. 32, 1. 10 ; &c. 
, sb. The result or issue of an action, good or bad : p. 101, 1. 31 : 
, 1. 4. It was formerly used with some qualifying adjective. See 
.8. 

le. Such, such a one : p. 253, 1. 15. 
rs. Plural for singular : p. 28, 1. l8. 
ly, adv. Quickly, hastily : p. 184, 1. 16; p. 334,!. 8. 

' Muse not that I thus suddenly proceed.' 

Shakespeare, Two Gent of Ver. i. 3. 64. 

'And suddenly resolve me in my suit.* 

Id. Love's Lab. Lost, ii. 2. no. 
V. i. To be competent : p. 1 72, 1. 23. 

at, adj. Competent, able: p. 79, \. 18; p. 93, 1. 32; p. 221, 
' Sufficient men ' = men of capacity, ability, 
acy, sb. Ability, capacity : p. 216, 1. 29. See 2 Cor. iii. 5. 
ry, adj. Chief, most important : p. 6, 1. 30 ; p. 19, 1. 30 ; p. 45, 

itation, sb. Assistance : p. 206, 1. 2. 

, v.t. To assist: p. 76, 1. 16. 

3, V. t. To imagine : p. 267, 1. 19. 

3d, adj. Fictitious, imaginary: p. 45, 1. 5. 'Upon supposed 

s.' Shakespeare, Mer. of Yen. iii. 2. 94. * Wounding supposed 

Id. 2 Hen. IV. iv. 5. 196. 
rge, sb. Surfeit : p. 83, 1. 20. 

ij. Literally, without sound, unmeaning : p. 255, \. I. 
), adj. Suspected, suspicious: p. 81, 1. 12; p. 260, L 1 9. 'Cei> 
In Italy, they hold it a little suspect in popes, when they have oftm 
r mouth, padre commune* Essay li. p. 208. 
g, sb. Inflation of mind by pride: p. lo, I. 13. Compare a Cor, 

■ 

, sb. Arrangement: p. 182, 1. 28. 
{, sb. See p. 1 74, L 2 ;. 



T. 

h. A tablet, picture : p. 57, 1. 31. 'A pair of tables* p. 64, L 10. 
* Who art the table wherein all my thoughts 
Are visibly character'd and engraved.' 

Shakespeare, Two Gent of Vcr. iL 7. 3. 
Bb 2 



37a QLOSSARF. 

Taint, v. /. To sully, tamish : p. 27, 1. a8. With the use of 'blemish tnd 
taint ' in this passage, compare Macbeth, iy. 3. 124 : 

* The taints and blames I laid upon myself.* 
Take up, v. refl. To check oneself; p. 65, 1, 23. 

Take upon. To arrogate, assume to oneself: p. 65, 1. 31. 
Tax, v./. To censure: p. 24, 1. 4; p. 135, 1. 14. In the fonner paisip 
the Latin translation takes the word in the modem sense. See note. 

* They tax our policy and call it cowardice.' 

Shakespeare, Tr. and Cr. i. 3. 197. 
Taxation, sh. Censure, reprehension: p. 62, 1. 17; p. 103, 1. 27. 'Yool 
be whipped for taxation one of these days.* Shakespeare, As You Lib 
It, i. 2. 91. 
Temperature, sb. Temperament : p. 21, 1. 26 ; p. 59, L a. *The beti 
composition, and temperature is, to have opennesse in fiune tnd opiniooi 
secrecy in habit ; dissimulation in seasonable use ; and a power to frigne, 
if there be no remedy.' Essay vi. p. 22. 
Tenderness, sb. Sensitiveness: p. 192, 1. 29. *Tendemett of oovn* 
tenance'=bashfulness: p. 208, 1. 31. 

' Lest I give cause 
To be suspected of more tenderness 
Than doth become a man.* 

Shakespeare, Cjrmb. i 1. 94* 
Term, sb. Limit, termination: p. 129, 1. 14. 
Terrene, adj. Earthly: p. 48, 1. 13. 

* Alack, our terrene moon 
Is now eclipsed.' Shakespeare, Ant. and CL in. 13. I53i 
That, pron. That which : p. 66, 1. 30; p. no, 1. 8 ; p. 1 1 a, 1. 9; p. 1551 

1. 2. 
The, used for the possessive pronoun 'its': p. 27, I. 26. C<Mnpaie th 
version in the Bishops' Bible of Lev. xxv. 5 : * 'That which groweth tf 
the owne accord of thy haruest, thou shalt not reape.* And also Hollao^ 
Plutarch, p. 812 (ed. 1603) : ' Anstotle and Plato doe holde, that mal 
is corporall, without forme, shape, figure and qualitie, in tiu owne mXm 
and propertie.' 
The, redundant. * At the first :' p. 37, IL 7, ll. « The which:' p. 37»l 3>» 

p. 234, 1. 10. • Other the heathen gods': p. 38, 1. 25. 
Theomachy, sb. A battle with the gods : p. 194, 1. 18. 
Theory, sb. Speculation : p. in, 1. 33. 
Think much. To take ill, grudge : p. 88, 1. 30. 
Through-lights, sb. Lights or windows on both sides of t room : p. 97> 

1. 25. Comp. Essay xlv. p. 183. 
Throughly, adv. Thoroughly ; p. 67, L 28 ; p. 86, L I9. See Mitt 

iii. 12. 
Through-passage, sb. Transit, traversing : p. 98, L 15. 
Thwart, adj. Perverse: p. 17, 1. 10. 

* Create her child of spleen ; that it may liver 
And be a thwart disnatured torment to her.' 

Shakespeare, K. Lear, i. 4. 305. 
To, prep. 'Designed /o' = designed for: p. 234, 1. 31. Comp. 'gain Ik' 
P- 43> 1- 25 ; ' employ to* p. 252, 1. 20. ' To ' rednndant ia 'nun 



GLOSsARr. 373 

to suffer' : p. 189, 1. 12. Comp. Colours of Good and Evil, p. 262 ; * Yet 
you shall seldome see them complaine, but to set a good face upon it.' 
Tongue, sb. Language: p. 17, 1. 19. 

Touch, sb. *To give a touch of'=to allude to, mention slightly: p. 96, 
1. 12. Testing, examination, p. 153, 1. 1 1, as of gold by the touch-stone. 

Touching, prep. Concerning : p. 59, 1. 22 ; p. 88, I. 25. 

Tractate, sb. A treatise: p. 245, 1. 17. 

Tradition, sb. The delivery of knowledge: p. 166, 1. 8; p. 170, 1. 5; 
p. 176, 1. 28. 

Traduced, p.p. In the passage in which this word occurs, p. 20, 1. 25, 
' traduce ' appears to be used with a distinct reference to its original mean- 
ing *to lead along, lead in procession/ and so 'to parade.' Hence 
* traduced to contempt ' would mean * paraded contemptuously, or so as to 
excite contempt.* 

Traducexnent, sb. Misrepresentation, calumny : p. 38, 1. I ; p. 43, 1. 31. 

*'Twere a concealment 
Worse than a theft, no less than a traducement. 
To hide your doings.' Shakespeare, Cor. i. 9. 22. 

Translation, sb. A metaphor: p. 61, 1. 29. See note. 

Travail, v. i. To labour: p. 49, 1. 7 ; p. 80, 1. 31. 

Travail, s6. Labour: p. 10, I. 27; p. 28, 1. 23, &c. Travails =» pains: 
p. 208, 1. 22. See Num. XX. 14, Lam. iii. 5. 

Treacle, sb. p. 140, 1. 31. Formerly triacle from Gk. OrjpioK-^^ an antidote 
to the viper's poison. * " Treacle," or " triacle," as Chaucer wrote it, was 
originally a Greek word, and wrapped up in itself the once popular belief 
(an anticipation, by the way, of homceopathy), that a confection of the 
viper's flesh was the most potent antidote against the viper's bite. . . . 
Expressing first this antidote, it then came to express any antidote, then 
any medicinal confection or sweet syrup ; and lastly that particular syrup, 
namely, the sweet syrup of molasses, to which alone it is now restricted.' 
Trench, English' Past and Present, fourth ed. p. 188. Coverdale's version 
of Jer. viii. 22 is — ' I am heuy and abashed, for there is no more Triacle 
at Galaad;' and of Jer. xlvi. II — * Go vp (o Galaad) and bringe triacle 
vnto the doughter off Egipte.* 

Trepidation, sb. Trembling ; used in a literal sense: p. 94, 1. 19. 

Triplicity, sb. A threefold combination or nature: p. 4, 1..5; p. 188, L 18. 

Trivial, adj. Trite, commonplace : p. 1 74, 1. 1 7. 

Trope, sb. A figure, generally of speech ; here applied to music : p. 107, 

u. 33. 33. 

Tutor, sb. A guardian: p. 21, 1. li ; p. 184, 1. i. See Gal. iv. 2. 

Typocosmy, sb. p. 176, 1. 21. Defined by Blount and others • a figure 
or type of the world.' But this does not appear to me satisfactory. 
Among. 'the means that help the understanding and faculties thereof 
Bacon enumerates 'Lullius Typocosmia.* *To reduce surnames to a 
Methode, is matter for a Ramist, who should happly finde it to be a Typo- 
cosmie* Camden, Remaines, p. 95, ed. 1605. It seems rather to mean 
an orderly arrangement of the figures or tjrpes which play such an im- 
portant part in the Art of LuUius. 

Tyrannous, adj. T)rrannical: p. 61, 1. 30. 

Tyranny, sb. Absolute power : p. 241, 1. 8 ; p. 202, 1. 8. 



374 GLOssARy. 



u. 



I 



Unawares, at. Unexpectedly: p. ii, 1. 7; p. t6, 1. 31. Comp.Fli 
XXXV. 8. 

Uncivilly, adv. Rudely : p. 25, 1. 14, 

Uncomely, adv. Ungracefully, awkwardly : p. 26, 1, 7, 

Unconstancy, sb. Inconstancy : p. 38, 1. 33. 

Uncredible, adj. Incredible : p. 35, 1. 28. 

Understandingly, adv. Intelligently: p. 128, 1. 8. 

Undertake, v.t. To deal with, contend with: p. 221, L 12. 

Undervalue, sb. Depreciation : p. 4, 1. 25. I 

Universality, sb. The study of general principles : p. 78, 1. 94* 

UnHkest, adj. Most unlike : p. 235, 1. 26. 

Uumannred, />.^ Uncultivated: p. 84, 1. 8. 

Unmovable, adj. Immovable: p. 158, I. 13. 

Unpartial, adj. Impartial: p. 234, 1. 12. 

Unperfect, adj. Imperfect: p. 91, 1. i ; p. 240, L l8. la the btttf 
passage the ed. of 1605 has vnperfite, 

Unproper, adj. Improper : p. 41, I. 2. 

Unsafety, sb. Insecurity : p. 236, L 24. 

Untaxed, p.p. Uncensured : p. 56, 1. 19, 

Unwinded, />.^. Unwound: p. 181, 1. 15. 

Unwrap, v.t. To disentangle: p. 246, 1. 16. 

Upon, prep. Used in phrases where we should now empk>7 other (Vfr 
positions. * Upon a natural curiosity ' = ' out of a natural curion^*: 
p. 42, 1. 20. 'Proceeding upon some inward discontent '«:prooeediflg 
from, &c. : p. 54, 1. 19. * Upon a more original tradition': p. 104,1 ai. 
' Upon displeasure': p. 221, 1. 33. *Upon heat ': p. 231, 1, 23, &c. *To 
take advantage upon* = to take advantage of: p. 27, 1. 26. * To do good 
upon* == to do good to: p. 201, 1. 9. * Multipl3ring and extending tbeir 
form upon other things*: p. 195, 1. I, * Study upon*: p. 223, L !!• 
* Be bold upon ' : p. 223, 1. 8. See Glossary to Bacon's Essays. 

Ure, sb. Use: p. 151, 1. 15; p. 171, 1. 27. 

Use, v. i. To be accustomed : p. 21, 1. 3 ; p. 40, L 31. 

Use, sb. Usance, interest, increase: p. 126, 1. 15. 



V. 

Value, v.t. To give value to: p. 118, 1. 10. 

Vaporous, adj. Boastful, vain: p. 15. 1. 12; p. 123, 1. 31* 

Variably, adv. Unsystematically : p. 153,1. 22. 

Vastness, sb. A waste, wilderness : p. 1 20, 1. 5. 

Vehemency, sb. Vehemence: p. 177, 1. 25. 

Ventosity, sb. Windiness : p. 7, 1. 16; p. 95, 1. 13. 

Verdure, sb. Literally, greenness; and so, vegetation genenl^: pi 48, 

1. 17. 
Verity, sb. Truth : p. 91, 1. 18 ; p. T09, L 20. 



GLOSS ART. 375 

late» adj. Intricate, winding, like the moving of a worm : p. 31, 

), adj. Changeable: p. 24, 1. I. 

CLts, sb. Vestments, dress : p. 88, 1. 33. ' Vestimento, as Veste, 
'iment or vesture/ Florio, Ital. Diet. 

ide, sb. Change: p. 6, 1. 26. Order of things : p. 49, 1. 16. 
f. Empty : p. 43, 1/22. 

sb. Flights: p. 252, 1. 1 1. From Fr. volde a flight of birds. 
by, sb. Rolling or twisting motion : p. 201, 1. 6. 
adj. Capable of revolving: p. 239, 1. 27. 
yy, sb. A volunteer : p. 66, 1. 14. 

ary, adj. Belonging to pleasure : p. 133, 1. 25 ; p. 143, 1. 26, 
idj. Common, familiar : p. 54, 1. 8. 



W. 

To attend: p. 49, 1. 17. 
on. To attend : p. 95, 1. 3. 
. Defect, deficiency: p. 237, 11. 2I, 23, 
I, V. i. To attest : p. 1 1, 1. 27. 

audle, sb. A night light : p. 32, 1. 32. Compare Albmnazar 11. 
ly should I twine mine arms to cables, and sigh my soul to air ? 
ill night like a watching candle^ and distil my brains through mj 
' ' * My good old mistress was wont to call me her watch-candle, 
it pleased her to say I did continually bum (and yet she sufltered 
/aste almost to nothing).' Bacon, Letter to King. James (Works, 

> 

b. A piece of water : p. 105, 1. 9. Compare Teuiyson, Morte 
r: 

* On one side lay the ocean, and on one 
Lay a great water^ and the moon was full.' 
Lg, sb. Oscillation : p. 94, 1. 19. 

the phrase * to hold %vay with * ss to keep pace with : p. 14, L 16. 
ieep way with,' p. 113, 1. 10 ; * to take the way '-s to take steps 
ures: p. 173, 1. 27. 

A road : p. 144, 1. Ii ; p. 246, 1. 25. 
' No ways ' = in no way : p. 28, 1. 16 ; p. 56, L 25 ; p. 221, L 15. 

Welfare, prosperity : p. 55, 1. 33. 
X. To suffer from wear or use : p. 15, 1. 24, 
= were current about : p. 68, 1. 5. 

itter, p. 217, 1. 7 ; p. 222, 1. 25. We should now say 'a aian 
ter,* or * it were better for a man &c.' 
ne. At which time, when : p. 92, 1. 27. 
I, adv. Where : p. 68, 1. 9. 
•fpron. Which, of two: p. 195, 1. 32. 
-el. pr. Who ; used of persons : p. 9, L 18 ; p. 28, 1. 21 ; p. 233, 



376 GLOSSARF. 

Whiffler, sb. An officer whose duty it was to clear the waj for t proas' 
sion : p. 152, 1. 32. 

'Which like a mighty whiffler 'fore the king/ 

Shakespeare, Hen. V. y. Chor. I a. 

Wit, s5. Our modem word * intellect' expresses as nearly as possible the 
meaning which * wit ' had in Bacon's time : p. 33, 1. 26. See note 00 
p. 64, 1. 4, and comp. Essay vi. p. 18 ; xliv. p. 179. 'Games oiwU* tn 
games of skill or science as opposed to games of chance : p. 256, L 7* 

With, prep. Occurs where we should now use *by/ 'Waited on toUk*» 
attended by : p. 49, 1. 1 7. * Attended with ' = attended by : p. 59> L 14. 

Withal, prep. With : p. 24, 1. 3. Placed after the case it governs. 

Within, prep. Among : p. 46, 1. 21. 

Without, prep. Beyond : p. 185, 1. 25 ; p. 204, 1. 11. Comp. 2 Cor. i. 

I3> 15. 
Word, &b. Motto: p. 98, 1. i. 

'And the device he bears upon lus shield 

Is a black Ethiope reaching at the sun; 

The wordf * Lux tua vita mihL' 

Shakespeare, Per. u. a. 21. 

Work, 'To set on work* ^to set working: p. 198, 1. 7. So'tosetfli 

work*=^\o put in motion : p. 240, 1. 23. 

Worthy, sb, A hero: p. 53, 1. 4. Comp. 'the nine worikm* and Nab. 

ii. 5. 

Wrought, p.p. Influenced, worked upon: p. 177, L 24. 



Additional Note, 

P. 228 [20]. Dr. Thompson, the Master of Trinity College^ Cunbodgef 
has pointed out to me that the origin of Bacon's * globe of matter ' tf^ 
* globe of crystal or form ' is probably the a<ptupo9 aia$ijT69 and tii0 
<T<paipos vorjTOB of Empedocles as interpreted by Produs. See Proclai is 
Timaeum, p. 160 D, and Simplicius in Pbysica, p. 7 b. 



iober, 1876. 



BOOKS 



PltlNTKD AT 

S GliABENDON FBESS, OXFORD, 

AND PUBUSHBD FOR THE UNtVBRStTY BY 

MACMHiIiAK AND CO., 

>, BEDFORD STREET, COVENT GARDEN, LONDON. 



LEXICONS, GBAMMABS, Ao. 
eek-English Iiezioon, by Henry Gcoi^ liddell, 

., and Robert Scott, D.D. SiiOh Bditumt Rtvismi and AugnmOed, 2870, 
tloth, 1.L x6s. 

'eek-English Lexioon, abridged from tiie above, 

ly for the use of Schoola SuOeenth BdOtOHt cmr^dl^rttdmi tkrti g ktmL 
square z2mo. cloth, js. 6d, 

iou8 Greek-English Vocabulary, comfMled from tlie 

authorities. 1850. 34010. tound, y, 

ae Grammaticae Budimenta in usnm Scholanun. 

ore Carolo Wordsworth, D.C. L. Eig^tt^nth EditioH, x^S naoiO. k oumd, 4fc 

actical Introduction to Greek Aoomtnation, by 

f. Chandler, M.A. 1862. 8vo. cMk^ lor. 6d, 

ler's Iiexicon of the Latin Tongue, with the German 

inatioQS translated into English by J. E. ^ddle, M.A. zQss fbL ektM, 

ictical Grammar of the Sanskrit Itangoage, ar* 

;d with reference to the Classical Languages of Europe^ fw the nse of 
ish Students, by Monier Williams, M.A. 7%9nlEdaiOH, 1864. 8to. eMh, 

nskrit English Dictionary, Etymolocically and 

ilog^ically arranged, with special reference to Greek. Latin, GenDan. 
o-Saxon, English, and other cognate Indo-Enropean Languages. By 
er Williams, M. A., Boden Professor of Sanskrit iBja. 4to. ciotk, 4/. X4f. 6d, 

ielandic-English Dictionary. By the late R. Cleasby. 

rg'ed and completed by G. Vigfusson. With an Introductiofi, and Lire 
Cleasby, by G. Webbe Dasent, D.C.L. 4ta cMh, 3I. js. 



Books lately printed at the 



QBEEK CLASSICS. 
Aesoliylns: Tragoediae et Fragmenta, ex recei 

DindorfiL Second Edition^ 1851. 8vo. cMh, sx. td. 

Sophooles : Tragoediae et Fragmenta, ex recens 

commentariis GiiiL DindorfiL Third Edition, a ▼0I& ^860. fi 
iJ. zs. 

Each Flay separately, li*n/, as. 6d. 

The Text alone, printed on writing papei 

margia, royal i6mo. cioth, &r. 

The Text alone, square i6mo. elotb, 3s. 6 

Each Flay separately, iirn^, 6d. 

Sophocles : Tragoediae et Fragmenta cam Am 

Dindorfii. Tomi IL 1849. 8va cMh, xos. 

The Text, VoL I. y. 6d. The Notes, VoL IL 4*. 6d. 

Suripides : Tragoediae et Fragmenta, ex rece 

DindorfiL Tomi IL 1834. 8vo. cMM, lor. 

Aristophanes : Comoediae et Fragmenta, . ex 

GuiL DindorfiL Tomi IL 1835. 8vo. cltOh, lis. 

Aristoteles ; ex recensione Immanuelis Bekkeri 

Indices SylburglanL Tomi XL 1837. 8vo. cM/if al 10s. 

Each volume separately, sr. 6d. 

Demosthenes: ex recensione Guil. Dindorfii 

1846. 8vo. cloth, iL IS. 

Homems : Hias, ex rec. GuiL DindorfiL 1856. 
Homems: Odyssea, ex rec. Guil. Dindorfii. 

dothfSS. 6d. 

« 

Flato: The Apology, with a revised Text a 

Notes, and a Digest of Flatonic Idioms, by James Riddell, 1 
cloth, 8s. 6d. 

Plato : Fhilebns, with a revised Text and Enj 

by Edward Poste, M.A. i860. 8va cloth, js. 6d. 

Plato : Sophistes and Foliticns, with a revise 

English Notes, by L. Campbell, M.A. x866. 8va cloth, z&r. 

Plato : Theaetetus, with a revised Text and £n 

by L. Campbell, M. A. i86z. 8vo. doth^gs. 

Plato : The Dialogues, translated into Englist 

lyses and Introductions. By B. Jpwett, M.A., Master of Ball: 
Keeius Professor of Greek. A new Edition in five volunu 

cloth, 3/. lor. 



Clarendon PresSy Oxford 



THE HOLY SOBIPTUBES. 
The Holy Bible in the Earliest English Versions, made from 

the Latin Vulgate by John Wycliffe and his followers : edited by the Rev. J. 
Forshall and Sir F. Madden. 4 vols. 1850. royal 4to. cloth, ^f. y. 

The Holy Bible : an exact reprint, page for page, of the 

Authori2ed Version published in the year z6ii. Demy 4to. hiu/bound, x/. is. 

N'ovmn Testamentum Graeoe. Edidit Carolus Lloyd, 

S.T.P.R., necnon Episcopus Ozoniensis. 1869. iSmo. clothe y. 

The same on writing paper, small 4to. clothe los. 6rf. 
Ifovum TestamentTuu Graece juxta Exemplar Millianmn. 

z868. i8mo. cloth, ax. td. 

The same on writing paper, small 4to. cloth^ (is* 6d. 
Evangelia Saera Graeoe. 1870. fcap. 8vo. limp, is. 6d. 
Vetus Testamentum ex Versione Septuaginta Interpretum 

secundum exemplar Vaticanum Romae editum. Accedit potior varietas Codicis 
Alexandrini. Edit to Altera, Tomi III. z8mo. cloth, zSf. 

ECCLESIASTICAIi HISTOB7, &o. 
Baedae Historia Ecclesiastica. Edited, with English 

Notes, by G. H. Moberly, M.A. 1669. crown 8vo. cloth^ 10s. 6d. 

Bingham's Antiquities of the Christian Church, and other 

Works. 10 vols. 1855. 8vo. cloth. Price reduced/rom $1. y. to 3/. y. 

Eusebius' Ecclesiastical History, according to the Text 

of Burton. With an Introduction by William Bright, D.D., Regius Professor 
of Ecclesiastical History, Oxford. Crown 8vo. cloth, 8Lr. 6d. 

The Orations of St. Athanasius against the Arians. With 

an Account of his Life. By William Bright, D.D. Crown 8va cMh, gs. 

Fatrum Apostolicoruni, S. dementis Romani, S. Ignatii, 

S. Polycarpi, quae supersunt Edidit GulL Jacobson, S.T.P.R. Tomi IL 
Fourth Edition, 1863. 8vo. cloth, z/. is. 

ENGLISH THEOLOGY. 
Butler's Analogy, with an Index. Svo. cloih, 5s. 6d, 
Butler's Sermons. Svo. clothf 55. 6d, 
Greswell's Harmonia Evangelica. Fifth Edition, 1856. 

8vo. cloth, 9T. 6d. 

Hooker's "Works, with his Life by Walton, arranged by 

John Keble, M.A. Sixth Edition, 3 vols. 1874. 8vo. cloth, i/. 11s. 6d. 

Hooker's "Works ; the text as arranged by John Keble, M.A. 

a vols. 1875. 8vo. cloth, 11s. 

Pearson's Exposition of the Creed. Revised and corrected 

by E. Burton, D.D. Sixth Edition, 1870. Svo. cloth, 10s. 6d. 

Waterland's Review of the Doctrine of the Eucharist, with 

a Preface by the present Bishop of London. 1868. crown Svo. doth, 6s. 6d. 



Clarendon Press ^ Oxford. 



ENGLISH HISTOBY. 
A History of England. Principally in the Seventeenth 

Century. By Leopold Von RanlcCi 6 vols. 8va clotht 3/I, y. 

Clarendon's (Edw. Earl of) History of the Rebellion and 

Civil Wars in England. To which are subjoined the Notes of Bishop War- 
biuton. 7 vols. i&^ mediiun 8va cloth, ai. xot» 

Clarendon's (Edw. Earl of) History of the Rebellioa and 

Civil Wars in England. 7 vols. X839. x8ma cloth, zZ zx. 

Freeman's (E. A.) History of the Norman Conquest of 

England : its Causes and ResultSi Vols. L and IL 8va xi. i6r. 

VoL III. The Reign of Harold and the InterrM[nnm. 8vo. cMA, z/. u. 

VoL IV. The Rogn of WiUiam. 1871. 8vo. dcth, il. is. 

Vol. V. The Eficcts of the Norman Conquest. 8va doth, xL %g. 



Bogers's Histoiy of Agriculture and Prices in England, aj>« 

X3S9— Z40& s vols. z86& 8vo. cMh, al. as. 



MATHEMATICS, FHTSICAIi SCIENCE, fte. 
An Acconnt of Vesuvius, by John Phillips, MA^ F.RJS.t 

Professor of Geology, Oxford. 1869^ Crown 8vo. doth, xos. 6d, 

Treatise on Infinitesimal Calculus. By Bartholomew 

Price, M. A., F.R.S., Professor of Natiu:al Philosophy, Oxford. 

VoL L Differential Calculus. Second Edttion, z8^ 8va doth, 149. tfdL 

VoL IL Integral Calculus, Calculus of Variatioiis,and DifferentU Eqmtlaaft 
Second Edition, 186^ 8vo. dt^, z8r. 

VoL III. Statics, including AttractioBS ; Dynamics of ■ Bfaterial FMtida 
Second Edition, z868. 8va cloth, z6r. 

Vol. rv. Dynamics of Material Systems ; t<M;ether with a Chapter on Theo- 
retical Dynamics, by W. F.Donkin,M. A., F.R.Sb z86aL 8va <MUI,]te 



MISCELLANEOnS. 
An Introduction to the Principles of Morals Mid 

Legislation. By Jeremy Bentham. Crown 8vo. cloth, 6s, 6d. ^ust PmMshtd, 

Bacon's Novum Organum, edited, with English Notes, by 

G. W. Kitchin, M.A. 1855. 8va cloth, gs. 6d. 

Bacon's Novum Organum, translated by G. W. K^'^^"*, 

M.A. 1855. 8va cloth, gs. 6d. 

Smith's 'Wealth of Nations. A new Edition, with Notes, 

by J. E. Thorold Rogers, M.A. 3 vols. 8va doth,ajs. 

The Student's Handbook to the IJniTersitT' wid OoiU 

leges of Oxford. Third Edition. Extra fcap. 8vo. daih, ms, 6d, 



The Delegates of the Clarendon Press having undertaken 
the publication of a series of works, chiefly educational, and 
entitled the Clarentlon ^ress SSeries, have published, or have 
in preparation, the following. 

Those to "Which prices are attached are alreatfy published; the «thert eart in 

Preparation, 

I. LATIN AND GBEEK CI1A88IC8, fto. 
An Elementary Latin Grammar. By John B. Allen, M. A., 

Head Master of Perse Grammar School, Cambridge. Extra fcapk 8to. cMA, 
3X. td. 

A First Latin Exercise Book. By the same Author. 

Extra fcap. 8vo. ctoth^ as. 6d. 

A Series of Gradttated Latin Readers, 
First Latin Bearder. By T. J. Nunns, M.A. Second 

Edition. Extra fcap. 8vo. clothe as. 

Second Latin Header. By Joseph Wood, M.An The 

College, Leamington. , » 

Third Latin Header, or Spedmens of Latin Literature. 

Fart I, Poetry. By James McCall Marshall, M.A., Duhdch College. 

Fourth Latin Header. 

Cicero. Selection of interesting and descriptive passages. 

With Notes. By Henry Walford, M.A., Wadham College, Oxford, Assistant 
Master at Hail^bury College. In three Parts. Th^^ EdOion. Ext fcap. 
8vo. cloth, ^.6a. 

Each Part separately » in limp cloth, xt. td. 

Part I. Anecdotes from Grecian and Roman History. 
Part II. Omens and Dreams : Beauties of Nature. 
Part III. Rome's Rule of her Provinces. 

Cicero. Select Letters (for Schools). With Notes. By the 

late C E. Prichard. M.A., and E. R. Bernard, M.A., Fellow of Magdalen 
CoU^e, Oxford. Extra fcap. 8vo. cloth, y. 

Pliny. Select Letters (for Schools). With Notes. By the 

same Editors. Extra fcap. 8vo. cloth, y. 

Cornelius Nepos. With Notes, by Oscar Browning, M.A., 

Fellow of King's College, Cambridge, and Assistant Master at Eton College. 
Ext. fcap. 8vo. cloth, as. 6d. 

Caesar. The Commentaries (for Schools). Part I. The 

Gallic War, with Notes and Maps, &c. By Charles E. Moberiy, M. A., Asdstant 
Master in Rugby School ; formerly Scholar ot Balliol CoOeg^ Oxford. Ext. 
fcap. 8vo. cloth, 4^. 6d. 

Part II. The Civil War. Book I. By the same Editor. 

Ext. fcap. 8vo. cloth, as. 



Clarendon Press Series. 



Ijivy. Selections (for Schools). With Notes and Maps. 

By H. Lee Warner, M.A., Assistant Master at Rtigby SchooL In Parts. 
Ext. fcap. 8to. cMh, is. id. each. 

Part I. The Caudme Disaster. 

Part II. Hannibal's Campaign in Italy. 

Part III. The Macedonian War. 

Iilvy, Books I-X. By J. R. Seeley, M.A., Fellow of Christ's 

College, and Regius Professor of Modem History, Cambridge. Book L Secntd 
Edition. Demy 8vo. cloth, 6s. 

Also a small edition lor Schools. 

Passages for Translation into Latin. For the use of 

Passmen and others. Selected by J. Y. Sargent, M.A., Fellow of Magdaloi 
College, Oxford. Fourth Edition. Ext. fcap. 8vo. cMh, as. 6d. 

TacitTis. The Almals. Books I— VI. "With Essays and 

Notes. By T. F. Dallin, M. A., Tutor of Queen's CoIl<^e. Oxford. Prt^^aring, 

Cicero's Philippic Orations. With Notes. By J. R. King, 

M.A., formerly Fellow and Tutor of Merton Collie, Oxford. Demy 8va 
clothf los. 6d, 

Cicero. Select Letters. With English Introductions^ 

Notes, and Appendices. By Albert Watson, M.A., Fellow and Lecturer oif 
Brasenose College, Oxford. Second Edition. Demy 8vo. cioth, zftr. 

Cicero. Select Letters (Text). By the same Editor. 

Extra fcap. 8vo. c/oth, 4f. 

Cicero pro Cluentio. With Introdaction and Notes. By 

W. Ramsay, M.A. Edited by G. G. Ramsay, M.A., Professor of Humaiiityf 
Glasgow. Ext, fcap. 8vo. doth, y. 6d. 

Cicero de Oratore. With Introduction and Notes. By 

A. S. Wilkins, M. A., Professor of Latin, Owens College, Manchester. 

Catulli Veronensis Liber. Recognovit, apparatum criticnm 

prolegomena appendices addidit, Robinson Ellis, A.M. 1867. Bra cMM, ita 

Catulli Veronensis Carmina Selecta, secunduin recog- 

nitionem Robinson Ellis, A.M. Extra fcap. 8va cloth, 3s. id, 

Ovid. Selections for the use of Schools. With Introduc- 
tions and Notes, and an Appendix on the Roman Calendar. By W. Ramsay. 
M.A. Edited by G. G. Ramsay, M. A., Professor of Humanity, Glasgow. Jm¥wa 
Edition. Ext fcap. 8vo. cloth, sr. 6d, 

Horace. With Introductions and Notes. By Edward C 

Wickham, M.A., Head Master of Wellington Coll^^ 
Vol. I. The Odes, Carmen Seculare, and Epodes. Demy Sro. cleUk, ia& 

Also a small edition for Schools. 



Persius. The Satires. With a Translation and Com- 

mentiry. By John Coningfton, M.A., late Corpus Professor of Latin in the 
University of Oxford. Edited by H. NettJeship, M.A. Sra cloth, 7t,6d. 

Selections from the less known Latin Poets. By North 

Finder, M.A. Demy 8vo. cloth, i^s. 



Clarendon Press Series. 



Fragments and Specimens of Early Latin. With Intro- 
duction and Notes. By John Wordsworth, M.A., Tutor of Brasenose College, 
Oxford. Demy 8vo. clothf i&r. 

A Manual of Comparative Philology, as applied to the 

Illustration of Greek and Latin Inflections. By T. L. Papillon, M.A., Fellow 
of New College. Crown 8vo. cloth, 6s. 

The Boman Poets of the Augustan Age. By William 

Young Sellar, M.A., Professor of Humanity in the University of Edinburgh. 
In tne Press. 

The Boman Poets of the Bepublio. By the same 

Editor. Preparing. 

The Ancient Ijanguages of Italy. By Theodore Aufrecht, 

PhiL Doct. Preparing. 



A Greek Primer, in English, for the use of beginners. By 

the Right Rev. Charles Wordsworth, D.C.L., Bishop of St. Andrews. Fourth 
Edition. Ext. fcap. 8vo. clothe is. 6d. 

Greek Verbs, Irregular and Defective; their forms, 

meaning, and quantity ; embracing all the Tenses used by Greek writers, with 
reference to the passages in which they are found. By W. Veitch. New 
Edition. Crown Svo. cloth, xos. 6d. 

The Elements of Greek Accentuation (for Schools) : 

abridged from his larger work by H. W. Chandler, M.A., Waynflete Professor 
of Moral and Metaphysical Philosophy, Oxford. Ext fcap. Svo. clothe as. 6d, 

A Series of Graduated Greek Readers. 

First Greek Beader. In Preparation. 

Second Greek Beader. In Preparation^ 

Third Greek Beader. In Preparation, 

Fourth Greek Beader ; being Specimens of Greek 

Dialects, with introductions and Notes. By W. W. Merry, M.A., Fellow 
and Lecturer of Lincoln College. Ext. fcap. Svo. cloth, 4s. 6af. 

Fifth Greek Beader. Part I, Selections from Greek Epic 

and Dramatic Poetry, with Introductions and Notes. By Evel)m Abbott, M.A., 
Fellow and Tutor of Balliol College. Ext fcap. Svo. cloth, 4J. 6d, 

Part II. By the same Editor. In Preparation. 

Xenophon. Selections (for Schools). With Notes and 

Maps. By J. S. Phillpotts, B.C. L., Head Master of Bedford School. 

Part I. Second Edition. Ext. fcap. Svo. cloth, y. 6d. 

Part II. By the same Editor, and C. S. Jerram, M.A., Trinity College, 
Oxford. Nearly ready. 

Arrian. Selections (for Schools). With Notes. By J, S. 

Phillpotts, B.C.L., Head Master of Bedford School. 



8 



Clarendon Press Series, 



The Golden Treasury of Andent Greek Poetry ; being t 

Collection of the finest passages in the Gredc Classic Poets, with Introdnctanr 
Notices and Notes. By R. S. Wright, M.A., Fellow of Oriel CoU^^, Qzfbrd. 
Ext. fcap. 8yo. doth, 8s. 6d. 

A. Golden Treasury of Greek Prose ; being a Collection of 

the finest passages in the principal Greek Prose Writers, with bUrodiictoiy 
Notices and Notes. By R. S. Wright, M.A., and J. E. L. Shadwdl, M.A. 
Ext fcap. 8vo. cio/A, is. 6d, 

AristoUe's FoUtics. By W. L. Newman, MA.» FeQow 

of Balliol C<^^e, Oxford 

Demosthenes and Aeschines. The Orations on flie 

Crown. With Introductory Essays and Notes. By G. A. Simcox, M.A., aid 
W. H. Simcox, M.A. Demy 8to. eMh, xax. 

Theocritus (for Schools). With Notes. By H. Kynaston, 

Hate Snow,) M.A., Head Master of Cheltenham College. Second Ed^ion. 
Ext fcap. 8va clcth, ^s. 6d. 

Homer. Iliad. By D. B. Monro» M.A., Fellow and Tutor 

of Oriel CoHege, Oxford. 

Also a smaller editi(m for Schools. 

Homer. Odyssey, Book II. With Introduction, Notes» 

and Table of Homeric Forms. By W. W. Merry, M.A., Fellow and Lectmer 
of Lincoln Collie, Oxford. Ext. leap. 8vo. cMA, is. 6d, 

Homer. Odyssey, Books I-XII (for Schools). By W. W. 

Meny, M. A., Fellow and Lecturer of Lincoln Collie, Oxford. I^Pitrth EdUiom, 
Ext fcap. 8vo. cloth, 4J. 6d. 

Homer. Odyssey, Books I-XII. By W. W. Meny, MA., 

Fellow and Lecturer of Lincoln College, Oxford ; and the late James Riddell, 
M.A., Fellow of Balliol College, Oxford. In the Press. 

Homer. Odyssey, Books XIII-XXIV. % Robinson Ellis, 

M. A., Fellow of Trinity College, Oxford. 

Plato. Selections (for Schools). With Notes. By B. Jowett, 

M.A., Regius Professor of Greek ; and J. Purres, M.A., Fellow aad Lecturet 
of Balliol College, Oxford. 

Sophocles. The Plays and Fragments. With English Notes 

and Introductions. By L.ewis Campbell, M. A., Professor of Oe^ St. Aadbews, 

formerly Fellow of Queen's College, Oxford. 

Vol I. Oedipus Tyrannus. Oedipus Coloneus. Aatigone. Sro. eietk, 141; 

Sophocles. The Text of the Seven Pkys. For the use of 

Students in the University of Oxford. By the same Editor. ExL fcaa. Sio. 

cMh, AS. 6d. '~'' 

Sophocles. In Single Play%, with English Notes, &c By 

Lewis Campbell. M. A., Professor of Greek, St Andrews, and ET«lym Abbott. 
M. A. , Fellow of Balliol College, Oxford. ' 

Oedipus T}rrannus. Ext. fcap. 8vo. cUth, is, 9A 
Oedipus Coloneus. Ext. fcap. 8vo. cMh, is. 9A 
Antigone. Ext fcap. 8vo. cMh, xs. ^. 
Ajax. Ext fcap. 8va cloth, ar. 

Sophocles. Oedipus Rex: Dindorfs Text, with Notes by 

the present Bishop of St David's. Extra fcap. Sro. doth, zt» 6d, 



Clarendon Press Series, 



II. MENTAL AND MOBAIi PHILOSOPHY. 

The Elements of Beduotive Logio, designed maiiily for 

the use of Junior Students in the Universities. By T. Fowler, M.A., Fellow 
and Tutor of Lincoln College. Oxford. Fifih EdOion, with a Collectioii of 



the use of Junior Students in the Universities. By T. Fowler, M. A., Fellow 
and Tutor of Lincoln College. Oxford. Fifth EeM,' '" - •• -• 
Examples. Ext. fcap. 8vo. cMAt y. 6d. 

The Elements of Inductive Logio, designed mainly for 

the use of Students in the Universities. By the same Author. Seamet Editicn, 
Ext fcap. 8vo. cloth, 6s. 

Selections from Berkeley. With an Introduction and Notes. 

For the use of Students in the Universities. By Alexander Campbell Fraser, 
LL.D., Professor of Lo^c and Metaphysics fai the Univenity ot £dinbui]gh. 
Crown 8vo. cloth, js. 6eL 

A Manual of Political Economy, for the use of Schools. 

By J. £. Thorold Rogers, M.A., formerly Professor of Political Economy, 
Oxford. Second Editum. Exti fcap. 8vo. aeth, 4s. 6d. 

III. MATHEMATICS, ftc. 

Figures made Sasy: a first Arithmetic Book. (Intro- 
ductory to 'The Scholar's Arithmetic.') By Lewis Hensl^. M.A., formerly 
Fellow of Trinity College, Cambridge. Crown 8vo. cMh, 60. 

Answers to the Examples in Figures made Basy. 

By the same Author. Crown Svo. dath, za 

The Scholar's Arithmetic. By the same Author. Crown 

8vo. cloth, 4s. 6d. 

The Scholar's Algebra. By the same Author. Crown 8yo. 

cloth, 4r. 6d. 

Book-keeping. By R. G. C. Hamilton, Financial Assistant 

Secretary to the Board of Trade, and John Ball (of the Firm of Quilter, Ball, 
& Co.). Co-Examiners in Book-keepmg for the Society of Arts. New ami 
enlarged Edition. Ext fcap. Svo. /im> clt^h, af . 

A Course of Lectures on Pure Geometry. By Hmry J. 

Stephen Smith, M.A., F.R.S.. Fellow of Corpus, Christi College, and Savilian 
Professor of Geometry in the Umversity of Oaord. 

Acoustics. By W. F. Donkin, M.A., F.R.S., Savilian Pro- 
fessor of Astronomy, Oxford. Crown Svo. doth, js. 6d. 

A Treatise on Electricity and Magnetism. By T. Clerk 

Maxwell. M.A.,F.R.S., Professor of Experimental Physics In the University 
of Cambridge, a vols. Demy Svo. cMh, li. xzx. €d. 

An Elementary Treatise on the same subject. By the 

same Author. Preparing. 

IV. HISTOBT. 
Select Charters and other Illustrations of English 

Constitutional History from the Earliest Times to the rdgn of Edward I. 
By W. Stubbs, M.A.. Regius Professor of Modem History. Oxford. Soeond 
Edition. Crown Svo. clotk, 8f . td. 



10 Clarendon Press Series. 



A Constitutional History of England. By W. Stubbs, M.A., 

Reprius Professor of Modem Hjstory, Oxford. Vols. I. aad 11. Crown 8to. 
c/otA, each las. 

Genealogical Tables illustrative of Modem History. 

By H. B. George, M.A. New Edition, Revised and CorrecUd. Small 4to> 

cloth, 12S. 

A History of France, down to the year 1453. With 

numerous Maps, Plans, and Tables. By G. W. Kitchln, M.A., formeily Censor 
of Christ Church. Crown 8vo. ciotk, los. 6d. 

Vols. II and III. From 1453- 1789. ^Y ^^ same Author. In ike Press. 

A. Manual of Ancient History. By George Rawlinson, 

M. A., Camden Professor of Ancient History, Oxford. Demy Svo. cMM, 14*. 

A History of Q-ermany and of the Empire, down to the 

close of the Middle Ages. By J. Bryce, D.C.L., Regius Professor of Cfaril 
Law, Oxford. 

A History of British India. By S. J. Owen, M.A., Tutor 

and Reader in Law and Modem History, Christ Church. 

A History of Greece. By E. A. Freeman, MA., fonnerly 

Fellow of Trinity College, Oxford. 

Selections from the 'Wellesley Despatches. Edited by 

b. J. Owen. M.A., Tutor and Reader in Law and Modem History, Christ 
Church, /h the Press. 

V. IiA-W. 

Elements of Iiaw considered with reference to Principles 

of General Jurisprudence. By William Markby, M.A., Judge of the Higli 
Court of Judicature, Calcutta. Second Edition, with Supplement. Crown 8to. 
cloth, js. 6d. 

An Introduction to the History of the Iiaw of Beal 

Property, with Original Authorities. By Kenelm E. Digby, M. A., fonneriy 
Fellow of Corpus Christi College, Oxford. Crown Svo. datk, js. 6A 

Qaii Institutionum Juris Civilis Conunentarii Quatnor; 

or, Elements of Roman Law by Gains. With a Translation and Commentary. 

By Edward Poste, M. A., Barrister-at-Law, and Fellow of Oriel CoUes^e, OsfiDrd. 

Second Edition. Svo. cloth, z&s. I 

j 

The Institutes of Justinian, edited as a Recension of the < 

Institutes of Gaius. By Thomas Erskine Holland, B.C.L., Chichele Pitrfessor I 
of International Law and Diplomacy, and formerly Fellow of Exeter CoUiegfi, 1 
Oxford. Extra fcap. Svo. cloth, 5J. j 

The Elements of Jurisprudence. By the same Editor. ' | 
Select Titles from the Digest of Justinian. By T. K ! 

Holland, B.C.L., Chichele Professor of International Law and Diplomacy, and I 
fonnerly Fellow of Exeter College, Oxford, and C. L. Shadwell, B.C,L., i 
Fellow of Onel College, Oxford. In Parts. 

Part I. Introductory Titles. Svo. setved, as. 64. 
Part II. Family Law. Svo. sewed, is. 
Part III. Property Law. Svo. sewed, 2s. 6d, 



Clarendon Press Series, 



II 



VI. PHYSICAL SCIEM-CE. 
Descriptive Astronomy. A Handbook for the General 

Reader, and also for practical Observatory work. With 224 illustrations and 
numerous tables. By G. F. Chambers, F.R.A.S., Barrister-at>Law. DemySvo. 
856 pp., cloth, i/. IS. 

Chemistry for Students. By A. W. Williamson, Phil. 

Doc, F.RS., Professor of Chemistry, University College, London. A new 
Edition, with Solutions. Ext. fcap. 8vo. cloth, %s. 6d. 

A Treatise on Heat, with numerous Woodcuts and Dia- 
grams. Bv Balfour Stewart, LL.D., F.R.S., Professor of Physics, Owens 
College, Manchester. Third Edition. ExL fcap. 8vo. cloth, js. 6d. 

Forms of Animal Life. By G. Rolleston. M.D., F.R.S., 

Linacre Professor of Physiology, Oxford. Illustrated by Descriptions and 
Drawings of Dissections. Demy 8vo. cloth, i6x. 

Exercises in Practical Chemistry. By A. G. Vernon 

Harcourt, M.A., F.R.S., Senior Student of Christ Church, and Lee's Reader 
in Chemistry; and H. G. Madan, M.A., Fellow of Queen's College, Oxford. 

Series I. Qualitative Exercises. Second Edition, Crown 8vo. clotht js. 6d. 

Series II. Quantitative Exercises. 

Geologry of Oxford and the Valley of the Thames. 

By John Phillips, M.A., F.R.S., Professor of Geology, Oxford. Svo. cloth, il. is. 

Crystallography. By M. H. N. Story-Maskelyne, M.A., 

Professor of Mineralogy, Oxford ; and Deputy Keeper in the Department of 
Minerals, British Museum, /n the Press, 



VII. ENGLISH LANGUAGE AND LITEBATURE. 
A First Beading Book. By Marie Eichens of Berlin ; and 

edited by Anne J. Clough. Ext, fcap. Svo. stiff covers, tjd. 

Oxford Beading Book, Part I. For Little Children. 

Ext fcap. Svo. stiff covers, 6d. 

Oxford Beading Book, Part II. For Junior Classes. 

ExL fcap. Svo. stiff covers, 6d. 

On the Principles of Grammar. By E. Thring, M.A., 

Head Master of Uppingham School Ext. fcap. Svo. cloth, 4r. 6d. 

Grammatical Analysis, designed to serve as an Exercise 

and Coraposition Book in the English Language. By E. Thring, M.A., Head 
Master of Uppingham School. Ext. fcap. Svo. cloth, y. 6d. 

An English Grammar and Beading Book, for Lower 

Forms in Classical Schools. By O. W. Tancock, M.A., Assistant Master of 
Sherborne School Second Edition. Ext. fcap. Svo. cloth, y. 6d. 

Specimens of Early English. A New and Revised Edi- 
tion. With Introduction, Notes, and Glossarizd Index. By R. Morris, LL.D. 
and W. W. Skeat. M.A. 
Part I. /n the Press, 

Part II. From Robert of Gloucester to Cower (A.D. 1298 to A.D. 1393). Ext. 
fcap. Svo. cloth, 7s. 6d. 



1 2 Clarendon Press Series. 



Specimens of English Literature, from the ' Plbughmans 

Crede' to the 'Shepheardes Calender' (A.D. 1394 to A.D. 1579). With Intro- 
duction, Notes, and Glossarial Index. By W. W. Skeat, l/LK. Ext. fcap. Sro. 

The Vision of T^illiam oonoeming Piers the FlowmBn, 

by WUliam Langland, Edited, with Notes, by W. W. Skeat, M.A. Seand 
edition. Ext. fcap. 8vo. clotAf 4r. 6d. 

Chaucer. The Prioresses Tale; Sire Thopas; The 

Monkes Tale : The Clerkes Tale ; The Squieres Tale, &c Edited by W.W. 
Skeat, M. A., Editor of Piers the Plowman. Ext. fcap. 8vo. ciotAt 4t. 6d. 

Chaucer. The Man of Law's Tale; The Pardoner's 

Tale ; The Second Nun's Tale ; The Canon's Yeoman's Tale, &c. By^the 
same Editor. Nearly ready. 

Shakespeare. Hamlet. Edited by W. G. Clark, M. A., and 

W. Aldis Wright, M.A. Extra fcap. 8va st\ff covers ^ at, 

Shakesi>eare. The Tempest. Edited by W. Aldis Wright, 

M.A. Extra fcap. 8vo. stiff arvers, is. 6d. 

Shakespeare. King Lear. By the same Editor. Ext. fcap. 

8vo. stiff" covers, "• 6<'» 

Shakespeare. As Tou Like It. By the same Editor. 

Nearly ready. (For other Plays, see page 15.) 

Milton. Areopagitica. With Introduction and Notes. By 

J. W. Hales, M. A. Extra fcap. 8vo. cloth, y. 

Addison. Selections from Papers in the Spectator. With 

Notes. By T. Arnold, M.A., University College. Extra fcap. Svo. cMh,\t. 6d. 

The Philology of the English Tongue. By J. Earle, 

M. A., formerly Fellow of Oriel College, and Professor of Anglo^axon, Oxford. 
Second Edition. Ext. fcap. Svo. cloth, js. 6d. 

Typical Selections from the best English Writers, with 

Introductoiy Notices. Second Edition, in Two Volumes. Extra fcap. 8v<x 
cloth. Sola separately, jf. 6rf. each. 

Vol. I. Latimer to Berkeley. Vol. II. Pope to Macanlay. 
Specimens of Lowland Scotch and Northern liTigHwli. 

By J. A. H. Murray. Preparing. 

See also XII. below for other English Classies, 



VIII. FBENCH LANGUAGE AND LITBBATUBB. 
Brachet*s Historical Grammar of the Frendi Language. 

Translated by G. W. Kitchin, M. A. Third Editton. Ext. fcap. Svo. clMh, 31. &^ 

An Etymological Dictionary of the French Language, with 

a Preface on the Principles of French Etymology. By A. Brachet Tnaalated 
by G. W. Kitchin, M.A. Crown Svo. cloth, los. 6d. 



Clarendon Press Series. 13 



Comeille's Cinna, and Molidre's Les Femmes Sayantes. 

Edited, with Introduction and Notes* by Gustave Masson. Ext fcap. 8to. 
clotht 2S. 6d. 

Racine's Andromaque, and Comeille's Le Mentenr. With 

Louis Racine's Life of his Father. By the same Editor. EjEt fcap. 8va ci9th, 

Molidre's Les Fourberies de Scapin, and Baoine's Athalie. 

With Voltaire^s Life of Motive. By the same Editor. Ext fcap^ 8to. cloth, 
3X. 6d, 

Selections from the Correspondence of Madame de S^rignd 

and her chief Contemporaries. Intended more eq;>eciaUy tat Girbf Schools, 
^y the same Editor. Ext fcap. 8va cloth, yt. 

Selections from Modem Writers. By the same Editor. 

Ext fcap. 8vo. cMh, as. 6d, 

Begnard's Le Joueur, and Bmeys and Falaprat^s Le 

Grondeur. With Notes. By the same Editor. Ext fcap. 8vow ckth, ar, 6dL 

XjouIs xrvr and his Contemporaries; as described in 

Extracts from the best Memours of the Serenteeath Century. With EneUsh 
Notes, Genealogical Tables, etc. By the same Editw. Extra fcap. Sra Ooth, 



T 



IX. GEBMAN LANGUAGB AJSTD LITBBATUBiB. 

New German Method. In Fonr Vols. By Hermann Lange^ 

Teacher of Modem Languages, Manchester. 
VoL I. The Germans at Home. 8vo. etoth, as. &£ S^MSt Pmd i i t hid, ' * 
Vols. II. and III. The German ManuaL In th* Presu 
VoL IV. German Composition. In Pr^aration, 

Goethe's Egmont With a Life of Goethe, &c. By C. A. 

Buchheim, Phil. Doc., Professor in King's Collie, London ; someome Bxft* 
miner to the University of London. Extra fcap. 9to. ^oth, 9c 

BchiUer's Wilhelm Tell. With a Life of Schiller ; an histo- 
rical and critical Introduction, Arguments, and a complete CommentMy. By 
the same Editor. Second Edition, Ext leap. 9fO. €Mh, y. 4A 

Lessing*s Minna von Bamhelm. A Comedy. With a Life 

of Lessing, Critical Analysis, Complete Commentary, &c. By i3m nme Editor. 

Ext fcap. 8vo. c/otJt, y. 6d. 

Goethe's Iphigenie anf Tanris. A Drama. With a 

Critical Introduction, Ar^ments to the Acts, and a complete Commentary. 
By the same Editor. In Preparation. 

Selections from the Poems of Schiller and Goethe. By 

the same Editor. In Preparation. 

Becker's (K. F.) Friedrich der Grosse. By the same 

Editor. In Preparation. 

Egmont's Leben und Tod, and Belagenms Ton Ant- 

werpen by Schiller. By the same Editor. In Pr^araHon, 



14 Clarendon Press Series* 



X. ABT, &o. 
A Handbook of Pictorial Art. By R. St. J. Tym 

M.A., formerly Student and Tutor of Christ Church, Oxford. With coi 
Illustrations, Photographs, and a chapter on Perspective by K. Macd 
Second Edition. 8vo. half morocco^ x8J. 

A Treatise on Harmony. By Sir F. A. Gore Ous 

Bart.. M. A., Mus. Doc, Professor of Music in the University of Oxford. . 
Edition. 4to. clothe vas, 

A Treatise on Counterpoint, Canon, and Fugue, I 

upon that of Cherubim. By the same Author. 4to. cMht z6r. 

A Treatise on Musical Form, and General Con 

sition. By the same Author. 4to. cloth, tos. 

A Music Primer for Schools. By J. Troutbeck, li 

and R. F. Dale, M. A., B. Mus. Second Edition, Crown 8vo. cMht is. 6 

The Cultivation of the Speaking Voice. By John He 

Stcond Edition. Extra fcap. 8vo. cloth, as. 6d, 



XI. MISCEIiIiANEOUS. 
JTezt-Book of Botany, Morphological and Fh] 

logical. Bv Dr. Julius Sachs, Professor of Botany in the University of Wiir 
Translatea by A. W. Bennett, M.A., Lecturer on Botany, St. Th' 
Hospital, assisted by W. T. Thiselton Dyer, M.A., Ch. Ch., Oxford. 
8vo. haljf morocco, 31 j. (>d. 

Dante. Selections from the Inferno. With Introdu< 

and Notes. By H. B. Cotterill,-B.A., Assistant Master in Haiieybnry C* 
Extra fcap. 8vo. cloth, ^. 6d, 

Tasso. La Gerusalemme Iiiberata. Cantos I, U. 

the same Editor. Extra fcap. 8vo. cloth, zs. 6d. 

A Treatise on the Use of the Tenses in Hebrew. 

S. R. Driver, M. A., Fellow of New College. Extra fcap. 8vo. cloth, dr. < 

Outlines of Textual Criticism applied to the New T 

ment. By C. £. Hammond, M.A.. Fellow and Tutor of Exeter C 
Oxford. Extra fcap. 8vo. cloth, 3s. 6d. 

The Modem Greek Language in its relation to An 

Greek. By E. M. Geldart, B.A., formerly Scholar of Balliol Collie, C 
Extr. fcap. 8va cloth, 4s. dd. 

A System of Physical Education : Theoretical and ] 

ticaL By Archibald Maclaren, The Gymnasium, Oxford. Extra fcap 

cloth, 7S. 6d. 



Clarendon Press Series, 15 



XII. A SEBIES OF ENGLISH CLASSICS. 

Designed to meet the <ivants of Students in English 
Literature: under the superintendence of the Rev. J. S. 
Brewer, M.A., of Queen^s College, Oxford, and Professor 
of English Literature at King^s College, London, « 

It is especially hoped that this Series may prove useful to 
Ladies^ Schools and Middle Class Schools ; in fwhich English 
Literature must al<ways be a leading subject of instruction. 



A General Introduction to thd Series. By Professor 

Bfewer, M.A. 

I. Chaucer. The Prologue to the Canterbury Tales ; The 

Knightes Tale ; The Nonne Prestes Tale. Edited by R. Morris Editor for 
the Early Encrlish Text Society, &c, &c. Sixth Edition. Extra fcap. 8vo. 
cloth, 2S. 6d. See also p. 12. 

a. Spenser's Faery Queene. Books I and II. Designed 

chiefly for the use of Schools. With Introduction, Notes, and Glossary. By 
G. W. Kitchin, M.A., formerly Censor of Christ Church. 

Book I. Eighth Edition. Extra fcap. 8vo. cloth, as. 6d. 

Book II. Third Edition. Extra, fcap. 8to. cloth, as. 6d, 

3. Hooker. Ecclesiastical Polity, Book I. Edited by R. W. 

Church, M.A., Dean of St. Paul's, formerly Fellow of Oriel College, Oxford. 
Second Edition. Extra fcap. 8vo. cloth, as. 

4. Shakespeare. Select Plays. Edited by W. G. Clark, 

M.A., Fellow of Trinity CoUcKe, Cambridge; and W. Aldis Wright, M.A., 
Trinity College, Cambridge. Extra fcap. 8vo. stiff covers, 

I. The Merchant of Venice, x*. 

II. Richard the Second, u. 6d. 

IIL Macbeth. \s. 6d. (For other Plays, see p. xa.) 

5. Bacon. 

I. Advancement of Learning. Edited by W. Aldis Wright, M.A. Second 

Edition. Extra fcap. 8vo. cloth, 4s. 6d. 

II. The Essays. With Introduction and Notes. By J. R. Thursfield, M.A., 

Follow and Tutor of Jesus College, Oxford. 



1 6 Clarendon Press Series. 



6. Milton. Poems. Edited by R. C. Browne, M.A., and 

Associate of King's College, London 2 vols. Fourth EdUion, Ext. icap. 8vo« 
cMh, dr. 6d, 

Sold separately^ VoL L 4^., VoL IL jr. 

7. Dryden. Stanzas on the Death of Oliver Cromwell; 

Astraea Redux ; Annus Mirabilis ; Absalom and Achitophel ; Rel^o Laid ; 
The Hind and the Panther. Edited by W. D. Christie, M. A., Trinity CoUqse, 
Cambridge. S^ond Edition. Extra fcap. 8vo. eMh, y. 6d, 

8. Bunyan. The Pilgrim's Progress; Grace Abounding. 

Edited by E Venables, M. A., Canon of Lincoln. In tM Press, 

9. Pope. With Introduction and NQtes. By Mark Pattison» 

B.D., Rector of Lincoln College, Oxford. 

L Essay on Man. F^th Edttion, Extra fcap. 8vo. stiff aroerSt xt. <SA 
II. Satires and Epistles. Second Edition, Extra fc^. Sra st^ffcovers^ a*. 

10. Johnson. Rasselas; Lives of Pope and Dryden* Edited 

by T. Arnold, M. A. University College. Pr^aring. 

11. Burke. Edited, with Introduction and Notes, by £. J. 

Payne, M.A., Fellow of University College, Oxford. 

L Thoughts on the Present Discontents ; the Two Speeches on America. 
etc. Second Edition, Extra fcap. 8vo. clothe 4^. 6d. 

II. Reflections ou the French Revolution. Extra fcE^). 8to. cloth, 51V 

12. Cowper. Edited, with Life, Introductions, and Notes, 

by H. T. Griffith, B. A., formerly Scholar of Pembroke College, Oxford. 

L The Didactic Poems of 1789, with Selections finom the Minor Pieces, 
KM. 1779-1783, Ext fcap 8vo. cloth, jf. 

II. The Task, with Tirocinium, and Selections from the Minor Foema^ 
A.D. 1784-1799. Ext. fcap 8vo. cloth, 3s. 

Published for the Univeraity by 
MACMIIiIiAN AND CO., LONDOiEr. 



T%e Deleoates of the Press inviie suggestiona and euhnce 
from all persons interested in education; and wUl h§ thankful 
for bintSt (tc, addressed to the Secretary to thb Deiaoatbs, 
Clarendon Presst Oxford, 



